
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
Ann Rule

THE FINAL CHAPTER?—

  2008

  PART ONE

  I never expected to be writing about Theodore Robert Bundy once again. The man who was neither famous nor infamous when I first knew him thirty-seven years ago has been dead for twenty years, and yet new generations are intrigued by him. I have written an epilogue, an afterword, “The Last Chapter,” and “Update: Twenty Years Later” for The Stranger Beside Me, my first published book, but Ted’s story never seems to end. I will probably continue to add to this book for years to come.

  Some of the information I added to my original book turned out to be untrue—folktales and rumors that most of the Bundy experts believed—and I want to correct those. The single executioner who pulled down the arm that activated the electric chair in Starke, Florida, wore no mask, nor did he have thick, mascaraed eyelashes. That was part of the legend of Ted.

  In this brand-new section, I have the words of an eyewitness to Ted Bundy’s death, and he will erase any misconceptions.

  New information about Ted keeps surfacing. And his “almost-victims” continue to come forward. Part of me wants to turn away and
be done with the memories of Ted. I’ll admit I even put off writing this chapter. The reason?

  Ted Bundy haunts me still.

  If his desperate fight to save his own life after taking so many others had succeeded and Ted was still locked behind prison bars, he would be an old-timer there now—sixty-two-years old. My granddaughter is now the age I was when I first met Ted, and I am a great-grandmother. Ted’s daughter with his then-wife, Carol Ann Boone, is twenty-six. Meg Anders’s child, who viewed Ted as a father figure, is close to forty.

  The young women Ted killed would be in their mid-fifties. Those myriad potential victims who barely escaped from him with their lives are between fifty and sixty today. No one will ever know just how many there were.

  The world moves on inexorably without Ted Bundy. But he left behind so many scars, nightmares, and memories that cannot be blotted out.

  Ted was never as handsome, brilliant, or charismatic as crime folklore has deemed him. But, as I have said before, infamy became him. A virtual nonentity before he was suspected of a series of horrific crimes, he somehow became all of those things as the media embraced him. The passage of decades has raised—or lowered—Ted to the level of Leopold and Loeb, Albert DeSalvo, William Heirens, Charles Manson, and perhaps a dozen other murderers who killed for the sake of killing.

  I always believed that time would blur the interest in Bundy, particularly after his execution. Instead, he has become almost mythical.

  As a pulp magazine writer yearning to be a book author, I should be grateful that I had a ringside seat to the monstrous scenario Ted Bundy acted out as, according to one periodical, the “glamour boy of homicide.”

  But I’m not grateful. I would rather I’d never had a book of my own, much less twenty-nine, and that Ted’s victims had lived. His crimes changed my life, and opened the door to my first book contract, but as a human being, I wish I could go back and erase him and his murderous swath through America. If only I had the power to make none of it real. Sometimes, after so many years, it almost seems that Ted Bundy and his dozens of victims were only a figment of my imagination.

  Ironically, the image of Ted that remains in the public eye almost forty years later tends to be that of the handsome and daring criminal. This is especially true with young women who are today the same age as his victims in the 1970s.

  I shouldn’t be surprised that I still get letters and e-mails from twenty-year-olds who are fascinated with Ted Bundy. Thirty years ago, I watched the Florida girls who lined up outside the courtroom in Miami, anxious to get a place on the gallery bench behind his defense table.

  They gasped and sighed with delight when Ted turned to look at them.

  He enjoyed their reaction. He was in control, or believed he was, during that first trial in Miami.

  For some reason, and I am at a loss to say why, I get more than an average proportion of mail from Italy, where women “love” Ted and mourn him. I’ve received mail about him from every state in the union, and from France, Sweden, Holland, Germany, and even Zimbabwe and China. He has become the American Jack the Ripper, the real Dracula, a killer whose genius soared over common murderers. And, in so being, he is perversely attractive to lonely women.

  Maybe part of it was my fault: Did I describe the “good” side of Ted, the one I saw in the first three years I knew him, too well? He appeared to be kind, considerate, and honest then, and I didn’t recognize the danger—not to me, but to pretty young women who fit his victim profile. I wanted to warn readers that evil sometimes comes in handsome packages. I wanted to save them from the sadistic sociopaths who still roam, looking for victims.

  When I look back, I see how naïve I was. I even see how naïve I’ve continued to be in one sense. I still want to save women’s lives, but just one more would be important to me.

  In 1980, I didn’t really understand the difference between being psychotic and having a personality disorder. In the first edition of this book, I wrote that Ted had to have been insane when he killed all those young women. I really thought Ted was just plain crazy, and said he should be sent to a mental hospital.

  And I was wrong. At least I understood that his personality disorder meant that he should never be released into society. But that’s about all I can take credit for. I’m not embarrassed that I stumbled over my diagnosis. Many psychologists and psychiatrists who interviewed Ted did, too.

  He wasn’t insane. He undoubtedly had a number of personality disorders—probably narcissistic, borderline, and sociopathic. One psychologist, who changed her diagnosis of Ted Bundy more than once, started out with bipolar and finally settled on Multiple Personality Disorder. I never agreed that either category was accurate. His characteristics and actions didn’t fit—unless you forced them into the wrong holes.

  Ted, I believe, was a sadistic sociopath who took pleasure from another human’s pain and the control he had over his victims, to the point of their death, and even after. He was a child, an adolescent, a young man who never felt much power over his life. He chose a hideous path as he sought power and control.

  He was all that mattered to him.

  One who suffers from a personality disorder knows the difference between right and wrong—but it doesn’t matter because he is special and he deserves to have and do what he wants. He is the center of the world. We are all paper doll figures who don’t matter. Under the law and medically, someone who is insane doesn’t know the difference and is not responsible for his actions, however shocking.

  Early on, I thought that at some point Ted would confess because he surely must have felt guilty. But he never felt guilty. He had no capacity for guilt.

  Only for survival.

  And there was something about Ted Bundy that so terrified some of the women who got away from him at the last minute. They “smelled” danger early enough to scream, fight, or run. For years, they couldn’t even talk about their encounters with him. They were middle-aged and he had been dead long enough to become less of a threat to them when they finally contacted me.

  Most of them were originally afraid to read The Stranger Beside Me because they didn’t want to find out that their belief that he’d approached them—chosen them—was real. The thin edge of their own mortality had come far too close to buckling.

  It was akin to being in a terrible accident and coming out alive, but you don’t want to think about it until you put some distance between you and the close call.

  I’ve asked permission to include some of these near-misses in this update and was told it would be okay, if I didn’t use their real names. I understand that.

  I’ve gone through more than a hundred incidents sent to me and I first chose only those that I believed were mostly true encounters with Ted Bundy. Even then, I’ve had to winnow down the frightening recollections, or I would be writing another book.

  The first memory comes from a middle-aged woman who is plagued by guilt and regret because she feels in her heart that she, and not Georgeann Hawkins, was Ted’s intended victim in June 1974. Worse, she watched, paralyzed with fear, as he grabbed Georgeann and walked her to his car, and her imminent death.

  Caitlyn Montgomery wrote to me several times. She no longer lives in the Northwest, but she was taking courses in nursing at the University of Washington in the mid seventies. She lived in the basement of a boardinghouse that was on the opposite side of the alley Georgeann walked down on June 10, 1974. Caitlyn sent me a photograph of herself taken at that time, and she looked enough like Stephanie Brooks* to be a mirror image. Stephanie was the woman Ted had proposed to only so he could dump her as she had abandoned him.

  “Someone had been peeking in our windows,” Caitlyn recalled, “and I’d seen the guy on crutches around our block. I felt as though he was following me. In fact, I came down that alley just moments before Georgeann Hawkins did. It was dark and I was afraid, and I ran into our house as quickly as I could and locked the doors behind me.

  “Then I turned the lights out, and I looked out
on the alley and saw the girl I later learned was Georgeann in the alley.”

  Caitlyn heard a yelp of surprise or fear. She watched as the man on crutches approached a blond girl, said a few words Caitlyn couldn’t make out, and then grabbed on to her arm. Caitlyn wasn’t sure if the girl went willingly or not, but she sensed fear, and believed he had forced Georgeann to walk back up the alley.

  “I should have tried to help her,” she wrote. “I should have called someone. Maybe the police. But I was too frightened. I just watched. And I’ve regretted it ever since. …”

  Caitlyn Montgomery was exactly the slender brunette type that Ted Bundy chose as victims time and time again. Georgeann was a blonde. Both of them were extremely attractive. I don’t know if Caitlyn was Ted’s original intended victim. Only he knew, and he, of course, is no longer here to say.

  In the seventies, the University District was still a fairly circumscribed area, much like it was when I finished my senior year, majoring in writing, a decade earlier. There was 45th Street, which ran east and west past the campus, and University Way, known as “The Ave,” going north and south. The Greek houses lined a few streets north of campus, and Ted usually lived on the west side of The Ave. Almost every north and south street had an alley at midblock.

  By my estimation, Ted roved from 41st Street as far as 65th, and on both sides of The Ave. I cannot count the number of women who were in their late teens or early twenties in the seventies who tell me of a handsome man in a Volkswagen Bug who was insistent that they accept a ride with him in that area. When they refused, he showed a searing flash of anger.

  But some encounters were more violent. The following is an e-mail I received in July 2008 (again, I have permission to print it with the author’s pseudonym). Oddly, I lived for one summer in the same apartment house she lived in, albeit years earlier. The apartments were one block west, and parallel to University Way.

  Audrey* writes:

  “I’m a fifty-three-year-old University of Washington graduate who lived in the Brooklyn apartments from 1973-1977. I was leafing through my recent UW Columns magazine and came across a short profile of you, and [which] mentioned your book, The Stranger Beside Me.”

 Audrey had never heard of me, but she was aware of Ted Bundy’s crimes and his execution and read stories in the local papers in the Midwest, where she had moved after graduation. She decided to read my book twenty-eight years after it was first published.

  “It was not until I hit page 98 in your book that I realized how close I may have come to being personally involved. You mention the street address where Ted resided during the time of the Seattle-area murders. For the first time I realized my apartment was less than a block from his rooming house.

  “One night (around 1973-1974), my roommate, an attractive brunette, and I (a long-haired blonde—parted down the middle) decided to treat ourselves to dinner at Horatio’s. She had aced her final in nursing school and we got dressed up to celebrate. I had been assigned a weird parking place at the apartment complex, which entailed going through the alley. It was turning dusk when we walked the stairs from our third-floor walk-up, and when we hit the alley, I remembered that I had forgotten my night-driving glasses. I told her to stay there and I would dash back up and get them.

  “I did.

  “When I got back down to the bottom of the apartment complex and turned the corner into the alley, I saw my roommate attempting to fend off a man who had her in a tight headlock.

  “I froze and then let out a guttural scream that I’ve never been able to duplicate since. It was so primal and bold that, later, a couple of guys a few blocks away told us they had heard it and knew something was wrong. The man then let go of my friend and ran toward 12th Avenue onto a lit back porch of a house. When he got to the porch, he turned around and looked back at us.

  “I will never forget those eyes and that stare as long as I live. At the time, other than being terrified, I didn’t think for a moment it could have been Ted. I don’t know why I didn’t put it together, except to say that I believe I had yet to see some media stories about him.

  “In the next few days, it was reported that Georgeann Hawkins had disappeared.”

  Audrey and her roommate called their boyfriends the night of the abduction attempt, and they rushed over and took them to their houses. Audrey’s fiance was an assistant professor at the University of Washington and he urged her to report it. But she didn’t because she felt no crime had actually been committed.

  “I was young and naïve.”

  Strangely, during the early morning when Ted was executed in January 1989, Audrey—then living in California— recalls sitting straight up in bed from a deep sleep at the exact moment Ted died.

  Was it Ted who found her lovely brunette roommate apparently alone in the dark?

  I think so.

  Audrey wrote to me one more time. I had told her that my ultimate goal was to warn women of danger, and hopefully save their lives with some bit of advice or caution they read in my books.

  “Just the other night,” she wrote, “I had watched a guy watch me go into a Pilates class, and he was still lurking when I headed out. So I went back in and called the cops to give me a police escort out of the building. He moved along before they arrived, but it is something, even at fifty-three, I wouldn’t have thought to do until reading your book, and realizing what the modus operandi is with some of these jerks.”

  A woman named Marilyn wrote a letter to me in 1998. She, too, lived in the greater Seattle area in 1974, and she was headed north on the I-5 Freeway one evening in early summer, for a meeting of social workers in a hospital in Northgate.

  “I left the freeway one exit too soon,” she recalled, “and I was looking for a way to get back on. But all I found was a sign that said VANCOUVER B.C. ONLY. It was then that I became aware of a light-colored Volkswagen Bug behind my car. I was pretty disoriented at that point, and I turned east on 65th Street instead of west toward the freeway. I kept turning into streets, looking for the freeway signs, but I was just going in a circle. After that, I was so late for my meeting that I was getting really nervous and the streets got narrower and narrower.

  “The Volkswagen was still behind me, and I was frightened. The guy driving it couldn’t possibly be taking the same mixed-up path I was on. The last turn had no outlet at all— unless you backed up. I pulled over to where the pavement ended in a field of weeds, and stopped. The guy in the VW parked behind me. …”

  Marilyn wrote that she had quickly locked her doors, but the man—with wavy brown hair—reached for the door handle anyway, and stared at her angrily through her driver’s side window.

  “Just then, a car full of high school guys pulled in behind him. I don’t know why, but they probably saved my life. The angry guy ran back to his car, forced them to back up, and he turned around and he was gone. The kids led me back to the freeway.

  “It was Ted Bundy. I recognized his eyes when I saw his picture in the Seattle Times several months later.”

  On August 10, 2007, I got an email from a fifty-two-year-old woman who had grown up in Olympia, Washington, our state capital. Ted worked for the Washington State Department of Emergency Services in Olympia for several months, beginning in the spring of 1974.

  Bettina wrote that she believed she had encountered Ted Bundy twice in the early-to-mid 1970s.

  “I was in high school in Olympia the first time,” she wrote, “and had decided to skip and walk home from school around Capitol Lake. I lived halfway up Harrison Hill on the west side of Olympia. It was a sunny day, I was halfway around the lake, and a VW Bug pulled over to me. The man inside asked if I wanted a ride. (I wore my hair long and parted in the middle in those days.) I said ‘sure,’ and got in the car. My visual memory is very vague as I was extremely shy, so I didn’t really look at him. Just sideways glances.

  “Anyway, I remember he had shortish dark brown hair. I don’t remember the color of the Bug, but it seemed like it was a light color. He asked me what college I went to, and I remember feeling flattered that he would think I was in college. I answered that I wasn’t in college, and that I was in high school. He dropped me off where I specified, and that was it.”

  But the man knew where Bettina lived.

  The second time Bettina saw this man was about eighteen months later. “I was already out of school, living in a rented house on Franklin Street in downtown Olympia. I still wore my hair long and parted in the middle. It was very late at night and I was wakened by a knock on the door. The door had windows, and I saw what I perceived to be a policeman standing on the porch. I remember looking out to the street before I opened the door and it struck me as odd that I hadn’t seen a police car. But I opened the door anyway and peered out, still looking for the car that wasn’t there.

  “I had a small dog that was barking wildly during all this, but the ‘policeman’ said he had a report from neighbors (across the street from me was a huge parking lot to a church—no houses). He pointed across the street, and he said that a girl with long hair, as the runaway was described, was seen coming into my house.

  “I had my hair up in curlers with a bonnet on, and I said, ‘Well, I have long hair, but I’m not a runaway—I live here.’ He seemed adamant about the runaway thing and he kept mentioning the description of long hair, but my dog was going crazy and I just wanted to end the whole conversation. So I just said he had the wrong place and shut the door. That was it. I never did see a cop car drive off. It was weird.”

  Bettina said she had forgotten those two incidents for years, until she read an article about Ted Bundy with pictures accompanying it.

  “‘Oh my God,’ I said. And it dawned on me that I’d gotten a ride home from school from Ted Bundy. I’m positive that’s who it was. And I remembered the late-night ‘policeman’ incident with no car, and I realized that was him, too. He must have been watching me.

  “It happened so long ago that it doesn’t really shake me up, but to think how things could have been different—if I hadn’t had my hair up in curlers or my dog wasn’t barking and throwing a fit—I could have been one of the names on the ‘list.’”

  The e-mails from women wh
o lived in Washington in the 1970s continue to pour in, and I expect to get more of them after this updated version of The Stranger Beside Me is released. Some women will be mistaken in identifying Bundy as the man who frightened them. I can usually weed those out by the dates and locations they give. Some come from women with overactive imagination. I can usually spot those, too. But many of them will be real sightings.

  One I find authentic is the recollection of a woman who was a college student in Salt Lake City in 1974. Ted moved there from Seattle that fall to attend law school in the Mormon city. Teresa lived in a large rented home with several other female students, a living arrangement very similar to the house that Lynda Ann Healey shared with her coed friends near the University of Washington before she disappeared in January of that year.

  “We had a voyeur—a window peeper—that fall,” Teresa said. “At first, we only had a feeling that someone was watching us, and then we saw him outside the downstairs’ window. We found signs that someone had been staying in the garage, at least some of the time.”

  When Teresa and her housemates finally got a good look at the man who was watching them, standing half-hidden by bushes, in the dark outside, they all memorized his facial features.

  “The police couldn’t find anything that might identify him,” she recalled. “They told us to be very careful about locking up, and we were. But when it got colder in November, we heard sounds coming from the basement. The worst was the morning we found that someone had defecated right outside the window where the guy had been watching us. But he left then, and never came back.”

  When Ted Bundy was arrested by Salt Lake County detectives in the summer of 1975, his picture was in papers from Salt Lake City to Seattle. Teresa and her friends recognized his face. He was the man who they’d seen in their window, who had left empty cans of tuna fish in the basement, who probably had defecated in their yard.

  Over the years, I’ve had many letters and e-mails from Utah. I’ve also had other communication from much more distant areas. Given the fact that Ted Bundy traveled America and Canada often, some memories that remain after three decades or more may well be true, no matter where they come from. We know Ted visited New England, Pennsylvania, Michigan, Chicago, the entire eastern seaboard, Oregon, California, Idaho, Colorado, Utah, Georgia, and more. Sometimes he traveled as part of his allegiance to the Republican Party. Sometimes he had his own reasons.

  I never dismiss correspondence simply because it comes from the other side of the country, because I know Ted Bundy may very well have been there at one time or another.

  A woman named Siobhan sent me an e-mail in April 2007. The content was very much like most of the “Bundy Sighting” I’ve received, but Siobhan lives in New Jersey.

  “Back in the seventies, I was sixteen,” she wrote. “I lived in Linden, New Jersey. I used to take the number 44 bus from Route 1 to Wood Avenue. I worked for a wedding clothes rental store. It was not until I read your book that I know I rode with Ted Bundy. It was pouring rain, my umbrella turned inside out, and I was soaking wet. The light was red, and a gold-colored VW pulled over and [the driver] rolled down the window. Sitting there was a handsome, well-dressed man. He said to me: ‘Come on, get in! You’re soaked. It’s okay.’

  “I was leery—it wasn’t something I would normally do— but I was cold and soaked. For a split second, I did think, Gee, such a nice, well-dressed man. You would think he’d be driving a Lincoln or something.

  “I got in the car, and said, ‘Make a left at the light.’ He did. I said, ‘When we get to Wood Avenue, make a right.’ As we approached Wood Avenue, he made a left instead. My insides were shaking. I knew this man knew the area. He went down to 16th Street. It was not a good area, if you know what I mean. There was a park where he pulled up to. As soon as he stopped, I poked him with my umbrella and said ‘f— you!’ and got out real fast. I had to walk all the way back to Route 1 in a neighborhood that also terrified me. It was still pouring out.

  “Years later, I saw pictures of Ted Bundy. I know without a doubt that it was him. I have told a few people. Maybe they believe me. Maybe they think I’m nuts. I just wanted to tell you.

  “My daughters laugh and say, ‘My mom escaped Ted Bundy!’ But I truly believe I did.”

  Siobhan isn’t sure if this happened in 1974 or 1975, but she knows it wasn’t in the wintertime. Is she right in her belief that she got away from Ted Bundy? I don’t know. Those were very “busy” years for Ted, and I cannot track him on all the stops on his trips to the East Coast.

  I’m inclined to guess that Siobhan met someone other than Ted, but I wouldn’t bet on it.

  Another East Coast e-mail is just as questionable, but possible.

  Long before I met Ted Bundy, he was active in Republican Party causes, and that made it somewhat easier to follow his activities. During the summer of 1968, he went to Miami, Florida, on a trip he’d won for his efforts to elect Nelson Rockefeller. He also took an intensive course in Chinese that summer at Stanford University in Palo Alto, California. By fall 1968, he was hired to be a driver and bodyguard for Art Fletcher in his candidacy for lieutenant governor of Washington State. In early 1969, Ted went back east again in an attempt to trace his own genetic heritage, a trip—as I’ve stated earlier—that took him to Burlington, Vermont, and to Philadelphia. Did Ted visit New York State in 1968 or 1969? It’s quite possible, and it would have to be for the meeting that Barbara believes she had with him.

  “My sister and I believe we met Ted Bundy in the central New York area in the summer of 1968. We were at a company picnic in a state park. We were middle-class girls, with long straight hair parted in the middle. He said he was a race car driver and he had a broken leg. He was driving a VW. We grew up near Watkins Glen racetrack and our family had a strong interest in auto racing. He asked me to go get him some food, which would have left my younger sister alone with him. I refused to leave her.

  “My father came to where we were sitting and sent him on his way. After telling us to go find our mother, my father had some harsh words with him, which my father refused to discuss with us. We got a long talking-to that evening.

  “In the early eighties, my sister called me from her office and asked if I had seen the paper. After buying a copy, I phoned her back. We both recognized him immediately. I am wondering if Ted Bundy was already approaching young girls in that time frame. That experience has actually made me a much more cautious person, and both my daughters and my niece have been raised to be much more cautious about strangers—especially attractive strangers.

  “We have always wondered about this and been grateful for my fathers surveillance. (There are five girls in my family. He must have been driven to distraction!)”

  Yes, it’s possible—even likely—that Ted passed through Watkins Glen, New York, on his way to Burlington, Vermont. But it would have been in the spring of 1969. Memory can trick us, and remembering an exact year four decades later is sometimes difficult.

  I think Barbara and her sister, young teens then, probably did meet Ted Bundy.

  As I write these recollections of women who survived, I hope my readers are taking careful note of why they did.

  They screamed.

  They fought.

  They slammed doors in a stranger’s face.

  They ran.

  They doubted glib stories.

  They spotted flaws in those stories.

  They were lucky enough to have someone step up and protect them.

  There is a true story I heard at a rape prevention conference in Tennessee years ago, and I’ve never forgotten it. This did not involve Ted Bundy, but it might have. There were some detectives at the conference who had arrested a man for the rape and murder of several young women, and he had been willing to talk to them, finally confessing. They described his confession:

  He had managed to lure one young woman into his car, and, once he had her inside, he pressed a knife against her ribs. “I told her that if she screamed, I
would kill her right there.”

  As they drove on a four-lane highway, they had to stop for a red light. A police cruiser pulled up beside them in the right-hand lane. It was a very warm evening, still light out, and both cars’ windows were open. The captured girl could have reached out her arm and touched the police car’s driver’s windowsill, but she felt the knife nudge more forcefully against her breast, and heard her captor say, “If you say anything, or call for help, you’re as good as dead. …”

  The interlude lasted less than a minute. The victim kept quiet.

  “That police car went straight ahead,” the suspect said. “I turned left, went down the road about half a mile, turned into a road, and I raped her and then I killed her.”

  PART TWO

  I wasn’t in Starke, Florida, when Ted Bundy had his date with “Old Sparky,” the electric chair in Raiford Prison, on January 24, 1989. Prison lore said that Old Sparky was made from an old oak tree, and constructed by prisoners in Raiford’s sawmill and carpentry shops in 1924. It wasn’t infallible, and sometimes burned the flesh and hair of the convicted killers who sat in it for the last time. Often, more than one jolt of electricity was required to kill them.

  In 1986, nineteen states had switched to the “more humane” lethal injection method.

  But Old Sparky had a waiting line.

  For some reason, I haven’t talked personally with anyone who was there in the execution chamber and gallery where Ted died—not until this week. Again, I may have been avoiding knowing all the details of Ted’s last moments.

  And then, in the summer of 2008, I received a nine-by-eleven-inch envelope from Dr. Arthur Burns, a Florida dentist whose partner, Clark Hoshall Jr., DMD, was not only present at Ted’s execution, his knees were three feet from Ted’s knees as the electric current coursed through his body. Art Burns enclosed a gripping piece that Clark Hoshall had written, describing what he had seen, heard, smelled, and experienced on that January morning in 1989.

Both Dr. Burns and Dr. Hoshall had been instrumental in identifying the remains of Kimberly Dianne Leach, twelve years old, the little girl from Lake City, Florida, who was Ted Bundy’s last victim. Although it was Burns’s signature on the official identification form, it was Hoshall who opened the little wooden box containing Kimberly’s skull and jaw.

  Peter Lipkovic, the medical examiner of the Fourth Judicial Circuit of Florida, had asked Hoshall to use his skill as a forensic dentist to tell us the truth. With anatomic identification, skeletal-dental components, and X-rays, Hoshall would be able to say absolutely if the size, placement, and even baby teeth matched the earlier dental treatment of Kimberly Leach. Ironically, Kimberly had had a fresh extraction shortly before she vanished.

  Her parents had taken good care of her.

  It wasn’t an easy assignment for Clark Hoshall. His own daughter, Victoria, was the same age as Kimberly Leach, and he couldn’t stop his mind from making comparisons and wondering how Kimberly’s family could bear this tragedy.

  Ken Robinson, the Florida Highway Patrol Officer who had found Kimberly’s skeleton in the hog farrowing shed near Suwanee State Park, had similar feelings: rage that anyone could do this to a seventh grader and a feeling of powerlessness that it was too late to save her.

  I suspect that few laymen understand the grief processes that law enforcement officers and forensic experts and prosecutors go through when the victims they seek to avenge are the most vulnerable of all: children.

  “I was the first witness to arrive for the execution of Theodore Robert Bundy,” Clark Hoshall wrote, and added to it when I talked to him by phone later. “When I arrived it was around three A.M. The moon was haloed and occupied a porthole in the otherwise cloud-covered sky. The impressive guard tower next to the main gate surveyed neatly manicured grass that carpeted three separate areas of razor-wired coils. Additionally, the ten-foot fencing presented an aura of impermeability.”

  The rest of the official witnesses appeared around 5 A.M. Dr. Hoshall had anticipated this day for more than a decade. “Professionally, the Bundy case will remain the most important case of my forensic career.”

  Clark Hoshall, Trooper Ken Robinson, and Prosecutor Jerry Blair were chosen to ride in the first van to the squat death chamber after they and the other witnesses and dignitaries had been served breakfast by convicts.

  On some other occasion, the smell of bacon and eggs, grits, pancakes, and coffee might have been tempting, but their plates were removed, barely touched.

  “I couldn’t eat,” Hoshall told me. “I had no appetite at all, nor did anyone else. It was a nice gesture, but knowing what was to come after …”

  Dr. Hoshall was sitting next to one of Raiford Prison’s psychologists.

  “I asked him if there was any effective treatment for people like Bundy.

  “He paused for a moment and said, ‘Only a sledgehammer between the eyes.’”

  The vans lined up, ready to drive across a grassy field. Hoshall carried a gold cross in his pocket.

  As he, Robinson, and Blair entered the viewing area, they hurried to the front row. Clark Hoshall chose the chair that lined up exactly with Old Sparky. Wainscoting, topped by clear glass, separated the witnesses from the death chamber.

  “Jerry Blair was seated on my left and Ken Robinson was on my right side.”

  Quietly, the twelve chairs were filled, and then people came in and stood along the pale, utilitarian walls of the gallery.

  “Guards with ‘iron claws’—T-bar handcuffs—on each of Bundy’s wrists pulled him through a doorway behind Old Sparky. He was shaking his head and trembling when he was dragged in.”

  Ted fought all the way to Old Sparky, but he was overpowered.

  Hoshall recalls no last words from the prisoner that made any sense at all. His further description is almost clinical, an image etched in his memory.

  “Bundy was uneasy and failed to keep eye contact until his head was strapped to a flat-backed, angular-sided headrest. A leather strap extended from below the right side of the lower jaw diagonally across his face, and was secured tightly above the left ear. The head strap compressed the nose laterally and squeezed Bundy’s left eyelids together. His right eye was open and looking straight forward.

  “I was eye-to-eye with one of the most heinous sexual predators of our time. My eyes were channeled with his right eye and I saw feral fear in his disheveled face—but no tears. A folded damp towel was placed on Bundy’s prepared head. A copper skull cap crowned with a bolt-like electrode was placed on his head. An electric cable was secured to the copper electrode. A leather-drop face mask [similar to a grinder’s face shield with leather in place of plastic] was part of the skull cap.”

  There was one chance left for Ted Bundy. A final phone call that could conceivably grant him yet another delay. The phone was mounted on the wall behind Old Sparky, and the lever arm to turn on the power was right beside it on the same wall.

  The phone rang. Someone answered it, shook his head, and within a “millionth of a second” or so, it seemed to Hoshall, the prison official standing behind the electric chair engaged a lever arm.

  “They didn’t want to give him any more time. It was done the instant they heard there was no word from the governor.”

  Contrary to reports that three masked “executioners” each pushed a button so that none of them would know which was the live button, Clark Hoshall denies that. “There was only that one lever, behind the chair.”

  “The electric force thrust through Bundy’s body. It strained against the tightly engaged restraints,” Hoshall wrote. “His fingernails were turning cyanotic blue. Ironically, it was said that Ted’s favorite colors were cyanotic blue in the lips and fingernails of his ‘objects.’”

  I asked Clark Hoshall if there was any sound in the room.

  “Oh, yes—there was a galvanic hum that drained all the energy out of the air. All it took was that one surge. Nothing after. My first observation immediately following the execution was the smoke rising from the area of Bundy’s right calf where he was cinched tightly to a grounded electrode.”

  A prison medical technician pulled the leather face mask from Ted’s face.

  “Again,” Clark Hoshall recalled, “I looked directly into Bundy’s right eye. This time the pupil was fixed, dilated, clouding and nonresponsive to light. Additional perfunctory evaluations established Bundy’s death for the record.”

  As the powerful surge of electricity coursed through Ted’s body and roared in the room, Hoshall had deliberately rubbed the gold cross.

  Ken Robinson noticed that and asked him, “Who’s that for?”

  “For her, of course.”

  Both men believed in a life for a life. Hoshall turned to Robinson in the hallway outside the viewing area.

  “Would we be here today—if you had found him, and snatched him up by that pig pen?”

  “No,” Robinson said. If either of them had gotten their hands on Ted Bundy as they examined Kimberly’s skeletal remains, they would probably have been hard put not to strangle him.

  Instead, Ted had had eleven more years to live.

  But no more.

  I asked Clark Hoshall about his daughter, Victoria, in her early forties now, the same age Kimberly would be.

  “She’s fine. She’s happy,” he said. “She has six children, and she has a good life.”

  Neither of us spoke of the obvious.

  If only.

  PART THREE

  TED BUNDY: FREQUENTLY ASKED QUESTIONS

  Every week, I get mail with questions about Ted Bundy. Some of them are repeated continually. I’m going to answer those questions to the best of my ability here. Many of my responses will be, of necessity, only my opinion—based on what I have learned over the years.

  Who was Ted’s biological father?

  This has never been absolutely established. His mother, Eleanor Louise Cowell, said simply that Ted’s father was a “sailor.” His birth
certificate listed his father as Lloyd Marshall, thirty, an Air Force veteran, a graduate of Penn State University. Jack Worthington was another name listed as his father. Born at the Elizabeth Lund Home for Unwed Mothers in Burlington, Vermont, on November 24, 1946, Ted had “illegitimate” stamped on his birth certificate.

  Many feel that he was a child of incest, fathered by his mother’s father, a man known for his violent temper. To the best of my knowledge, blood samples were never taken to establish or refute this. DNA testing was fifty years in the future. Ted had many names: Cowell, Nelson, Bundy, and all the names he stole from other men to protect his identify when he was on the run.

  Did Ted Bundy really father a child in prison?

  Yes, I believe he did. A frequent visitor to Raiford Prison in Starke, Florida, told me that prisoners in the early 1980s pooled their money to bribe guards to allow them intimate time alone with their female visitors. Whoever won that lottery did have enough privacy and time to impregnate a wife or a girlfriend. Furthermore, the baby girl born to Carole Ann Boone is said to resemble Ted a great deal.

  Where are Carole Ann Boone and her daughter now?

  I have always tried not to know anything about Ted’s ex-wife (who divorced him before he was executed) and child, feeling that if I had no information, I could never accidentally tell anyone in the media details that would invade their privacy. I have heard that Ted’s daughter is a kind and intelligent young woman but I have no idea where she and her mother may live. They have been through enough pain.

  Where are Meg Anders and her daughter, the child who looked upon Ted as a father figure back in the seventies?

  I have also attempted to know very little about Meg and her daughter, who is now around forty. Meg wrote a book, using the pseudonym “Elizabeth Kenyon” many years ago. Entitled The Phantom Prince: My Life with Ted Bundy, and published by a small Seattle press that no longer exists, it has been out of print for years. I was surprised recently to receive a phone call from Liane Anders,* Meg’s daughter. Ted had hurt her emotionally, too. In the tangled way humans respond to trauma, Liane said she felt a lingering guilt about the young women Ted killed, as if there might have been some way she could have stopped him from killing. I pointed out that she should have no responsibility whatsoever for what Ted did. She was only a little girl when it all happened, a child who once loved and trusted him. Perhaps one day, she will write about her feelings, and I hope that “Elizabeth Kenyon” will see that her book is reissued.

  Was Ted Bundy ever cleared of homicides he was suspected of?

  Perhaps once or twice, officially. I believed that he had killed Katherine Merry Devine after picking her up in the University District in December 1973. Her parents and many detectives also thought Ted was responsible. But there was a “sleeper” suspect that Thurston County, Washington, sheriff’s detectives were also watching over the twenty-eight years her murder went unsolved. His name was William E. Cosden and he had a record for rape and a doubtful acquittal on rape and murder charges back in Maryland.

  In March 2002, DNA retrieved from Katherine Merry’s body and clothing was compared to Cosden’s and it was a definite match. Cosden had believed he skated away clear. He had been visiting relatives who owned a service station in Olympia when the fourteen-year-old hopped down from the ride she had gotten from Seattle. He met her there in the gas station/truckers’ stop, and she trusted him.

  Cosden is now safely locked away in prison.

  Wasn’t Ted Bundy really nice … underneath?

  No.

  Were you ever afraid when you were with Ted Bundy, especially all alone at the Crisis Clinic all night long?

  Again, the answer is no. I had always prided myself on my ability to detect aberrance in other humans, both because I had that innate skill and through experience and training. And I have berated myself silently for a long time because I saw nothing threatening or disturbing in Ted’s façade. He was very kind to me, solicitous of my safety, and seemingly empathetic.

  The only clue I had was that my dog (who liked everyone) didn’t like Ted at all. Whenever he bent over my desk at the Crisis Clinic, she growled and the hackles on her neck stood up.

  The lesson is clear: Pay attention to your dog!

  Don’t you think that Ted Bundy should have been kept alive and studied by psychiatrists while he served life in prison?

  No, I don’t. Ted would have found a way to escape again, and he would have been more dangerous than ever. He fooled any number of intelligent, experienced people—including myself—and he was fully capable of doing it again and again. That was too big a risk to take.

  What was Ted’s I.Q.?

  It was 124 on the Standard Wechsler-Bellevue. Enough to graduate from college, and obtain further degrees but he never tested at the genius level.

  Where is Ted Bundy buried?

  No one but those closest to him knows. His body was cremated, and he had asked to have his ashes scattered in the Cascade Mountains in Washington State. This was probably a wise choice, as a recognizable grave would be in danger of being desecrated.

  Were you in love with Ted Bundy?

  No. Thankfully, I was never attracted to Ted as anyone beyond a friend. I was in love with a homicide detective in the seventies and long afterward. I was shocked this year when a coed wrote to me and said her professor told their class that Ted and I had an affair and planned to marry. This was one rumor I had to track down immediately! With the help of my editor, we found an ad on eBay for a secondhand copy of one of my books. The seller had left out two sentences of a book review that completely changed its meaning. This mistake used my name as the review spoke of Carole Ann Boone’s relationship with Ted, and the error spread to many Internet locations. Embarrassing, and entirely untrue.

  Ted Bundy was crazy, wasn’t he?

  No. Please refer to the first part of this chapter.

  From yesterday’s email:

  “I have read in numerous print (that) in July 1986, Bundy’s execution was stayed just fifteen minutes before it was to take place. And then again in October, his execution was stayed just seven hours before. Are these accounts accurate or just media sensation? And equally important, if Ted Bundy had only fifteen minutes or seven hours to live, why did he not confess until January 1989? Did his attorneys assure him that he would not be executed? Why did he wait and not pull this card in 1986? How did he know he wouldn’t be executed then?”

  First of all, he did not come within fifteen minutes of execution in July 1986. It was fifteen hours. He did come within seven hours of dying in November that year. His attorneys had filed eighteen appeals. I think he had begun to feel invincible—that there would always be another chance. He could not have known absolutely, however, that he wouldn’t sit in Old Sparky on each date set.

  He took a chance, and he won again. Neither I nor anyone else, however, could say then, or now, what Ted was thinking.

  And that brings us to the most omnipresent question of all:

  What was Ted Bundy really like?

  I don’t know. He was so many things to different people. He was an actor, a liar, a thief, a killer, a schemer, a stalker, a charmer, intelligent but not brilliant, and doomed.

  I don’t think even Ted knew what he was really like.

  And now, to the story of a man named Ted Bundy— from the very beginning.

  —ANN RULE September 2008


Preface
I
This book began a half dozen years ago as an entirely different work.
It was to have been a crime reporter's chronicling of a series of
inexplicable murders of beautiful young women. By its very nature, it
was to have been detached, the result of extensive research. My life,
certainly, would be no part of it. It has evolved instead into an
intensely personal book, the story of a unique friendship that has
somehow transcended the facts that my research produced. As the years
passed, I learned that the stranger at the very vortex of an
ever-spreading police probe was not a stranger at all; he was my friend.
To write a book about an anonymous murder suspect is one thing. To write
such a book about someone you have known and cared for for ten years
is quite another. And yet, that is exactly what has happened. My contract
to write this book was signed many months before Ted Bundy became the
prime suspect in more than a dozen homicide cases. My book would not
be about a faceless name hi a newspaper, about one unknown out of the
over one million people who live in the Seattle area; it would be about
my friend, Ted Bundy.
We might never have met at all. Logically, statistically,
demographically, the chance that Ted Bundy and I should meet and become
fast friends is almost too obscure to contemplate. We have lived in
the same states at the same timenot once but many times-but the fifteen
years between our ages precluded our meeting for many years.
When we did meet in 1971, I was a plumpish mother of four, almost forty,
nearing divorce. Ted was twenty-four, a brilliant, handsome senior in
psychology at the University of Washington. Chanfce made us partners
on the crisis lines at Seattle's Crisis Clinic on the Tuesday night
late shift. Rapport, an almost instant rapport, made us friends.
I was a volunteer on the phones, and Ted earned two dollars an hour
as a work-study student. He looked forward to
Page 4
XIV
PREFACE
law school, and I hoped that my fledgling career as a freelance writer
might grow into something that would provide a fulltime income for my
family. Although I had a bachelor's degree in creative writing from
the University of Washington, I had done little writing until 1968 when
I'd become the Northwest correspondent for True Detective Magazine and
her sister publications, all specializing in fact-detective stories.
My beat was major crime stories in a territory extending from Eugene,
Oregon to the Canadian border.
It proved to be a field for which I was well suited. I'd been a Seattle
policewoman in the 1950s and the combination of my interest in law
enforcement and my education in writing worked. I had minored in abnormal
psychology at the University and had gone on to obtain an associate
degree in police science to enable me to write with some expertise about
the advances in scientific criminal investigation. By 1980,1 would have
covered more than 800 cases, principally homicides, all up and down
the Northwestern coast, gaining the trust of hundreds of homicide
detectives-one of whom would give me the somewhat unsettling accolade,
"Ann, you're just like one of the boys."
I'm sure that our mutual interest in the law drew Ted and me together,
gave us some common ground for discussion--just as our interest in
abnormal psychology did. But there has always seemed to be something
more, something almost ephemeral. Ted himself referred to it once in
a letter mailed from a jail cell, one of the many cells he would occupy.
"You've called it Karma. It may be. Yet whatever supernatural force
guides our destinies, it has brought us together in some mind-expanding
situations. I must believe this invisible hand will pour more chilled
Chablis for us in less treacherous, more tranquil times to come. Love,
ted."
The letter was dated March 6, 1976, and we were never to come face to
face again outside prison walls or a tightly secured courtroom. But
a curious bond remains.
And so Ted Bundy was my friend, through all the good times and the bad
tunes. I stuck by him for-many years, hoping that none of the innuendo
Page 5
was true. There are few who will understand my decision. I'm sure that
it will anger many. And, with it all, Ted Bundy's story must be told,
and it must be told in its entirety if any good can evolve from the
terrible years: 1974-1980.
I have labored for a long time with my ambivalence about
PREFACE
XV
Ted. As a professional writer, I have been handed the story of a lifetime,
a story any author prays for. Prohably there is no other writer so privy
to every facet of Ted's story. I did not seek it out, and there have
been many, many, long nights when I wished devoutly that things might
have been different -that I was writing about a complete stranger whose
hopes and dreams were no part of my own. I have wanted to go back to
1971, to erase all that has happened, to be able to think of Ted as
the open, smiling young man I knew then.
Ted knows I am writing this book. He has always known, and he has
continued to write to me, to call me. I suspect that he knows I will
try to show the whole man.
Ted has been described as the perfect son, the perfect student, the
Boy Scout grown to adulthood, a genius, as handsome as a movie idol,
a bright light in the future of the Republican Party, a sensitive
psychiatric social worker, a budding lawyer, a trusted friend, a young
man for whom the future could surely hold only success. He is all of
these things, and none of them. Ted Bundy fits no pattern at all; you
could not look at his record and say: "See, it was inevitable that he
would turn out like this." In fact, it was incomprehensible.
ANN RULE
January 29,1980
Page 6
2 THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
University of Michigan campus, and he could have stayed there. There'd
been enough money left from the stash he'd hidden in jail to pay for
a twelve-dollar room at the YMCA but Michigan nights in January can
be unrelentingly icy, and he didn't have warm clothing.
He'd been to Florida before. Back in the days when he was an energetic
young worker for the Republican Party he'd received a trip to the 1968
convention in Miami as part of his reward. But, as he pored over college
catalogues in the University of Michigan Library, he wasn't thinking
of Miami.
He looked at the University of Florida in Gainesville and dismissed
it summarily. There was no water around Gainesville, and, as he would
say later, "It didn't look right on the map--superstition, I guess."
Tallahassee, on the other hand, "looked great." He had lived the better
part of his life on Washington's Puget Sound and he craved the sight
and smell of water: Tallahassee was on the Ochlockonee River which led
to the Apalachee Bay and the vastness of the Gulf of Mexico.
He knew he couldn't go home again, ever, but the Florida Indian names
reminded him a little of the cities and rivers of Washington with their
Northwestern tribal names.
Tallahassee it would be.
He had traveled comfortably up until New Year's Day. The first night
out was a little hard, but walking free was enough in itself. When he'd
stolen the "beater" off the streets in Glenwood Springs, he'd known
it might not be up to making the snow-clogged pass into Aspen, but he'd
had little choice. It had burned out thirty miles from Vail-forty miles
from Aspen-but a good Samaritan had helped him push the car off the
road, and given him a ride back to Vail.
From there, there was the bus ride to Denver, a cab to the airport,
and a plane to Chicago, even before they'd discovered he was gone. He
hadn't been on a train since he was a child and he'd enjoyed the Amtrak
journey to Ann Arbor, having his first drinks in two years in the club
car as he thought of his captors searching the snowbanks further and
further behind him.
In Ann Arbor, he'd counted his money and realized that he would have
to conserve it. He'd been straight since leaving Colorado, but he decided
Page 7
one more car theft didn't matter. He left this one in the middle of
a black ghetto in Atlanta with the keys in it. Nobody could ever tie
it to Ted BundyTHE STRANGER BESIDE ME 3
not even the FBI (an organization that he privately considered vastly
overrated,) who had just placed him on their Ten-Most-Wanted List.
The Trailways bus had delivered him right into the center of downtown
Tallahassee. He'd had a bit of a scare as he got off the bus. He thought
he'd seen a man he'd known in prison in Utah, but the man had looked
right through him, and he realized he was slightly paranoid. Besides,
he didn't have enough money to travel any further and still afford a
room to rent.
He loved Tallahassee. It was perfect, dead, quiet-a hick town on Sunday
morning. He walked out onto Duval Street, and it was glorious. Warm.
The air smelled good and it seemed right that it was the fresh dawn
of a new day. Like a homing pigeon, he headed for the Florida State
University campus. It wasn't that hard to find. Duval cut across College
and he turned right. He could see the old and new capitol buildings
ahead, and, beyond that, the campus itself.
The parking strips were planted with dogwood trees-reminiscent of
home-but the rest of the vegetation was strange, unlike that in the
places from which he'd come. Live oak, water oak, slash pine, date palms,
and towering sweet gums. The whole city seemed to be sheltered by trees.
The sweet gum branches were stark and bare in January, making the vista
a bit like a northern winter's, but the temperature was nearing 70
already. The very strangeness of the landscape made him feel safer,
as if all the bad times were behind him, so far away that everything
in the previous four years could be forgotten, forgotten so completely
that it would be as if it had never happened at all. He was good at
that; there was a place he could go to in his mind where he truly could
forget. Not erase; forget.
As he neared the Florida State campus proper, his euphoria lessened;
Page 8
perhaps he'd made a mistake. He'd expected a much bigger operation in
which to lose himself, and a proliferation of For Rent signs. There
seemed to be very few rentals, and he knew the classifieds wouldn't
help him much; he wouldn't be able to tell which addresses were near
the university.
The clothing that had been too light in Michigan and Colorado was
beginning to feel too heavy, and he went to the campus bookstore where
he found lockers to stow his sweaters and hat.
4 THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
He had $160 left, not that much money when he figured he had to rent
a room, pay a deposit, and buy food until he found a job. He found that
most of the students lived in dormitories, fraternal houses, and in
a hodge-podge of older apartment and rooming houses bordering the campus.
But he was late in arriving; the term had started, and almost everything
was already rented.
Ted Bundy had lived in nice apartments, airy rooms in the upper stories
of comfortable older homes near the University of Washington and the
University of Utah campuses, and he was less than enchanted with the
pseudo-Southern-mansion facade of "The Oak" on West College Avenue.
It drew its name from the single tree in its front yard, a tree as
disheveled as the aging house behind it. The paint was fading, and the
balcony listed a bit, but there was a For Rent sign in the window.
He smiled ingratiatingly at the landlord and quickly talked his way
into the one vacancy with only a $100 deposit. As Chris Hagen, he promised
to pay two months rent-$320within a month. The room itself was as
dispirited as the building, but it meant he was off the streets. He
had a place to live, a place where he could begin to carry out the rest
of his plans.
Ted Bundy is a man who learns from experience-his own and others'. Over
the past four years, his life had changed full circle from the world
of a bright young man on his way up, a man who might well have been
Governor of Washington in the foreseeable future, to the life of a con
Page 9
and a fugitive. And he had, indeed, become con-wise, gleaning whatever
bits of information he needed from the men who shared his cell blocks.
He was smarter by far than any of them, smarter than most of his jailers,
and the drive that had once spurred him on to be a success in the straight
world had gradually redirected itself until it focused on only one thing:
escape-permanent and lasting freedom, even though he would be, perhaps,
the most hunted man in the United States.
He had seen what happened to escapees who weren't clever enough to plan.
He knew that his first priority would have to be identification papers.
Not one set, but many. He had watched the less astute escapees led back
to their prisons, and had deduced that their biggest mistake had been
that they were stopped by the law and had been unable to produce I.D.
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME 5
that would draw no hits on the "big-daddy" computers of the National
Crime Information Center in Washington D.C.
He would not make that fatal error; his first chore would be to research
student files and find records of several graduates, records without
the slightest shadows on them. Although he was thirty-one, he decided
that in his new lives, he would be about twenty-three, a graduate student.
Once he had that secure cover, he would find two other identities that
he could switch to if his antennae told him he was being observed too
closely.
He also had to find work-not the kind of job for which he was infinitely
qualified: social service, mental health counselor, political aide,
legal assistant-but a blue collar job. He would have to have a social
security number, a driver's license, and permanent address. The latter,
he had; the rest he would obtain. After the rental deposit, he had only
$60 left, and he'd been shocked already to see the inroads inflation
had made into the economy while he'd been incarcerated. He'd been sure
that the several hundred dollars he'd begun his escape with would last
him a month or two, but now it was almost gone.
He would rectify that. The program was simple. First the I.D., next
Page 10
the job, and last, but most important, he would be the most law-abiding
citizen who ever walked a Florida street. He promised himself that he
would never get so much as a jaywalking ticket, nothing whatever that
would cause law enforcement officers to ever glance his way.
He was now a man without any past at all. Ted Bundy was dead.
As all of his plans had been, it was a good plan. Had he been able to
carry it out to the letter, it is doubtful that he would ever have been
apprehended. Florida lawmen had homicide suspects of their own to keep
tabs on, and crimes as far afield as Utah or Colorado held little interest
for them.
Most young4men, among strangers, in a strange land, with only $60 to
their names, jobless, and in need of $320 within the month, might be
expected to feel a stirring of panic at the unknown quality of the days
ahead.
"Chris Hagen" felt no panic. He felt only a bubbling elation and a vast
sense of relief. He had done it. He was free, and he no longer had to
run. Whatever lay ahead paled in comparison with what the morning of
January 9th had meant
« THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
to him as 1977 drew to a close. He was relaxed and happy as he fell
asleep in his narrow bed in the Oak in Tallahassee.
He had good reason to be. For Theodore Robert Bundythe man who was no
more-had been scheduled to go on trial for first degree murder in
Colorado Springs, Colorado at
9 A.M. on January 9th. Now that courtroom would be empty.
The defendant was gone.
,
The Ted Bundy who "died" and was reborn as Chris Hagen in Tallahassee
Page 11
on January 8, 1978 had been a man of unusual accomplishment. While much
of his life had seemed to fit into the flat wasteland of the middle
class, there was also much that did not.
His very birth stamped him as different. The mores of America in 1946
were a world removed from the attitudes of the '70s and '80s. Today,
illegitimate births make up a substantial proportion of deliveries,
despite legalized abortions, vasectomies, and birth control pills.
There is only token stigma toward unwed mothers and most of them keep
their babies, merging smoothly into society.
It was not that way in 1946. Premarital sex surely existed-as it always
has-but women didn't talk about it if they indulged, not even to their
best friends. Girls who engaged in sex before marriage were considered
promiscuous, though men could brag about it. It wasn't fair, and it
didn't even make much sense, but that's the way it was. A liberal at
that time was someone who pontificated that "only good girls get caught."
Programmed by anxious mothers, girls never doubted the premise that
virginity was an end in itself.
Eleanor Louise Cowell was twenty-two, a "good girl," raised in a deeply
religious family in northwest Philadelphia. One can only imagine her
panic when she found she had been left pregnant by a man she refers
to today only as "a sailor." He left her, frightened and alone, to face
her strict family. They rallied around her, but they were shocked and
saddened.
Abortion was out of the question. It was illegal--carried out in murky
rooms on dark streets by old women or doctors who'd lost their licenses.
Furthermore, her religious training forbade it. Beyond that, she
already loved the baby growing within her. She couldn't bear the thought
of putting the child
7
8 THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
up for adoption. She did the only thing she could; when she was seven
months pregnant, she left home and entered the Elizabeth Lund Home for
Page 12
Unwed Mothers in Burlington, Vermont.
The maternity home was referred to by waggish locals as "Lizzie Lund's
Home for Naughty Ladies." The girls who came there in trouble were aware
of that little joke, but they had no choice but to live out their days
until labor began in an atmosphere which was-if not
unfriendly-seemingly heedless of their feelings.
After sixty-three days of waiting there, Theodore Robert Cowell was
born on November 24, 1946.
She took her son back to her parents' home in Philadelphia and began
a hopeless charade. As the baby grew, he would hear Eleanor referred
to as his older sister, and was told to call his grandparents "Mother"
and "Father." Already showing signs of brilliance, the slightly
undersized little boy whose crop of curly brown hair gave him a faunlike
appearance did as he was told, and yet he sensed that he was living
a lie.
Ted adored his grandfather-father Cowell. He identified with him,
respected him, and clung to him hi times of trouble.
But, as he grew older, it was clear that remaining in Philadelphia would
be impossible. Too many relatives knew the real story of his parentage,
and Eleanor dreaded what his growing-up years would be like. It was
a working-class neighborhood where children would listen to their
parents' whispered remarks and mimic them. She never wanted Ted to have
to hear the word "bastard."
There was a contingent of Cowells living in Washington State, and they
offered to take Eleanor and the boy in if they came west. To insure
Ted's protection against prejudice, Eleanor-who would henceforth be
called Louise-went to court on October 6, 1950 in Philadelphia and had
Ted's name legally changed to Theodore Robert Nelson. It was a common
name, one that should give him an anonymity, that would not draw
attention to him when he began school.
And so, Louise Cowell and her son, four-year-old Ted Nelson, moved 3,000
miles away to Tacoma, Washington where they moved in with her relatives
until she could get a job. It was a tremendous wrench for Ted to leave
his grandfather behind, and he would never forget the old man. But he
soon
Page 13
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME 9
adjusted to the new life. He had cousins, Jane and Alan Scott, who were
close to his age and they became friends.
In Tacoma, Washington's third largest city, Louise and Ted started over.
The beauty of Tacoma's hills and harbor was often obscured by smog from
industry, and the downtown streets infiltrated by honky-tonk bars, peep
shows, and pornography shops catering to soldiers on passes from Fort
Lewis.
Louise joined the Methodist Church, and there at a social function she
met Johnnie Culpepper Bundy-one of a huge clan of Bundys who reside
in the Tacoma area. Bundy, a cook, was as tiny as Louise, neither of
them standing an inch over five feet. He was shy, but he seemed kind.
He seemed solid.
It was a rapid courtship, marked principally by attendance at other
social functions at the church. On May 19, 1951, Louise Cowell married
Johnnie Bundy. Ted attended the wedding of his "older sister" and the
little cook from the army base. He was not yet five when he had a third
name: Theodore Robert Bundy.
Louise continued working as a secretary and the new family moved several
times before finally buying their own home near the soaring Narrows
Bridge.
Soon, there were four half-siblings, two girls and two boys. The youngest
boy, born when Ted was fifteen, was his favorite. Ted was often pressed
into babysitting chores, and his teen-age friends recall that be missed
many activities with them because he had to babysit. If he minded, he
seldom complained.
Despite his new name, Ted still considered himself a Cowell. It was
always the Cowell side of the family to which he gravitated.
He looked like a Cowell. His features were a masculinized version of
Louise Bundy's, his coloring just like hers. On the surface, it seemed
the only genetic input he'd received from his natural father was his
height. Although still smaller than his peers hi junior high school,
Ted was already taller than Louise and Johnnie. One day he would reach
Page 14
six feet.
Ted spent time with his stepfather only grudgingly. Johnnie tried. He
had accepted Louise's child just as he had accepted her, and he'd been
rather pleased to have a son. If Ted seemed increasingly removed from
him, he put it down to burgeoning adolescence. In discipline, Louise
had the final
10
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
word, although Johnnie sometimes applied corporal punishment with a
belt.
Ted and Johnnie often picked beans in the acres of verdant fields
radiating out through the valleys beyond Tacoma. Between the two of
them, they could make five to six dollars a day. If Bundy worked the
early shift at Madigan Army Hospital as a cook-5 A.M. to 2 P.M.-they
would hurry out to the fields and pick during the heat of the afternoon.
If he worked a late shift, he would get up early anyway and help Ted
with his paper route. Ted had seventy-eight customers along his early
morning route and it took him a long time to work it alone.
Johnnie Bundy became a Boy Scout leader, and he frequently organized
camping trips. More often than not, however, it was other peoples' sons
who went on the outings; Ted always seemed to have some excuse to beg
off.
Oddly, Ixniise had never directly confirmed to Ted that she was, in
fact, his mother and not his older sister. Sometimes he called her Mother,
and sometimes just Louise.
Still, it was clear to everyone who knew them that this was the child
she felt had the most potential. She felt he was special, that he was
college material, and urged him on to start saving for college when
he was only thirteen or fourteen.
Although Ted was growing like a weed, he was very slender-too light
for football in junior high. He attended Hunt Junior High, and did turn
out for track where he had some minor successes in the low hurdles.
Page 15
Scholastically, he did much better. He usually managed to maintain a
B average, and would stay up all night to finish a project if need be.
It was in junior high that Ted endured some merciless teasing from other
boys. Some who attended Hunt Junior High recall that Ted invariably
insisted on showering in privacy in a stall, shunning the open showers
where the rest of his gym class whooped and hollered. Scornful of his
shyness, the other boys delighted in creeping up the single shower stall
and pouring cold water down on him. Humiliated and furious, he chased
them away.
Ted attended Woodrow Wilson High School in Tacoma and became a member
of the largest graduating class of that school to date; the class of
1965 had 740 members. Any search of records on Ted Bundy at Woodrow
Wilson is fruitTHE STRANGER BESIDE ME
11
less; they have disappeared, but many of his friends remember him.
A young woman, now an attorney, recalls Ted at seventeen. "He was well
known, popular, but not in the top crowd-but then neither was I. He
was attractive, and well dressed, exceptionally well mannered. I know
he must have dated, but I can't ever remember seeing him with a date.
I think I remember seeing him at the dances-especially the TOLOS, when
the girls asked the boys to dance-but I can't be sure. He was kind of
shy-almost introverted."
Ted's best friends in high school were Jim Paulus, a short, compact
young man with dark hair and horn-rimmed glasses who was active in
student politics, and Kent Michaels, vicepresident of the student
council, a reserve football team member, and now an attorney in Tacoma.
Ted often skied with them, but, despite his awakening interest in
politics himself, he did not hold a student body office.
In a class with almost 800 members, he was a mediumsized fish in a large
pond; if not among the most popular, he at least moved near those at
the top and he was well liked.
Page 16
Scholastically, he was getting better. He consistently drew a B plus
average. At graduation, he was awarded a scholarship to the University
of Puget Sound in Tacoma.
Ted wrote an unusual note in a classmate's copy of "The Nova," Wilson
High's yearbook:
Dearest V.,
The sweetness of the spring time rain runs down the
window pain (sic.) (I can't help it. It just flows out)
Theodore Robert Bundy Peot(sic)
The only fact that might mar the picture of the clean-cut young graduate
in the spring of 1965 was that Ted had been picked up at least twice
by juvenile authorities in Pierce County for suspicion of auto theft
and burglary. There is no indication that he was ever confined, but
his name was known to juvenile caseworkers. The records outlining the
details of the incidents have long been shredded-procedure when a
juvenile reaches eighteen. Only a card remains with his name and the
offenses listed.
Ted spent the summer of 1965 working for Tacoma City
12
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
Light to save money for college, and he attended the University of Puget
Sound for the school year 1965-66.
After working in the sawmill the next summer, Ted transferred to the
University of Washington where he began a program of intensive Chinese.
He felt that China was the country that we would one day have to reckon
with, and that a fluency in the language would be imperative.
Ted moved into McMahon Hall, a dormitory on the University campus. He
had yet to have a serious involvement with a woman, although he had
yearned for one, held back by his shyness and his feeling that he was
not socially adept, that his background was stultifyingly middle class,
that he had nothing to offer the kind of woman he wanted.
When Ted met Stephanie Brooks in the spring of 1967 at McMahon Hall,
Page 17
he saw a woman who was the epitome of his dreams. Stephanie was like
no girl he had ever seen before, and he considered her the most
sophisticated, the most beautiful creature possible. He watched her,
saw that she seemed to prefer football jocks, and hesitated to approach
her. As he would write a dozen years later, "She and I had about as
much in common as Sears and Roebuck does with Saks. I never considered
S. with any more romantic interest than I considered some elegant
creature on the fashion page."
But they did share one common interest-skiing. Stephanie had her own
car, and he managed to hitch a ride to the mountain summits east of
Seattle with her. As they rode back from a day's skiing, he studied
the beautiful, dark-haired girl behind the wheel. He had told himself
that Stephanie outclassed him, and yet he realized that he was infatuated
with her. He was both bemused and thrilled when she began to spend more
and more time with him. His preoccupation with intensive Chinese was
pushed temporarily into the background.
"It was at once sublime and overpowering," he recalled. "The first touch
of hands, the first kiss, the first night together. . . . For the next
six years, S. and I would meet under the most tentative of
circumstances."
Ted had fallen in love. Stephanie was a year or so older, the daughter
of a wealthy California family, and she was, quite possibly, the first
woman to initiate him into physical lovemaking. He was twenty years
old. He had very little to offer her, a young woman who'd been raised
in an atmoTHE STRANGER BESIDE ME
13
sphere where money and prestige were taken for granted. And yet she
stayed with him for a year, a year that may have been the most important
in his life.
Ted worked a series of menial, low-paying jobs to pay his way through
college: in a posh Seattle yacht club as a bus boy, at Seattle's venerable
Page 18
Olympic Hotel as a busboy, at a Safeway store stocking shelves, in a
surgical supply house as a stockboy, as a legal messenger, as a shoe
clerk. He left most of these jobs of his own accord-usually after only
a few months. Safeway personnel files evaluated him as "only fair,"
and noted that he had simply failed to come to work one day. Both the
surgical supply house and the messenger service hired him twice, however,
and termed him a pleasant, dependable employee.
Ted became friends in August of 1967 with sixty-year-old Beatrice Sloan,
who worked at the yacht club. Mrs. Sloan, a widow, found the young college
student a lovable rascal, and Ted could talk her out of almost anything
when they worked at the yacht club together for the next six months
and then for many years after. She arranged for his job at the Olympic
Hotel, a job that lasted only a month; other employees reported they
suspected he was rifling lockers. Mrs. Sloan was somewhat shocked when
Ted showed her a uniform that he had stolen from the hotel, but she
put it down as a boyish prank as she would rationalize so many of his
actions.
Beatrice Sloan heard all about Stephanie, and understood Ted's need
to impress this marvelous girl. She loaned him her car often and he
returned it in the wee hours of the morning. Once, Ted told her he was
going to cook a gourmet meal for Stephanie and the widow loaned him
her best crystal and silver so that he could create the perfect setting.
She laughed as he imitated the precise English accent he planned to
use as he ' served the meal he'd cooked himself.
She felt that Ted needed her. He'd explained that his family life had
been very strict, and that he was on his own now. She allowed him to
use her address when he applied for jobs and as a reference; sometimes
he had no place to sleep except in the lo'nge of McMahon Hall, a dormitory
he still had a key for. He was a "schemer," she knew, but she thought
she could understand why; he was only trying to survive.
Ted entertained her. Once, he put on a black wig and he
!4
Page 19
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
seemed to take on an entirely different appearance. Later, she would
catch a glimpse of him on television during Governor Rosellini's
campaign and he was wearing that same wig.
Even though Mrs. Sloan suspected that Ted was sneaking girls up into
the "crow's nest" at the yacht club for what she called hanky-panky,
and even though she also suspected him of taking money sometimes from
the drunken patrons of the club who had to be driven home, she couldn't
help liking the young man. He took the time to talk to her, and bragged
to her that his father was a famous chef, that he planned to go to
Philadelphia to visit an uncle who was high up in politics. She even
loaned him money once-and then wished that she hadn't. When he wouldn't
pay it back, she called Louise Bundy and asked that she remind Ted.
Louise had laughed, according to Mrs. Sloan, and said, "You're a fool
to loan him money. You'll never get it back. He's a stranger around
here."
Stephanie Brooks was a junior when she met Ted in the spring of 1967,
and she was in love with Ted through the summer and into 1968. But not
as much in love as he was. They dated often-dates that did not require
much money: walks, movies, hamburger dinners, sometimes skiing. His
lovemaking was sweet and gentle, and there were times when she thought
it might really work out.
But Stephanie was pragmatic. It was wonderful to he in love, to have
a college romance, to stroll through the wooded paths of the campus
hand-in-hand as the Japanese cherry blossoms gave way to the
rhododendrons and then to the brilliant orange of the vine maples. The
skiing trips up to the Cascades were fun, too, but she sensed that Ted
was foundering, that he had no real plans, no real prospects for the
future. Consciously or unconsciously, Stephanie wanted her life to
continue as it always had; she wanted a husband who would fit into her
world in California. She just didn't believe that Ted Bundy fit that
picture.
Stephanie found Ted very emotional, unsure of himself. He didn't seem
to have the capacity to decide what his major was going to be. But,
more than that, she had a niggling suspicion that he used people, that
he would become close to people who might do favors for him, and that
Page 20
he took advantage of them. She was sure that he had lied to her, that
he had made up answers that sounded good.
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
IS
That bothered her. It bothered her more than his indecision, and his
tendency to use people.
Stephanie graduated from the University of Washington in June, 1968,
and it seemed that that might be a way to ease out of the romance. Ted
still had years to go, and she would be in San Francisco, starting a
job, back among her old friends. The affair might just die of lack of
nourishment due to time and distance.
But Ted won a scholarship to Stanford in intensive Chinese for the summer
of 1968. He was only a short drive down the Bayshore Highway from her
parents' home, and so they continued to date throughout the summer.
Stephanie was adamant when the time came for Ted to return to the
University of Washington. She told him that their romance was over,
that their lives were headed on divergent paths.
He was devastated. He could not believe that she was really through
with him. She was his first love, the absolute personification of
everything he wanted. And now she was willing to walk away from him.
He had been right in the first place. She was too beautiful. Too rich.
He should never have believed he could have her.
Ted returned to Seattle. He no longer cared about intensive Chinese.
Indeed, he cared about very little. Yet, he still had a toe-hold on
the political scene. In April of 1968, he'd been appointed Seattle
chairman and assistant state chairman of the New Majority for
Rockefeller, and he'd won a trip to the Miami convention. His mind filled
with his break with Stephanie Brooks, Ted went to Miami, only to see
his candidate plowed under.
Back at the University, he took courses-not in Chinese, but in urban
planning and sociology. He didn't come close to his previous excellence,
and he dropped out of college.
Page 21
During the fall of 1968, Ted had worked as a driver for Art Fletcher,
a popular black candidate for Lieutenant Governor. When there were death
threats against Fletcher, the candidate wasfhoused in a secret
penthouse location. Ted became not only^a driver, but a bodyguard,
sleeping in a room close by. He wanted to carry a gun, but Fletcher
vetoed that.
Fletcher lost the election.
It seemed that everything Ted had counted on was crumbling. In early
1969, he set out on travels that might help him understand his roots.
He visited relatives in Arkansas and in
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
Philadelphia where he took some classes at Temple University. Yet all
the while the real purpose of his trip burned in his mind.
His cousins, Alan and Jane Scott, with whom he'd grown up in Tacoma,
had hinted at it; he himself had always known it, sensed the truth hidden
there in memories from his earliest years. He had to know who he was.
Ted went to Burlington, Vermont, after checking records in Philadelphia.
His birth certificate was in the files there, stamped with the archaic
and cruel "Illegitimate." He had been born to Eleanor Louise Cowell.
The name of the father was given as Lloyd Marshall, a graduate of
Pennsylvania State University, an Air Force veteran, a salesman born
1916.
So his father had been thirty years old when he was born, an educated
man. Why had he left them alone? Had he been married? What had become
of him? There is no information on whether Ted tried to find that man
who had gone out of his life before he was even born. But Ted knew.
He knew that what he had always sensed was true: Louise was, of course,
his mother. Johnnie Bundy wasn't his father, and his beloved grandfather
wasn't his father either. He had no father.
Ted had continued to write to Stephanie, with only sporadic response.
He knew she was working for a brokerage firm in San Francisco. As he
headed back toward the West Coast, he was obsessed with getting to
Page 22
Stephanie. The knowledge that his mother had lied to him wasn't a
complete surprise. It wasn't a surprise at all-and yet it hurt. All
those years.
It was a bright spring day in 1969 when Stephanie walked out of her
office building. She didn't see Ted. There was suddenly someone behind
her, someone putting his hands on her shoulders. She turned around and
there he was ...
If he had expected that she would be delighted to see him, that their
romance could be resumed, he was to be harshly disappointed. She was
moderately glad to see him, but nothing more than that. Ted seemed to
be the same drifting young man she'd always known. He wasn't even
enrolled in college anymore.
Had she accepted him back at that point, some of his humiliation might
have been tempered. But she couldn't. She
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
17
asked how he had gotten to San Francisco, and he was vague, mumbled
something about hitchhiking. They talked for awhile, and
then she sent him away, for the second time. She never expected to see
him again.
Somehow the revelation about his parentage and the final rejection from
the lost Stephanie, coming so close together in
1969, did not bury Ted Bundy. Instead, he became possessed of a kind
of icy resolve. By God, if it took whatever he had, he was going to
change. By sheer force of will, he would become the kind of man that
the world-and particularly Stephanie-saw as a success. The years that
followed would see an almost Horatio Alger-like metamorphosis in Ted.
He didn't want to go back to McMahon Hall; the memories there were too
Page 23
filled with Stephanie. Instead, he walked the streets of the University
District, knocking on doors of older homes that flanked the streets
just west of the campus. At each door, he would smile and explain he
was looking for a room, that he was a student in psychology at the
University.
Freda Rogers, an elderly woman who, along with her husband Ernst, owned
the neat, white two-story frame house at
4143 12th N.B. was quite taken with Ted. She rented him a large room
in the southwest corner of the home. He would live there for five years
and become more of a son than a tenant to the Rogers family. Ernst Rogers
was far from well, and Ted promised to help with heavy chores and the
gardening-a promise he kept.
Ted also called Beatrice Sloan, his old friend from the Seattle yacht
club. She found him the same as he'd always been, full of plans and
adventures. He told her he'd been to Philadelphia where he'd seen his
rich uncle, and that he was on his way to Aspen, Colorado to become
a ski instructor.
"Then I'll knit you a ski hat," she replied promptly.
"No need. I already have a ski mask. But I do need a ride to the airport."
Mrs. Sloan did drive him to the airport and saw him off on
18
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
19
his trip to Colorado. She wondered a little at the expensive ski gear
he carried. She knew he'd never had any money, and the equipment was
clearly the best.
Why he went to Colorado at that point is unclear. He did not have a
job or even the promise of a job as a ski instructor. Perhaps, he only
wanted to see the skiing hamlet that Stephanie had raved about. He was
back by the time the fall quarter started at the University of
Washington.
In a psychology curriculum, Ted seemed to have found his niche. He pulled
Page 24
down mostly A's with a sprinkling of B's, in courses like physiological
psychology, social psychology, animal learning, statistical methods,
developmental psychology, deviant personality, and deviant development.
The boy who had seemed to be without direction or plans now became an
honors student.
His professors liked him, particularly Patricia Lunneborg, Scott Fraser,
and Ronald E. Smith. Smith, who three years later would write Ted a
glowing letter of recommendation to the University of Utah Law School
which read in part:
Mr. Bundy is undoubtedly one of the top undergraduate students in our
department. Indeed, I would place him in the top 1% of undergraduate
students with whom I have interacted both here at the University of
Washington and at Purdue University. He is exceedingly bright,
personable, highly motivated, and conscientious. He conducts himself
more like a young professional than like a student. He has the capacity
for hard work and because of his intellectual curiosity is a pleasure
to interact with. .. . As a result of his
undergraduate psychology major,
Mr. Bundy has become intensely interested in studying psychological
variables which influence jury decisions. He and I are currently engaged
in a research project in which we are attempting to study experimentally
some of the variables which influence jury decisions. |j
I must .admit that I regret Mr. Bundy's decision to pursue a career
in law rather than to continue his professional training in psychology.
Our loss is your gain. I have no doubt that Mr. Bundy will distinguish
himself as a law student and as a professional and I recommend him to
you without qualification.
20
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
Ted needed nothing more than his scholastic excellence to stand him
in good stead with his professors. It was somewhat odd then that he
should tell Professor Scott Fraser that he had been a foster child,
Page 25
raised in one foster care home after another during his childhood. Fraser
accepted this information as fact and was surprised later to find that
it had not been true.
Ted often frequented University District taverns, drinking beer and
occasionally scotch. It was in the Sandpiper Tavern on September 26,
1969 that he met the woman who would be a central force in his life
for the next seven years.
Her name was Meg Anders. Like Stephanie, Meg was a few years older than
Ted. She was a young divorcee with a three-year-old daughter named Liane.
Meg was a diminutive woman with long brown hair-not pretty, but with
a winsomeness that made her seem years younger than she was. The daughter
of a prominent Utah doctor, she was on the rebound from a disastrous
marriage which had foundered when she learned that her husband was a
convicted felon. Meg had divorced him and taken her daughter to Seattle
to make a new life. Working as a secretary at a Seattle college, she
knew no one in Seattle except for Lynn Banks, a childhood friend from
Utah, and the people she worked with.
A little hesitant at first, she had finally allowed Ted to buy her a
beer and had been fascinated with the good-looking young man who talked
about psychology and his plans for the future. When she gave him her
phone number, she really hadn't expected that he would call her. When
he did, she was thrilled.
They began a friendship, and then an affair. Although Ted continued
to live at the Rogers home and Meg kept her apartment, they spent many
nights together. She fell in love with him; given her situation, it
would have been almost impossible not to. She believed totally in his
ability to succeed-something Stephanie had never done-and Meg often
loaned Ted money to help with his schooling. Almost from the start,
she wanted to marry him but understood when he told her that would have
to be a long time in the future; he had much to accomplish first.
Ted continued to work at part-time jobs-selling shoes for a department
store, working again for the surgical supply house. When he couldn't
make ends meet, Meg helped out.
Sometimes she worried that it was her family's money and
Page 26
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
position that attracted Ted to her. She'd seen his appraising glance
around their home in Utah when she took him home for Christmas in 1969.
But it had to be more than that. He was good to her, and he was as devoted
as a father to Liane. Liane always got flowers from him on her birthday,
and Ted always sent Meg a single red rose on September 26th to
cornmemorate their first meeting.
She sensed that he sometimes saw other women, knew that he and a friend
would occasionally drop into the Pipeline Tavern or Dante's or
O'Bannion's and pick up girls. She tried not to think about it. Time
would take care of that.
What she did not know was that Stephanie existed, that Stephanie lived
in Ted's mind as strongly as she always had. Although Stephanie had
felt relieved when she said goodbye to Ted in the spring of 1969, she
had not dropped him cornpletely. The California woman who had wrought
such a cataclysmic change in Ted Bundy's life had relatives in Vancouver,
British Columbia, and she had taken to calling Ted to say "Hi" when
her travels brought her through Seattle from time to time.
As 1969 and 1970 passed, Ted's path was straight upward, excelling in
everything he put his hand to; he was becoming more urbane, superbly
educated, socially adept. He was an ideal citizen. He even drew a
commendation from the Seattle Police Department when he ran down a purse
snatcher and returned the stolen bag to its owner. In the summer of
1970, it was Ted Bundy who saved a three-and-a-half-year-old toddler
from drowning in Green Lake in Seattle's north end. No one had seen
the child wander away from her parents-no one but Ted-and he had dashed
into the water to save the youngster.
Ted kept up his contacts with the Republican Party. He was a precinct
committeeman and would become more involved in the party work as the
years progressed.
To those closest to him, Meg was definitely Ted's girl. He took her
to meet Louise and Johnnie Bundy in their rambling blue and white house
in Tacoma, and they liked her. Louise was relieved to see that he'd
Page 27
apparently gotten over his disappointment over the end of his romance
with Stephanie.
From 1969 onward, Meg was a welcome visitor at both the Bundys' Tacoma
home and at the A-frame cabin they'd built at Crescent Lake near Gig
Harbor, Washington. Meg, Ted, and Liane often went camping, rafting,
sailing, and took
22
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
more trips to Utah and to Ellensburg, Washington to visit Ted's
highschool friend, Jim Paulus.
Everyone they visited found Meg gentle and bright, devoted to Ted, and
it seemed only a matter of time until they married.
4
The Seattle Crisis Clinic's offices were housed in 1971 in a huge old
Victorian mansion on Capitol Hill. Once the area where Seattle's richest
pioneering fathers settled, Capitol Hill today has the second highest
crime rate in the city. Many of these old houses remain, scattered
willy-nilly among apartment houses and Seattle's main hospital district.
When I signed on as a volunteer at the Crisis Clinic, I felt some
trepidation about working a night shift, but with four children at home
that was the only time I had free.
Ted Bundy became a paid work-study student at about the time I became
a volunteer. While I worked a four-hour shift one night a week from
10 P.M. to 2 A.M., Ted worked from 9 P.M. to 9 A.M. several nights a
week. There were fifty-one volunteers and a dozen work-study students
manning the crisis lines around the clock. Most of us never met because
of the staggered schedules, and the circumstances that made Ted and
me partners were purely coincidental. I have pondered on that
Page 28
coincidence in the years since, wondered why I should have been the
one out of fifty-one to spend so much time with Ted Bundy.
None of those on the phone were professional psychiatric social workers,
but we were people who were empathetic and who sincerely tried to help
the clients who called in in crisis. All of the volunteers and work-study
students had to pass muster first during interviews with Bob Vaughn,
the protestant minister who directed the Crisis Clinic and Bruce Cummins
who had a Masters in psychiatric social work. Through the three-hour
intake interviews, we had "proved" that we were essential!^ normal,
concerned, and capable people who were not likely to panic in emergencies.
It was a favorite joke among the crew that we must have our heads on
straight or we wouldn't be there dealing with other peoples' problems.
After going through a forty-hour course which featured
23
24
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
psychodramas with would-be volunteers answering staged calls which
represented the more common problems we might expect, we were trained
by experienced volunteers in the phone rooms themselves-allowed to
listen in on calls through auxilliary receivers. Ted and I were trained
by Dr. John Eshelman, a brilliant and kind man who is now head of the
economics department at Seattle University.
I remember the first night I met Ted. John gestured toward a young man
sitting at a desk in the phone room which adjoined ours with only an
arch separating us, "This is Ted Bundy. He'll be working with you."
He looked up and grinned. He was twenty-four then, but he seemed younger.
Unlike most of the other male college students of that era who wore
long hair and often beards, Ted was clean-shaven and his wavy brown
hair was cut above the ears, exactly the style that the male students
had worn when I had attended the University fifteen years before. He
wore a tee shirt, jeans, and sneakers, and his desk was piled with
textbooks.
Page 29
I liked him immediately. It would have been hard not to. He brought
me a cup of coffee and waved his arm over the awesome banks of phone
lines, "You think we can handle all this? John's going to turn us loose
alone after tonight."
"I hope so," I answered. And I did devoutly hope so. Suicides-in-progress
seemed to make up only about ten percent of the calls coming in, but
the range of crises was formidable. Would I say the right thing? Do
the right thing?
As it turned out, we made a good team. Working side by side in the
cluttered two rooms on the top floor of the building, we seemed to be
able to communicate in emergencies without even having to speak. If
one of us got a caller on the line who was actually threatening suicide,
we would signal the other to call the phone company and put a trace
on the line.
The wait always seemed endless. In 1971 it took almost an hour to get
a trace and an address if we had no hint about the area of town from
which the call was coming. The one of us who was on the line with the
would-be suicide would attempt to maintain a calm, caring tone while
the other raced around the offices making calls to get help to the caller.
We had callers who became unconscious from overdoses many times, but
we always managed to keep the lines open. Then there would be the welcome
sound of Medic I crews
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
25
breaking in, sounds of their voices in the room with the caller, and
finally, the phone would be picked up and we would hear "It's O.K. We've
got him; we're on the way to Harborview."
If, as many people believe today, Ted Bundy took lives, he also saved
lives. I know he did, because I was there when he did it.
I can picture him today as clearly as if it were only yesterday, see
him hunched over the phone, talking steadily, reassuringly-see him look
up at me, shrug, and grin. I can hear him agreeing with an elderly woman
Page 30
that it must have been beautiful indeed when Seattle was lit only by
gas lights, hear the infinite patience and caring in his voice, see
him sigh and roll his eyes while he listened to a penitent alcoholic.
He was never brusque, never hurried.
Ted's voice was a strange mixture of a slightly western drawl and the
precise clipped phraseology of an English accent. I might describe it
as courtly.
Shut off from the night outside-with doors locked to protect us from
the occasional irrational caller who tried to break in-there was an
insular feel to those two offices where we worked. The two of us were
all alone in the building, connected to the outside world only by the
phone lines. Beyond the walls, we could hear sirens screaming as police
units and Medic I rigs raced up Pine Street a block away toward the
county hospital. With the blackness outside our windows broken only
by the lights in the harbor far below us, the sound of rain and sleet
against the panes, those sirens seemed to be the only thing reminding
us that there was a world of people out there. We were locked in a boiler
room of other people's crises.
I don't know why we became such close friends so rapidly. Perhaps it
was because we dealt with so many life-and-death situations together,
making our Tuesday nights intense situations that bound us together
the way soldiers in battle often are. Perhaps it was the isolation,
and the fact that we were constantly talking to other people about their
most intimate problems. •
And so, when the quiet nights came, the nights when the moon was no
longer full, when the welfare money had run out with no money left to
buy liquor, and when the street people and the callers seemed to be
enjoying a spate of serenity, Ted and I talked for hours to each other.
26
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
On the surface, at least, it seemed that I had more problems than Ted
did. He was one of those rare people who listen with full attention,
Page 31
who evince a genuine caring by their very stance. You could tell things
to Ted that you might never tell anyone else.
Most of the Crisis Clinic volunteers gave our time because we had endured
crises ourselves, tragedies that made us more able to understand those
who called in. I was not an exception. I had lost my only brother to
suicide when he was twenty-one, a Stanford senior about to enter Harvard
Medical School. I had tried vainly to convince him that life was
worthwhile and precious, and I had failed because Yd been too close
to him and had felt his pain too acutely. If I could save someone else,
I think I felt that it might help me to expiate some of the guilt I
still carried.
Ted listened quietly as I told him about my brother, of the long night's
wait while sheriff's deputies looked for Don, finally finding him too
late in a deserted park north of Palo Alto, dead of carbon monoxide
poisoning.
In 1971 my life was not without problems. My marriage was in deep trouble,
and I was again trying to cope with guilt. Bill and I had agreed to
a divorce only weeks before he'd been diagnosed as having malignant
melanoma, the deadliest of skin cancers.
"What can I do?" I asked Ted. "How can I leave a man who may be dying?"
"Are you sure he's dying?" Ted responded.
"No. The first surgery seems to have caught all the malignancy, and
the skin grafts have finally held. He wants to end the marriage. He
says he wants to, but I feel as if I'm really running away from a sick
man who needs me."
"But it's his choice, isn't it? If he seems well, and if your being
together is an unhappy situation for both of you, then you have no guilt.
He's made the decision. It's his life, and, especially when he might
not have that many years ahead, it's his right to decide how he wants
to spend them."
"Are you talking to me as if I were a crisis caller?" I smiled.
"Maybe. Probably. But my feelings would be the same. You both deserve
to get on with your lives."
Ted's advice proved to be the right advice. Within a year, I would be
divorced, and Bill would remarry, would have four good years doing what
he wanted.
Page 32
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
27
What was happening in my life in 1971 is unimportant to the story of
Ted Bundy, save for the fact that Ted's incisive viewpoint on my problems,
his unfailing support and belief in my capabilities as a writer who
could earn a living on her own, demonstrate the kind of man I knew.
It was that man I would continue to believe in for many years.
Because I had opened up my life to him, Ted seemed to feel at ease in
talking about the vulnerable areas in his world, although it was not
until many weeks after I met him that he did so.
One night, he moved his chair through the alcove that separated our
desks and sat beside me. Behind him one of the posters that were plastered
over most of the walls in our offices was in my direct line of vision.
It was a picture of a howling kitten clinging to a thick rope, and it
read, "When you get to the end of your rope ... tie a knot and hang
on."
Ted sat there silently for a moment or two as we sipped coffee
companionably. Then he looked down at his hands and said, "You know,
I only found out who I really am a year or so ago. I mean, I always
knew, but I had to prove it to myself."
I looked at him, a little surprised, and waited for the rest of the
story.
"I'm illegitimate. When I was born, my mother couldn't say that I was
her baby. I was born in a home for unwed mothers and, when she took
me home, she and my grandparents decided to tell everyone that I was
her brother, and that they were my parents. So I grew up believing that
she was my sister, that I was a 'late baby' born to my grandparents."
He paused, and looked at the sheets of rain that washed over the windows
in front of us. I didn't say anything; I could tell he had more to say.
"I knew. Don't tell me how I knew. Maybe I heard conversations. Maybe
I just figured out that there couldn't be twenty years' difference in
age between a brother and a sister, and Louise always took care of me.
Page 33
I just grew up knowing that she was really my mother."
"Did you ever say anything?"
He shook his head. "No. It would have hurt them. It just wasn't something
you talked about. When I was little, we moved away-Louise and I-and
left my grandparents behind. If they were my mother and father, we
wouldn't have
2g
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
done that. I went back east in 1969. I needed to prove it to myself,
to know for sure. I traced my birth to Vermont, and I went to the city
hall, and I looked at the records. It wasn't difficult; I just asked
for my birth certificate under my mother's name-and there it was."
"How did you feel? Were you shocked, or upset?"
"No. I think I felt better. It wasn't a surprise at all. It was like
I had to know the truth before I could do anything else. And when I
saw it there on the birth certificate, then I'd done that. I wasn't
a kid. I was twenty-two when I found out for certain."
"They lied to you. Did it seem like they'd deceived you?"
"No. I don't know."
"People lie out of love too, you know," I said. "Your mother could have
let you go-but she didn't. She did the best she could. It must have
seemed the only thing she could do to keep you with her. She must have
loved you very much."
He nodded, and said softly, "I know ... I know."
"And look at you now. You turned out pretty good. In fact, you turned
out great."
He looked up and smiled. "I hope so."
"I know so."
We never talked about it again. It was funny. In 1946, when Ted's mother
had found out she was pregnant in Philadelphia, I had been a high school
student thirty miles away in Coatesville. I remember that when the girl
who sat next to me in physics class became pregnant, it was the talk
Page 34
of the school. That's the way things were in 1946. Could Ted understand
that in 1971? Could he even fathom what his mother had gone through
to keep him?
He certainly seemed to have made the most of his considerable assets.
He was brilliant, and making almost straight A's in psychology in his
senior year, even though most of his studying had to be done between
calls during his all-night shifts at the Crisis Clinic. I had never
brought up any facet of psychology that Ted wasn't fully conversant
with. During that autumn quarter of 1971, Ted was taking ecological
biology, adaptation of man, laboratory of human performance, and an
honors seminar.
He was handsome, although the years of adversity ahead would somehow
see him become even handsomer, as if his features were being honed to
a fine edge.
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
29
And Ted was physically strong, much stronger than I had thought when
I saw him for the first time. He had seemed slender, almost frail, and
I had made it a habit to bring cookies and sandwiches to share with
him each Tuesday night; I thought he might not be getting enough to
eat. I was surprised one warm night when he'd bicycled to the clinic
wearing cut-off blue jeans. His legs were as thickly muscled and powerful
as a professional athlete's. He was slender, but he was whipcord tough.
As far as his appeal for women, I can remember thinking that, if I were
younger and single-or if my daughters were older-this would be almost
the perfect man.
Ted talked quite a bit about Meg and Liane; I assumed that he was living
with Meg, although he never actually said he was.
"She's really interested in your work," he said one night. "Could you
bring in some of your detective magazines so I can take them home to
her?"
I did bring in several, and he took them with him. He never commented
Page 35
on them, and I assumed that he hadn't read them.
We were talking one night about his plans to go to law school. It was
almost spring then, and, for the first time, he told me about Stephanie.
"I love Meg, and she really loves me," he began. "She's helped me with
money for school. I owe her a lot. I don't want to hurt her, but there's
somebody else I can't stop thinking about."
Again, he had surprised me. He'd never mentioned anyone but Meg.
"Her name is Stephanie, and I haven't seen her for a long time. She's
living near San Francisco, and she's completely beautiful. She's tall,
almost as tall as I am, and her parents are wealthy. She's never known
anything but being rich. I just couldn't fit in with that world."
"Are you in touch with her at all?" I asked.
"Once in a while. We talk on the phone. Every time I hear her voice,
it all comes back. I can't settle for anything else unless I try one
more time. I'm going to apply for law school anyplace I can get in around
San Francisco. I think the problem now is that we're just too far apart.
If we were both in California, I think we could get back together."
I asked him how long it had been since he'd gone with
30
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
Stephanie, and he said they'd broken up in 1968, but that Stephanie
was still single.
"Do you think she might love me again if I sent her a dozen red roses?"
It was such a naive question that I looked up to see if he was serious.
He was. When he talked about Stephanie in the spring of 1972, it was
as if the intervening years hadn't happened at all.
"I don't know, Ted." I ventured. "If she feels the same way you do,
the roses might help-but they wouldn't make her love you if she's
changed."
"She's the one woman, the only woman I ever really loved. It's different
from the way I feel about Meg. It's hard to explain. I don't know what
to do."
Page 36
Seeing the glow in his eyes when he talked about Stephanie, I could
envision the heartbreak ahead for Meg. I urged him not to make promises
to Meg he couldn't keep.
"At some point, you're going to have to choose. Meg loves you. She's
stood by you when the going is rough, when you don't have any money.
You say that Stephanie's family makes you feel poor, as if you don't
fit in. It might be that Meg's real, and Stephanie's a dream. I guess
the real test is-how would you feel if you didn't have Meg? What would
you do if you knew she had someone else, if you found her with another
man?"
"I did once. It's funny you should bring it up, because it just made
me wild. We'd had a fight, and I saw some guy's car parked outside her
apartment. I raced around the alley and stood up on a garbage can to
look in the window. The sweat was just pouring off me and I was like
a crazy man. I couldn't stand to think of Meg with another man. I couldn't
believe the effect it had on me ..."
He shook his head, bemused by the violence of his jealousy.
"Then maybe you care more about Meg than you realize."
"That's the problem. One day I think I want to stay here, marry Meg,
help bring Liane up, have more children-that's what Meg wants. Sometimes
it seems like that's all I want But I don't have any money. I won't
have any money for a long time. And I can't see myself being tied down
to a life like that just when I'm getting started. And then I think
about Stephanie, and the life I could have with her. I want
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
31
that too. I've never been rich, and I want to be. But how can I say
'thanks a lot and goodbye' to Meg?"
The phones rang then, and we left the problem in midair. Ted's turmoil
didn't seem that bizarre or desperate for a man of twenty-four; in fact,
it seemed quite normal. He had some maturing to do. When he did, I thought
he would probably make the right decision.
Page 37
When I arrived for work a few Tuesdays later, Ted told me he had applied
for admittance to law school at Stanford and at the University of
California at Berkeley.
Ted seemed to be a prime candidate for law school; he had the incisive
mind for it, the tenacity, and he believed totally in the orderly
progression of changes in the system of government through legislation.
His stance made him something of a loner among the work-study students
working at the Crisis Clinic. They were semihippies, both in their garb
and their political views, and he was a conservative Republican.
I could see that they considered him a rather odd duck as they argued
about the riots that were constantly erupting on the University campus.
"You're wrong, man," a bearded student told him. "You aren't going to
change Vietnam by sucking up to the old fogies in Congress. All they
care about is another big contract for Boeing. You think they give a
shit about how many of us get killed?"
"Anarchy isn't going to solve anything. You just end up scattering your
forces and getting your head broken," Ted responded.
They snorted in derision. He was anathema to them.
The student riots, and the marches blocking the 1-5 Freeway enraged
Ted. On more than one occasion, he had tried to block the demonstrations,
waving a club and telling the rioters to go home. He believed there
was a better way to do it, but his own anger was, strangely, as intense
as those he tried to stop.
I never saw that anger. I never saw any anger at all. I cannot remember
everything that Ted and I talked about, try as I might, but I do know
we never argued. Ted's treatment of me was the kind of old-world
gallantry that he invariably showed toward any woman I ever saw him
with, and I found it appealing. He always insisted on seeing me safely
to my car when my shift at the Crisis Clinic was over in the wee hours
of the morning. He stood by until I was safely inside
32
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
Page 38
my car, doors locked and engine started, waving to me as I headed for
home twenty miles away. He often told me, "Be careful. I don't want
anything to happen to you."
Compared to my old friends, the Seattle homicide detectives, who
routinely saw me leave their offices after a night's interviewing, at
midnight in downtown Seattle with a laughing, "We'll watch out the window
and if anyone mugs you, we'll call 911," Ted was a like a knight in
shining armorl
I had to drop my volunteer work at the Crisis Clinic in the spring of
1972. I was writing six days a week, and, beyond that, I was getting
stale--a little jaded on the phones. After a year and a half, I had
heard the same problems too many times. I had problems of my own. My
husband had moved out, we had filed for divorce, and I had two teenagers
and two preteens at home who provided their own crises for me to cope
with. Ted graduated from the University in June. We had never seen each
other outside the Crisis Clinic, and now we kept in touch with infrequent
phone calls. I didn't see him again until December.
My divorce was final on December 14th. On December
16th all current and former clinic personnel were invited to a Christmas
party at Bruce Cummins's home on Lake Washington. I had a car-but no
escort-and I knew Ted didn't have a car, so I called and asked him if
he would like to attend the party with me. He seemed pleased, and I
picked bun up at the Rogers's rooming house on 12th N.B. Freda Rogers
smiled at me and called up the stairs to Ted.
On the long drive from the University District to the south end, we
talked about what had happened in the intervening months since we'd
seen each other. Ted had spent the summer working as an intern in
psychiatric counseling at Harborview, the huge county hospital complex.
As a policewoman in the 1950s, I had taken a number of mentally deranged
subjects--220s in police lingo--to the fifth floor of Harborview and
knew the facilities there well. But Ted talked little about his summer
job. He was far more enthusiastic about his activities during the
Page 39
governer's campaign in the fall of 1972.
He had been hired by the Committee to Re-Elect Dan Evans, Washington's
Republican Governor. Former Governor Albert Rosellini had made a
comeback try, and it had been Ted's assignment to travel around the
state and monitor
33
34
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
Rosellini's speeches, taping them for analysis by Evans's team.
"I just mingled with the crowds and nobody knew who I was," he explained.
He'd enjoyed the masquerade, sometimes wearing a false moustache,
sometimes looking like the college student he'd been only a short time
before, and he'd been amused at the way Rosellini modified his speeches
easily for the wheat farmers of eastern Washington and the apple growers
of Wenatchee. Rosellini was a consummate politician, the opposite of
the up-front, All-American Evans.
All this was heady stuff for Ted, to be on the inside of a statewide
campaign, to report to Governor Evans himself and his top aides with
the tapes of Rosellini's speeches.
On September 2d, Ted-driving Governor Evans and other dignitaries in
the lead limousine-had been the first man to traverse the North Cascades
Highway that winds through spectacular scenery at the northern
boundaries of Washington State.
"They thought that President Nixon was going to show up," Ted recalled.
"And they had secret service men checking everybody out. His brother
came instead, but I didn't care. I got to lead 15,000 people in a
sixty-four-mile parade across the mountains."
The Evans campaign for re-election had been successful, and now Ted
was in good standing with the administration in power. At the time of
the Christmas party, he was employed by the City of Seattle's Crime
Prevention Advisory Commission and was reviewing the state's new
hitchhiking law, a law which made thumbing a ride legal again.
Page 40
"Put me down as being absolutely against hitchhiking," I said. "I've
written too many stories about female homicide victims who met their
killers while they were hitchhiking."
Although Ted still looked forward to law school, he had his sights on
the position as director of the Crime Prevention Advisory Commission,
was among the final candidates, and felt optimistic about getting the
job.
We went our separate ways at the party; I danced with Ted once or twice
and noticed that he seemed to be having a good time, talking with several
women. He seemed to be completely entranced with a young woman who
belonged to Seattle's Junior League, a Crisis Clinic volunteer whom
neither of us had happened to meet before. Since some shifts
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
35
never coincided, it wasn't unusual that volunteers' paths didn't cross.
The woman was married to a young lawyer with a "future," a man who is
now one of Seattle's most successful attorneys.
Ted didn't talk to her; in fact, he seemed in awe of her, but he pointed
her out to me and asked about her. She was a beautiful woman with long
dark hair, straight and parted in the middle, and dressed in a way that
spoke of money and taste. She wore a black, long-sleeved blouse, a
straight white silk evening skirt, solid gold chains, and earrings.
I doubt that she was even aware of Ted's fascination with her, but I
caught him staring at her several times during the evening. With the
others at the party, he was expansive, relaxed, and usually the center
of conversation.
Since I was the driver, Ted drank a good deal during the evening, and
he was quite intoxicated when we left at 2:00 A.M. He was a friendly,
relaxed drunk, and he settled into the passenger seat and rambled on
and on about the woman at the party who had impressed him so much.
"She's just what I've always wanted. She's perfect-but she didn't even
notice me..."
Page 41
And then he fell sound asleep.
When I delivered Ted back to the Rogers's that night, he was almost
comatose, and it took me ten minutes of shaking him and shouting to
wake him up. I walked him to the door and said goodnight, smiling as
he bumbled in the door and disappeared.
A week later, I received a Christmas card from Ted. The block print
read, "O. Henry wrote the 'Gift of the Magi,' a story of two lovers
who sacrificed for each other their greatest treasures. She cut her
long hair to buy her lover a watch chain. He sold his watch to buy her
combs for her hair. In acts that might seem foolish these two people
found the spirit of the Magi."
It was my favorite Christmas story. How had he known?
Inside, Ted ^printed his own wishes: "The New Year should be a good
one for a talented, delightful, newly liberated woman. THank you for
the party. Love, ted."
I was touched by the gesture. It was typical of Ted Bundy; he knew I
needed the emotional support of those sentiments.
Seemingly, there wasn't a thing in the world I could do for him. He
wasn't interested in me romantically, I was just
36
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
about as poor as he was, hardly influential. He sent that card simply
because we were friends.
When I look at that card today and compare it with the signatures on
the dozens of letters I would receive later, I am struck with the
difference. Never again would he sign with the jaunty flourish he did
then.
Ted didn't get the job as director of the Crime Prevention Advisory
Commission and he resigned in January, 1973. I saw him again on a rainy
day in March. An old friend whom I'd known since my days on the police
department, Joyce Johnson-a detective for eleven years in the Sex Crimes
Unit-and I emerged from the police-jail elevator in the Public Safety
Page 42
Building on our way to lunch, and there was Ted. Bearded now, he looked
so different that I didn't recognize him at first. He called my name
and grabbed my hand. I introduced him to Joyce, and he told me
enthusiastically that he was working for King County Law and Justice
Planning Office.
"I'm doing a study on rape victims," he explained. "If you could get
me some back copies of the stories you've done on rape cases, it would
help my research."
I promised to go through my files and cull some of the accounts-many
of them written about cases in which Joyce Johnson had been the principal
detective-and get them to him. But, somehow, I never got around to it,
and I eventually forgot that he'd wanted them.
Ted had applied, for the second time, to the University of Utah's Law
School, largely at Meg's urging. Her father was a wealthy physician,
her siblings professionals in Utah, and she hoped that she and Ted would
eventually end up in the Mormon state.
He was quickly accepted, although he had been rejected in a previous
application to the University of Utah in 1972, despite his degree from
the University of Washington "With Distinction." Ted's gradepoint
average from the University was 3.51, a GPA that any student might have
aspired to, but his legal aptitude test scores had not been high enough
to meet Utah's standards for entry.
In 1973, he bombarded the admissions department at Utah with letters
of recommendation from professors and from Governor Dan Evans. Not
content with the restrictions of a standard application form, he had
résumés printed up listing his accomplishments since graduation from
the University of
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
37
Washington, and wrote a six-page personal statement on his
philosophies on law.
It made an impressive packet
Page 43
Under postgraduate employment, Ted listed:
Criminal Corrections Consultant: January, 1973. Currently retained by
the King County Office of Law and Justice Planning to identify recidivism
rates for offenders who have been found guilty of misdemeanors and gross
misdemeanors in the twelve county District Courts. The purpose of the
study is to determine the nature and number of offenses committed
subsequent to a conviction in District Court.
Crime Commission Assistant Director: October, 1972 to January, 1973.
As assistant to the Director of the Seattle Crime Prevention Commission,
suggested and did the preliminary investigation for the Commission's
investigations into assaults against women, and "white collar"
(economic) crime. Wrote press releases, speeches, and newspaper
articles for the Commission. Participated extensively in the planning
of the Commission's activities for 1973.
Psychiatric Counselor: June, 1972 to September, 1972. Carried a full
case-load of twelve clients during a fourmonth internship in Harborview
Hospital's Outpatient Clinic. Held periodic sessions with clients;
entered progress reports in hospital charts, continually re-evaluated
psychiatric diagnoses, and referred clients to physicians for medical
and psychotherapeutic medication evaluations. Participated in numerous
training sessions conducted by staff psychiatrists.
Ted went on:
I apply to law school because my professional and cornmunity activities
demand daily a knowledge of the law I do not ha'tie. Whether I am studying
the behavior of criminal offenders, examining bills before the
legislature, advocating "court reform, or contemplating the creation
of my own corporation, I immediately become conscious of my limited
understanding of the law. My life style requires that I obtain a
knowledge of the law and the ability to practice legal skills. I intend
to be my own man. It's that simple.
38 THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
I could go on at great length to explain that the practice of law is
Page 44
a life-long goal, or that I do not have great expectations that a law
degree is a guaranty of wealth and prestige. The important factor,
however, is that law fulfills a functional need which my daily routine
has forced me to recognize.
I apply to law school because this institution will give me the tools
to become a more effective actor in the social role I have denned for
myself.
T.R.B.
Ted's personal statement was most erudite and filled with quotes from
experts ranging from Freud to the President's Committee on Law
Enforcement, and the Administration of Justice Report. He began with
a discussion of violence: "You begin with the relation between might
and right, and this is the assuredly proper starting point for our
inquiry. But, for the term 'might,' I would substitute a tougher and
more telling word: 'violence.' In right and violence, we have today
an obvious antimony."
He had not softened his position against riots, student insurrections,
and anarchy. The law was right; the rest was violence.
Ted stated his current involvement in a series of studies of jury trials.
"Using computer-coded data collected on 11,000 felony cases by the
Washington State Criminal Justice Evaluation Project, I am writing
programs designed to isolate what I hope to be tentative answers ...
to questions regarding the management of felony cases."
He talked of a study he had undertaken to equate the racial composition
of a jury with its effect on the defendant.
Ted's thoroughly impressive application to the University of Utah Law
School in early 1973 worked, and overshadowed his mediocre Law School
Aptitude Test scores. But, oddly, he chose not to enter their law school
in the fall of 1973, and the reason given to the Dean of Admissions
was a curious lie.
He wrote "with sincere regret" a week before classes were to begin,
that he had been injured severely in an automobile accident and was
hospitalized. He explained that he had hoped that he would be physically
strong enough to attend the fall quarter, but found he was not able
to, apologizing for
Page 45
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
39
waiting so long to let the University know and saying he hoped that
they could find someone to fill his place.
In truth, Ted had been in an extremely minor accident, spraining his
ankle, had not been hospitalized, and was in perfect condition. He had,
however, wrecked Meg's car. Why he chose not to go to Utah in 1973 remains
a mystery.
There were discrepancies too in his almost flamboyant dossier. Both
the study on rape that he told me he was writing and the racial
significance in jury composition study were only ideas; he had not
actively begun work on either.
Ted did begin law school in the fall of 1973-at the University of Puget
Sound in his home town, Tacoma. He attended night classes on Mondays,
Wednesdays and Fridays, riding from the Rogers's rooming house to U.P.S.,
twenty-six miles south, in a car pool with three other students. After
the night classes, he often stopped for a few beers with his car pool
members at the Creekwater Tavern.
Ted may have elected to remain in Washington because he had been awarded
a plum political job in April, 1973-as assistant to Ross Davis, chairman
of the Washington State Republican Party. His $1,000 a month salary
was more money than he'd ever made. The "perks" that came with the job
were something that a man who had struggled for money and recognition
most of his life could revel in: the use of a Select Credit Card issued
to the Republican Party, attendance at meetings with the "big boys,"
and occasional use of a flashy car. There was statewide travel, with
all expenses paid.
Davis and his wife thought highly of Ted. He ate dinner with their family
at least once a week, and often babysat for their children. Davis recalls
Ted as "smart, aggressive,-exceptionally so, and a believer in the
system."
Despite his work for the Republican Party, Ted managed to keep up a
good gradepoint average in his night law classes at U.P.S. He continued
Page 46
to live at Freda and Ernst Rogers's home in the University District
in Seattle. Ernst's health was no better, and,|when he had free time,
Ted helped to keep the house in rerair.
There had been great upheavals in Ted's life during 1973, but I had
seen him only once during that year-the brief meeting in the Public
Safety Building in March. It was that kind of friendship where you touch
base with someone rarely, you are pleased to see each other, and they
are, at least on the surface, the same people you have always known.
40
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
I saw Ted again in December of 1973-again at a Crisis Clinic Christmas
party. It was held at a board member's house in the Laurelhurst section
in Seattle's north end, and, this time, Ted brought Meg Anders with
him, and I met her for the first time.
In one of those crystalline flashes that float to the surface of memory,
I can recall standing in the host's kitchen, talking to Ted and Meg.
Someone had placed a giant bowl of fried chicken wings on the counter,
and Ted munched on them as we talked.
Ted had never described Meg to me. I had heard his detailed recollection
of Stephanie Brooks's beauty, and I had seen his reaction to the tall,
dark-haired woman at last year's party. Meg was nothing like either
of them. She seemed very small, very vulnerable, and her long light
brown hair overpowered her facial features. Cîearly, she adored Ted,
and she clung to him, too shy to mingle.
I commented that Ted and I had attended the last Crisis Clinic Christmas
party together, and her face lit up.
"Really"! It was you?"
I nodded. "I didn't have a date, and Ted didn't have a car, so we decided
to pool our resources."
Meg seemed vastly relieved. I was clearly no threat to her, a nice,
middle-aged lady with a bunch of kids. I wondered then why he had let
her agonize over it for a whole year when he could easily have explained
Page 47
our friendship to her.
I spent most of that evening talking with Meg because she seemed so
intimidated by the mass of strangers milling around us. She was very
intelligent and very nice. But her focus of attention was Ted. When
he wandered off into the crowd, her eyes followed him; she was trying
very hard to be casual, but for her there was no one else there at all.
I could understand her feelings only too well. Three months before,
I had fallen in love with a man who wasn't free, would never be free,
and I could empathize with Meg's insecurity. Still, Ted had been with
her for four years, and he seemed devoted to her and to Liane. There
seemed a good possibility that they might marry one day.
Seeing Meg and Ted together, I assumed that he had given up his fantasy
about Stephanie. I could not have been more wrong. Neither Meg nor I
knew that Ted had just spent several days with Stephanie Brooks, that
he was, in fact, enTHE STRANGER BESIDE ME
gaged to Stephanie, and that he was looking forward to seeing her again
within a week.
Ted's life was so carefully compartmentalized that he was able to be
one person with one woman, and an entirely different man with another.
He moved in many circles, and most of his friends and associates knew
nothing of the other areas in his life.
When I said goodbye to Ted and Meg in December, 1973, I truly didn't
expect to see him again; our bond had been through the Crisis Clinic
and we were both moving away from that group. I had no way of knowing
that Ted Bundy would one day change my life profoundly.
It would be almost two years before I heard from Ted again, and, when
I did, it would be under circumstances that would shock me more than
anything ever has-or possibly ever will again.
i
I
Page 48
Most of us have harbored a fantasy wherein we return to confront a lost
first love, and, in that reunion, we have become better looking, thinner,
richer, utterly desirable-so desirable that our lost love realizes
instantly that he has made a terrible mistake. It seldom occurs in real
life, but it is a fantasy that helps to relieve the pain of rejection.
Ted had tried once, in 1969, to reach out to Stephanie Brooks, to rekindle
a seemingly extinguished flame, and it hadn't worked.
But, by the late summer of 1973, Ted Bundy had begun to be somebody.
He had worked, planned, groomed himself to be the kind of man that he
thought Stephanie wanted. Although his relationship with Meg Anders
had been a steady and, to Meg, a committed one for four years, Ted had
had no one but Stephanie on his mind when he arrived in Sacramento on
a business trip for the Washington Republican Party. He contacted
Stephanie in San Francisco and she was amazed at the changes four years
had wrought in him. Where he had been a boy, uncertain and wavering,
with no foreseeable prospects, he was now urbane, smooth, and confident.
He was nearing twenty-seven, and he seemed to have become an imposing
figure in political circles in Washington State.
When they went out to dinner, she marveled at his new maturity, the
deft manner with which he dealt with the waiter. It was a memorable
evening and when it was over, Stephanie agreed readily to make a trip
soon to Seattle to visit him, to talk about what the future might hold
for them. He did not mention Meg; he seemed as free to make a cornmitment
as Stephanie was.
Stephanie had flown to Seattle during her vacation in September, and
Ted met her at the airport, driving Ross Davis's car, and whisked her
to the University Towers Hotel. He took her to dinner at the Davis's
home. The Davises seemed
42
Page 49
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
43
to approve heartily of her, and she didn't demur when Ted introduced
her as his fiancee.
Ted had arranged for a weekend in a condominium at Alpental on Snoqualmie
Pass, and, still using Davis's car, he drove them up to the Cascade
Pass, up through the same mountain foothills they'd traversed when
they'd gone on skiing trips in their college days. Looking at the
luxurious accommodations, she wondered how he had paid for it, but he
explained that the condo belonged to a friend of a friend.
It was an idyllic time. Ted was talking marriage seriously, and Stephanie
was listening. She had fallen in love with him, a love that was much
stronger than the feeling she'd had for him in their college romance.
She was confident that they would be married within the year. She would
work to pay his way through law school.
Back at the Davises' home, Stephanie and Ted posed for a picture together,
smiling, their arms around each other. And then Mrs. Davis drove her
to the airport for the flight to San Francisco as Ted had an important
political meeting to attend.
Stephanie flew back to Seattle in December, 1973, and spent a few days
with Ted in the apartment of a lawyer friend of his who was in Hawaii.
Then she went further north to Vancouver, B.C. to spend Christmas with
friends. She was very happy. They would be together again for several
days after Christmas and she was sure they could firm up their wedding
plans then.
Ted, then, even as he introduced me to Meg at that Christmas party in
1973 had apparently been marking tune until Stephanie returned.
During those last days of 1973, Ted wined and dined Stephanie royally.
He took her to Tai Tung's, the Chinese restaurant in the international
district where they had eaten during their first courtship. He also
took her to Ruby Chow's, a posh oriental restaurant, run by a Seattle
city councilwoman, tellingier that Ruby was a good friend of his.
But somethiig had changed. Ted was evasive about marriage plans. Hé
told her that he'd become involved with another woman-a woman who had
had an abortion because of him. "That's over. But she calls every so
often, and I just don't think it's going to work out for us."
Page 50
Stephanie was stunned. Ted told her he was trying to "get loose" of
this other girl-a girl whose name he never men44
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
tioned-but that things were just too complicated. Where he had been
so loving and affectionate, he now seemed cold and distant. They had
such a little time to spend together, and yet he left her alone for
an entire day while he worked on a "project" at school that she felt
sure could have waited. He didn't buy her anything at all for Christmas,
although he showed her an expensive chess set that he'd bought for his
lawyer friend. She had brought him an expensive Indian print and a bow
tie, but he showed little enthusiasm for her gifts.
His lovemaking, which had been ardent, had become perfunctory, what
she termed a "Mr. Cool" performance, rather than a spontaneous show
of passion. In fact, she felt he was no longer attracted to her at all.
Stephanie wanted to talk about it, to talk about their plans, but Ted's
conversation was a bitter diatribe about his family. He talked about
his illegitimacy, stressing over and over that Johnnie Bundy wasn't
his father, wasn't very bright, and didn't make much money. He seemed
angry at his mother because she had never talked to him about his real
father. He was scornful of what he called the "lack of I.Q." of the
whole Bundy clan. The only member of the extended family that he seemed
to care about was his grandfather Cowell, but the old man was dead,
leaving Ted with no one.
Something had happened to change Ted's whole attitude toward her, and
Stephanie was a very confused and upset woman when she flew back to
California on January 2, 1974. Ted had not even made love to her on
their last night together. He had chased after her for six years. Now,
he seemed uninterested, almost hostile. She had thought they were
engaged, and yet he had acted as if he could hardly wait to be rid of
her.
Back in California she waited for a call or a letter from him, something
Page 51
that might explain his radical change of heart. But there was nothing.
Finally, she went to a counselor to try to sort out her own feelings.
"I don't think he loves me. It seems as though he just stopped loving
me."
The counselor suggested that she write to Ted, and she did, saying that
she had questions that had to be answered. Ted didn't answer that letter.
In mid-February, Stephanie called Ted. She was angry and hurt, and she
started to yell at him for dropping her without
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
45
so much as an explanation. His voice was flat, calm, as he said,
"Stephanie, I have no idea what you mean ..."
Stephanie heard the phone click and the line went dead. At length, she
concluded that Ted's high-power courtship in the latter part of 1973
had been deliberately planned, that he had waited all those years to
be in a position where he could make her fall in love with him, just
so that he could drop her, reject her, as she had rejected him. In
September, 1974, she wrote to a friend, "I don't know what happened.
He changed so completely. I escaped by the skin of my teeth. When I
think of his cold and calculating manner, I shudder."
She was never to have an explanation. She never heard from him again
and she married someone else at Christmas,
1974.
I
I
During December 1973 I had participated in a different kind of writing
project. I carried many deputy sheriff commissions in my wallet; they
had been given to me by various counties around Washington State as
Page 52
a P.R. gesture, and made me more of a "Kentucky Colonel" than a bonafide
law officer. I'll admit I got a kick out of having the badges, but I
didn't do any real law enforcement work. Then on Thursday, December
13th, I had been asked to help with an investigation in Thurston County
sixty miles south of Seattle.
Sheriff Don Redmond called and asked if I would attend a briefing on
a homicide case his county was investigating. "What we want to do, Ann,"
he explained, "is fill you in on where we are with the Devine case,
get your impressions. Then we need a comprehensive narrative of
everything we've got so far. It may be rushing you, but we'd like about
thirty pages covering the case that we can hand to the prosecuting
attorney on Monday morning. Could you do that?"
I drove to Olympia the next day and met with Sheriff Redmond, Chief
Criminal Deputy Dwight Caron, and Detective Sergeant Paul Barclift.
We spent the day going over follow-up reports, looking at slides, and
reading the medical examiner's autopsy reports in the case involving
the murder of fifteen-year-old Katherine Merry Devine.
Kathy Devine had vanished from a street corner in Seattle's north end
on November 25th. The pretty teenager-who had looked closer to eighteen
than fifteen-had last been seen alive hitchhiking. She had told friends
that she was running away to Oregon. They had seen her, in fact, get
into a pickup truck with a male driver. She had waved goodbye, and then
she had disappeared. She never arrived at her Oregon destination.
On December 6th, a couple, hired to clean up litter in McKenny Park
near Olympia, had found Kathy's body. She
46
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
47
lay on her face in the sodden forest. She was fully clothed, but her
jeans had been slit in the back seam with a sharp instrument from her
waist to the crotch. Decomposition was far advanced, due to an unusually
warm winter, and ravaging animals had carried away her heart, lungs,
Page 53
and liver.
The pathologist's tentative conclusion was that she had been strangled,
perhaps had her throat cut; the primary wounds had been to the neck.
The condition of her clothing suggested also that she had been sodomized.
She had been dead since shortly after she was last seen.
Sheriff Redmond and his investigators were left with the girl's body,
the mock suede coat with fur trim, the blue jeans, a white peasant blouse,
waffle stomper boots, and some cheap costume jewelry. The time lapse
between her disappearance and the discovery of her body made it next
to impossible to get a handle on the man who had killed her.
"It's that damned new hitchhiking law," Redmond said. "Kids can stick
their thumbs out and get in a car with anybody."
There was so little to go on, but I took copious notes and spent the
weekend putting the Devine case in chronological order, listing what
was known and concluding that Kathy Devine had probably been killed
by the man who gave her the ride. It seemed an isolated case; I had
not written up any similar homicides in several years.
I spent that whole weekend-with the exception of Saturday night when
I attended the Crisis Clinic party-working on my thirty-page report
for Redmond. On Sunday evening, two deputies were sent up from Olympia
to pick it up. As a special deputy on assignment. I was paid $100 from
the department's investigative funds. I didn't forget the Devine case;
a few months later, I wrote it up as an unsolved case for True Detective,
asking that anyone with information contact the Thurston County
Sheriff's Office. But no one did, and the case remained unsolved.
With the new year, 1974, I was aware that, if I was going to support
four children, I would have to step up my writing sales. Although their
father's cancer had seemingly been arrested, I remembered the first
surgeon's prognosis that Bill's life expectancy could range anywhere
from six months to five years.
Most of my cases came from the Seattle Police and the King County Police
homicide units. Those detectives were
Page 54
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
exceptionally kind to me, allowing me to interview them when crime in
Seattle was at a low ebb. Far from being the tough, hard-bitten
detectives depicted on television and in fiction, I found them to be
highly sensitive men--men who understood that if I didn't find enough
cases to write up, my kids might not eat. I formed some of the strongest
friendships of my life with those men.
For my part, I never "burned" them, never took anything "off the record"
and used it in a story. I waited until trials were ended, or until a
defendant had pleaded guilty, careful that my reporting would in no
way prejudice a prospective jury before trial.
They trusted me, and I trusted them. Because they knew I was trying
to learn everything I could in the field of homicide investigations,
I was often invited to attend seminars given by experts in law
enforcement and, once, a two-week homicide crime scene course given
as part of the King County Police basic police school. I rode shifts
with the Washington State Patrol, the K-9 units, Seattle Police and
King County patrol units, Medic paramedics, and spent 250 hours with
Marshal
5, the Seattle Fire Department's arson team.
I suppose it was an odd career for a woman, but I enjoyed it thoroughly.
Half the time I was an everyday mother; the other half I was learning
about homicide investigative techniques and how to spot an arson fire.
My grandfather and uncle had been sheriffs in Michigan, and my own years
as a policewoman had only enhanced my belief that lawmen were "good
guys." Nothing I saw as a crime reporter tarnished that image, even
though in the early 1970s policemen were frequently referred to as pigs.
Because in a sense I had become one of them again, I was privy to
information on cases being actively worked-as I had been with the Devine
homicide. I didn't discuss this information with anyone outside the
police world, but I was aware of what was happening in 1974.
The year had bareiy begun when there was a shocking attack on a young
woman who lived in a basement room of a big old house at 4325 8th N.B.,
near the University of Washington. It happened sometime during the night
of January
4th, and it was bizarre enough that Detective Joyce Johnson mentioned
Page 55
it to me. Johnson, with twenty-two years on the force, dealt with crimes
every day that would upset most laymen, but this assault had disturbed
her mightily.
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
49
Joni Lenz, eighteen, had gone to sleep as usual in her room, a room
located in a basement accessible from the outside by a side door that
was usually kept locked. When she didn't appear for breakfast the next
morning, her housemates assumed she was sleeping in. By midafternoon,
however, they went down to check on her. Joni didn't respond to their
calls. As they approached her bed, they were horrified to see that her
face and hair were covered with clotted blood. She was unconscious.
Joni Lenz had been beaten with a metal rod wrenched from the bed frame,
and when they pulled the covers away, they were stunned to see that
the rod had been jammed viciously into her vagina, doing terrible damage
to her internal organs.
"She's still unconscious," Joyce Johnson told me a week later. "It breaks
my heart to see her parents sitting by her bed, praying she'll come
out of it. Even if she does, the doctors think she'll have permanent
brain damage."
Joni did beat the odds. She survived, but she had no memory of events
from ten days before the attack until she awoke from her coma, and she
was left with brain damage that will stay with her for the rest of her
life.
She had not been raped-except for the symbolic rape with the bed rod.
Someone in the grip of a maniacal rage had found her asleep and vented
that anger. Detectives could find no motive at all: the victim was a
friendly, shy girl who had no enemies. She had to have been a chance
victim, attacked simply because someone who knew she slept alone in
her basement room, had perhaps seen her through a window, found the
basement door unlocked.
Joni Lenz was lucky; she lived. She was one of the very few who did.
Page 56
"Hi, this is Lynda with your Cascade Ski Report: Snoqualmie Pass is
29 degrees with snow and ice patches on the road; Stevens Pass is 17
degrees and overcast with packed snow on the roadway . . ."
Thousands of western Washington radio listeners had heard
twenty-one-year-old Lynda Ann Healy's voice without really knowing who
she was. It was a sexy-sweet voice, the kind of voice that disc jockeys
could talk back to, that commuters driving to work at 7 A.M. could enjoy.
The last names of the girls who gave the pass reports were never revealed,
no matter how many interested men might call in, however. They
50
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
were anonymous, the vocal personification of the All-American girl.
Lynda was as beautiful as she sounded, tall, slender, with chestnut
hair that fell almost to her waist, clear blue eyes fringed with dark
lashes. A senior majoring in psychology at the University of Washington,
she shared an older green frame house with four other students. Marti
Sands, Jill Hodses. Lorna Moss, and Barbara Little split the rent at
5517 12th N.B.'
Lynda had grown up in a sheltered, upper-middle-class home in Newport
Hills on the east side of Lake Washington from Seattle. Gifted musically,
she had played Fiona in Newport High's production of Brigadoon, and
she been a soloist in the Congregational Church's "Winds of God" folk
mass. But it was psychology-particularly working with retarded
youngsters-that interested her most. Certainly, in her years at the
University, she had had ample opportunity to study the deviant mind.
Study, not know.
None of the five roommates in the big old house was particularly naive,
and they were all cautious young women. Jill's father was the prosecuting
attorney in an eastern Washington county, and, as a criminal lawyer's
daughter, she had been aware of violent crime, but none of the girls
had ever been exposed personally to violence. They had read of the attack
a few blocks away on January 4th, and they had heard rumors of a prowler
Page 57
in their own neighborhood. They took the proper precautions, locked
their doors, went out in pairs after dark, discouraged men who seemed
odd.
Still, with five of them living in the same house, they felt safe.
Lynda's job at Northwest Ski Reports meant that she had to get up at
5:30 in the morning, and bike over to the office a few blocks away,
so she rarely stayed up past midnight. Thursday, January 31 st, began
routinely for her. She'd recorded the ski report, gone to classes, and
then come home to write a letter. She hadn't a problem in the world-other
than the fact that her boyfriend worked such long hours that they had
little time together, and some vague stomach pains that had been
bothering her. She wrote a note to a friend, the last letter she would
ever write:
"Just thought I'd drop a line to say 'Hello.' It's snowing outside so
I'm writing this letter bundled up in my blue afghan. You wouldn't
believe how comfortable it makes studying,
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
51
or napping. Everyone at my house is fine. I've invited Mom and Dad.
Bob and Laura to dinner. I think I'll make Beef Stroganoff. I've been
doing a lot of skiing, some working, and studying .. . not necessarily
in that order."
At 2:30 that afternoon, Jill Hodges drove Lynda to the University for
chorus practice, and returned at five to pick up Lynda and Lorna Moss.
They ate dinner and afterward Lynda borrowed Marti Sands's car to go
to the grocery store, returning at 8:30.
Lynda, Lorna, Marti and a male friend then walked to Dante's, a tavern
popular with University students, located at Fifty-third and Roosevelt
Way. The foursome shared two pitchers of beer, and the girls talked
to no one, although Lorna and Marti would later recall that their friend
Pete had visited briefly with some people who were playing a dice game
at a nearby table.
Page 58
They were home in an hour and Lynda received a call from a former
boyfriend in Olympia. Her roommates remember that she spoke with him
for about an hour. The girls then watched "Miss Jane Pittman" on
television before retiring.
When Lynda left to go to her basement room, she wore blue jeans, a white
blouse, and boots.
Barbara Little had been at the library that Thursday evening, and went
to her room in the basement-a room separated from Lynda's by only a
thin plywood wall-at a quarter to one. Lynda's light was out, and all
was quiet.
At 5:30 A.M., Barbara heard Lynda's alarm radio go off as usual, and
she went back to sleep. At 6:00 her own alarm sounded and she was somewhat
surprised to hear the insistent buzzing of Lynda's alarm still sounding.
The phone rang--Lynda's employer at the ski report company inquiring
why Lynda hadn't arrived at work. Barbara went to Lynda's room and
switched on the light; the room was immaculate, the bed perfectly made
without a wrinkle. This was a bit unusual as Lynda's habit was to make
her bed after she returned from classes, but Barbara wasn't particularly
concerned. She turned off the alarm, and assumed that Lynda was already
on her way to work.
Lynda Ann Healy was not on her way to work, or to school. She was gone
without a struggle, and without a trace.
The green ten-speed bike that Lynda routinely used for transportation
was still in the basement, but her roommates
52
THE STRANGER BESTDE ME
noted something alarming. The side door which led into the basement
was unlocked. They never left it unlocked. Indeed, the door was very
difficult-almost impossible-to unlock from the outside, so they always
opened it from the inside when they wanted to push their bikes out and
then locked it from the inside again going around the house to reach
their bikes. The single window with its transparent curtain next to
Page 59
the concrete interior steps had long since been painted shut.
The girls who lived in the shared home met on campus that afternoon
and compared notes. Each assumed that one of the others had seen Lynda
at classes during the day, yet none had. When her family arrived that
evening for the dinner she'd planned, they were frightened; Lynda was
the last person in the world who would fail to show up for work, class,
and, most particularly, for a supper where she'd invited her family.
They called the Seattle Police and reported her as a missing person.
Detectives Wayne Dorman and Ted Fonis of the Homicide Unit arrived to
talk to Lynda's worried parents and housemates. They were led to her
neat room in the basement. It was a happy-looking room, painted a sunny
yellow, its walls festooned with posters and photographs-many of Lynda
and friends skiing, several of the retarded youngsters from the
experimental school, Camelot House, where the missing girl volunteered
her time. Lynda's bed was next to the plywood wall; Barbara's was just
on the other side.
The detectives pulled the spread back. The caseless pillow was stained
crimson with dried blood, and a great splotch had soaked through the
sheets into the mattress. Whoever had shed that blood would have had
to have been seriously injured, perhaps unconscious-but there was not
enough blood present to indicate that the victim had bled to death.
Lorna and Marti pointed out to the investigators that the bed had been
made differently than Lynda would have done it. "She always pulled the
sheet up over the pillow, and now it's tucked underneath."
Lynda had had a pink satin pillowcase on her bed. It was gone; its mate
was in her dresser drawer. Her nightgown was located in the back of
the closet, the neck area stiffened with dried blood.
A reasonable supposition was that someone had entered
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
53
Lynda's room as she lay sleeping, beaten her into unconsciousness before
she could cry out, and carried her away.
Page 60
Her roommates looked through her closet and found the only clothing
missing were the jeans, blouse, and boots she'd worn the night before.
"And her backpack is gone," Marti said. "It's red with gray straps.
She usually kept books in it, and maybe her yellow ski cap and gloves . . .
and yes, she had a whole bunch of tickets to the Youth Symphony and
some checks for tickets in there."
Lynda's nightgown had been stained with blood which surely indicated
she'd worn it when she was attacked. The only conclusion the detectives
could reach was that her abductor had taken time to dress her before
he took her away. Yet all her coats were in her room; had it been too
late for her to ever need a coat again? And why the backpack? Why the
pillowcase?
The owner of the house told Detectives Fonis and Dorman that he routinely
changed all the locks on outer doors to the house when new tenants moved
in. This might have been a prudent safeguard, save for the fact that
the five girls had left an extra key in the mailbox on the front porch.
Furthermore, both Lynda and Marti had lost their keys and had duplicates
made.
Any man, watching, waiting, aware that five women lived in the home
could have charted their movements, seen them retrieving the extra key
from the mailbox.
Now, filled with dread, the remaining four tenants moved out of the
green house, and some young male friends moved in to monitor any strange
activities. But what had happened had happened. The last peculiar
incidents the other four girls could remember was that there had been
three phone calls on the afternoon after Lynda vanished. Each time they
answered, they could hear only breathing on the other end and then the
line had gone dead.
Every inch of the neighborhood was searched, all the dark leafy ravines,
nearby Ravenna Park, both by officers and by K-9 dogs. But Lynda Ann
Healy was gone, and the man who had taken her away had left no trace
of himself, nothing. Not so much as a hair, a drop of blood or semen.
He had either been very clever, or very, very lucky. It was the kind
of case that homicide detectives dread.
Page 61
54
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
On February 4th, a male voice called the police emergency number 911.
"Listen. And listen carefully. The person who attacked that girl on
8th last month and the person who took Lynda Healy away are one in the
same. He was outside both houses. He was seen."
"Who is calling?" the operator asked.
"No way are you going to get my name," the man answered and hung up.
Both Lynda's current and former boyfriends volunteered to take a
lie-detector test-and both passed without question.
As the days and then weeks passed, it was painfully clear that Lynda
Ann Healy was dead, her body hidden so carefully that only her killer
and God knew where she was. The Seattle Police crime lab had a pitifully
short list of physical evidence items to work with. "One white sheet
(bloodstained-type A positive), one yellow pillow (bloodstainedtype
A positive), one short cream-colored nightgown with brown and blue
flowered trim (bloodstained-type A positive). Area of bloodstain on
white sheet shows distinct 'ribbed' pattern at edges." This was all
that remained of the vibrant girl who had bade goodnight to her friends
on January 31st and walked away into oblivion.
To solve a homicide--and Lynda Healy's disappearance was surely a
homicide--detectives must find some common threads, something linking
the victim to the killer, a similar method of operation in a series
of crimes, physical evidence, links between the victims themselves.
Here, they were stymied. There were no connections at all between Lynda
Healy and Joni Lenz except that they had both been attacked as they
slept in basement rooms in communal houses less than a mile apart. Joni
had suffered head wounds, and, from the blood pattern on Lynda's pillow
and the stains on her nightgown, it would seem that she too had been
struck violently on the skull. But none of the residents of the two
houses knew each other; they hadn't even attended the same classes.
February slipped into March, and Lynda didn't come home, nor was there
even one sighting of the possessions missing with her-the backpack;
her peasant blouse; her old jeans with the funny triangular patch in
Page 62
the back; her two turquoise rings, distinctive round flat rings with
tiny, turquoise nuggets "floating" on the silver circles on top.
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME 55
Just two more quarters and Lynda would have graduated from the University,
would have taken a job where she would have been of infinite help to
the retarded children whose lives had not been blessed as hers had been
with brains, beauty, a loving and nurturing home.
While Seattle Police detectives wrestled with the inexplicable
disappearance of Lynda Ann Healy, Sheriff Don Redmond in Thurston County
and his detectives were having problems of their own. A female student
was missing from Evergreen State College whose campus is just southwest
of Olympia.
Evergreen is a relatively new college in Washington with great, soaring
precast concrete buildings rising improbably from the dense forest of
fir trees. It is a school much maligned by traditional educators because
it eschews required courses, accepted grading scales, and embraces a
"do your own thing" philosophy. Students choose what they want to
learn-everything from cartoon animation to ecology-and draw up
contracts that they promise to fulfill each quarter for credit. Its
detractors claim that a graduate of Evergreen has no real skills or
educational background to offer an employer, calling it a "toy college."
Nevertheless, Evergreen attracts some of the brightest and the best.
Nineteen-year-old Donna Gail Manson was a typical Evergreen student,
a highly intelligent girl who marched to a different drummer. Her father
taught music in the Seattle public schools, and Donna shared his talent
and interest in music. She was a flutist, expert enough to play in a
symphony.
With the news that a second young woman had undoubtedly come to harm
within Thurston County, I drove once again to Olympia and conferred
with Sheriff Redmond and Sergeant Paul Barclift. Barclift explained
the circumstances of Donna's vanishing to me.
On the rainy Tuesday night of March 12, 1974, Donna had planned to attend
Page 63
a jazz concert on campus. Her dormitory mates recalled that she'd changed
clothes several times, studying her image in the mirror before she was
satisfied with the red, orange, and green striped top, blue slacks,
a fuzzy black maxi-coat. She'd worn an oval brown agate ring and a Bulova
wristwatch.
And then she'd set out-alone-to walk to the concert shortly after 7:00
P.M.
56 THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
"She was not seen at the concert," Redmond said. "She probably didn't
get that far."
Lynda Ann Healy and Katherine Merry Devine had been tall and willowy;
Donna Manson was only five feet tall, and weighed 100 pounds.
The Thurston County detectives and Rod Marem, Chief Security Officer
for Evergreen State College, were not notified that Donna was missing
for six days. Donna's lifestyle was such that she often took off on
a moment's notice, only to reappear with tales of a hitchhiking
trip-sometimes to points as far away as Oregon. When the report on her
absence came in from another student, it was only a "Please attempt
to contact" request. But the days passed with no word of her, and her
disappearance took on an ominous tone.
Barclift began to contact everyone who knew Donna, followed up every
possible lead. He talked to her best friend, Teresa Olsen, and her
ex-roommate Celia Dryden, and several other girls who had lived in the
dormitory with her.
Donna Manson, despite her I.Q., had not been a good student. She had
attended Green River Community College in Auburn before she'd come to
Evergreen, and had entered with a cumulative 2.2 (C plus) grade point.
She had chosen a rather broad curriculum-P O R T E L S (Personal Options
Toward Effective Learning Skills). However, Donna had fallen behind
even at Evergreen because she consistently stayed out all night,
returning at dawn to ask Celia to cover for her in class, and then going
to bed for most of the day. This had bothered Celia, as had Donna's
Page 64
obsession with death, magic, and alchemy. Donna had seemed to be weighed
down with depression, and her constant scribblings about alchemy
troubled her roommate too.
Celia had asked to be moved to another room shortly before Donna
vanished.
Alchemy is an ancient pseudoscience: ". . . the preparation of an elixir
of longevity . . . any seemingly
magical power or process of
transmuting." Practiced first in ancient Egypt, it was not the
curriculum that might be offered at a more conventional college.
"We thought she might have committed suicide," Barclift said. "But we
had her writings evaluated by a psychiatrist and he felt they were not
particularly significant for a girl of that age. If she had been afraid
of anything specific, he thought
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
57
she would have written it down-and we didn't find anything like that
in her writings."
The investigators had found several slips of paper in Donna's room.
One listed "Thought Power Inc." A preliminary check by the detectives
showed this to be a licensed business in Olympia, located in a neat
older home. Seminars on positive thinking and mind discipline were held
there. The owners had changed the name to the "Institute of ESP" just
before Donna disappeared.
Donna Manson had used marijuana almost daily, and her friends thought
she might also have tried other drugs. She had dated four men. They
were checked out and all were cleared.
Donna had hitchhiked to Oregon in November, but most of her trips away
from campus were to visit friends in Selleck, a tiny mining hamlet
located along the road that led up to Lssaquah and North Bend and then
connected to the main freeway which wound over Snoqualmie Pass. "We
checked with the people there and they hadn't seen her since February
Page 65
10th." Barclift said.
As caught up as she was in her search for what she termed "that other
world you can't explain," Donna had remained close to her parents. She
had spent the weekend of February
23-24 with them, had called them on March 9th, and written them a letter
on March 10th. She'd been in good spirits and was planning a trip to
the beach with her mother.
Barclift drove me around the Evergreen campus. He pointed out the lights
that stood next to the pathways, but the campus seemed to retain many
elements of the original wilderness it had been. In spots, the winding
paths disappeared into tunnels of lowering fir boughs. The forest
primeval. "Most of the girls walk in pairs or groups after dark," he
commented.
The campus was sodden with spring rains. It had been searched in a grid
pattern by men and tracking dogs. If Donna was there-her body hidden
in a morass of salal, Oregon Grape, sord ferns, and deadfall firs-they
would have found her. But Donna was gone, just as completely as Lynda
Healy was. The things she'd left behind in her room-her backpack, her
flute, suitcases, all her clothing, even the camera she invariably
carried-were turned over to her parents.
In the end the Thurston County investigators were left with
58
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
Donna's writings on death and magic, and the x-rays they had obtained
from her physician of her spine, left ankle, and left wrist. If they
found her now, they feared it might be the only way to identify her.
8
During that spring of 1974, I had rented a houseboat in Seattle to use
Page 66
as an office, subletting the creaky little oneroom structure that
floated precariously on logs in Lake Union-a mile south of the University
District. I was fully aware now that two college girls were missing,
that Kathy Devine had been murdered, and I was beginning to sense that
police felt a pattern was emerging, but the public remained unaware.
Seattle averages about sixty homicides a year, King County vacillates
from two or three to a dozen annually, and Thurston County rarely exceeds
three. Not a bad percentage for areas highly populated, and things
appeared to be normal. Tragic, but normal.
My ex-husband had suffered a sudden grand mal epileptic seizure; his
cancer had metastasized to the brain. He underwent surgery and was
hospitalized for several weeks. My youngest daughter, Leslie, then
sixteen, took a bus to Seattle every day after school to care for her
father; she didn't think the nurses were attentive enough. I worried.
She was so lovely, looked so much like the girls who were disappearing,
and I was frightened to have her walk even half a block alone in the
city. She was insistent that it was something she had to do, and I held
my breath each day until she was home safe. I was experiencing the kind
of dread that soon every parent in the area would feel. As a crime writer,
I had seen too much violence, too much tragedy, and I saw "suspicious
men" wherever I went. I have never been afraid for myself. But for my
daughters, oh yes, for my daughters. I warned them so much that they
finally accused me of getting paranoid. »
I gave up the houseboat. I didn't want to be that far away from my children,
not even during the daytime hours.
On April 17th, it happened again. This time the girl who vanished was
120 miles away from Seattle, far across the
59
60
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
looming Cascade Mountains that separate the verdant coastland of
Washington from the arid wheatflelds of the eastern half of the state.
Page 67
Susan Elaine Rancourt was a freshman at Central Washington State College
in Ellensburg, a rodeo town that has retained the flavor of the old
west. One of six children in a close family, Susan had been a cheerleader
and homecoming queen in LaConner, Washington, High School.
She differed from the other missing girls in that she was a blonde,
a blonde with long hair, blue eyes. She had the sort of stunning figure
that most teenaged girls pray for, not to mention teenaged boys. Perhaps
her early development had contributed to her shyness and eclipsed the
fact that Susan had a superior, scientifically oriented intelligence.
When the rest of her family moved to Anchorage, Alaska, it took courage
on Susan's part to stay behind to attend college in Ellensburg. She'd
known she'd have to pay most of her own way; with five other siblings
to raise, her family just didn't have the money to foot all her college
bills.
The summer before her freshman year, Susan worked two full-time
jobs-seven days a week-to save money for tuition. She'd always known
that her career would be in the field of medicine, and her high school
grades-straight A's-and her college aptitude scores verified that she
was a natural. At Ellensburg, Susan Rancourt was majoring in biology,
still getting a straight 4.0 point, and working a full-time job in a
nursing home. She was a young woman any family could be proud of.
Where Lynda Healy had been cautious, and Donna Manson had been heedless
of danger, Susan Rancourt was frankly afraid of the dark, of being out
alone. She never went anywhere without her roommate after the sun had
set.
Never, until the evening of April 17th. It had been a busy week for
her; midterm finals were being held, but she learned of an opportunity
open for would-be dorm advisors. With that job, her expenses could be
cut a great deal; besides it would give her a chance to meet more students,
to break out of her self-imposed shell of shyness.
So she took a chance.
Susan was only five feet two and weighed 120 pounds, but she was strong.
She jogged every morning and she'd gone to Karate classes. Perhaps she'd
been foolish to think she
Page 68
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
61
couldn't protect herself on a crowded campus even if someone did approach
her.
At eight o'clock that evening, she took a load of clothing to a wash
room in one of the campus dorms, and walked off to the advisors' meeting.
The meeting was over at nine, and she planned to meet a friend to see
a German film and then return to the laundramat to put her clothes in
the dryer at ten o'clock.
But no one saw Susan after she left the meeting. Her friend waited and
waited, and then finally went into the film alone, looking back toward
the entrance several times for the familiar sight of Susan's figure.
Susan's clothes remained in the washer, until another student who needed
to use it impatiently removed them and set them on a table, where they
were discovered a day later.
Susan Rancourt's failure to return to her dorm was reported at once.
Susan had a boyfriend, but he was far away at the University of Washington
in Seattle, and she dated no one else. She just wasn't the type not
to come home at night, and she surely wouldn't have missed a final exam;
she'd never even skipped a class.
Campus police officers noted down the outfit she'd worn when she had
last been seen: gray corduroy slacks, a shortsleeved yellow sweater,
a yellow coat, and brown "hush puppy" shoes. And then they attempted
to retrace the route she would have taken from the advisors' meeting
back to the dormitories a quarter mile away.
The quickest and most common route led up the Mall past a construction
area, across a footbridge over a pond-and then under a railroad trestle
near a student parking lot.
"If someone watched her, followed her, and meant to grab her," one
officer commented, "it would have been here-under the trestle; it's
dark as Hell for about twenty feet."
But there should have been something left of Susan there. For one thing,
she'd been carrying a folder full of loose papers that would have
scattered in every direction in a struggle. And, shy as she was, Susan
Page 69
Rancourt was a fighter, adept at Karate. Her friends insisted that there
was no way she would have given up quietly.
Beyond that, the path back to Barto Hall where the film was being shown
was the route most students took. At nine at night, there would have
been steady light traffic. Someone should have seen something
unusual-but no one had.
62
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
Susan had had only one physical imperfection; she was very nearsighted.
On the night of April 17th, she had worn neither her glasses nor her
contact lenses. She could have seen well enough to make her way around
the campus, but she would have had to walk up quite close to someone
to recognize them, and she might well have missed a subtle movement
in the shadows beneath the trestle.
With the disappearance of Susan Rancourt, other coeds came forward with
descriptions of incidents that had vaguely disturbed them. One girl
said she'd talked to a tall, handsome man in his twenties outside the
campus library on April 12th, a man who had one arm in a sling and a
metal brace on his finger. He'd had trouble managing his armload of
books and had dropped several. "Finally, he asked me if I'd help him
carry them to his car," she recalled.
The car, a Volkswagen bug, was parked about 300 yards from the railroad
trestle. She'd carried his books to the car, and then noticed that the
passenger seat was missing. Something-she couldn't even say what-had
caused the hairs on the back of her neck to stand on end, something
about that missing seat. He seemed nice enough, and they'd talked about
how he'd been injured skiing at Crystal Mountain, but, suddenly, she
just wanted to be away from him. "I put the books on the hood of his
car, and I ran . . ."
A second girl told a story very like the first. She had met the man
with an injured arm on the 17th, and had carried some packages wrapped
in butcher paper to his car for him. "Then he told me that he was having
Page 70
trouble getting it started, and asked me to get in and try the ignition
while he did something under the hood. I didn't know him. I didn't want
to get in his car, and I just made some excuse about being in a hurry
and I left."
The son of an Oregon district attorney, visiting on campus, remembered
seeing a tall man with his arm in a sling standing in front of Barto
Hall around 8:30 on the evening of the
17th.
The reports didn't seem all that ominous; any time a crime or a
disappearance occurs, ordinary incidents take on an importance for
"witnesses" who want to help. The statements were typed, filed away,
and the search for Susan Rancourt continued.
In this case, as in many others, a minute detail would provide mute
testimony to the fate of the missing girls. With
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME 63
Donna Manson, it had been her camera left behind; with Susan, it was
her contact lenses and her glasses, glasses that she'd probably meant
to carry with her to the movie on the night she vanished, and her dental
floss. When her mother looked into her medicine cabinet and saw the
dental floss, she felt her heart thud. "She was such a creature of habit.
She never went anywhere overnight without dental floss ..."
Captain Herb Swindler, a massive bulldog of a cop, a veteran in homicide
investigations, had taken over command of the Crimes Against Persons
Unit of the Seattle Police Department in the spring of 1974. I had known
Herb for twenty years; in 1954 he was the patrol officer who had responded
first to a complaint of indecent liberties by the mother of a small
girl in West Seattle, and I was the most-rookie of policewomen who was
called in to question the child. I'd been twenty-one then, and admittedly
somewhat embarrassed at the questions I had to ask the little girl about
the "nice old man" who boarded with the family.
I remember how Herb teased me because I'd blushed--the standard razzing
that new policewomen received--but he'd been gentle with the child,
Page 71
with her mother. He was a good cop, and a thorough investigator and
he'd moved up rapidly through the ranks. Now, the buck stopped in Herb's
office; most of the missing girls' cases had seemingly originated in
Seattle, and he was wrestling day and night with the mysteries that
seemed to have no clues, no answers. It was as if the man responsible
was taunting the police, laughing at the ease with which he'd abducted
the women, leaving no trace of himself.
Swindler is a talkative man, and he needed a sounding board. I filled
that need. He knew I wouldn't talk to anyone outside the department,
knew I'd followed the cases as meticulously as any detective. Certainly,
I was a writer looking for the big story; but I was also the mother
of two teenaged daughters, and the horror of it all, the agony of the
parents, kept me awake nights. He was confident I wouldn't publish a
word until the time was right-if ever.
During those months of 1974, I talked to
Swindler almost every
day--listening, trying to find some common denominator. My territory
took me up and down the coast, and I often knew of cases in other cities,
cases 200 miles away in
64
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
Oregon, and I reported any disappearance that might tie in to the Seattle
Police.
The next girl to walk away forever lived in Oregon. Nineteen days after
Susan Rancourt vanished-on May 6thRoberta Kathleen "Kathy" Parks had
spent an unhappy and guilt-ridden day in her room in Sackett Hall on
the Oregon State University campus in Corvallis, 250 miles south of
Seattle. I knew Sackett Hall; I'd lived there myself when I attended
one term at O.S.U. back in the 1950s, a huge, modern dormitory complex
on a campus that was then considered a "cow college." Even then, when
the world didn't seem to be so fraught with danger, none of us would
ever go to the snack machines in the cavernous basement corridors alone
Page 72
at night.
Kathy Parks wasn't very happy at Oregon State. She was homesick for
Lafayette, California, and she'd broken up with her boyfriend who'd
left for Louisiana. On May 4th, Kathy had argued in a phone call with
her father, and, on May 6th, she learned that he'd suffered a massive
heart attack. Her sister had called her from Spokane, Washington with
the news of their father's coronary, and then called back some hours
later to say that it looked as though he would survive.
Kathy, whose major was world religions, felt a little better after the
second call, and she agreed to join some of the other residents of Sackett
Hall in an exercise session in the dorm lounge.
Shortly before eleven, the tall slender girl with long ashblonde hair
left Sackett Hall to meet some friends for coffee in the Student Union
Building. She promised her roommate she would be back within the hour.
Wearing blue slacks, a navy blue top, a light green jacket, and platform
sandals, she left Sackett for the last time.
Kathy never made the Student Union Building. Like the others, all of
her possessions were left behind: her bike, clothing, cosmetics.
This time, no one had seen anyone suspicious. No man with his arm in
a sling. No Volkswagen bugs. Kathy had never talked of being afraid
or of receiving obscene phone calls. She had been a girl so subject
to wide mood swings that the question of suicide arose. Had she felt
so guilty about fighting with her father, perhaps believing that she
had caused his heart attack? Guilty enough to have taken her own life?
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
65
The Willamette River, which wends its way near Corvallis, was dragged,
and nothing was found. Had she chosen another means of self destruction,
her body would surely be located soon, but it was not.
Lieutenant Bill Harris, of the Oregon State Police Criminal
Investigation Unit, was stationed on the O.S.U. campus and he headed
the probe in Oregon. He had had a tragic homicide in Sackett Hall a
Page 73
few years before, where a coed was found stabbed to death in her room,
but his successful investigation had resulted in the arrest of a male
student who lived on an upper floor. That youth was still in the Oregon
State Penitentiary.
After a week-long search, Harris was convinced that Kathy Parks had
been abducted, probably seized as she walked between the great masses
of lilac bushes blooming along the path between Sackett Hall and the
Student Union Building. Gone, like all the others, without a single
cry for help.
Police bulletins with pictures of the four missing girls were tacked
up side by side on the office walls of every law enforcement agency
in the Northwest, smiling faces that looked enough alike to be sisters.
Yet only Herb Swindler was absolutely convinced that Kathy Parks was
part of the pattern; other detectives felt Corvallis was too far away
for her to be a victim of the same man who prowled Washington campuses.
There was to be only a short respite. Twenty-six days later, a casual
acquaintance of my elder daughter, Brenda Carol Ball, twenty-two, who
lived with two roommates in the south King County suburb of Burien,
disappeared. Brenda had been a Highline Community College student,
until two weeks before. She was five feet three, 112 pounds, and her
brown eyes sparkled with her zest for life.
On the night of May 31-June 1, Brenda went alone to the Flame Tavern
at 128th South and Ambaum Road South. Her roommates had seen her last
at 2 P.M. that Friday afternoon and she told them that she planned to
go to the tavern, and mentioned that she might catch a ride afterward
to Sun Lakes State Park in eastern Washington and meet them there.
She did go to the Flame and was seen there by several people who knew
her. No one remembers exactly what she was wearing, but her usual garb
was faded blue jeans and long-sleeved turtleneck tops. She seemed to
be having a good time, and stayed until closing at 2 A.M.
66
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
Page 74
Brenda asked one of the musicians in the band for a ride home, but he
explained he was heading in another direction. The last time anyone
remembers seeing Brenda Ball, she was talking in the parking lot with
a handsome, brown-haired man who had one arm in a sling. . . .
Because Brenda-like Donna Manson-was a free spirit, given to impulsive
trips, there was a long delay before she was officially reported missing.
Nineteen days passed before her roommates became convinced that
something had happened to her. They'd checked with her bank and become
alarmed when they learned that her savings account hadn't been touched.
All of her clothing was still in their apartment. Her parents, who lived
nearby, hadn't heard from her either.
At twenty-two, Brenda was the oldest of all the missing women, an adult,
who had proved herself capable and cautious in the past. But not now.
It seemed that Brenda too had met someone she should not have trusted.
Brenda was gone.
But the stalking was far from over. Even before Brenda Ball was reported
as a missing person to King County Police, the man law enforcement
officers sought was on the prowl again, about to strike audaciously,
virtually in full view of dozens of witnesses-and still remain only
a phantom figure. He would thumb his nose at police, leaving them as
frustrated as they had ever been in the series of crimes that had already
both galled and horrified them; many of the detectives searching for
the missing girls had daughters of their own.
It was almost as if it were some kind of perverse game of challenge
on the part of the abductor, as if, each time, he would come a little
further out of the shadows, take more chances, to prove that he could
do what he wanted and still not be caught, or even seen.
Georgeann Hawkins, at eighteen, was one of those golden girls for whom
luck or fate had dealt a perfect hand-until the inexplicable night of
June 10th. Raised in the Tacoma suburb of Sumner, she'd been a Daffodil
Princess, and, like Susan Rancourt, a cheerleader, an honor student
at Lakes High School. She had a vivacious, pixielike quality to her
loveliness, glossy long brown hair, and lively brown eyes. She was
tiny-five feet, two inches tall, 115 pounds-healthy in a glowing way,
the youngest of two daughters of the Warren B. Hawkins family.
Page 75
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
67
While many good students in high school tend to find the University
of Washington's curriculum much more difficult and drop to a comfortable
C average, Georgeann had continued to maintain a straight A record.
Her biggest worry during that finals week of June, 1974 was that she
was having a difficult time with Spanish. She considered dropping the
course, but, on the morning of June 10th, she had phoned her mother
and said she was going to cram for the next day's final as hard as she
could, and she thought she could handle it.
She already had a summer job lined up-with Pierce County in Tacoma-and
she'd discussed it by phone with her parents at least once a week.
During rush week in September of 1973, Georgeann had been tapped by
one of the top sororities on campus, Kappa Alpha Theta, and lived in
the big house among several other Greek houses along 17th Avenue N.B.
Residents of the sororities and fraternities along Greek Row visit back
and forth much more freely than they did back in the fifties when it
was strictly forbidden for members of the opposite sex to venture above
the formal living rooms on the first floor. Georgeann frequently dropped
in to see her boyfriend, who lived in the Beta Theta Pi House six houses
down from the Theta House.
During the early evening hours of Monday, June 10th, Georgeann and a
sorority sister had gone to a party where they'd had one or two mixed
drinks. Georgeann explained that she had to get back to study for her
Spanish exam. But, first, she was going to stop by the Beta House and
say goodnight to her boyfriend.
Georgeann was cautious; she rarely went anywhere on campus alone at
night, but the area along 17th Avenue N.B.
was so familiar, so
well-lighted, and there was always someone around she knew. The
fraternal organizations front the street on each side, with a grassy
island running down the middle. Trees, in full leaf in June, do block
out some of the street lights; they've grown so tall since they were
Page 76
planted back in the twenties.
The alley that runs in back of the Greek houses from 45th N.B. to 47th
N.B. is as bright as day, lit by street lights every ten feet or so.
June 10th was a warm night, and every window opening onto the alleyway
was open. It is doubtful that any of the student residents were asleep,
even at midnight;
68
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
most of them were cramming for finals with the aid of black coffee and
No-Doz.
Georgeann did go to the Beta House, a little before 12:30 A.M. on June
11th. She visited with her steady boyfriend for a half hour or so,
borrowed some Spanish notes, and then said goodnight and left by the
back door to walk the ninety feet down to the back door of the Theta
House.
One of the other Betas heard the door slam and stuck Ms head out his
window, recognizing Georgeann.
"Hey George!" he called loudly. "What's happening?"
The pretty, deeply tanned, girl wearing blue slacks, a white backless
teeshirt, and a sheer red. white, and blue top. craned her neck and
looked back. She smiled and waved, talked for a moment or two about
the Spanish exam, and then, laughing, called "Adios."
She turned and headed south toward her residence. He watched her for
about thirty feet. Two other male students who knew her recall that
they saw her traverse the next twenty feet.
She had forty feet to go-forty feet in the alley brightly lit. Certainly,
there were some murky areas between the big houses, filled with laurel
hedges, bloomins rhododendrons, but Georgeann would have stayed in the
middle of the alley.
Her roommate, Dee Nichols, waited for the familiar sound of pebbles
hitting their window: Georgeann had lost her key to the back door, and
the sorority sister would have to run down the stairs and let her in.
Page 77
There was no rattling of pebbles. There was no sound, no outcry, nothing.
An hour passed. Two hours. Worried, Dee called the Beta House and learned
Georgeeann had left for home a little after
1:00 A.M. She awoke the housemother, and said softly, "Georgeann's gone.
She didn't come home."
They waited through the night, trying to find some reasonable
explanation for why Georgeann might be gone, not wanting to alarm her
parents at three A.M.
In the morning, they called the Seattle Police.
Detective "Bud" Jelberg of the Missing Persons Unit took the report,
and rechecked with the fraternity house where she'd been seen last,
then called her parents. Usually, any police department will wait
twenty-four hours before beginning a search for a missing adult but,
in view of the events of the
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
69
first half of 1974, the disappearance of Georgeann Hawkins was treated
very, very seriously immediately.
At 8:45 A.M. Detective Sergeant Ivan Beeson, and Detectives Ted Fonis
and George Cuthill of the Homicide Unit arrived at the Theta House,
4521 17th N.B. They were accompanied by George Ishii, one of the most
renowned criminalists in the Northwest. Ishii, who heads the Western
Washington State Crime Lab, is a brilliant man, a man who probably knows
more about the detection, preservation, and testing of physical
evidence than any other criminalist in the western half of the United
States. He was my first teacher of crime scene investigation. In two
quarters, I learned more about physical evidence than I ever had before.
Ishii believes implicitly in the theories of Dr. E. Locarde, a pioneer
French criminalist who states, "Every criminal leaves something of
himself at the scene of a crime-something, no matter how minute-and
always takes something of the scene away with him." Every good detective
knows this; this is why they search so intensely at a crime scene for
Page 78
that small part of the perpetrator that he has left behind: a hair,
a drop of blood, a thread, a button, a finger or palm print, a footprint,
traces of semen, tool marks, shell casings. And, in most instances,
they find it.
The criminalist and the three homicide detectives covered that alleyway
behind 45th and 47th N.B.-that ninety feet on their hands and knees.
And found nothing at all.
Leaving the alley cordoned off, and guarded by patrolmen, they went
into the Theta House to talk with Georgeann's sorority sisters and her
housemother.
Georgeann lived in Number Eight in the house, a room she shared with
Dee Nichols. All of her possessions were there, everything but the
clothes she'd been wearing and her leather purse, a tan "sack" bag with
reddish stains on it. In that purse she had carried her I.D., a few
dollars, a bottle of "Heaven Sentfc perfume with angels on the label,
and a small hair brush.
"Georgeann never went anyplace without leaving me the phone number where
she'd be," Dee said. "I know she intended to come back here last night.
She had one more exam and then she was going home for the summer on
the 13th. The blue slacks-the ones she was wearing-were missing
70 THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
three buttons; there was only one left. I can give you one of the buttons
like it from our room."
Like Susan Rancourt, Georgeann was very myopic. "She wasn't wearing
her glasses or her contacts last night," her roommate recalled. "She'd
worn her contacts all day to study, and after you've worn contact lenses
for a long time, things look blurry when you put glasses on, so she
wasn't wearing them either."
The missing girl could have seen well enough to negotiate the familiar
alley, but she would have seen nothing more than a vague outline of
a figure more than ten feet away. If someone had been lurking in the
alley, someone who had learned Georgeann's name after hearing the youth
Page 79
call to her from the Beta House window, he could easily have used a
soft "George-" to call her close to him. And she would have had to walk
very close indeed in order to recognize the man who beckoned to her.
Perhaps so close that she could have been seized, gagged, and carried
off before she had a chance to cry out?
Surely, anyone looking down the alley would have been alerted at the
sight of a man carrying her away. Or would they? There are always high
jinks during finals week, anything to break the tension, and strong
young men frequently pick up giggling, squealing girls, playing "cave
man."
But no one had seen even that. Georgeann Hawkins may have been knocked
out with one blow, chloroformed, injected with a swift-acting nervous
system depressant, or just pinioned in powerful arms, a hand held tightly
over her mouth so that she couldn't even scream.
"She was afraid of the dark," Dee said quietly. "Sometimes, we would
walk all the way around a block just to avoid a dark spot along the
sidewalk. When he got her, I know that she was hurrying back here. I
don't think she had a chance."
The sorority sister who had attended the party earlier in the evening
with Georgeann, remembered that they'd parted on the corner of 47th
N.B. and N.B. 17th. "She stood and waited while I walked to our house,
and 1 yelled to her that I was O.K., and she yelled back that she was
O.K. All of us kind of checked on each other like that. She went into
the Beta House and that's the last time I ever saw her."
It was incomprehensible then, and it is still incomprehensible to
Seattle homicide detectives, that Georgeann Hawkins
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
71
could vanish so completely within a space of forty feet. Of all the
cases of missing girls, it is the Hawkins case that baffles them the
most. It was something that couldn't have happened, and yet it did.
When the news of Georgeann's disappearance hit the media, two witnesses
Page 80
came forward with stories of incidents on June 11th that were amazingly
similar. An attractive sorority girl said that she'd been walking in
front of the Greek houses on 17th N.B. at about 12:30 A.M. when she'd
seen a young man on crutches just ahead of her. One leg of his jeans
had been cut up the side and he appeared to have a full cast on that
leg.
"He was carrying a briefcase with a handle, and he kept dropping it.
I offered to help him, but I told him I had to go into one of the houses
for a few minutes, and, if he didn't mind waiting. I'd come out and
help him get his stuff home."
"And did you?"
"No, I was inside longer than I thought, and he was gone when I came
out."
A male college student also had seen the tall, good-looking man with
the briefcase and crutches. "A girl was carrying his case for him, and,
later on, after I'd taken my girl home, I saw the girl again, walking
alone."
He looked at a picture of Georgeann Hawkins, but said he was positive
she wasn't the girl he'd seen.
At this time, the notation in the Susan Rancourt file in Ellensburg
about the man with his arm in a sling was not generally known. Only
after publicity about the man with his leg in the cast was disseminated
would the two incidents so far apart be coordinated. Coincidence, or
part of a sly plan to throw young women off guard?
Detectives canvassed every house on each side of 17th N.B. At the Phi
Sigma Sigma fraternity at 4520-just across from the Theta House-they
found that the housemother recalled being awakened from a sound sleep
between one and two on the morning of June llth.
"It was a scream that wakened me. It was a high-pitched scream ... a
terrified scream. And then it just stopped, and everything was! quiet.
I figured it was just kids horsing around, but now I wish ... I wish
I'd. . . ."
No one else heard it.
Lynda . . . Donna . . . Susan . . . Kathy . . . Brenda ... Georgeann.
All gone as completely as if a seam in the
Page 81
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
backdrop of life itself had opened, drawn them in, and closed without
leaving so much as a mended tear in the tapestry.
Georgeann Hawkins' father, his voice breaking, summed up the feelings
of all the desperately worried parents who waited for some word. "Every
day, I'm a little bit lower. You'd like to hope, but I'm too realistic.
She was a very friendly, very involved, youngster. I keep saying 'was.'
I shouldn't say that. It's a job raising kids. You steer them along,
and we figured we had both our kids over the hump."
Any homicide detective who has ever tried to cope with the anguish of
parents who realize intuitively that their children are dead, but have
not even the faint comfort of knowing where their bodies are, can attest
to the fact that this is the worst. One weary investigator commented
to me, "It's rough. It's damn rough, when you have to tell them that
you've found a body, that it's their kid. But it's never over for the
parents who just don't know. They can't really have a funeral, they
can't know that their children aren't being held and tortured someplace,
they can't face their grief and get it over. Hell, you never get over
it, but, if you know, you can pick your life up again, somehow."
The girls were gone, and each set of parents tried to deal with it,
brought in the records that would mean the identification one day,
perhaps, of a decomposed body. Dental records, all the years of paying
for fillings and orthodontics so that their daughters would have good
teeth to last a lifetime. The x-rays from Donna Manson's broken bones,
set clean and strong again. And, for Georgeann, x-rays taken when she'd
suffered from Osgood-Schlatter's Disease as a teenager, an inflammation
of the tibia near the knee. After months of concern, her legs had grown
long and shapely, marked only by slight bumps just below the knee.
Any of us who have raised children know, as John F. Kennedy once said,
that "to have children is to give hostages to fate." To lose a child
to an illness, or even an accident, can be dealt with during the passage
of time. To lose a child to a predator, an insanely brilliant killer,
is almost more than any human should have to bear.
Page 82
When I began writing fact-detective stories, I promised myself that
I would always remember I was writing about the loss of human beings,
that I was never to forget that. I hoped that the work I did might somehow
save other victims, might warn them of the danger. I never wanted to
become tough, to
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
73
seek out the sensational and the gory, and I never have. I have joined
the Committee of Friends and Families of Missing Persons and Victims
of Violent Crimes, at the invitation of the group. I have met many parents
of victims, cried with them, and yet I have somehow felt guilty-because
I make my living from other peoples' tragedies. When I told the Committee
how I felt, they put their arms around me and said, "No. Keep on writing.
Let the public know how it is for us. Let them know how we hurt, and
how we try to save other parents' children by working for new legislation
that requires mandatory sentencing and the death penalty for killers."
They are far stronger than I could ever be.
And so, I kept on, trying to find the answer to the awful puzzle,
believing that the killer, when he was found, would prove to be a man
with a record of violence, a man who should never have been allowed
to walk the streets, someone who must surely have shown signs of a
deranged mind in the past, someone who had been let out of prison too
soon.
1
I
I happened to be sitting in Captain Herb Swindler's office one afternoon
in late June of 1974 when Joni Lenz and her father came into the Homicide
Unit. Herb had a montage of the victims' pictures on his wall; he kept
Page 83
them there as a reminder that the investigation must continue with no
let-up in intensity. Joni had volunteered to come in and look at the
other girls' pictures, to see if she recognized any of them, even though
their names were completely unfamiliar to her.
"Joni," Herb said gently. "Look at these girls. Have you ever seen any
of them? Maybe you've been in a club together, worked together, had
a class or something with them."
With her father standing protectively beside her, the victim of the
January 4th bludgeoning studied the photographs. The slender girl was
still recovering from the brain damage she'd suffered, and she spoke
with a hesitancy, a vagueness, but she was trying very hard to help.
She moved closer to the wall, studied each photo carefully, and then
she shook her head.
"N-n-n-o-o," she stuttered. "I never saw them. I didn't know them. I
can't remember-a lot of things I can't remember, but I know I never
knew the girls."
"Thank you, Joni," Herb said. "We appreciate your coming in."
It had been a long shot, the slight possibility that the one living
victim would prove to be a link. Herb glanced at me, and shook his head
as Joni Lenz limped out of the room. If she had known any of the others,
so much of her memory of the past year had been battered out of her
brain cells.
Now, in the early summer of 1974, the reading public knew of the pattern
of missing girls; it was no longer a matter that concerned only
detectives and the principals involved. And the public was terrified.
Hitchhiking among young women dropped sharply, and women from fifteen
to sixty-five jumped at shadows.
74
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
75
Stories began, the kind of stories that can never be traced directly
to the source. I heard variations on the same theme a dozen times. But
Page 84
they always came from a friend of a friend of a friend of someone whose
cousin, or sister, or wife had been involved.
Sometimes the attacks were said to have happened in a shopping mall,
sometimes in a restaurant, sometimes a theater. It went like this: "This
man and his wife (or sister, daughter, etc.) went to Southcenter Mall
to shop, and she went back to their car to get something. Well, she
didn't come back for a long time, and he got worried and went looking
for her. He got there just in time to see some guy carrying her away.
The husband yelled, and the guy dropped her. He'd given her some kind
of shot that made her pass out. It was really lucky that he got there
in time, because, you know, with everything that's been happening, it
was probably that killer."
The first few times I heard versions of the "true" story, I attempted
to trace it back to its origin, but I found it was impossible to do
so. I doubt that any of the incidents ever happened at all; it was the
reaction of the public, mass hysteria. If the girls who were gone could
disappear the way they had, then anyone could, and there seemed to be
no way to prevent it.
The pressure on law enforcement, of course, was tremendous. On July
3rd, more than a hundred representatives from departments all over
Washington and Oregon met in Olympia at Evergreen State College for
a day-long brainstorming conference. Perhaps if they pooled their
information, they might find the common denominator that would break
the seemingly inscrutable mysteries.
I was invited to attend, and felt a kind of eerie oppressiveness as
I walked along the fir shrouded paths to the conference. Donna Manson
had walked here four months before, headed for the same building. Now,
the rains had given way to bright sunshine and the birds called from
the trees above me, but the feeling of dread was still there.
Sitting amongMhe investigators from the Seattle Police Department, the
King County Police Department, the Washington State Patrol, the U.S.
Army's C.I.D., the University of Washington Police, the Central
Washington Security Force, the Tacoma Police Department, the Pierce
County Sheriff's Office, the Multnomah (Oregon)
County Sheriff's
departPage 85
76
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
ment, the Oregon State Police, and dozens of smaller police departments,
I found it almost impossible to believe that all these men, with scores
upon scores of years of training and experience could not find out more
about the suspect they sought.
It was not from lack of trying; every single department involved wanted
him, and they were willing to explore any avenue-no matter how bizarre-to
accomplish an arrest, a good arrest that would stick.
Sheriff Don Redmond of Thurston County summed up the feeling in his
opening remarks, "We want to show parents we really care. We want to
find their children. The people of the State of Washington are going
to have to give us a hand. So many times people could volunteer
information. We need the eyes and ears of the people out there."
Redmond's department, located in Washington's capital city, was still
searching for the killer of Katherine Merry Devine, and the whereabouts
of Donna Manson. Now. they had another homicide of a teenager to contend
with. Brenda Baker had been fifteen years old, a hitchhiker like Kathy
and Donna, and she'd run away from home on May 25th. On June 17th, her
badly decomposed body was found at the edge of Millersylvania State
Park. It was too late to determine cause of death or to make a quick
identification. At first, it was thought that it might have been the
body of Georgeann Hawkins. Dental charts proved, however, that it was
Brenda Baker. The Baker girl's body was found several miles away from
McKenny Park where Kathy Devine had been found. However, both sites
were the same distance from 1-5, the freeway that runs between Seattle
and Olvmpia.
Looking at the cases of the missing girls side by side, some striking
similarities could not be ignored; it was as if the man who'd taken
them away had chosen a certain type he wanted, picked his quarry with
care:
*Each had long hair, parted in the middle.
Page 86
*Each was Caucasian, fair-complexioned. ~~~
*Each was of much more than average intelligence.
*Each was slender, attractive, highly talented.
*Each had vanished within a week of midterm or final exams at local
colleges.
*Each came from a stable, loving family.
*Each disappearance took place during the hours of darkness.
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
77
*Each girl was single.
*Each girl had been wearing slacks or jeans when she disappeared.
*In each case, detectives had not one piece of physical evidence that
might have been left by the abductor.
"•Construction work was going on on each campus where the girls were
missing.
And, in two instances-Susan Rancourt in Ellensburg, and Georgeann
Hawkins in Seattle-a man wearing a cast on his arm or leg had been seen
close to where they had vanished.
They were all young girls; none of them could be considered a mature
woman.
It was weird, perverted, insane, and, for the detectives trying to get
a fix on the man, akin to working their way through a maze, starting
up each new path only to find it blocked. The victims certainly did
not appear to have been selected by random choice, and they wondered
about that.
They even wondered if it might not be more than one man they were
seeking-a cult choosing maidens to be sacrificed in deadly rituals?
During that spring of 1974, a rash of
reports had come in from
northwestern states on the mutilation of cattle, found in fields with
only their sexual organs missing. All this smacked of devil worship;
the natural (or unnatural) progression of such mutilations would be
Page 87
human sacrifice.
For the detectives gathered at Evergreen College, all men whose work
and life styles made them think in rational, concrete terms, the occult
was a foreign concept. I believe in the efficacy of ESP, but I was most
certainly not conversant with astrology beyond reading the daily
syndicated columns. However, I had had a phone call a few days before
that Olympia conference and a meeting with a woman who was an astrologer.
My friend, who uses the initials "R.L." when she charts astrology, is
a woman who had worked at the Crisis Clinic while I did. In her late
thirties, she was in her senior year at the University of Washington
as a history major. I had not heard from her for some time when she'd
called in late June.
"Ann, you're close to the police," she began. "I've found something
that I think they should know about. Could we talk?"
I met with R.L. in her North End apartment, and she led me to her office
where the desk, floors, and furniture were
78
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
buried in charts with strange symbols. She had been trying to find a
pattern-an astrological pattern-in the case of the missing girls.
"I've come across something. Look at these," she said.
I was completely at a loss. I could make out my sign-Libra's scales-but
the rest was only so much scribbling to me. I told her so.
"O.K. I'll give you a crash course. You probably know about the sun
signs. There are twelve and last approximately a month each year. That's
what people mean when they say 'I'm an Aquarian, or a Scorpio, etcetera.'
But the moon passes through each of these signs every month."
She showed me an Ephemeris (an astrological almanac) and I could see
that the phases of the moon signs seemed to last about forty-eight hours
each month.
"All right, I understand that much. But I can't see what it has to do
with the cases," I argued.
Page 88
"There's a pattern. Lynda Healy was taken when the moon was going through
a Taurus phase. From that point on, the girls vanished alternately in
Pisces and Scorpio moon phases. The chances against that happening-the
odds-are almost impossible."
"You think someone is deliberately abducting those girls, maybe killing
them, because he knows the moon is going through a certain sign? I can't
comprehend that."
"I don't know if he knows anything about astrology," she said. "He might
not even be aware of the forces of the moon."
She pulled out a sealed envelope. "I want you to give this to someone
who's in charge. It's not to be opened until after the weekend of July
13th to 15th."
"Come on! They'd laugh me out of their offices."
"What else do they have to go on? I've seen this pattern. I've worked
it out several times, and there it is. If I could tell you who, or where,
or when it's going to happen again, I would-but I can't do that. It's
happened once when the moon was in Taurus, and then a half dozen times
back and forth between Pisces and Scorpio. I think he's going to go
back to Taurus and start a new cycle."
"All right," I finally said. "I'll take the envelope, but I won't promise
I'll give it to anyone. I don't know who I could give it to."
"You'll find someone," she said firmly.
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
79
I had that envelope in my purse as I attended the law enforcement
conference at Evergreen. I was still undecided about mentioning it,
or the predictions of R. L.
Herb Swindler took over the lectern after the lunch break. He threw
out a startling question and drew some guffaws from his fellow lawmen.
"Anybody have any ideas? Is there some pattern coming down that we
haven't considered? Anybody here know anything about numerology,
anybody psychic?"
Page 89
I figured Herb was kidding, but he wasn't. He began to write on the
blackboard, listing the dates of the girls' disappearances in an attempt
to find a numerological link.
But there seemed to be nothing that could be called a pattern. From
Lynda's disappearance to Donna's, there had been a forty-two day interim;
from Donna's to Susan's-36 days; from Susan's to Kathy Parks'-19 days;
from Kathy's to Brenda's-25 days, and from Brenda's to Georgeann's-11
days. The only thing immediately apparent was that the abductions were
getting closer and closer together.
"O.K." Herb said. "Any other suggestions? I don't care how crazy it
might sound. We'll kick it around."
The letter was burning a hole in my purse. I raised my hand.
"I haven't heard anything about numerology, but my friend, an astrologer,
says there's an astrological pattern."
There were some eyes raised to the ceiling, some chuckles, but I plunged
ahead, explaining what R.L. had told me. "He's only taking the girls
away when the moon is moving through Taurus. Pisces, or Scorpio."
"Your friend thinks this is unusual." Swindler smiled.
"She says it defies the laws of probability."
"Then she can tell us when it might happen again?"
"I'm not sure. She gave me a sealed envelope. You can have it if you
like. You're not to open it until July 15th."
I could sense that my audience was getting restless, that they thought
we were wasting time.
I passed the envelope up to Herb, and he weighed it in his hand.
"So she thinks that's the next time a girl's going to vanish, does she?"
"I don't know. I don't know what's in that envelope. She wants to test
her theory, and she only said not to open the letter until then."
80
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
The discussion moved into other areas. I suspected that most of the
investigators present thought I was a "crazy reporter," and I wasn't
Page 90
too sure myself that it wasn't really reaching to make a pattern where
there was none.
The general consensus of opinion was that it was only one man who was
responsible for the girls' vanishing, and we were trying to figure out
what ruse he could use that would put the women at ease enough so that
they would drop their natural caution.
Who would most young women trust automatically? What guise could he
have assumed that would make them feel he was safe? Since childhood,
most of us have been trained to believe we can trust a minister, a priest,
a fireman, a doctor, ambulance attendant, and a policeman. The last
thought was one that couldn't be overlooked, abhorrent as it was to
these men who were policemen themselves. A rogue cop, maybe? Or someone
in a policeman's uniform?
The next safe assumption was that most young women would have helped
a handicapped person-a blind man, someone taken suddenly ill, someone
on crutches or in a cast.
So what do you do? Infiltrate every campus in the Northwest with
policemen, tell them to stop every man who's dressed like a cop, fireman,
ambulance attendant, priest, every man with a cast? There wasn't enough
manpower in Oregon and Washington law enforcement agencies to even dream
of doing that.
In the end, the only thing to do was to warn the public with as much
media saturation as possible, to ask for information from citizens,
and to keep on working the slightest tip that came in. Surely, the man,
or the group, that was seizing the girls would make a slip-up; surely,
he would leave some clue that would lead back to him. The officers at
that July 3rd conference said a prayer that no more girls would have
to suffer before that happened.
Tragically, it seemed that the press coverage of the conference served
only as a gauntlet thrown down, a challenge to the man who watched and
waited, who felt that he was above the law, too cunning ever to be caught,
no matter how blatant he might be.
Lake Sammamish State Park edges the east side of the lake for which
it is named. The park, twelve miles east of Seattle, and almost adjacent
to Interstate 90 which leads up into
Page 91
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
81
Snoqualmie Pass, draws summertime crowds not only from Seattle itself,
but from nearby Bellevue. the city's largest suburb. Bellevue is a
booming bedroom city of 75,000 people, and the hamlets of Issaquah and
North Bend are also close to the state park.
Lake Sammamish State Park is level, a sweep of meadow land dotted in
the spring with buttercups, in summer with field daisies. There are
trees, but no dark copses, and a ranger's residence is on the property.
Lifeguards watch the swimmers, and warn pleasure boats away, and
picnickers can look to the east and watch the billowing chutes of
skydivers who jump from the small planes which circle constantly.
When my children were small and we lived in Bellevue, we spent almost
every warm summer evening at Lake Sammamish State Park. The kids learned
to swim there, and I often went there alone with them during the day;
it seemed the safest place in the world.
July 14th, 1974 was one of
those glorious brilliant days that
Washingtonians look forward to during the endless rainy days of winter
and early spring. The sky was a clear blue, and temperatures crept up
into the eighties before noon, threatening to hit 90 before the day
was over. Such days are not commonplace, even in summer in western
Washington, and Lake Sammamish State Park was packed to overflowing
that Sunday-40,000 people jockeying for a spot to spread their blankets
and enjoy the sun.
Besides individual family groups, the Rainier Brewery was holding its
annual "beer bust" in the park, and there was a Seattle Police Athletic
Association picnic; the asphalt parking lot was jammed early in the
day.
A pretty young woman arrived at the park around 11:30 that morning,
and was approached by a young man wearing a white tee-shirt and blue
jeans.
"Say, could you help me a minute?" he asked, smiling.
Page 92
She saw that one of his arms was suspended in a beige sling, and she
answered, "Sure, what do you need?"
He explained that he wanted to load his sailboat on his car and he
couldn't manage it with his bum arm. She agreed to help him and wafked
with him to a metallic brown VW bug in the parking lot.
There was no sailboat anywhere around.
The woman looked at the handsome young man-a man she later described
as having sandy blond hair, being about
82
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
five feet, ten inches tall, and weighing 160 pounds-and asked where
his boat was.
"Oh. I forgot to tell you. It's up at my folks' house-just a jump up
the hill."
He motioned to the passenger door, and she stopped, wary. She told him
her parents were waiting for her and that she was already late.
He took her refusal with good will, "That's O.K. I should have told
you it wasn't in the parking lot. Thanks for bothering to come to the
car."
It was 12:30 when she glanced up and saw the man walking toward the
parking lot with a pretty young woman, a woman wheeling a bike and engaged
in an animated conversation with the man. And then she forgot about
the incident-forgot until she read the papers the next day.
July 14th had been a lonely day for twenty-three-year-old Janice Ott,
a probation case worker at the King County Youth Service Center in
Seattle, the county's juvenile detention hall and court. Her husband,
Jim, was 1,400 miles away in Riverside, California, completing a course
in the design of prosthetic devices for the handicapped. The job with
the Juvenile Court-a job Janice had waited a long time forhad kept her
from going to California with her husband. It meant a separation of
several months, and they'd only been married a year and a half. She
would join him in September for a reunion; for now calls and letters
Page 93
would have to suffice.
Janice Anne Ott was a tiny girl, weighing only 100 pounds, and barely
topping five feet. She had long blonde hair, parted in the middle, and
startling gray-green eyes. She looked more like a high school girl than
a mature young woman who had graduated from Eastern Washington State
College in Cheney with a straight A average. Janice's father in Spokane,
Washington was an assistant director of public schools in that city
and had once been an associate of the State Board of Prison Terms and
Paroles; the family orientation was decidedly toward public service.
Like Lynda Ann Healy, Janice was well-educated in the theoretical
approaches to antisocial behavior and disturbed minds, and, like Lynda,
she was idealistic. Her father would say later, "She thought that some
people were sick or misdirected, and felt that she could help them
through her training and personality."
It was just after noon when Janice, riding her ten-speed
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
83
bike from her Issaquah home, arrived at Lake Sammamish State Park. She
had left a note for the girl she shared her small house with, saying
she would be back around four that afternoon.
She found a spot to spread her blanket about ten feet away from three
other groups. She wore cut-off jeans and a white shirt tied in front;
beneath it, she had on a black bikini, and she stripped to that and
lay down to take advantage of the sun.
It was only minutes later when she felt a shadow and opened her eyes.
A good-looking man, a man wearing a white tee-shirt, white tennis shorts,
and white tennis shoes looked down at her. He had a sling on his right
arm.
The picnickers nearby couldn't help but overhear their conversation,
as Janice sat up, blinking in the bright sun.
They would remember that the man had a slight accentperhaps Canadian,
perhaps British-as he said, "Excuse me. Could you help me put my sailboat
Page 94
onto my car? I can't do it by myself. I've got this broken arm."
Janice Ott had told the man to sit down, and they'd talk about it. She
told him her name, and those close by heard him say his name was "Ted."
"See, my boat's up at my parents' house in Issaquah . .."
"Oh really? That's where I live too," she'd smiled.
"You think you could come with me and help me?"
"Sailing must be fun," she said to him. "I never learned how."
"It will be easy for me to teach you," he responded.
Janice had explained that she had her bike with her, and she didn't
want to leave it on the beach for fear it might be stolen, and he'd
answered easily that there was room for it in the trunk of his car.
"Well O.K., I'll help you."
They'd chatted for about ten minutes before Janice stood up, slipped
back into her shorts and shirt, and then she'd left the beach with "Ted,"
pushing her bike toward the parking lot. I
No one ever saw Janice Ott alive again.
Eighteen-year-old Denise Naslund went to Lake Sammamish State Park on
that Sunday in July too, but she wasn't alone. She was accompanied by
her boyfriend and another couple, arriving in Denise's 1963 Chevrolet.
Denise, darkhaired, dark-eyed, and startlingly attractive, was exactly
two
84
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
days older than Susan Elaine Rancourt. who had been gone now three months;
maybe she had read about Susan, but it's doubtful. Denise was five feet
four, weighed 120 pounds, and she matched the pattern so well.
She once babysat for a good friend of mine, who remembers her as an
unfailingly cheerful denendable girl. Her mother, Mrs. Eleanor Rose,
would recall later that Denise often said, "I want to live. There is
so much in this beautiful world to do and to be seen."
Denise was studying to be a computer programmer, working part-time as
a temporary office helper to pay her own way through night school, and
Page 95
the picnic on July 14th was a welcome vacation from her busy schedule.
The afternoon had started out well, and then been somewhat marred by
an argument with her boyfriend, an argument quickly resolved. The four
young people in her group had stretched out on blankets in the sun,
eyes closed, the voices of the swimmers and other picnickers a pleasant
cacophony in the backeround.
A little before four P.M.-hours after Janice Ott had vanished-a
sixteen-year-old girl, walking back to her friends after a stop at the
park's restroom, was approached by a man with his arm in a sling. "Excuse
me, young lady-could you help me launch my sailboat?"
She shook her head, but he was insistent. He tugged on her arm, "Come
on."
She quickly walked off.
At 4:15 another young woman in the park saw the man with his arm in
the sling.
"I need to ask a really big favor of you," he began. He needed help
in launching his boat, he explained.
The woman said that she was in a hurry, that her friends were waiting
for her to leave for home.
"That's O.K.," he said with a smile. But he stood staring at her for
a few moments before he walked away. He'd been wearing a white tennis
outfit, had looked like a nice guy, but she was in a hurry.
Denise and her friends roasted hotdogs around four, and then the two
men had promptly fallen asleep. About 4:30, Denise got up and strolled
toward the women's restroom.
One of the last people known to have seen her alive was a woman who
saw Denise talking to another girl in the cinderblock structure, saw
them walk out of the building together.
Back at their campsite, Denise's friends began to get
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
85
restless; she'd been gone such a long time when she should have returned
Page 96
within a few minutes. Her purse, car keys, her woven leather sandals
still rested on the blanket. It hardly seemed likely that she'd decided
to walk away from the park wearing just her cut-off shorts, her blue
halter top. And she hadn't mentioned that she was going swimming.
They waited, and waited, and waited, until the sun began to dip low,
casting shadows over the area, and it began to grow chilly.
They didn't know, of course, about the man with the injured arm. They
didn't know that he had approached yet another woman a little before
five P.M., asked her the same favor, "I was wondering if you could help
me put my sailboat on my car?"
That twenty-year-old woman had just arrived at the park, via her bike,
and she'd seen the man staring at her. She hadn't wanted to go anywhere
with him, and she'd explained that she really wasn't very strong, and
that, besides that, she was waiting for someone. He had quickly lost
interest in her and turned away.
The timing was about right. Denise was the kind of girl who would help
someone, particularly someone who was handicapped-however temporarily.
As the evening wore on, the park emptied, and there was only Denise's
car left in the lot, only her worried friends who had searched the whole
park without a sign of her. They had hoped that she might have gone
off to search for her dog which had wandered off.
They found the dog, alone.
Denise's boyfriend couldn't believe what was happening. He and Denise
had been together for nine months. They loved each other; she would
never have left him like this.
They reported her disappearance to the park ranger at
8:30 that night. It was too late to drag the lake, or even search the
park thoroughly. The next day, one of the most extensive searches ever
carried out in King County would begin- *
Back at the little house at 75 Front Street in Issaquah, where Janice
Ott lived in a basement apartment, her phone had begun to ring at four.
Jim Ott had waited for his wife's call--the call she'd promised to make
when he talked to her the night before, the call that was never to come.
Jim dialed
Page 97
86
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
her number repeatedly all evening, hearing only the futile rings of
a phone in an empty house.
Jim Ott waited by his phone on Monday night, too. He didn't know that
his wife had never come back to her apartment.
I talked to Jim Ott a few days later after he'd caught a plane for Seattle,
and he told me of a strange series of almost extrasensory communications
he'd received during the days after July 14th.
"When she called me on Saturday night-the 13th-I remember that she was
complaining about how long it took for mail to get from Washington to
California. She said she'd just mailed me a letter, but she thought
she'd call because it took five days for me to receive it. In that letter,
she'd written 'Five days! Isn't that a drag? Someone could expire before
you ever got wind of it!' "
When Jim Ott got that letter, there was every indication that Janice
had indeed expired.
He paused, getting a grip on his feelings. "I didn't know she was gone
on Monday night and I waited by the phone until I fell asleep. I woke
up suddenly and I looked at the clock; it said 10:45. And I heard her
voice. I heard it as clearly as if she was in the room with me. She
was saying, 'Jim . . . Jim . . . come help me. . . .' "
The next morning, Jim Ott had learned that his wife was missing.
"It's funny, I'd sent Janice a card that crossed in the mails with her
letter. It was one of those sentimental cards with a guy and a girl
on it. kind of walking into the sunset. It said, 'I wish we were together
again . . . much too long without you.' And then, I wrote at the bottom-and
I don't know why I chose just those words, 'Please take care of yourself.
Be careful about driving. Be careful of people you don't know. I don't
want anything to happen to you; you're my source of peace of mind.'
"
Ott said that he and his wife had always been close, had often shared
the same thoughts at the same time, that he was now waiting for some
other message, some sign of where she might be, but after those clear
Page 98
words in the stillness of his room on July 15th, "Jim . . . Jim . . .
come help me. . . ." there had been
only silence.
In Seattle, in his offices at the Seattle Police Department, Captain
Herb Swindler opened the sealed envelope I'd deTHE STRANGER BESIDE ME
87
livered from the astrologer. A slip of paper read, "If the pattern
continues, the next disappearance will occur on the weekend of July
13th to 15th."
He felt a chill. It had come true-twice.
I
I
10
"Ted" had surfaced, allowed himself to be seen in broad daylight,
approached a half dozen young women at least, beyond the missing pair.
He'd given his name. His true name? Probably not, but, for the media
who pounced on the incredible disappearances it was something to
headline. Ted. Ted. Ted.
Indeed, the dogged pursuit of reporters seeking something new to write
was going to interfere mightily with the police investigation. The
frantic families of the missing girls from Lake Sammamish were besieged
by some of the most coercive tactics any reporter can use. When families
declined to be interviewed, there were some reporters who hinted that
they might have to print unsavory rumors about Janice and Denise unless
they could have interviews, or that, even worse, families' failure to
tell of their exquisite pain in detail might mean a lessening of
publicity needed to find their daughters.
Page 99
It was ugly and cruel, but it worked; the grieving parents allowed
themselves to be photographed, and gave painful interviews. Their
daughters had been good girls-not casual pick-ups-and they wanted that
known. And they wanted the girls' pictures shown in every paper, on
every TV news show; maybe that way, they could be found.
The police investigators had little time to spend giving out interviews.
Technically, the missing girls' investigations fell within several
different jurisdictions: Lynda Ann Healy and Georgeann Hawkins within
Seattle's city limits and that probe headed by Captain Herb Swindler
and his unit; Janice Ott, Denise Naslund, and Brenda Ball had gone
missing in King County, and Captain J. N. "Nick" Mackie's men were now
under the heaviest stress in looking for a solution to the latest
vanishing. Thurston County's Sheriff Don Redmond was responsible for
the Donna Manson case, in conjunction with Rod Marem of the Evergreen
College Campus Police. Susan
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
89
Rancourt's case was still being actively worked by Kittitas County and
the Central Washington University Campus Police, and Roberta Kathleen
Parks's disappearance was being investigated by the Oregon State Police
and the Corvallis, Oregon City Police.
The hue and cry from the public to produce, and produce some answers
quickly, grew every day and the impact on the detectives was tremendous.
If there could not be an arrestor many arrests-the layman, bombarded
with nightly television updates and front page stories, failed to
understand why, at the very least, the bodies of the missing girls could
not be found.
For the King County Police, the abductions and probable murders of three
girls in the county meant thirty-five percent of their average yearly
workload occurring in one month. Although the county population equals
Seattle's half million people, it is a spread-out population, most of
it small towns, rural, and sylvan, not as catalytic to violent crimes
Page 100
as the crowded city.
There were only eleven homicides in the county in 1972nine closed
successfully by year's end; in 1973, there had been five-all cleared.
Although the homicide unit in 1974 handled armed robberies in addition
to murder cases, a fieldworking sergeant and six detectives had been
able to deal effectively with the case load. The disappearance of first
Brenda Ball, and six weeks later, Janice Ott and Denise Naslund would
force drastic restructuring of the unit.
Mackie was a highly competent administrator. He was not yet forty when
he took over as head of the Major Crimes Unit. He had reorganized the
jail's administration, and accomplished much, but his background was
not heavily oriented toward actual investigative work. The field
detectives were headed by Sergeant Len Randall, a soft-spoken blond
bear of a man who made it a practice to join his men at major crime
scenes.
For the main part, the King County detectives were a young group; Ihe
only man in the unit over thirty-five was Ted Forrester |who wore his
appellation "Old Man," with grudging good'nature. He handled the
southeast end of the county-farmland, old mining towns, woods and the
foothills of Mount Rainier. Rolf Grunden had the south end, urban, part
of the future megalopolis of Seattle-Tacoma. Mike Baily and Randy
Hergesheimer shared the southwest, also princi90
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
pally urban. Roger Dunn's sector was the north end of the county-the
area between Seattle's city limits and the Snohomish County line.
The newest man in the unit was Bob Keppel, a slender, almost boyish
looking, man. It was in KeppePs sector that the Lake Sammamish
disappearances had occurred-the territory east of Lake Washington.
Until July 14, 1974, Keppel had handled only one homicide investigation.
In the end, as the years passed, the "Ted" case would weigh most heavily
on Bob Keppel's shoulders. He would come to know more about "Ted," more
Page 101
about his victims, than any of the other investigators in the county,
with the possible exception of Nick Mackie.
By 1979, Bob Keppel's hair would be shot with grey, and Captain Mackie
invalided out of law enforcement with two crippling coronaries. Captain
Herb Swindler would undergo critical open heart surgery. It is
impossible to pinpoint just how much stress comes to bear on detectives
involved in an investigation of the scope of the missing girls' cases,
but anyone who is close to homicide detectives sees the tension, the
incredible pressure brought on by their responsibility. If a
corporation president carries the responsibility of bringing in or
losing profits, homicide detectives-particularly in cases like the
"Ted" disappearances-are truly dealing with life and death, working
against time and almost impossible odds. It is a profession that brings
with it the occupational hazards of ulcers, hypertension, coronary
disease, and, on occasion, alcoholism. The public, the victims'
families, the press, superiors-all demand immediate action.
The scope of the search for Denise Naslund and Janice Ott drew all of
the King County's Major Crimes Unit's manpower into the eastside area,
along with Seattle detectives, and personnel from the smalltown police
departments near Lake Sammamish State Park: Issaquah and North Bend.
In a sense, they had a place to start now-not for Janice and Denise
alone-but for the six other girls they felt sure were part of the deadly
pattern. "Ted" had been seen; perhaps a dozen people came forward when
the story hit the papers on July 15th: the other girls who had been
approached, who shuddered to think that they had come so close to death,
and the people at the park who had seen "Ted" talk to Janice Ott before
she'd walked away with him.
Ben Smith, a police artist, listened to their descriptions and
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
91
drew a composite picture of a man said to resemble the stranger in the
white tennis outfit. He erased, drew again, tediously trying to capture
Page 102
on paper what was in the minds of the witnesses. It was not an easy
task.
As soon as the composite appeared on television, hundreds of calls came
in. But then "Ted" seemed to have had no particularly unusual
characteristics. A good-looking young man appearing to be in his early
twenties, blondish-brown hair, a little wavy, even features, no scars,
no outstanding differences that might set him apart from hundreds,
thousands of young men at the beach. The broken arm-yes-but the
detectives doubted that it was really broken. They were sure the sling
was off now, thrown away, after it had served its purpose.
No. "Ted" apparently was so average looking that he, perhaps, had counted
on his prosaic appearance, allowed himself to be seen, and was now taking
a perverse pleasure in the publicity.
Again and again, the detectives probed. "Think. Try to picture something
special about him, something that stands out in your mind."
The witnesses tried. Some even underwent hypnosis in the hope they would
remember more. The accent, yes, slightly English. Yes, he'd spoken of
playing racquet ball while he chatted with Janice Ott. His smile, his
smile was something special. He spoke with excellent grammar; he'd
sounded well-educated. Good. What else? Tan, he was tan. Good. What
else?
But there was nothing else, nothing beyond the strange way he had stared
at a few of the almost-victims.
There was the car, the off-shaded brown VW bug of indeterminate vintage.
All bugs looked alike; who could tell? And the one witness who had walked
out to the parking lot with "Ted," hadn't actually seen him get into
the bug. He'd leaned against it as he explained that his sailboat wasn't
at the park. It could have been anyone's car. No, wait, he had gestured
toward the passenger door. It must have been his car.
No one at all fjad seen Janice Ott get into any car on the lot. I
There was Jsmice Ott's ten-speed bike, yellow "Tiger" brand. It wasn't
the kind of bike that could be quickly disassembled for ease of
transporting. A full-size ten-speed would not fit into the trunk of
a VW without sticking out. Surely someone must have noticed the car
with the bike-either on a rack or protruding awkwardly from the car.
Page 103
92
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
But no one had.
The lakefront park was closed to the public as police divers, looking
like creatures from another planet, dove again and again beneath the
surface of Lake Sammamish, coming to the top each time shaking their
heads. The weather was hot, and, if the girls' bodies were in the lake,
they would have bloated and surfaced, but they did not.
County patrolmen, Issaquah police, and eighty volunteers from the
Explorer Scouts Search and Rescue teams, both on foot and on horseback,
combed the 400-acre park, finding nothing. Seattle police helicopters
circled over the area, spotters looking down vainly for something that
would help: a brilliant yellow bike or the bright blue backpack Janice
had borrowed to use on Sunday, the girls themselves, their bodies lying
unseen by ground parties in the tall vegetation east of the parking
lot.
Sheriff's patrol cars cruised slowly along all the back roads wending
through the farmland beyond, stopped to check old barns, sagging
deserted sheds, empty houses.
In the end, they found nothing.
There were no ransom notes; their abductor had not taken the women away
because he wanted money. It became more and more apparent as the week
passed that the man in white was probably a sexual psychopath. The other
women had vanished at long intervals. Many detectives believe that the
male too operates under a pseudo-menstrual cycle, that there are times
when the perverse drives of marginally normal men become obsessive and
they are driven out to rape, or kill.
But two women in one afternoon? Was the man they sought so highly
motivated by sexual frenzy that he would need to seize two victims within
a four-hour time span? Janice had vanished at 12:30; Denise around 4:30.
It would seem that even the most maniacally potent male might have been
exhausted and satiated after one attack. Why then would he return to
the same park and take away another woman only four hours later?
Page 104
The pattern of attacks had appeared to be escalating, the abductions
coming closer and closer together, as if the awful fixation of the
suspect needed more frequent stimulus to give him relief. Perhaps the
elusive "Ted" had had to have more than one victim to satisfy him. Perhaps
Janice had been held captive somewhere, tied up and gagged, while he
went back for a second woman. Perhaps he had needed the macabre
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
93
thrill of a double sexual attack and murder-with one victim forced to
wait and watch as he killed the other. It was a theory that many of
us could scarcely bear to contemplate.
Every experienced homicide detective knows that if a case is not resolved
within twenty-four hours, the chances of finding the killer diminish
proportionately with the amount of time that passes. The trail grows
colder and colder.
The days and weeks passed without any new developments. The
investigators didn't even have the victims' bodies. Denise and Janice
could be anywhere-100, 200 miles away. The little brown VW had only
a quarter of a mile to travel before it reached the busy 1-90 freeway
leading up over the mountains to the east, or into the densely populated
city of Seattle to the west. It was akin to looking for two needles
in a million haystacks.
On the chance that the women had been killed and buried somewhere in
the vast acres of semi-wild land around the park, planes went aloft
and took films with infrared film. It had worked in Houston in 1973
when Texas investigators searched for the bodies of teenage boys slain
by mass killer Dean Coril. If earth and foliage have been recently
overturned, the already dying vegetation will appear bright red in the
finished print, long before a human eye can detect any change at all
in trees or bushes. There were some suspicious areas, and deputies dug
delicately, carefully. They found only dead trees, nothing beneath them
in the ground.
Page 105
Film taken at several of the big company picnics held at Lake Sammamish
on July 14th was quickly developed and detectives watched the subjects
in the foreground-but mostly what was going on in the background, hoping
to catch a glimpse of the man with his arm in a sling. They didn't smile
at the laughter and playfulness on the screen, the happy faces; they
kept watching for the man who might have been just out of focus. He
wasn't there.
Reporters checked out Lake Sammamish State Park on the Sunday following
the abductions. They found, in spite of the spectacularly sunny day-a
day much like the Sunday of a week before-thbt there were few picnickers
or swimmers. Several of the women they talked to who were there pointed
out guns hidden under their beach towels, switchblades, whistles. Women
went to the restroom in teams of two or more. Park Ranger Donald Simmons
remarked that the crowd was about a twentieth the size he expected.
94
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
But, as the weeks passed, people forgot, or put the two disappearances
out of their minds. The park filled up again, and the ghosts of Denise
Naslund and Janice Ott didn't seem to be haunting anyone.
No one that is, but the King County Police detectives. Cases Number
74-96644; 74-95852; and 74-81301 (Janice, Denise and Brenda) would
haunt them for the rest of their lives.
Dr. Richard B. Jarvis, a Seattle psychiatrist specializing in the
aberrations of the criminal mind, drew a verbal picture of the man now
known as "Ted," a profile based on his years of experience. He felt
that, if the eight missing girls' cases were interrelated, if the girls
had been harmed, that the assailant was probably between twenty-five
and thirty-five, a man mentally ill, but not the type who would draw
attention to himself as a potential criminal.
Jarvis felt that "Ted" feared women and their power over him, and that
he would also evince at times "socially isolative" behavior.
Jarvis could see many parallels between the man in the park and a
Page 106
twenty-four-year-old Seattle man who had been convicted in 1970 for
the murders of two young women, rape and attempted rape involving other
girls. That man, designated a sexual psychopath, was currently serving
a life term in prison.
The man Jarvis referred to had been a star athlete all through school,
popular, considerate and respectful of women, but he had changed
markedly after his high school girlfriend of longstanding had rejected
him. He later married, but began his sexual prowlings after his wife
filed for divorce.
A sexual psychopath, according to Dr. Jarvis, is not legally insane,
and does know the difference between right and wrong. But he is driven
to attack women. There is usually no deficiency in intelligence, no
brain damage, or frank psychosis.
Jarvis' statements made an interesting side-bar in the Seattle paper
that ran the story; later, much later, I would re-read that story and
realize how close he had come to describing the real killer.
During the very few moments when detectives working on the cases had
time to talk, we tossed back and forth possible evaluations of who "Ted"
might be. He obviously had to be
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
95
quite intelligent, attractive, and charming. None of the eight girls
would have gone with a man who had not seemed safe, whose manner was
not so urbane and ingratiating that their normal caution, all the
warnings since childhood, would have been ignored. Even though
force-and probably violencecame later, he must have, in most of the
cases, gained their confidence in the beginning. It seemed likely that
he was-or had recently been-a college student; he was apparently
familiar with campuses, and the way of life there.
The device used to gain the girls' trust-beyond his appearance and
personality-was certainly his illusion of comparative helplessness.
A man with one arm broken, or a leg in a full cast, would not seem much
Page 107
of a threat.
Who would have access to casts, slings, crutches? Anyone perhaps, if
he sought them out-but a medical student, a hospital orderly, an
ambulance attendant, a medical supplies firm employee seemed the most
apparent.
"He's got to be someone who seems above suspicion," I mused. "Someone
that even the people who spend time with him would never connect to
'Ted'."
It was a great theory, and yet it made finding that man even more
impossible.
The astrology pattern, even though it had accurately predicted the
weekend that the next disappearances would occur, was too ephemeral
to trace. Maybe the man didn't know that he was being affected by those
moon signs, if, indeed he was.
I was now shuttling charts full of strange symbols to Herb Swindler
from R.L. Herb was taking a lot of ribbing from detectives who didn't
believe in "any of that hocus pocus."
Both the King County Police and the Seattle Police were being deluged
with communications from psychics, but none of their "visions" of the
spots where the girls would be found proved accurate. A search for "a
little yellow cottage near Issaquah" proved fruitless, as did the effort
to locate a "house full of sex cultBts in Wallingford" and a "huge red
house in the South End full of blood." Still, the information from
clairvoyants wa| about as helpful as the tips coming in from citizens.
"Ted" had been seen here, there, everywhere-and nowhere.
If the astrological moon pattern was to be believed, the next
disappearance was slated to occur between 7:25 P.M. on
96
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
August 4th, 1974 and 7:12 P.M. on August 7th-when the moon was moving
through Pisces again.
It did not.
Page 108
In fact, the cases in Washington stopped as suddenly as they had begun.
In a sense, it was over; in another sense, it would never be over.
11
I can remember standing in the Homicide Unit of the Seattle Police
Department during August of 1974 and looking at a computer print-out,
single spaced, that the detectives had taped to the twelve-foot ceiling
of their office; it reached the floor and overflowed. On it were the
names of suspects turned in by citizens, names of men they thought might
be the mysterious "Ted." Just locating and questioning each of the
"suspects" could take years, if there was enough manpower to do it,
and, of course, there wasn't. There probably wasn't a police department
in the country with enough investigators to go through that awesome
list of suspects precisely. All King County and Seattle police could
do was to cull out those that looked the most likely, and check those
men out.
One of the reports that had come in, on August 10th, had a familiar,
ominous sound to detectives; a young woman related an encounter that
she had had in the University District a few blocks from where Georgeann
Hawkins vanished. "I was walking near 16th N.B. and 50th on July 26th
at
11:30 in the morning. There was this man-five foot nine or ten, good
build, with brown hair to his collar-and he was wearing blue jeans,
but one leg was cut off because he had a cast on his leg all the way
up to his hip. He was on crutches, and he was carrying a kind of old
fashioned briefcase. It was black, round on the top, with a handle.
He kept dropping it, picking it up, and then dropping it again."
The girl stated that she had passed him, and looked back when she heard
the briefcase thud to the sidewalk. "He smiled at me. H* looked like
he wanted me to help him and I was almost goitfe to ... until I noticed
his eyes . . . they were very weira and they gave me the creeps. I began
walking very rapidly away until I got to the 'Ave' (the main business
thoroughfare in the University District). He was
Page 109
97
98
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
very clean-cut, and his cast was white and fresh; it looked like it
had just been put on."
She'd never seen him before, and she hadn't seen him again.
Police patrol units out of the Wallingford Precinct in the city's North
End watched constantly for men with broken arms, men with legs in full
casts, but they found few, and those they did stop to question proved
to have real injuries.
Something had been bothering me for two weeks as August drew to a close.
I'd kept going back to the composite picture of the "Ted" in Lake
Sammamish State Park, reading over the physical description, the
references to a "slight English, or English type accent." And I saw
a resemblance to someone I knew. I put it in the back of my mind, told
myself that I too was being caught up in the hysteria of that long,
terrible summer.
I knew a lot of men named Ted--including two homicide detectives-but
the only Ted I knew who fit the description was Ted Bundy. I hadn't
seen him or talked to him for eight months and, for all I knew, he had
left Seattle. But, the last time I'd seen him, I knew that he'd lived
at 4123 12th Avenue N.B., only blocks from so many of the missing girls.
I felt guilty that a friend I'd known for three years should even come
to mind. You didn't go running to the police to turn in the name of
a good friend, a friend who seemed the very antithesis of the man they
sought. No, it couldn't be. It was ridiculous. Ted Bundy would never
hurt a woman; he wouldn't even make an off-color remark to one. A man
whose life's work was oriented toward helping people, toward
eliminating that very sexual violence that marked the crimes, couldn't
be involved, no matter how much he resembled the composite.
I went through periods where I didn't think about it, and then, usually
just before I dropped off to sleep at night, Ted Bundy's face would
Page 110
flash through my mind. A long time later, I would learn that I wasn't
the only one who wrestled with such indecision that August, that there
were others with much more insight into Ted Bundy than I had who were
Tom.
Finally, I decided that I could do something that would erase my doubts.
As far as I knew, Ted didn't even have a car, much less a VW bug. If
I could check to see that that was still true, then I could forget it.
If, by the furthest stretch
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
99
of my imagination, Ted Bundy had had anything to do with the missing
girls, I had an obligation to come forward.
I chose to contact Seattle Homicide detective Dick Reed. Reed, a tall,
lean man with the irrepressible humor of a practical joker, had been
in the homicide unit longer than any of the other seventeen detectives.
He'd become a close friend. I knew I could count on him to be discreet,
to run a Motor Venicles Department check on the computer on Ted without
making a big deal out of it.
I called him and began haltingly, "... I don't really think this is
anything, but it's bugging me. I have a good friend named Ted; he's
about twenty-seven, and he matches the description, and he used to live
out by the University, but I don't know where he is now. Listen, I don't
even think he has a car because I used to give him rides. And I don't
want this to be like I'm turning him in or anything. I just want to
know if he has a car now. Can you do that?"
"Sure," he answered. "What's his name? I'll run it through the computer.
If he has a car registered to him, it will show."
"His name is Ted Bundy. B-u-n-d-y. Call me back. O.K.?"
My phone rang twenty minutes later. It was Dick Reed.
"Theodore Robert Bundy. 4123 12th Avenue N.B. Would you believe a 1968
bronze Volkswagen bug?"
I thought he was teasing me. "Come on, Reed. What does he really drive?
Page 111
He doesn't even have a car, does he?"
"Ann, I'm serious. He's currently listed at that address, and he drives
a bronze bug. I'm going to go out and drive around the block and see
if I can spot it."
Reed called me back later that afternoon and said he hadn't been able
to find the car parked near the house on
12th N.B. He said he would go a step further. "I'm going to send to
Olympia and get a driver's license picture of him. I'll pass it on to
the County."
"But my name doesn't have to be on the information, does it?"
"No problem. I'll put it down as anonymous."
Reed did put|Ted Bundy's picture into that vast hopper with some 2400
irther "Ted's"-and nothing came of it. ^ The King County directives
couldn't possibly show mug "laydowns" of each of those 2400 "suspects"
to the witnesses at Lake Sammamish State Park. Just the sheer number
of faces would tend to confuse them, and there was nothing about Ted
Bundy at that time that would mark him as a likely sus100
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
pect. The computer check on Ted drew no "hits" at all that would make
them suspect him.
I forgot about it. I didn't lend much weight to the fact that Ted had
acquired a Volkswagen. A lot of people drove VWs, and I heard nothing
more to indicate that Ted Bundy was a viable suspect.
I hadn't seen Ted since the Christmas party at the end of
1973. I had tried to call him once or twice when I was living on the
houseboat to invite him down, but I'd never found him home.
Ted's job with the Republican Party had phased out, but he'd been busy
attending law school at U.P.S. in Tacoma for most of the school year
1973-74. He'd been receiving unemployment insurance at the beginning
of spring, 1974, and his attendance at U.P.S. had become desultory at
best. On April
Page 112
10th, he dropped out of law school altogether. He had received a second
acceptance from the Registrar at the University of Utah Law School for
the coming fall. He hadn't even taken his final exams at U.P.S., although
he wouldn't admit it to the students in his car pool. When they asked
about his grades, he'd sloughed the question off with, "I can't
remember."
He may have felt that U.P.S. was not up to his standards, that Utah
had much more to offer him. His last application to Utah had contained
the information that he was to be married to a former Utah resident,
Meg Anders, by the time he entered law school in the fall, and a notation
on his application made by the registrar read, "Very anxious to attend
University of Utah-will be married before quarter starts. Recommend
acceptance."
One of Ted's statements accompanying his application " gives an
interesting insight into his self confidence:
I do not believe this is the time to be timid, and I shall not be. I
have planned too long for a career in law to allow vanity or a poor
performance on the LSAT to prevent me from making every effort to plead
my case for admission to law school. Therefore, I say to you now, with
the greatest confidence, that the file you have before you is not just
the file of a 'qualified student,' but the file of an individual who
is obstinate enough to want to become a critical and tireless student
and practitioner of the law, and qualified enough to succeed. My grades
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
101
these past two years, my recommendations, and my personal statement
speak of Ted Bundy, the student, the worker, and researcher in pursuit
of a legal education; the LSAT does not and cannot reveal this.
Sincerely, Theodore R. Bundy
Ted's signature is a masterpiece of swirls and flourishes, and he had
inserted a card asking that this statement be read before any of the
many other forms in his application.
Page 113
Not the least of the documents in Ted's file at the University of Utah
Dean of Admissions' office was a letter from Governor Dan Evans, a letter
he had written on behalf of Ted in 1973.
Dean of Admissions College of Law University of Utah Salt Lake City,
Utah 84112
Dear Dean:
I write to you in support of the application of Theodore Bundy to your
law school. Ted has expressed a desire to attend the University of Utah.
It is my pleasure to support him with this letter of recommendation.
I first met Ted after he had been selected to join my campaign staff
in 1972. It was the consensus among those of us who directed the operation
that Ted's performance was outstanding. Given a key role in the issues,
research, and strategy section, he demonstrated an ability to define
and organize his own projects, to effectively synthesize and clearly
communicate factual information, and to tolerate uncertain and
sometimes critical situations. In the end, it was probably his
cornposure and| discretion that allowed him to successfully carry out
hîs assignments. These qualities made his contributions te strategy
and policy dependable and productive.
If, however, you are concerned that a political campaign is not the
measure of a prospective law student, then I am sure you will look,
as I have, at Ted's other achieve102 THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
ments and activities. Look at his academic record in his last two years
of college; look at his impressive community involvements; and look
at the several law-related positions he has held since graduation. I
believe he is qualified to and intent upon pursuing a career in law.
I strongly recommend the admission of Ted Bundy to your law school.
You would be accepting an exceptional student.
Sincerely, Daniel J., Evans
Utah had been willing to accept Ted in 1973; he was a student they wanted,
and, in 1974, he was recovered from his "serious accident" that had
Page 114
prevented his going to Utah the year before.
With U.P.S. behind him and Utah ahead in September, Ted had a new job
in May of 1974. He was hired on May
23, 1974 to work on the budget for the Washington State Department of
Emergency Services, a many-armed agency responsible for quick action
in natural disasters, forest fires, enemy attack, and even plague (if
such a catastrophe should occur). In 1974, the first of the nation's
gas shortages was at its peak. Fuel allocation would be part of the
D.E.S. duties.
Ted worked five days a week-from eight to five-and overtime if a need
arose in the D.E.S. headquarters in Olympia. He commuted the sixty miles
from the Rogers's rooming house, although, occasionally, he stayed in
Olympia with friends or stopped in Tacoma to spend the night with his
family.
It seemed an excellent interim job for Ted while he marked time before
moving to Salt Lake City. His salary was $722 a month, not as much as
he'd made as Ross Davis's aide, and the job wasn't as prestigious, but
it would give him a chance to save for tuition and to see the red tape
of a state governmental office from the inside.
Around the Rogers's rooming house, newer residents saw Ted so rarely
that summer of 1974 that they dubbed him "The Phantom." They saw him
mostly either coming or going, sometimes watching television. He was
often away for several days at a stretch.
Ted's attitude at the Department of Emergency Services drew mixed
reviews from his fellow workers. Some of them
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
103
liked him; others thought he was gold-bricking. His work was erratic.
It was not unusual for him to work through the night on fuel allocation
projects, but he also often arrived for work very late in the morning.
If he missed a day's work, he never bothered to call in to inform his
supervisors he would be out; he would simply appear the next day saying
Page 115
he'd been ill.
Ted did sign up for the office softball team, and went to parties given
by fellow workers. Carole Ann Boone Anderson, Alice Thissen, and Joe
McLean liked Ted very much. Some of his other co-.workers deemed him
something of a con man, a manipulator, and a man who talked as if he
worked hard, but who actually produced little.
Ted's longest absence from the job, according to Neil Miller,
administrative officer for the D.E.S. office, had been between Thursday,
July llth and Wednesday, July 17th. This time, he had phoned in to say
he was sick, but Miller cannot recall what his illness was. Ted had
sick pay accumulated to cover the first day, but lost three days' pay.
Ted had taken a lot of kidding after the double disappearances at Lake
Sammamish on July 14th, and the
avalanche of publicity about the
mysterious "Ted" which followed. Carole Ann Boone Anderson razzed him
unmercifully about it, although they were great friends and Ted had
been very considerate with her as she debated ending a relationship
with a man she'd been seeing.
The head of the Search and Rescue group for Washington State also teased
Ted about his being a "look-alike" for the "Ted" the police were looking
for.
But nobody meant it seriously.
1
I
12
In all, there would be four individuals who would suggest the name "Ted
Bundy" to the homicide probers. At about the same time I had had Dick
Reed check on whether Ted drove a car-possibly a Volkswagen-a professor
from the University of Washington, and a woman employed at the Department
of Emergency Services in Olympia had called the King County Police to
say that Ted Bundy resembled the artist's depiction of the man seen
at Lake Sammamish on July 14th. Just as I had, each of them noted that
Page 116
there was nothing about Ted's personality or activities that would make
him a suspect; it was just similarity in appearance and the name "Ted."
Meg Anders had studied the drawing that appeared in so many papers and
on the nightly television news broadcasts. She saw the resemblance too,
and-just as I had-she put it out of her mind at first. For me, it had
been vaguely disturbing; for Meg, it could mean the end of all her dreams.
Meg had only one close friend other than Ted, a woman. That was Lynn
Banks, the woman she had grown up with in Utah, the woman who had moved
to Seattle about the same time Meg had. Lynn would not let Meg forget
the picture of the man the police sought, even though Meg tried to ignore
it. She thrust a newspaper in front of Meg's eyes and demanded, "Who
does this look like? It's someone we know, isn't it?"
Meg looked away. "It does look like him, doesn't it? Very much . . ."
Lynn didn't like Ted. She had felt that his treatment of Meg was cavalier,
that he was not dependable. More than that, she distrusted him. She
had come upon him once, late at night, as he crept through the backyard
of the house where she lived, and he hadn't had a good explanation for
being there. Now, she insisted that Meg go to the police and tell
104
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
105
them how much Ted Bundy looked like the composite picture.
"No," Meg said firmly. "I can't do that, and I don't want to talk about
it anymore."
Meg Anders could not really believe that her Ted could be the Ted the
police wanted. She stiil loved him so much, despite the way he had changed
during the summer of 1974. She blocked all of Lynn's arguments. She
didn't want to think about it.
Meg still had no knowledge of Ted's "engacement" to Stephanie Brooks
the previous winter, had no idea how close she had come to losing him.
She was concerned about the things she did know about. She and Ted were
about to be separated, physically-if not emotionally-by the miles
Page 117
between Seattle and Salt Lake City. He planned to leave on Labor Day
for law school. She had wanted him to go to Utah for his law education,
hut she dreaded the years ahead without him. There would be visits,
of course, but it wouldn't be the same.
Ted had begun to pack up his belongings, cleaning out the room where
he'd lived for almost five years. He packed up the raft hanging over
his bed, the raft that had often startled the women he brought home,
his plants, the bicycle wheel that hung by chains and a meat hook from
the ceiling, records, books, clothes. He had an old wh'te pickup truck
he could move with, and he would haul the VW bug behind it.
Ted had become sexually cold to Meg during the summer, blaming his lack
of interest in sex on job pressures and what he called "too high a peak
of frustration." Meg had been hurt and confused; she was convinced that
there were other women who were fulfilling his sexual drives in the
way she once had.
Meg threw a small going away party for Ted, and she'd expected that
they would make love afterward. But they'did not, and Ted left her with
only a kiss.
It was not a happy parting. Meg decided that when Ted returned to Seat1|e
in a few weeks to sell his car so that he could repay Freda Rogers $500
he owed her, she would tell him that she wmnted to break off their
relationship. It didn't look like there was going to be a marriage;
it didn't seem to her that they even had a relationship any longer.
She was going through the same conflicting emotions that Stephanie
Brooks had the January before.
106
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
And yet Meg still loved him. She had loved him for so long.
Driving the pickup with the VW trailing behind, Ted set off for Salt
Lake City on the Labor Day weekend. I thought of Ted only once during
the fall of 1974. In cleaning out some old files, I came across the
Christmas card he'd sent me two years before. I read the front, and
Page 118
then, suddenly, something struck me. There had been so much stress placed
on the fact that all the missing women had had beautiful long hair.
I looked at the card in my hand, "She cut her long hair to buy her lover
a watch chain. He sold his watch to buy her combs for her hair."
No, that was really embroidering on my imagination. It was simply a
nice card, something Ted had undoubtedly picked out at random. The
mention of long hair was a coincidence.
Nothing had come of my giving Ted's name to Dick Reed. If Ted had become
a suspect, I would have been told. Obviously, my fears had been needless.
I thought about throwing the card away, but I kept it, tucking it in
with a bunch of old letters. I doubted that I would ever see Ted again.
Early in August of that uncharacteristically hot summer of
1974, a King County road worker had paused on a service road two miles
east of Lake Sammamish State Park to eat his lunch. As he unwrapped
a sandwich, his appetite vanished when his nostrils were assailed with
a carrionlike odor. He'd glanced down the brush-strewn bank beside the
road, looking for the source of the smell and seen what he took to be
a deer carcass discarded by a poacher.
The man had walked back to his truck and moved to a more pleasant spot.
He'd quickly forgotten the incident, but he remembered it when he picked
up a newspaper on September 8th.
It is now a matter of academic conjecture whether an earlier report
by that road worker would have helped detectives. It might well have
been vital to the investigation, because that witness had seen not a
deer carcass, but a human body, a complete human body, and the grouse
hunters who crashed through the brush in the same region a month later
stumbled across only bones.
Elzie Hammons, a Seattle construction worker, found the
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
107
scattered remains on September 6th: a lower jaw, a rib cage, a spinal
column.
Page 119
Finally, tragically, the first solid evidence in any of the eight missing
girls' disappearances had surfaced, eight months after Lynda Healy had
vanished. Hammons knew instinctively what he had found, and he raced
into Issaquah to find a phone.
Immediately, King County police deputies and detectives responded, and
the area was cordoned off. Reporters chafed at the restriction, and
cameramen tried to get something they could show on the evening news.
The public was clamoring for news of the find and very little was being
released.
Captain Nick Mackie, Sergeant Len Randall and their six detectives,
dressed in coveralls, moved past the ropes often, carrying the bits
of bone found among the sword fern and brush in over thirty locations.
For four days, they worked in daylight and under powerful kleig lights
as the sun set.
Coyotes had done their work well; in the end, the detectives, the two
hundred Explorer Scouts, deputies, and tracking dogs had literally
sifted the earth and drying ground cover in a 300-foot circle, and yet
they found so little. The burning heat of July and August had accelerated
decomposition, and the foraging animals had reduced the bodies to skulls
and bare bones.
There were eight tufts of hair, some of it still long swatches of
luxuriant dark brown, some of it blondish-red. There was one skull,
the rib cage, the spinal column, a lower mandible (jaw) of another skull,
numerous small bones, but there were five femur (thigh) bones.
There was no clothing, no jewelry, no bicycle parts, no backpack; the
bodies tossed there so carelessly had been naked, and none of the
victims' possessions accompanied them.
Now the grim task of identifying the remains began. Dr. Daris Swindler
(no relation to Herb Swindler), a physical anthropologist from the
University of Washington, studied the femur bones. Dental charts from
all the missing women were compared to the. skull and the lower mandible.
Hair samples gleaned from the brushes the women had left behind were
compared microscopically to the tufts found near Issaquah.
Captain Nick Mackie called a press conference, and the dark circles
under his eyes, his tired voice, were indicative of the strain he was
under. "The worst we feared is true," he anPage 120
108
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
nounced. "We have identified the remains of Janice Ott and Denise Naslund.
They were found approximately 1.9 miles from Lake Sammamish State Park
where they vanished on July 14th."
He did not speak of Dr. Swindler's other findings, of the
anthropologist's feeling that perhaps the femur bones had come from
not two, but three or four different bodies. If there had been more
skulls lying there among the alder saplings and ferns, they were gone,
carried off by animals.
Who were the other two girls who had been brought there?
It was impossible to tell. It wasn't even possible to identify the sex
of those thigh bones. All Dr. Swindler could determine was that they
were the thigh bones of persons "under thirty," and probably between
five feet and five feet five inches tall.
A search for whatever bones might remain on the hillside was hampered
by the fact that the slope is crisscrossed with coal mines and shafts,
left when mining in the area was suspended in 1949. Many of those mines
are filled with water, and far too dangerous to even attempt to search.
Mines toward the top of the hill were searched and nothing was found.
Memorial services were held for Denise and Janice, and the search for
their killer went on.
Winter comes early to the foothills of the Cascade Mountains, and by
late October, the region was blanketed with snow. If the land there
had more secrets to give up, there was nothing to do but wait until
spring thawing.
In the meantime, a task force of top detectives from both the Seattle
Police Department and the King County Police Department, set up
headquarters in a windowless room hidden between the first and second
floors in the county courthouse. There, the walls were covered with
maps of Lake Sammamish, the University District, flyers bearing the
missing girls' pictures, and composite drawings of "Ted." The phone
Page 121
jangled continually. Thousands of names, thousands of tips; somewhere
in that plethora of information, there might be the one lead to the
real "Ted." But where?
Captain Nick Mackie took a brief vacation, a two-day hunting trip. As
he climbed a hill in eastern Washington, he was felled by the first
of the heart attacks which would eventually mean the end of his career
in law enforcement; no one who had watched him agonize over the girls'
disappearances,
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
109
who had seen him work ten-hour days, doubted that the strain had
contributed to his coronary. He was only fortytwo.
Mackie recovered and was back to work within a few weeks, and the search
for the smiling, tanned man in the white tennis outfit continued without
let-up.
Ted Bundy had returned to Seattle in mid-September, and was back in
Utah within a few days, ready to begin law classes at the University
of Utah. He'd found an apartment in a big, old dormered house at 565
First Avenue in Salt Lake City, a house quite similar to the Rogers's
where he'd lived in Seattle. He moved into Number 2, and soon had it
decorated to his satisfaction. He got a job as a night dormitory manager
on campus, and his new life had begun. He could make ends meet by getting
a partial rent decrease for managing the building where he lived, and
he drew $2.10 an hour at the dorm. Soon, he had a better paying job
as a campus security officer at the University of Utah.
He still phoned Meg often, but he met many new women in Utah. There
was Gallic Fiore, a fey, almost-kooky freckled girl who lived in the
house on First Avenue; Sharon Auer, who was a law student; another pretty
girl who lived in Bountiful, just north of Salt Lake City. Much later,
when I would see him again, when he had become the number one suspect
in so many killings and disappearances, he asked me, "Why should I want
to attack women? I had all the female companionship I wanted. I must
Page 122
have slept with at least a dozen women that first year in Utah, and
all of them went to bed with me willingly."
I didn't doubt it. Women had always liked Ted Bundy. Why indeed would
he have needed to take any woman by force?
During that fall of 1974, I had no knowledge whatsoever of criminal
activity in Utah. It was hundreds of miles from my "territory," and
I was kept busy dealing with cases in the Northwest. I had. learned
that I would have to have major surgery-elective* but something that
couldn't wait. It would mean that I wouMn't be able to work for at least
a month. I had no choice but to write twice as many stories so that
I could bank enough to see us through.
Had I had either the inclination, the opportunity, or the time to
investigate events around Salt Lake City during that
110
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
fall, I would have read about cases that bore an eerie parallel to those
seemingly ended in Washington. The siege of horror did seem to be over;
by October three months had passed and there had been no more
disappearances of young women. Detectives doubted that the killer had
overcome his compulsion, had exorcized the devils that drove him. Rather,
they felt that he was either dead, incarcerated in some other area,
or that he had moved on.
13
It was October 18, 1974, a Friday evening, when seventeenyear-old
Melissa Smith, daughter of Midvale's Police Chief, Louis Smith,
prepared to attend a slumber party. Melissa was a little girl, five
feet three, 105 pounds, very pretty, and she wore her long light brown
hair parted in the middle. She was a cautious girl, more so because
Page 123
of her father's profession. She had been warned again and again; Louis
Smith had seen too much violence and tragedy not to be afraid for Melissa
and her sister.
Melissa had planned to leave for the all-night party at a girlfriend's
home early in the evening, but, when she phoned her friend's home, there
was no answer. So she was still at home when another friend called her
in distress over a lovers' spat. The friend was at work at a pizza parlor,
and Melissa promised to walk over and talk to her. Wearing blue jeans,
a blouse with a blue flowered pattern, and a navy blue shirt, Melissa
left home, alone.
Midvale is a hamlet of 5,000 people, located just south of Salt Lake
City, a quiet, solidly Mormon community. It's a good place to raise
kids, and Melissa, although warned, had never had reason to be afraid.
The walk to the pizza parlor meant negotiating short cuts-down a dirt
road and a dirt bank, under a highway overpass and a railroad bridge,
and across a school playfield.
Melissa arrived to comfort her friend, and stayed at the restaurant
until|a little after ten. She had planned to return home, pick up her
nightclothes, and go to the slumber party. Her chosen roif e home would
be the same short cut she'd taken hours before.
Melissa never reached home. No one saw her after she walked out of the
lighted parking lot of the pizza parlor. It would be nine days before
her body was found near Summit
111
112
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
Park, many miles east of Salt Lake City in the Wasatch Mountains, long
since discarded by her killer.
Pathologist Serge Moore performed the autopsy on the battered body found
nude in the lonely mountains. She had been beaten savagely, possibly
with a crowbar, about the head. Melissa had sustained depressed
fractures on the left side and back of her head and massive subdural
Page 124
hemorrhages. Her body was covered with bruises which had occurred prior
to death.
She had also been strangled, by ligature. Someone had tightened her
own dark blue stocking around her neck so cruelly that the hyoid bone
was fractured. Melissa had been raped and sodomized.
Sheriff Delmar "Swede" Larson of Salt Lake County, and Captain N.D.
"Pete" Hayward, a longtime homicide detective and now chief of his unit,
assigned principal responsibility for the Meh'ssa Smith murder
investigation to Detective Jerry Thompson.
It was not an easy case; no one had actually seen Melissa walk off into
the shadows beyond the parking lot. No one had seen anyone with her
or near her. And she had not been found for nine days. Her killer could
be halfway around the world. As far as physical evidence, they had only
the girl's body. There had been so little blood beneath it that it was
probable she had been killed elsewhere-but where?
The investigation into Melissa's murder was still a nightand-day probe
on Halloween, four days after her body was found. On October 31st, some
twenty-five miles south in Lehi, Utah, seventeen-year-old Laura Aime,
disappointed at the lack of excitement on Halloween night, left a café
and headed for a nearby park. It was a little after midnight.
Laura Aime was almost six feet tall and weighed only 115 pounds. Her
model-like slimness seemed to her to be awkward skinnyness instead.
She'd dropped out of school and had moved in with friends in American
Fork, working at one low-paying job after another. But she had maintained
almost daily contact with her family who lived in Salem, Utah.
When Laura vanished on Halloween night, her parents didn't even know
she was missing. They didn't knew for four days-not until they called
her friends' home to see why she hadn't been in touch with them.
"Laura isn't here," was the response. "We haven't seen her since she
left on Halloween."
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
113
Page 125
The James Aimes were frightened. Her mother had warned her to be careful,
that she must stop her practice of hitchhiking, when the news of Melissa
Smith's murder had filled the headlines, and Laura had assured her that
she was quite capable of taking care of herself.
Now, Laura herself was missing. The pretty, long-haired girl, the
drifter in search of something to hold onto, had walked off into the
night wearing only blue jeans and a sleeveless striped sweater.
Had it been a normally cold winter, the place where they found Laura
Aime would have long since been covered by a blanket of snow. But it
was a mild Thanksgiving Day when hikers set out through American Fork
Canyon on November
27th. They found her body there in the Wasatch Mountains on a river's
bank below a parking lot. She was naked, battered so that her face was
unrecognizable. Her father identified her on that bleak Thanksgiving
Day in the morgue. He recognized some old scars on her forearm, scars
left from the time her horse tossed her into some barbed wire when she
was eleven.
The post-mortem exam of Laura Aime's body, performed by Dr. Moore,
elicited conclusions much like those in the autopsy on Melissa Smith.
Laura Aime had depressed skull fractures on the left side and back of
her head, and she had been strangled. The necklace she had worn when
she vanished was caught in the nylon stocking that had been used as
a ligature and was still cinched tightly around her neck. She had
countless facial contusions, and her body bore deep abrasions where
it had been dragged. The weapon used to inflict the skull fractures
appeared to have been an iron crowbar or pry bar.
Laura Aime had also been sexually assaulted; swabs taken from her vagina
and anus showed the presence of nonmotile sperm. It was far too late
to determine the blood type of the man who had killed her by the dead
ejaculate that he had left. |
Blood tests indicated no sign of drugs, but did show that the teenager
nfight have been under the influence of alcohol at the time of her death.
The reading was just over .1-a legal indicator of intoxication, -but
not necessarily so profound that she would have been unable to protect
herself, run, or scream.
But a scream on Halloween night might have gone unnoPage 126
114
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
ticed. If Laura Aime had called for help, no one had heard her.
Ted Bundy's Seattle girlfriend, Meg Anders, and her friend, Lynn Banks,
had both been raised in Ogden, Utah, and Lynn had been home for a visit
during the fall of 1974. She'd read of the two murdered women, looked
at their pictures, and seen the physical resemblance to the Washington
victims. When she got back to Seattle, she confronted Meg with her
suspicions.
Meg looked through the newspaper clippings that Lynn had brought back
with her, and she drew a sigh of relief when she read that Melissa Smith
had disappeared on the night of October 18th.
"There, see? October 18th. I talked to Ted that night about eleven
o'clock. He was looking forward to going hunting with my dad the next
day. He was in a good mood."
jLyïtff, s tfny woman-menés under riVe feet-was far more persuasive
than her diminutive size would indicate, and she was frightened enough
to be insistent this time.
"You have to go to the police! There are too many things that you and
I both know. You can't keep hiding from it any longer."
Meg Anders did contact the King County Police in the fall of 1974; her
information about Ted Bundy resulted in the fourth listing of his name
among the thousands turned in. Mine had been the first, and, like mine
and the others, the information did not warrant particular scrutiny.
Meg had kept most of her fears to herself in her first call to the
detectives.
It was Lynn's urging which made Meg turn on her lover, but that friendship
with Lynn also ended because of Lynn's animosity toward Ted. Ted himself
had no idea that Meg had contacted the investigators.
Melissa Smith's body had been found, and Laura Aime was still missing
on Friday evening, November 8th, 1974. It was raining that night in
the Salt Lake City area, a fine misty rain that promised to become a
Page 127
prolonged downpour. It wasn't a particularly propitious night for a
shopping trip, but eighteen-year-old Carol DaRonch headed toward the
Fashion Place Shopping Mall in suburban Murray, Utah anyway. She drove
her new Camaro, leaving home a little after 6:30 P.M.
Carol had graduated from high school in the spring of
1974 and taken a job with the Mountain Bell Telephone Company; she still
lived at home with her parents. A freTHE STRANGER BESIDE ME
115
quent shopper at the mail, she had nothing to fear as she parked her
car in the parking lot. She was going to shop at Auerbach's, and just
browse.
She ran into some cousins, chatted with them for a while, made her
purchase at Auerbach's, and was leafing through some books at Walden's
Book Store when she looked up to see a handsome man standing beside
her. He was welldressed in a sports jacket, green slacks, and cordovan
colored patent leather shoes. He had wavy brown hair and a moustache.
He asked her if she had parked her car in the lot near the Sears store,
and she nodded. Then he inquired as to her license number and she gave
it to him. He seemed to recognize it. He told her that a shopper had
reported that someone had been trying to break into her car, using a
wire coathanger. "Would you mind coming with me so we can check to see
if anything has been stolen?"
She was taken by surprise. It didn't occur to her to wonder how the
man with the moustache had found her, how he could have known that she
was the owner of the Camaro. His manner was such that she assumed he
must be a security guard or a policeman. She followed him meekly through
the lighted central corridor of the mall and out into the rainy night.
She became apprehensive as they walked through the parking lot, but
the man seemed so hi control, explaining that his partner probably
already had the thief in custody. "Perhaps you'll recognize him if you
see him," he told her easily.
Page 128
She asked to see his identification, and he only chuckled. Carol DaRonch
had been trained to trust police officers, and she felt somewhat foolish
for having questioned the man. She opened her car with her keys, and
glanced around the interior. "It's all here. There's nothing missing.
I don't think he managed to get in," she told him.
The man wanted her to open the passenger door too, and she demurred
jtthere was nothing missing, and she saw no need. She was surprised
when he tried that door anyway, shrugged and l|d her back to the mall,
telling her that they would confer with his partner.
He glanced around. "They must have gone back to our substation. We'll
meet them there and identify him."
"How would I know him?" she argued. "I wasn't even there. I was inside
shopping."
The man brushed off her objections, hurrying faster now,
116
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
past many stores, and out into the darkness of the north parking lot.
She asked his name, growing impatient and wary. She hadn't lost anything,
and she had better things to do than follow this man on a wild goose
chase.
"Officer Roseland. Murray Police Department," he answered shortly.
"We're almost there."
They stood outside a door with "139" on it. He knocked, waited, and
no one answered. He tried the door and found it locked. (The door was
a back entrance to a laundramat; it was not a police substation, but
Carol didn't know that.)
Now the man insisted that she accompany him to headquarters to sign
a complaint. He said he would drive her down in his car. She expected
to see a squad car. Instead, he led her to a battered Volkswagen bug.
She had heard of unmarked cars, even "sneaker" cars, but this didn't
look like any police vehicle she'd ever seen. She demanded to see his
I.D.
Page 129
Looking at her as if she were a hysterical female, the man grudgingly
flashed his wallet and she caught only a glimpse of a small gold badge.
He put it back in his pocket so quickly that she hadn't been able to
see the name of a department, or even a number.
He opened the passenger door and waited for her to get in. She debated
refusing, but the man was impatient, and she got into his car. The moment
the doors were closed, she caught the strong odor of alcohol on his
breath. She didn't think policemen were allowed to drink on duty. When
he instructed her to fasten her seat belt, she said "No." She was poised,
ready for flight, but the car had already pulled out of the lot and
was accelerating.
The driver didn't head in the direction of the Murray Police Department.
He was driving in the opposite direction. She looked at cars passing
by them, wondered if she should scream, wondered if she should try to
jump out, but they were going too fast, and no one seemed to be noticing
them at all.
And then the car stopped, so suddenly that it ran over a curb near the
McMillan Grade School. She turned to look at "Officer Roseland" and
saw that he was no longer smiling. His jaw was set, and he seemed removed
somehow from her. When she asked him what he was doing, he didn't answer
her.
Carol DaRonch reached for the door handle on her side,
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
117
and started to jump out, but the man was too quick for her. In an instant,
he had clapped a handcuff on her right wrist. She fought him, kicking,
screaming, as he struggled to get the cuffs on her other wrist. He missed,
and managed only to get the second cuff on the same wrist. She continued
to fight, scratching him, screaming at the top of her lungs, screams
that went unheard in the quiet neighborhood. He was getting angrier
and angrier with her.
Suddenly, there was a small, black gun in his hand. He held it next
Page 130
to her head and said, "If you don't stop screaming, I'm going to kill
you. I'll blow your brains out."
She fell backward out of the car, onto the sodden parking strip, saw
the pistol drop to the floor of the car. Now he had a crowbar of some
kind in his hand, and he threw her up against his car. She put up one
hand, and with the strength borne of desperation, managed to keep it
away from her head. She kicked at his genitals, and broke free. Running.
She didn't see or care where. She had to get away from him.
Wilbur and Mary Walsh were driving down Third Avenue East when a figure
was suddenly caught in their headlights. Walsh threw on his brakes,
barely missing it, and his wife fumbled with the door locks. They
couldn't see who it was trying to get into their car, expecting a maniac
at the very least. Then they saw that it was only a young girl, a terribly
frightened girl who sobbed, "I can't believe it. I can't believe it."
Mrs. Walsh tried to comfort her, telling her that she was safe, that
nothing was going to harm her now.
"He was going to kill me. He said he was going to kill me if I didn't
stop screaming."
The Walshes drove Carol DaRonch to the Murray Police Station on State
Street. She was unable to walk, and Wilbur Walsh carried the slender
girl inside, their entrance drawing startled looks from the men on duty
there.
As her sobs subsided to gasps, Carol told the policemen that one of
tieir men-Officer Roseland-had attacked her. Of course, thfce was no
Officer Roseland in the department, and no one used an old Volkswagen
while on duty. They listened as she described the car, the man, the
iron bar he'd used against her. "I didn't really see it. I felt it in
my hand as he tried to hit me with it. It had a lot of sides on it,
more than four, I think."
She held up her right wrist, still bearing the two handcuffs.
118
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
Page 131
Carefully, the officers removed the cuffs, dusted them for latent prints,
and came up with only useless smudges. They were not the Smith and Wesson
brand usually favored by policemen, but a foreign brand: Gerocal.
Patrolmen were dispatched to the site of the attack near the grade school.
They found Carol DaRonch's shoe, lost in the struggle, but nothing more.
The Volkswagen was, predictably, long gone.
Patrol units cruised the mall, looking for a light colored bug with
dents and rust spots, with a tear in the upholstery of the rear seat.
They didn't find it, nor was Murray Detective Joel Reed successful in
trying to lift prints from the door knob on door 139. Exposure to rain,
even dew, can eradicate fingerprints quickly.
Carol DaRonch looked through a pile of mug books and
ictuguiicu iiu uuc. Q\ic Tuau ncrvci actrri iVic Tfiîtn \>T&Vît, ?a&
devoutly hoped never to see him again. Three days later, she discovered
two small drops of blood staining the light fake fur of her jacket collar
and brought the jacket in for lab testing. The blood was not hers; it
was type O, but there was not enough of it to differentiate for RH
positive or negative factors.
Murray detectives had a description of a man, a car, an M.O., and, Thank
God, a live victim. The similarities between the DaRonch
almost-successful kidnaping and the murder of Melissa -Smith could not
be denied. Melissa had vanished from the parking lot of the pizza parlor,
a restaurant only a mile away from the Fashion Place Mall, but no one
knew what ruse had been used to entice her from that lot without a
struggle. Her father was a policeman. Would she have gone willingly
with a policeman?
Probably.
Whatever "Officer Roseland's" mission had been on the rainy night of
November 8th, he had been frustrated. Carol DaRonch had escaped. If
he had intended to rape her-or worse-his appetite had only been honed
to a keener edge. He had more to do that night.
Seventeen miles from Murray, Bountiful, Utah is a northern suburb of
the Mormon city, a suburb that lives up to its name with its natural
beauty and its recreational opportunities. On November 8th, the Dean
Kents of Bountiful prepared to attend a musical presented at Viewmont
High
Page 132
4
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
119
School. Dean Kent had been ill, but he was feeling better, and he and
his wife, Belva, and their oldest daughter, seventeenyear-old Debby,
headed for the premiere performance of "The Redhead."
Debby Kent's younger brother, Blair, didn't care about seeing the play;
he was dropped off at a roller rink and his mother promised to pick
him up at 10 P.M. Shortly before eight, they arrived at the high school.
They knew most of the crowd in the auditorium; high school drama
productions tend to appeal principally to the families of the performers,
classmates, and friends who have been prevailed upon to buy tickets.
While the audience waited in hushed expectation, Viewmont High School's
drama teacher, Jean Graham, a young woman only a few years out of college
herself, was approached by s stranger backstage. She was busy,
distracted, trying to coordinate last minute preparations for the
performance, and she paused only briefly as the tall, slim man with
the moustache called to her. She remembers that he wore a sports jacket,
dress slacks, and patent leather shoes, and that he was very handsome.
He was courteous, almost apologetic, as he asked her if she would
accompany him to the parking lot to identify a car. She shook her head,
scarcely wondering why he needed such help. She was just too busy.
"It will only take a minute," he urged.
"No, I can't. I'm in charge of the play," she said briskly, and hurried
past him in the darkened hallway. He was still lingering in the hall
when she headed toward the front of the auditorium twenty minutes later.
"Hi," she said. "Did you find anyone to help you yet?"
He didn't speak, but stared at her strangely, his eyes boring into her.
Odd, she thought. But she was used to men staring at her.
Her duties required that she go backstage again some minutes later Jnd
the man was still there. He walked toward her, smiling. |
"Hey, you look really nice," he complimented her. "Come on, give me
Page 133
a hand with that car. Just a couple of minutes will do it." His manner
was easy, cajoling.
And yet she was on guard. She tried to get past him, told him that maybe
her husband could help him. "I'll go find him." She was frightened,
but that was ridiculous, she told
120
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
herself. There were several hundred people close by. The man stepped
to the side, blocking her way. They jockeyed for position in a peculiar
side-to-side dance step, and then she was free of him. Who was he? He
wasn't on the staff, too old to be a student, and too young to be a
parent. She hurried backstage.
Debby Kent left at intermission to phone her brother and tell him that
the play wouldn't be over by ten, and then returned for the second act.
One of her girlfriends, Jolynne Beck, noticed the handsome stranger
pacing at the rear of the auditorium. Jean Graham saw him there too,
and felt curiously disturbed when she saw him for the last time, before
the play had concluded.
Debby Kent volunteered to drive over to the roller rink and pick up
her brother. "I'll be back to pick you up," she promised her parents.
Several residents of an apartment complex across from the high school
remember hearing two short, piercing screams coming from the west
parking lot between 10:30 and 11 that night. They hadn't sounded like
horseplay; they'd sounded like someone in mortal terror, screams so
compelling that the witnesses had walked outside to stare over at the
dark lot.
They had seen nothing at all.
Debby's brother waited in vain at the bowling alley. Her parents stood
impatiently in front of the high school while the crowd thinned. Finally,
no one was left, but their car was still in the lot. Where was Debby?
It was midnight, and they couldn't find their daughter anywhere. It
seemed she'd never arrived at the car at all. They notified the Bountiful
Page 134
Police Department, described their daughter: seventeen years old, with
long brown hair parted in the middle.
"She just wouldn't have left us stranded," her mother said nervously.
"Her father's just getting over a heart attack. And the car's still
in the school lot. It doesn't make sense."
Bountiful police had the radio report on the attempted abduction in
Murray; they were all too aware of the Melissa Smith case, and of the
disappearance of Laura Aime. They sent patrol units out to circle the
neighborhood around Viewmont High School, had the school itself opened
and each room checked on the off chance that Debby might have been
accidentally locked in a room. Her parents frantically called all her
friends. But no one had seen Debby Kent.
No one has ever seen Debby Kent again.
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
121
With the first thin wash of daylight the next morning, a police
investigative crew searched the Viewmont High School parking lot,
canvassed the neighborhood, looking for some clue to the inexplicable
vanishing of Debby Kent.
They learned of the screams heard the night before, but found no actual
witnesses to an abduction. There had been so many cars in the lot that
no one could pick out one, perhaps a tannish old Volkswagen bug?
Bountiful detectives Ira Seal and Ron Ballantyne hunkered down to search
the now empty lot. And there, between an exterior door to the school
and the parking lot, they found the little key. They knew what it was-a
handcuff key.
They took the key at once to the Murray Police Department, inserted
it in the lock of the handcuffs removed from Carol DaRonch. It slid
in perfectly; the cuffs opened. Still, they knew that some handcuff
keys are interchangeable. The key wouldn't open their Smith and Wesson
cuffs, but it would work on several brands of small cuffs. It could
not be considered positive physical evidence connecting the two cases,
Page 135
but it most certainly was alarming. Carol DaRonch had escaped.
Apparently, Debby Kent had not.
Just as in Washington State earlier in the year, the Utah law enforcement
officers were inundated with calls. The last call that appeared to have
any real bearing on the case came in mid-December. A man who had arrived
at Viewmont High School to pick up his daughter after the play reported
that he had seen an old, beat-up Volkswagen-a light colored bugracing
from the parking lot just after 10:30 on the night of November 8th.
There was no more. Debby Kent's parents were left to face a bleak, tragic
Christmas season, just as Melissa Smith's and Laura Aime's were. Carol
DaRonch was afraid to go out alone, even in the daylight.
I
I
14
Ted Bundy was not doing as well in his first year at the University
of Utah's law school as he had done in his earlier college career. He
was having difficulty maintaining a C average, and finished the quarter
with two incomplètes-Ted who had breezed through tough courses at the
University of Washington and graduated "with distinction," Ted who had
assured the Director of Admissions at Utah that he was not "just a
qualified student, but ... an individual who is obstinate enough to
want to become a critical and tireless student and practitioner of the
law, and qualified enough to succeed."
Certainly, he had to work to pay his way through and that would cut
into his studying time, but he was also drinking a great deal more than
he had in the past. He called Meg frequently and was very disturbed
when he did not find her at home. Strangely, while he was being
continuously unfaithful himself, he expected-demanded-that she be
totally loyal to him. According to Lynn Banks, Meg's close friend, he
would dial Lynn's number if he failed to find Meg at home, insisting
on being told where she was. '
On November 18, 1974, I entered Group Health Hospital in Seattle to
Page 136
be prepped for surgery the next morning. I had had four babies without
anesthetic, but this surgery proved to be more painful than anything
in my memory, and I was sedated heavily for two days. I remember calling
Joyce Johnson sometime in the late afternoon of November 19th, telling
her that I was all right, and I remember my motherwho had come up from
Salem, Oregon to stay with my children-sitting beside my bed.
I also remember the deluge of flowers I received from various police
departments. The Seattle homicide detectives sent me a dozen red roses,
and Herb Swindler appeared carrying a pot of yellow mums, followed.
by Ted Forrester from the
122
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
123
King County major crimes unit with a huge planter. I don't know what
the nurses thought as they saw the steady parade of visiting detectives
with ill-hidden gun belts at their waists. They must have thought I
was a girlfriend of the Mafia under surveillance.
Of course it was only a bunch of "tough" cops being kind. They knew
I was alone and worried about getting back on my feet and able to work,
and they were showing the sentimental side they usually keep hidden.
Within a few days, I felt much better and rather enjoyed my notoriety.
My mother visited me. She seemed worried as she remarked, "I'm glad
I'm up here with the kids. You got a really strange phone call last
night."
"Who was it?"
"I don't know. It sounded like it was long distance. Some man called
you a little before midnight and he seemed terribly upset that you
weren't home. I asked if there was any message, but he wouldn't leave
any and he wouldn't say who he was."
"Upset? How upset?"
"It's hard to describe. He might have been drunk, but he seemed
disoriented, panicky, and he talked rapidly. It bothered me."
Page 137
"It was probably a wrong number."
"No, he asked for 'Ann.' I told him you were in the hospital and that
I could have you call him back in a day or so, but he hung up."
I had no idea who it might have been, and I would not remember the call
at all until I was reminded of it almost a year later.
The Intermountain Crime Conference was held at Stateline, Nevada on
December 12, 1974, and law enforcement officers met to discuss those
cases which seemed to have indicators that other states might be involved.
Washington detectives presented jjheir missing and murdered girls cases,
and Utah lawmen dbcussed Melissa Smith, Laura Aime, Debby Kent, Carol
Dajfonch. There were similarities, certainly, but there are, sadly,
hundreds of young women killed each year in the United States. Many
of them are strangled, bludgeoned, and raped. The method of murder was
not enough to assume that any one man was responsible for a particular
group of victims.
124
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
Ted's name was now listed-four times-in that endless computer read-out
in the Washington State Task Force Office. But he was still one among
several thousand, a man with no adult criminal record at all, and
certainly a man whose job record and educational background did not
stamp him as a "criminal type."
He had been in Washington, and now he was in Utah. His name was Ted,
and he drove a Volkswagen. His girlfriend, Meg, had been suspicious
enough to turn him in, but Meg was a very jealous woman, a woman who
had been lied to; there were a score or more jealous women who had turned
their boyfriends' names in as possible "Teds."
It was after that 1974 Intermountain Conference, after more urging from
Lynn Banks, that Meg Anders had gone a step further. She placed a call
to the Salt Lake County Sheriff's Office, and repeated her suspicions
about Ted Bundy. Her voice had had a near-hysterical edge to it, and
Capt. Hayward too suspected that this woman on the long distance line
Page 138
from Seattle was exaggerating, was allowing herself to see connections
that were, at best, tenuous. He wrote down the name "Ted Bundy" and
gave it to Jerry Thompson to add to the burgeoning list of Utah suspects.
Without physical evidence, without solid information, detectives
cannot rush out and arrest a man. It goes against the grain of our whole
philosophy of justice. It would be eight months before Ted Bundy would,
through his own actions, place himself squarely in the eye of the law,
would almost challenge police to stop him.
What do I remember of the Christmas season of 1974? Very little; there
was no reason to. I remember that I was back at work two weeks after
surgery, a recuperation cornpounded by a bout with the flu. I couldn't
drive yet, but a few of the detectives had taken their free time to
tape the vital information on some of their cases which had already
been to trial, and they drove out to bring me the tapes so that I could
type stories at home.
I remember that the following January brought one wailing wind storm,
a storm that whipped across Puget Sound and hit our old beach house
with such force that the living room window all across the southern
wall was blown in, scattering plants, lamps, and glass shards twenty
feet into the room. It looked like a tornado had danced through, and
we froze until we could get someone out to put in a new window. That
was
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
125
the month the basement flooded, and the roof started to leak in several
spots. I can remember being very discouraged, but I can't remember once
thinking about Ted Bundy.
Ted came back to Seattle in January of 1975, and spent more than a week
with Meg, from January 14th to 23rd, after he had finished his final
exams in Utah. Meg didn't tell him that she had turned his name into
the police, and she carried a heavy burden of guilt, although no officer
had yet approached him. He was so nice to her, was seriously talking
Page 139
marriage again, and her doubts of the fall just past now seemed to be
only a nightmare. This was the old Ted, the man she had loved for so
many years. She was able to put her fears somewhere far back in her
mind. The only woman in Utah that he mentioned to her was Gallic Fiore,
whom he described as "flaky." He said that there'd been a goodbye party
for Callie sometime after Christmas of 1974, that they'd seen her off
on a plane.
He didn't mention that Callie hadn't left for good, that she Was coming
back to Salt Lake City.
When Ted left to go back to law school, Meg felt much better. There
were plans for her to visit him in Salt Lake City that summer, and he
promised to come back to Seattle as soon as he could.
Caryn Campbell had vacationed in Aspen, Colorado in January of 1975.
Caryn, a registered nurse, was engaged to Dr. Raymond Gadowski of
Farmington, Michigan and the pair, along with Gadowski's two children
by a prior marriage, were combining a pleasure trip with a medical
symposium on cardiology that Gadowski was scheduled to attend in Aspen.
The group checked into the plush Wildwood Inn on January llth, and was
given a room on the second floor. At twenty-three, Caryn was nine years
younger than Gadowski, but she loved him and she got along well with
his son, Gregory, eleven, and^his daughter, Jenny, nine. She wanted
to get married, and soon. When the couple argued that day, it was because
Gadowsti was not particularly anxious to rush into a second marriage.
Caryn Campbell was suffering with a slight case of the flu when they
arrived, but she was still able to take the youngsters skiing and
sightseeing while Gadowski attended seminars. On January 12th, they
ate dinner with friends at the
126
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
Stew Pot, and Caryn ordered beef stew. The others had cocktails but
Caryn, still feeling queasy, drank only milk.
And then Caryn, Gadowski and the youngsters returned to the cozy lounge
Page 140
at the Wildwood Inn. Gadowski picked up the evening paper, and Caryn
remembering that she'd left a new magazine in their room, headed toward
the elevator to get it. She carried with her the only key to Room 210.
All things being equal, she should have returned to the lounge within
ten minutes.
Caryn got off the elevator on the second floor and spoke to several
other physicians waiting there, doctors she'd met at the convention.
They watched her walk down the hall toward her room.
Downstairs, Gadowski finished the paper, and glanced around. His
children were playing contentedly, but Caryn hadn't come back. He looked
toward the elevators, expecting to see her emerge at any moment. The
minutes dragged, and she didn't appear.
Warning the youngsters to stay in the lounge, the young cardiologist
went up to their room, and then remembered that Caryn had the key. He
knocked, and waited for her to cross the room and open the door. She
didn't.
He knocked again, thinking that perhaps she was in the bathroom and
hadn't heard him, knocked louder. Still, she didn't open the door. He
felt a prickling of alarm; if she had gotten sicker, perhaps fainted
inside, she might have hit her head on something, might be unconscious.
He sprinted down to the desk, obtained a duplicate key, and ran back
to the second floor. The door swung open and the room before him looked
exactly as it had when they'd left before dinner. There was no sign
of Caryn's purse, and the magazine that she'd meant to get was still
on the stand beside the beds. Obviously, she hadn't come up to the room
at all.
Puzzled and indecisive, he stood in the empty room, the key in his hand.
Then he turned, and walked out into the hallway, locking the door behind
him. There were a lot of parties going on that Sunday night, and he
figured that his fiancée had probably run into some of their friends,
been enticed to stop someplace "for just one drink." She wasn't usually
inconsiderate, and she must have known he'd be worried, but then the
atmosphere in the lodge was an easy-going one. He checked back in the
lounge, and found the children still alone.
Page 141
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
127
Gadowski paced, hurrying faster and faster, from one bar in the sprawling
building to another, listening for the sound of Caryn's laughter,
looking for the familiar way she tossed back her hair. The din and the
ebullient spirits of the people around him seemed to mock him. Caryn
was gone, simply gone, and he couldn't understand it.
He gathered up his youngsters and took them to the room. It was 10 P.M.
now, and, outside the big warm lodge, it was freezing cold. All Caryn
had been wearing when she'd strolled toward the elevator were blue jeans,
her light brown wooly jacket and boots. That was warm enough during
the day, but it was inconceivable that she'd gone out into the January
Colorado night like that.
Gadowski called the Aspen Police Department shortly after ten. The
patrolmen who arrived took a missing report, but they assured the
Michigan doctor that almost everybody who "disappeared" showed up after
the bars and parties broke up.
Gadowski shook his head impatiently. "No, she isn't like that. She was
ill. She may have gotten sicker."
A description of the nurse was broadcast to patrolmen on duty in Aspen:
twenty-three-year-old woman, five feet, four inches tall, brown
shoulder-length hair, the clothes she was wearing. Many times during
the night, patrol units would pull up to a young woman wearing jeans,
a wooly jacket, only to find that it was someone else; it was never
Caryn Campbell.
By morning, Gadowski was distraught after a sleepless night, the
children crying and upset. Aspen police detectives moved through the
Wildwood Inn, searching room by room, storerooms, closets, even the
kitchens, and up through crawl spaces, peering down into the elevator
shafts. The pretty nurse wasn't anywhere in the lodge.
They questioned every guest, but no one had seen Caryn Campbell after
she'd said "Hi" to the group at the elevator on the second floor and
walked down the hall toward her room.
Finally, Dr. Gadowski packed up their bags and flew home with his
Page 142
children» hoping each time the phone rang that it would, somehow! be
Caryn, with a logical explanation of why she had walked away from him.
The call never came.
On February 18th, a recreational employee working along the Owl Creek
road a few miles from the Wildwood Inn, noticed a flight of squawking
birds that were circling something
128
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
in a snowbank twenty-five feet off the road. He walked
through the melting drifts and turned away, sickened.
What remained of Caryn Campbell's nude body lay there in the snow, snow
stained crimson with her blood.
Pathologist Dr. Donald Clark performed a post mortem examination on
the body that dental records verified was Caryn's. She had died of
repeated blunt instrument blows to her skull and had, in addition,
suffered deep cuts from a sharp weapon. A knife? An axe? There was not
enough tissue left in the neck area to say whether she had been strangled,
but her hyoid bone had been cracked.
It was much too late to tell if she had been subjected to a sexual attack,
but the nude condition of her body pointed to rape as a strong motive.
Undigested bits of stew and milk were easily identifiable in her stomach;
Caryn Campbell had been killed within hours after she had eaten on
January 12th, which would make time-of-death shortly after she had left
the lounge of the Wildwood Inn to go up to her room.
She had never made it to her room, or, if she had, someone had waited
inside for her. That seemed unlikely; the room had shown no signs of
struggle at all. Somewhere, along that well-lighted corridor on the
second floor of the Wildwood Inn, somewhere between the elevators and
Room
210, Caryn had met her killer, and had, seemingly, gone with him without
a fight.
It was a disappearance reminiscent of the Georgeann Hawkins case in
Page 143
June of 1974. Less than fifty feet to walk to safety, and then, gone.
One California woman tourist had been in that corridor of the Wildwood
Inn on the night of January 12th and she had seen a handsome young man
who had smiled at her, but she'd thought nothing of it. She had left
for home before Caryn Campbell's disappearance became known to other
hotel guests.
The winter waned, and back in Washington State the snows had begun to
melt and slough off in the foothills of the Cascade Mountains. On
Saturday, March 1, 1975, two Green River Community College students
were working on a forestry survey project on Taylor Mountain, a thickly
wooded "mini" mountain east of Highway 18, a two lane highway that cuts
through forests between Auburn and North Bend, Washington. The site
is about ten miles from the hillside
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
129
where the remains of Janice OU, Denise Naslund, and an unidentified
third person (perhaps fourth) were located in September of 1974. It
was slow going through the moss shrouded alders, the ground carpeted
with sword ferns and fallen leaves.
One of the forestry students looked down. A human skull rested at his
feet.
Brenda Ball had been found at last, although it would take dental records
to verify that. As they had six months before, King County Police
detectives immediately ordered the lonely area cordoned off, and, again,
Detective Bob Keppel led over two hundred searchers into the area. Men
and dogs moved with painstaking slowness through the dank forest,
turning over piles of leaves, rotten stumps.
Denise and Janice had been found only a few miles from the park where
they vanished; Brenda's skull was discovered thirty miles away from
the Flame Tavern. This could, perhaps, be explained by the fact that
she'd intended to hitchhike to Sun Lakes State Park east of the mountains.
Highway
Page 144
18 would have been a likely alternate route to Snoqualmie Pass. Had
she gotten into a car with the stranger with a sling on his arm, grateful
that she had a ride all the way to Sun Lakes? And had he then pulled
over, stopped in this desolate region, and stared at her with the
pitiless eyes of a killer?
The discovery of the skull on Taylor Mountain made some kind of macabre
sense, but that was all there was to be found of the dark-eyed girl.
Even if animals had scattered the remainder of her skeleton, there should
have been something more and there was nothing. No more bones, not so
much as a tattered rag of her clothing.
Cause of death was impossible to determine, but the skull was fractured
on the left side, smashed by a blunt instrument
The grim search went on for two more days.
Early on March 3rd, Bob Keppel slipped and fell as he made his way down
a slimy incline. He had stumbled-literally-over another skull one
hundred feet away from that of Brenda Ball. *
Dental recorJs would confirm that Keppel had found all that was left
of Susan Rancourt, the shy blonde coed who had vanished from Ellensburg,
eighty-seven miles away! There was no reason at all for Susan to be
here in this lonely grove. It appeared that the killer had established
his own graveyard, bringing only his victims' severed heads with him,
130
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
month after month. It was an ugly supposition to contemplate, but one
that could not be ignored.
Susan's skull, too, had been brutally fractured.
As the search went on, the other families waited, dreading that their
daughters might be up on Taylor Mountain, that they would hear a knock
on their door at any time.
Fifty feet more of the tedious sifting of wet leaves, brushing aside
dripping sword ferns. And there was yet another skull. Dental records
confirmed this victim was a girl that detectives hadn't expected to
Page 145
find so far away from home. It was that of Roberta Kathleen Parks, missing
since the previous May from Corvallis, Oregon-262 miles away. As with
the others, it bore the crushing damage of a blunt instrument.
The first to vanish was the last to be found. Lynda Ann Healy, the teacher
of retarded youngsters, gone fourteen months from her basement room
in the University District, could be identified only by her lower
mandible. The fillings in the jaw bone matched Lynda's dental charts.
Lynda's skull, too, had been carried to Taylor Mountain.
Although the search continued from dawn until sunset for another week,
no more skulls were found, no clothes, no jewelry.
There had been a few dozen small bones, neck bones, but not nearly enough
to indicate that the victims' complete bodies had been carried into
the forest, and the realization that only the girls' heads had been
brought there one at a time over a six months period brought forth more
rumors of cults, witchcraft, and satanism.
Seattle Police had a file, File 1004, a file on occult happenings.
Reports came into the beleaguered Task Force-reports from people who
thought they'd seen "Ted" at cult gatherings. In any case with such
widespread publicity, a number of "kooks" will surface, advancing
theories that make an ordinary man's hair stand up on the back of his
neck. There were totally unsubstantiated rumors that the missing and
murdered girls had been sacrificed and their headless bodies dumped,
weighted, into the almost bottomless waters of Lake Washington.
A psychic from eastern Washington contacted Captain Herb Swindler and
prevailed upon him to meet with her at dawn on the Taylor Mountain site
where the woman pierced the ground with a stick and attempted to deduce
information
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
131
from the way it cast shadows. It was an eerie scene, and it produced
no new theories.
Swindler was soon besieged by messages from those who claimed direct
Page 146
contact with "that other world," and almost as many requests from other
departments with crimes they felt might have resulted from devil worship.
The man was a nononsense cop, and he was hassled by his detectives who
thought the psychic angle was ridiculous.
But Swindler kept remembering the astrological prediction that had come
true on July 14th. Asked if he felt the occult was involved, he shook
his head, "I don't know; I've never known."
Psychiatrists were more inclined to believe that the killer was a man
obsessed by a terrible compulsion, a compulsion that forced him to hunt
down and kill the same type of woman, over, and over, and over again,
that he could never be able to murder her enough times to find surcease.
Over at County Police headquarters, Captain Nick Mackie admitted that
the crimes might never be solved. The probers knew now that Lynda, Susan,
Kathy, Brenda, Denise and Janice were dead. As to the fate of Donna
and Georgeann, they were in the dark. There were still the extra femur
bones found with Denise and Janice; they probably belonged to the missing
women. It was all they were ever to know. Donna Manson and Georgeann
Hawkins may never be found. In Utah, it is the same with Debby Kent.
Gone.
"The name of the game is tenacity," Mackie remarked. "We have looked
at 2,247 Ted' lookalikes, 916 vehicles . . ."
Mackie said that there were 200 suspects left after the winnowing out,
but 200 is still an impossibly large number of men to learn everything
about. "We have no crime scene evidence, no positive means of death,"
Mackie said. "It's the worst case I've ever been on. There's just
nothing."
Mackie added that a psychological profile of the killer indicated that
he would probably have criminal behavior in his background, w^ probably
a sexual psychopath. "You go up to a certain point in your
investigation," the weary detective chief commente». "Then you stop,
and start all over again."
Ted Bundy's name remained on the roster of 200 suspects. But Ted Bundy
had no criminal background; he was squarely on the other side of the
law from all the information the Task Force had uncovered on him. His
juvenile records were shredded, and they didn't know of his long-ago
arrests
Page 147
132
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
for car theft and burglary. Meg hadn't told them that she knew Ted had
stolen television sets, even while he was an honor student at the
University. There was a great deal she hadn't yet told them.
Just as the crimes had stopped in Washington, they stopped in Utah.
The murder of Caryn Campbell in Aspen was another state away, and
appeared to be an isolated instance. Detective Mike Fisher in Aspen
was busy checking out local suspects, eliminating every man who had
known the pretty nurse. He could see no link with the Utah cases, and
Washington State was a long, long way away.
Crime news was about to escalate in Colorado.
Vail, Colorado is one hundred miles away from Aspen, a booming ski resort
town, but without the flash, money, the drugs, and the "laissez faire"
attitude of Aspen. Jerry Ford keeps a vacation condo in Vail, and Gary
Grant occasionally flies in quietly with his daughter, Jennifer, to
ski.
Jim Stovall, Chief of Detectives of the Salem, Oregon Police Department,
takes his winter vacation there, working as a ski instructor. His
daughter lives there, also a ski instructor.
Stovall drew a deep breath as he recalled to me that twenty-six-year-old
Julie Cunningham was a good friend of his daughter, and Stovall, who
has solved so many Oregon homicides, was at a loss to know what had
happened to Julie on the night of March 15th.
At twenty-six, Julie Cunningham should have had the world by the tail.
She was very attractive and she had silky dark hair, parted in the middle.
She shared a pleasant apartment in Vail with a girlfriend, and worked
as a clerk in a sporting goods store, and as a part-time ski instructor.
But Julie wasn't happy; she was searching for the one man she could
really love and trust, someone to settle down with. She'd done the
ski-bum bit, but she was growing out of that; she wanted marriage and
children.
Page 148
Julie was not the best judge of men. She believed their lines, and she
was becoming disillusioned. She'd heard, "It's been great; I'll give
you a call some day" much too often. Maybe Vail was the wrong place
for her to be; maybe the aura of a ski town didn't lend itself to permanent
relationships.
In early March of 1975, Julie was to suffer her last heartbreak. She
thought she had met the man she wanted, and she
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
133
was thrilled when he invited her to go to Sun Valley with him for a
vacation. But she'd been "dumped on" again when they reached the resort
made famous by Sonja Henie movies in the thirties. The man had never
had any intention of a cornmitted relationship, and she returned to
Vail, crying and depressed.
On the Saturday night of March 15th, Julie didn't have a date. She called
her mother that evening, feeling a little better when she hung up just
before nine. She decided to get out of her apartment, and, wearing blue
jeans, a brown suede jacket, boots, and a ski cap, headed for a tavern
a few blocks away. Her roommate was there; she could have a beer or
two. There was always tomorrow.
Only there wasn't. There were no more tomorrows for Julie Cunningham.
She didn't arrive at the tavern, and, when her roommate came home in
the early morning hours, Julie wasn't there. Julie's clothes, books,
records, make-up-everything but what she'd worn when she walked
out-were there, but their owner never returned.
Julie Cunningham's disappearance was soon eclipsed in the news by an
event in Aspen. Claudine Longet, the divorced wife of singer Andy
Williams, was arrested for the March
19th slaying of her lover, "Spider" Sabich, a former world champion
skier. The lovers' quarrel, the notoriety of the principals, made much
bigger headlines than the disappearance of an unknown ski instructor.
But the pattern was repeating, just as it had in Washington a year earlier.
Page 149
A victim in January. No victim in February. A victim in March.
Would there be a victim in April in Colorado?
Denise Oliverson was twenty-five years old that spring, married, and
living in Grand Junction, Colorado, a town just east of the Utah-Colorado
border on Highway 70. Denise argued with her husband on Sunday afternoon,
April 6th, and left their home, riding her yellow bike, headed for her
parents' home.*-She may have grown less angry with each mile that passel;
it was a wonderful spring day, and perhaps she realized that their fight
had been silly. Maybe she planned to go home and make up that night.
It was a warm day, and Denise wore jeans, and a print, green long-sleeved
blouse; if anyone saw the pretty, darkhaired woman peddling her
ten-speed that afternoon, they have never come forward to report it.
134
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
Denise didn't arrive at her folks' place, but they hadn't been expecting
her. She didn't come home that night either, and her husband figured
she was still angry with him. He would give her time to cool off, and
then call.
On Monday, he called her parents and was startled to learn she had never
arrived at their home. A search of the route she had probably taken
was instituted and police discovered her bike-and her sandals-beneath
a viaduct near a railroad bridge close by the Colorado River on U.S.
50. The bike was in good working order; there would have been no reason
to leave it there.
Like Julie Cunningham, Denise Oliverson had disappeared.
There would be other girls who would vanish in Colorado during that
bright spring of 1975.
Eighteen-year-old Melanie Cooley, who looked enough like Bountiful
Utah's Debby Kent to have been a twin, walked away from her high school
in Nederland, a tiny mountain hamlet fifty miles west of Denver on April
15th. Eight days later, county road workers found her battered body
on the Coal Creek Canyon road twenty miles away. She had been bludgeoned
Page 150
on the back of the head-probably with a rockand her hands were tied.
A filthy pillowcase, perhaps used as a garotte, perhaps as a blindfold,
was still twisted around her neck.
On July 1st, Shelley K. Robertson, twenty-four, failed to show up for
work in Golden, Colorado. Her family checked around and discovered she
had been seen alive on Monday, June 30th, by friends. A police officer
had seen her in a service station in Golden on July 1st, in the company
of a wildhaired man driving an old pickup truck. No one saw her after
that.
Shelley had been a hitchhiker, and her family tried to believe that
she had decided to take off on a whim for a visit to another state.
But, as the summer passed with no word from her at all, that seemed
unlikely.
On August 21, Shelley's nude body was discovered 500 feet inside a mine
at the foot of Berthoud Pass by two mining students. Decomposition was
far advanced, making cause of death impossible to determine. Almost
100 miles from Denver, the mine is quite close to Vail. The mine was
searched on the possibility that Julie Cunningham's body might be hidden
inside, but she was not found.
And then it was over. There were no more victims, or, if
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
135
there were, they were young women whose vanishing was not reported to
police. In each jurisdiction, the detectives had checked out relatives,
friends, known sex criminals, and eliminated them all, through
polygraph examinations or alibis.
Of all the Western victims, there was not one who had short hair, not
one who could be described as anything but beautiful. And not one who
would have gone away willingly with a complete stranger; even the girls
who had been known to hitchhike had been cautious. Yet there is a common
denominator in almost every instance. Something in the victims' lives
had gone awry on the days they vanished, something that would tend to
Page 151
make them distracted, and therefore easy prey for a clever killer.
Brenda Baker and Kathy Devine were both running away from home; Lynda
Ann Healy had been ill; Donna Manson was suffering from depression;
Susan Rancourt was alone on campus at night for the very first time,
ever; Roberta Kathleen Parks was depressed and upset over her father's
illness; Georgeann Hawkins was extremely worried about passing her
Spanish final; Janice Ott was lonely for her husband and depressed on
that Sunday in July; Denise Naslund had had a fight with her boyfriend.
Of the Washington women, only Brenda Ball had been her usual good-natured
self the last time her friends saw her, yet patrons at the Flame Tavern
recall that she was worried because she'd been unable to find a ride
home that night.
In Utah, Carol DaRonch was a naive, too-trusting girl; Laura Aime was
a little drunk, disappointed at the fizzle of her party plans for
Halloween; Debby Kent was worried about her father's recent heart attack
and anxious to protect him from worry; Melissa Smith was concerned about
her friend's "broken heart" and probably was thinking about their
conversation as she left the pizza parlor.
The Colorado victims too had other things on their minds. Caryn
Campbel^had had an argument with her fiancé over their prolonged
engagement, and she was ill. Julie Cunningham was depressed over a failed
romance; Denise Oliverson had had a fight with her husband; and Shelley
K. Robertson had argued with her boyfriend the weekend before she
vanished. The thoughts of Melanie Cooley are not known.
The most basic bit of advice given to women who have to walk alone at
night is, "Look alert. Be aware of your surroundings and walk briskly.
You will be safer if you know
h -I
136
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
where you are going, and if anyone who observes you senses that."
Had the man who approached these young women divined somehow that he
Page 152
had come upon his victims at a time when they were particularly
vulnerable, when they were not thinking as clearly as they usually did?
It would almost seem so. The stalking, predatory animal cuts the weakest
from the pack, and then kills at his leisure.
15
In May of 1975, Ted Bundy had invited some old friends from the Washington
State Department of Emergency Services to visit him at his apartment
on First Avenue in Salt Lake City. Carole Ann Boone Anderson, Alice
Thissen, and Joe McLean spent almost a week with him. Ted seemed to
be in excellent spirits and enjoyed driving his friends around the Salt
Lake City area. He took them swimming and horseback riding. He and Callie
took them one night to a homosexual nightclub. Alice Thissen was somewhat
surprised that, although Ted said he had been there before, he seemed
ill at ease in the gay club.
The trio from Washington found Ted's apartment very pleasant; he'd cut
pictures out of magazines and tried to duplicate the decor he favored.
He still had the bicycle tire, hung from the meat hook in his kitchen,
and he used that to store knives and other kitchen utensils in a mobile
effect. He had a color television set, a good stereo, and he played
Mozart for them to accompany the gourmet meals he prepared.
During the first week in June, 1975, Ted came back to Seattle to put
a garden in for the Rogers at his old rooming house, and he spent most
of his time with Meg. She still made no mention of the fact that she'd
talked with both the King County Police and the Salt Lake County
Sheriff's Office about him. The cases of the missing women in Washington
were no longer being played up in local papers.
Because neither King County nor the Seattle Police Department could
|spare the detectives detailed to the Task Force during the^summer when
so many of their investigators were on vacatiof, the Task Force was
to be disbanded until September.
Meg and Ted decided to marry the following Christmas and, although they
had only five days together in June, they made plans for her to visit
Page 153
him in Utah in August. Meg was
137
138
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
almost convinced that she had been wrong, that she had allowed Lynn
Banks to cloud her mind with suspicions that couldn't have any basis
in fact.
But time was growing short, far shorter than either Meg or Ted realized.
If anything was bothering Ted Bundy's conscience during that summer
of 1975, he didn't show it. He was working as a security guard, still
managing the building he lived in, and, if he drank more and more,
drinking was a part of college life. But his grades in law school had
continued to drop; he wasn't beginning to live up to the potential of
a man with his I.Q., his boundless ambition.
It was close to 2:30 A.M. on August 16th, when Sergeant Bob Hayward,
a stocky, balding twenty-two-year veteran of the Utah Highway Patrol
pulled up in front of his home in suburban Granger, Utah. Bob Hayward
is the brother of Captain "Pete" Hayward, the homicide detective Chief
in the Salt Lake County Sheriff's Office, but his duties are quite
different. Like Washington state, Utah's Highway Patrol deals only with
traffic control, but Hayward has the kind of sixth sense that most
long-time cops have, the ability to note something that seems just a
hair off center.
In the balmy August predawn, Hayward noticed a lightcolored Volkswagen
bug driving by his home. The neighborhood was strictly residential,
and he knew almost everyone who lived along his street, knew the cars
that usually visited them. There was rarely any traffic at this time,
and he wondered what the Volkswagen was doing there.
Hayward threw on his brights so that he could catch the license plate
on the bug. Suddenly the Volkswagen's lights went out, and it took off
at high speed. Hayward pulled out, giving chase. The pursuit continued
through two stop signs and out onto the main thoroughfare, 3500 South.
Page 154
Hayward soon was just behind the slower car, and the Volkswagen pulled
into an abandoned gas station parking lot and stopped. The driver got
out, and walked to the rear of his car, smiling. "I guess I'm lost,"
he said ruefully.
Bob Hayward is a gruff man, not the sort of highway patrolman that a
speeder or reckless driver would choose to meet. He looked closely at
the man before him, a man who appeared to be about twenty-five, who
wore blue jeans, a black turtleneck pullover, tennis shoes, and longish,
wild hair.
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
139
"You ran two stop signs. Can I see your license and registration?"
"Sure." The man produced his I.D.
Hayward looked at the license. It had been issued to Theodore Robert
Bundy, at an address on First Avenue in Salt Lake City.
"What are you doing out here at this time of the morning?"
Bundy answered that he had been to see The Towering Inferno at the Redwood
drive-in and was on his way home when he'd become lost in the subdivision.
It was the wrong answer; the drive-in Bundy mentioned was in Hayward's
patrol area, and he'd driven by earlier that night. The Towering Inferno
was not the picture playing there.
As the burly sergeant and Bundy talked, two troopers from the Highway
Patrol puffed up m back or" FTaywarcTs car, 6ut remained inside, watching.
Hayward seemed to be in no danger.
Hayward glanced at the Volkswagen, and noticed that, for some reason,
the passenger seat had been removed and placed on its side in the back
seat.
He turned back to Bundy. "Mind if I look in your car?"
"Go ahead."
The highway patrol sergeant saw a small crowbar resting on the floor
in back of the driver's seat, and an open satchel sitting on the floor
in front. He played his flashlight over the open satchel, and saw some
Page 155
of the items inside: a ski mask, a crowbar, an ice pick, some rope,
wire.
They looked to Hayward like the tools of a burglar.
Hayward placed Ted Bundy under arrest for evading an officer, frisked
him, and handcuffed him. Then he called Salt Lake County for back-up
from a detective on duty.
Deputy Darrell Ondrak had the third watch that night, and responded
to 2725 W. 3500 South. He found troopers Hayward, Fife, and Twitchell
waiting with Ted Bundy.
Bundy maintains today that he gave no permission to search his car;
Ondrak and Hayward say that he did.
"I never said, 'Yes, you have my permission to search,' " Ted says,
"but I was surrounded by a number of uniformed men: Sergeant Hayward,
two highway patrolmen, two uniformed deputies. I wasn't exactly quaking
in my boots, but
140
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
. . . but I felt I couldn't stop them. They were intent and hostile
and they'd do what they damn well pleased."
Ondrak looked in the canvas satchel. He saw the ice pick, a flashlight,
gloves, Tom strips of sheeting, the knit ski mask, and another mask-a
grotesque object made from a pair of pantyhose. Eye holes had been cut
in the panty portion and the legs were tied together on top. There was
a pair of handcuffs, too.
Ondrak checked the trunk and found some large green plastic garbage
bags.
"Where'd you get all this stuff?" he asked Ted.
"It's just junk I picked up around my house."
"They look like burglar tools to me," Ondrak said flatly. "I'm going
to take these items, and I suspect the D.A. will be issuing a charge
of possession of burglary tools."
According to Ondrak, Ted simply replied "Fine."
Page 156
Detective Jerry Thompson met Ted Bundy face to face on that early morning
of August 16, 1975. Thompson, tall, good-looking, perhaps five years
older than Bundy, was later to become an important adversary, but now
they barely glanced at each other. Thompson had other things to do,
and Bundy was intent on bailing out and going home. He was released
on P.R. (personal recognizance).
It was the first time in his adult life that Ted Bundy had ever been
arrested, and it had been such a chance thing. Had he not driven by
the home of Sergeant Bob Hayward, had he not tried to run from the
pursuing policeman, he would have been home safe.
Why had he run?
On August 18th, Thompson glanced over the arrest reports for the weekend.
The name "Bundy" caught his eye. He'd heard it someplace before, but
he couldn't quite place it. He hadn't even known the name of the man
brought in early Saturday morning. And then he remembered. Ted Bundy
was the man that the girl from Seattle had reported in December of 1974.
Thompson read over the arrest report carefully. Bundy's car was a
light-colored Volkswagen bug. The list of items found in the car now
struck him as much more unusual. He pulled out the DaRonch report, and
the Debby Kent file.
The handcuffs found in Bundy's car were Jana brand; the handcuffs on
Carol DaRonch's wrist were Gerocal, but he wondered just how many men
routinely carried handcuffs
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
141
with them. There was the crowbar, similar to the iron bar that DaRonch
had been threatened with.
Ted Bundy was listed as being five feet, 11 inches tall, weighing 170
pounds. He was a law student at the University of Utah . . . yes, that's
what his girlfriend from Seattle had said too. He'd been arrested in
Granger, which was only a few miles from Midvale where Melissa Smith
had last been seen alive.
Page 157
There were more similarities, more common threads in front of Thompson
than he'd yet had in his ten months of trying to find the man with the
Volkswagen-"Officer Roseland."
On August 21, Ted was arrested on the added charges: possession of
burglary tools. He did not appear to be visibly upset by the arrest
and had deft explanations for the items found in his car. The handcuffs?
He'd found them in a garbage dumpster. He'd used the pantyhose mask
as protection under his ski mask against the icy winds of ski slopes.
And didn't everyone own crowbars, ice picks, garbage bags? He seemed
amused that the detectives would consider any of these things burglary
tools.
It was a posture that Ted Bundy would assume over and over again as
the years passed. He was an innocent man, accused of things that were
unthinkable for him.
The arrest by Sergeant Hayward on August 16th was the catalyst to a
flurry of intense activity in the Salt Lake County Sheriff's Office
during late August and September of 1975. Captain Pete Hayward and
Detective Jerry Thompson felt they had their man in the DaRonch
kidnapping, and suspected that Ted Bundy might well be the man who had
taken Melissa, Laura, and Debby away.
Ted readily signed a permission-to-search form on his First Avenue
apartment, and accompanied Thompson and Sergeant John Bernardo as they
scrutinized the neat rooms. It was not a forced search; there was no
search warrant listing specific items. la essence, this meant that the
detectives had no authority to remove anything from Ted's
apartment-even if they should c$me across something they felt might
be evidence. If they did, they would have to go to a judge and obtain
a search warrant listing those items.
Thompson glanced up at the bicycle wheel suspended from the meat hook,
at the assortment of knives hanging from it. Then he glanced at a chopping
block.
142
Page 158
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
Following Thompson's glance, Ted said mildly, "I like to cook."
The detectives saw the rows of law text books. A few months later, a
Washington detective would comment to me that the Utah investigators
had found a "weird sex book" in Ted's library. When I asked Ted about
it later, he told me that he had Alex Comfort's Joy of Sex, and I laughed.
I had a copy too, as did thousands of other people. It was hardly
Krafft-Ebing.
There were other items in the apartment, seemingly innocuous, but
meaningful in the probe going on. There was a map of ski regions in
Colorado, with the Wildwood Inn in Aspen marked, a brochure from the
Bountiful Recreation Center.
Oviertioned, Ted said Vve'd never been to Colorado, that a friend must
have left the map. He thought he must have driven through Bountiful,
Utah, but felt someone else had
HronnpfT flip- Ktv»^Tiin*a î« l%ïo nnn_+-« - *
dropped me brochure in his apartment.
Thompson insists today that he found patent leather shoes in Bundy's
closet on that first visit, but, when he returned later with a search
warrant, they were gone. A television set and a stereo he had seen were
also absent.
If the two detectives had expected to find something solid to tie Ted
with the murdered Utah victims, they were to be disappointed. There
were no women's clothes, jewelry, or purses.
When they had searched the whole place. Ted agreed to allow them to
photograph his Volkswagen bug, parked in the rear of the building. It
had dents and rust spots, a tear at the top of the rear seat.
Bernardo and Thompson left; they felt they were closer to unraveling
the truth, but were somewhat disconcerted by Ted Bundy's casual attitude.
He certainly didn't appear concerned.
One of Ted's women friends in Salt Lake City was Sharon Auer. She put
him in touch with attorney John O'Connell, a tall, bearded man who
affected a cowboy hat and boots. A respected criminal defense attorney
in the Mormon city, O'Connell immediately put a lid on Ted's
conversations with detectives. The lawyer called Thompson and said that
Bundy would not come to their offices as scheduled, off-August
Page 159
22nd.
Although Ted would not talk to detectives any longer, his mug shot,
along with several others, was shown to Carol
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
143
DaRonch and the drama teacher, Jean Graham, who had seen the stranger
just before Debby Kent vanished forever.
It had been ten months, but Mrs. Graham chose Bundy from the stack of
photos almost immediately. His mug shot bhowed him clean shaven; she
said that Ted Bundy was a linger for the man she'd seen, and all that
was missing was a moustache.
Carol DaRonch was not as definite. The first time she thumbed through
the packet of photos, she set Ted's picture aside, but did not comment
on it. When Thompson asked her why she had separated that photo from
the others, she seemed reticent.
"Why did you pull that one out?" Thompson asked.
"I'm not sure. It looks something like Mm ... but I really couldn't
say for sure."
The next day, Bountiful detective Ira Beal showed her a
iky-itbwir Ol^ ufavexs ' license piluuUs. ill ulis giuujj, rcu" was
depicted as he had looked in December, 1974, and appeared quite different
than the man in the mug shot taken in August of 1975. Ted was-and is-a
man with a chameleonlike quality, his appearance changing dramatically
in almost every picture taken of him, apparently through no conscious
effort on his part.
Carol looked at the second set of pictures. This time, she chose Ted
Bundy's picture almost at once. Like the teacher, she remarked that
he had had a moustache when she encountered him on November 8th, 1974.
The kidnap victim's identification of Bundy's Volkswagen was less clear.
She had seen the pictures taken of it several times, and, by the time
she was taken to view it, it had been sanded, the rust spots painted
over, and the tear in the back of the seat mended. It had also been
Page 160
scrubbed and hosed down inside and out.
Ted Bundy would never again be out of the constant attention of law
enforcement agencies. He was not in jail, but he might as well hib/e
been. Surveillance units watched him continually during September of
1975, and wheels were turning behind the scenls. His gasoline credit
card records had been requested, his school records were subpoenaed,
and, probably the most disastrous move as far as his future freedom
was concerned, Utah detectives had contacted his fiancée, Meg Anders.
16
I had neither seen nor heard from Ted Bundy since the Crisis Clinic
Christmas party in December, 1973. And then, my phone rang on an
afternoon in late September, 1975.
It was Ted, calling from Salt Lake City. I was surprised, but glad to
hear his voice. I felt a sharp twinge of guilt when he began, "Ann,
you're one of the few people I can really trust in Seattle."
Great. I remembered turning his name in to Dick Reed in August of 1974,
and wondered just how trustworthy he would -find me if he knew that.
But that had been a long time ago, and I hadn't heard a word about him
since. I wanted to ask him what he was doing in Salt Lake City, but
he had something on his mind.
"Listen, you have contacts with the police. Could you find out why
they're subpoenaing my law school records down here?"
A dozen thoughts raced through my mind. Why now? Why after thirteen
months? Was Ted being investigated because of what I had done so long
before? Had I implicated him in something that apparently had him very
concerned? I had never heard of Carol DaRonch, Melissa Smith, Laura
Aime, °r Debby Kent. I was completely unaware of the Utah investigation,
and it didn't seem possible that the Task Force would wait more than
a year to follow up on a lead I had given.
I answered slowly. "Ted, I probably could find out, but I wouldn't do
anything underhanded. I'd have to tell them who wanted to know."
"No problem. I'm just curious. Go ahead and tell them that Ted Bundy
Page 161
wants to know. Call me back, collect, at
801-531-7733 if you find out anything."
I stared at the phone in my hand. I truly couldn't believe the
conversation just finished. Ted had sounded exactly as he always had:
cheerful and confident. I debated calling King
144
h
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
145
County Police. I'd never interfered in their investigations, and I
hesitated now. It was almost four o'clock, and the detectives would
be going off shift within a few minutes.
I called the county's Major Crimes Unit, and Kathy McChesney answered.
I explained that Ted Bundy was an old friend of mine, and that he had
just called me requesting information about the subpoena. There was
a long pause, and the receiver was covered while she conferred with
someone in the office. Finally, she was back on the line.
"Tell him . . . tell him, that he's just one of 1,200 people being checked
out, that it's just a routine inquiry."
They were stalling-not me-but Ted. I'd been around police homicide units
long enough to know that they wouldn't be requesting records from that
many suspects, that something was definitely up. I didn't argue; Kathy
was clearly uncomfortable. "O.K. I'll tell him that."
Subpoenas are not 'issued w'rîhôut probable cause"; obviously,
something was happening, something big. I felt a chill. Not even a
television script could make it believable that a crime writer could
sign a contract to write a book about a killer, and then have the suspect
turn out to be her close friend. It wouldn't wash.
I called Ted back that night, waited as the phone rang six, seven, eight
times. Finally, he answered, panting. "I had to run up the stairs. I
was down on the front porch," he told me.
"I called them," I began, "and they said to tell you that you're only
Page 162
one of about 1,200 guys they're checking out." "Oh . . . O.K., great."
He didn't seem worried, but I wondered how somebody as sharp as Ted
was could believe that.
"If you have any more questions, they said you could just call them
direct." "Right."
"Ted .. . what's happening down there?" "Nothing much. Oh, I got picked
up on a Mickey Mouse thing in August by the state patrol. They're claiming
I had burglary tools if my car, but the charge won't stand up." Ted
Bundy with burglary tools? Impossible. But he continued. "I think they
have some kind of a wild idea that I'm connected with some cases up
in Washington. Do you remember something about some missing girls up
there?"
146
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
Of course, I remembered. I'd been living with it since January of 1974.
He claimed to have almost no knowledge of the cases, and he'd almost
thrown away his last statement. It was as if he'd said he was wanted
for a traffic violation in Washington. I didn't know what to say. I
knew that whatever was coming down, it had to be based on more than
my suggesting his name.
"I'm going to be in a line-up tomorrow," he said. "Everything's going
to turn out all right. But if it doesn't, you'll be reading about me
in the papers."
I couldn't understand how a line-up in Utah could have anything to do
with the cases in Washington. He hadn't mentioned Carol DaRonch or the
kidnapping case at all. If he was a suspect in Washington, he would
be in a line-up in Seattle; the only people who could conceivably
identify the "Ted" from Washington were the witnesses from Lake
Sammamish. But something kept me from asking him more.
"Hey, thanks. I'll keep in touch," he said, and we said goodbye.
On October 2nd, a brilliant gold and blue autumn day, I attended a junior
high school football game. My son, Andy, was starting at right end.
Page 163
He broke his thumb on the first play, but his team won, and we were
in a good mood as we stopped at McDonald's for hamburgers on the way
home.
Back in the car, I switched on the radio. A bulletin interrupted the
record playing, "Theodore Robert Bundy, a former Tacoma resident, was
arrested today in Salt Lake City and charged with aggravated kidnapping
and attempted criminal assault."
I must have gasped. My son looked at me, "Mom, what's wrong?"
"It's Ted," I managed to stammer.
"Isn't that your friend from the Crisis Clinic?"
"Yes. He told me I might be reading about him in the papers."
This time, there was to be no quick release on P.R. Ted's bail was set
at $100,000 and he was locked in the county jail.
Detective Dick Reed called me that night. "You were right!" he said.
I didn't want to be right. I didn't want to be right at all.
I slept little that night. Even when I'd suggested Ted's name to Reed,
I hadn't really visualized him as a man capable of violence; I hadn't
allowed my thinking to go that far. I
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
147
kept seeing Ted as I remembered him, picturing him hunched over the
Crisis Clinic phones, hearing his warm, sympathetic voice. I tried to
picture him now behind bars, and I couldn't.
Early the next morning, I received a phone call from the Associated
Press. "We have a message for Ann Rule, transmitted over our wires from
Salt Lake City."
"This is Ann."
"Ted Bundy wants you to know that he is all right, that things will
work out."
I thanked them, hung up the phone and it rang almost at once. First,
a reporter from the Seattle Times wondering what my connection was with
Ted Bundy. Was I a secret girlfriend? What could I say about Ted? I
Page 164
explained who I was-a writer like the reporter calling. "I've done
several pieces for the Sunday Times Magazine. Don't you know the name?"
"Oh, yeah-Rule. So why did he send you that message over A.P.?"
"He's a friend. He wanted me to know he was all right."
I didn't want to be quoted by name. I was still too confused by what
had happened. "Just say that the man I know couldn't be responsible
for any of the things he's accused of."
The next call followed immediately. It was the Seattle
Post-Intelligencer who had also picked up the A.P. message. I repeated
what I'd told the Times reporter.
It was as if someone had died suddenly. People who had known Ted from
the Crisis Clinic-Bob Vaughn, Bruce Cummins, John Eshelman-all calling
to talk about it. And none of us believed Ted capable of what he'd been
charged with. It was unthinkable. We kept recalling anecdotes about
Ted, trying to convince each other that what we were reading in blaring
headlines could not be happening.
I didn't know then that Carol DaRonch, Jean Graham, and Debby Kent's
girlfriend, Jolynne Beck, who had seen the man in the auditorium on
November 8th, had all picked Ted out of the Utah lin^-up on October
2nd. Ted had been one suspect, standing ia a seven man line-up,
surrounded by detectives, all of'than a little older, a little heavier
than he was. The question would arise: was this a fair line-up?
I wrote to Ted on October 4th, telling him of support from Seattle,
of the calls from his friends, of the favorable statements being
published in the Seattle papers, promising him that I would continue
to write. I ended that letter, "There is
148
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
nothing in this life that is a complete tragedy-nothing-try to remember
that."
Looking back, I wonder at my naivete. Some things in this life are
complete tragedies. Ted Bundy's story may well be one of them.
Page 165
I was about to become a part of Ted's life again. To this day, I do
not know what tied us together. It was more than my zeal as a writer;
it was more than his tendency to manipulate women who might be able
to help him. There is a vast, gray area somewhere in between that I
have never been able to clearly define.
His attorney, John O'Connell, called me during Ted's first week in jail,
seeking information on the investigation in Washington. I could tell
him nothing; that would have meant a betrayal of my responsibility to
detectives in Seattle. All I could do was keep writing to Ted. Whatever
his crimes might have been, whatever hidden things might someday be
revealed, he seemed to need someone.
I was beginning to be Tom apart.
And Ted began to write to me, long scrawled letters on yellow legal
pad sheets. His first correspondence was full of his sense of
displacement-letters from a young man who had never been in jail. He
could not quite believe it; he was both astonished by his plight and
outraged, but he was quickly learning the ropes of survival inside.
Much of his prose was turgid and overly dramatic, but he was caught
in a situation that seemed impossible for Ted Bundy, and he could
certainly be forgiven his tendency toward pathos.
"My world is a cage," he wrote on October 8, 1975. "How many men before
me have written these same words? How many have struggled vainly to
describe the cruel metamorphosis that occurs in captivity? And how many
have concluded that there are no satisfactory words to communicate their
feelings except to cry, 'My God!' I want my freedom!"
His cellmate was a fiftyish old-timer whom Ted saw as a "star-crossed
alcoholic;" the man quickly set about teaching the "kid" the ropes.
Ted had learned to hide his cigarettes and, when they were gone, to
roll his own. He learned to tear matches in half-because matches didn't
last long. He saved oranges, styrofoam cups, toilet paper, realizing
he was dependent on the whim of the trustees for all the small things
that made jail life a little more bearable. He learned to say
Page 166
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
149
"please" and "sir" when he wanted to make a phone call or needed an
extra blanket or soap.
He wrote that he was growing personally, however, that he was discovering
new things about himself and through his quiet observation of his fellow
prisoners. He praised his friends' loyalty and agonized over what the
publicity surrounding him might be doing to those close to him. Still,
he never lost sight of a happy ending. "The nighttime hours are the
hard hours. I make them easier by dwelling on the building which must
be done when the storm is past. I will be free. And, someday, Ann, you
and I will look upon this letter as a note from a nightmare."
It was a note from a nightmare. The flowery, often trite, phrases could
not take away from the fact that being locked up was a kind of hell
for Ted.
I continued to write to him, and to send whatever small checks I could
manage for cigarette and canteen money. I didn't know what I believed,
and all my letters were couched in terms that were deliberately ambiguous.
They contained information on what was appearing in the local press,
details about what I was writing, and on calls from mutual friends.
I tried to block the pictures that occasionally seized my mind and shook
it. I tried to think back to the old days; it was the only way I could
respond to Ted as I always had.
The second letter from the Salt Lake County Jail came on October 23rd,
and much of it was a poem, countless stanzas on life in jail. He was
still only an observer-not a participant. The poem rambled over both
sides of sixteen pages of the yellow legal paper.
He called it "Nights of Days," and it began:
This is no way to be Man ought to be free That man should be me.
The meter «ten faltered, but the words all rhymed as he again bemoaned
his lack of privacy and the cuisine in the jail, the omnipresent game
shows and soap operas on the television set in the day room, programs
which he termed "visual brain cancer."
He wrote-as he often would-of his belief in God. We had never talked
about religion, but now Ted was apparently spending a lot of his time
reading the Bible.
Page 167
150 THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
Sleep comes on slowly
Read the words of the wholly (sic)
The scriptures bring peace
They talk of release
They bring us to God
In here that seems odd
But His gift is so clear
I find that He's near
Mercy and redemption
Without an exception
He puts me at ease
Jailer, do what you please
No harm can befall me
When the Savior does call me.
The endless poem talked of another release; sleep. He could forget the
nightmare he was living, the bars, and the screams of other prisoners,
when he slept, so he napped whenever possible. He was trapped in a "caged
human sea."
_ Moving easily from the Bible to the menu in jail, a bit of his old
humor surfaced,
It makes me feel blue
Taking food from the animals in the zoo
Porkchops tonight
Jews are uptight
I gave mine away
It still has a tail
And as for dessert
The cook, that old flirt
Surprised us with mellow
Peach jello.
For all his days in jail to come, he would decry jello.
Page 168
As for the other residents of the jail, Ted found childlike-"Overgrown
kids."
Some really believe They were born to deceive To make a bank roll From
money they stole They do not relate To going it straight
them
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
151
Except when in court
They sometimes resort
To making a plea
For a new life and leniency.
His own inner ordeal emerged at the end of the poem; the fear of the
"cage" was there.
Days of days Self-control pays Don't lose your mind Panic's not kind ...
Days of days My integrity stays.
Was this poem contrived? Something to play on my sympathies which really
needed no stimulus at all? Or was it the true outpouring of Ted's anguish?
In the fall of 1975, I was terribly confused, besieged on one side by
detectives who felt sure that Ted was as guilty as hell, and, on the
other, by the man himself who insisted again and again that he was
innocent and being persecuted. It was a dichotomy of emotions that would
stay with me for a long, long time.
At the time, I still felt that I might have caused Ted's arrest; it
would be years before I learned that my information had been checked
out and cleared early in the game, and then buried in the thousands
of slips of paper with names on them. It had not been my doubts, but
Meg's, which had pinned him to the wall.
My mixed loyalties threatened to cost me a vital portion of my income.
I heard via the grapevine that the King County Police wanted those two
letters Ted was known to have sent me, and that, if I didn't turn them
over, I could forget about getting any more stories from that department.
It would mean that a qualter of my work would be cut off, and I simply
Page 169
couldn't affotiî it.
I went directly to Nick Mackie. "I have heard rumors that if I don't
turn over Ted's letters to the Task Force, your doors will be closed
to me. I think I should tell you frankly how I feel, and what is happening
in my life."
I told Nick that I had learned that my childrens' father was dying,
that it would only be a matter of weeks or a few
152
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
months at most. "I've just had to explain that to my sons, and they
don't want to believe it. They hate me because I had to put it into
words to prepare them. He is so ill that I no longer have any financial
support from him, and I'm trying to make it alone. If I can't write
up county cases, I don't think I can hack it."
Mackie is an infinitely fair man. More than that, he could empathize
with me. He was raising two sons alone; he had lost his wife a few years
earlier. What I was telling him struck a nerve. And we had been friends
for years.
"No one has ever said you would be barred from this department. I wouldn't
allow it. You know you can believe me; you've always been fair to us
and we respect you for it. Of course, we'd like to see those letters,
but whether you turn them over or not, things will be like they always
were here."
"Nick," I said honestly. "I have read those letters over and over, and
I can't find anything in them that makes Ted sound guilty, even
unconscious slips. If you'll let me ask him if you can see them, and
if he agrees, I'll bring them to you immediately. That's the only fair
way I can do it."
Nick Mackie agreed. I called Ted, and explained my problem, and he
responded that, of course, I must let the county detectives see his
letters. He had nothing to fear from them, nothing to hide.
I met with Mackie and with Dr. John Berberich, the psychologist for
Page 170
the Seattle Police Department, and they studied the first letter and
the second long poem. There seemed to be nothing inherent there that
would be a subconscious or overt admission of guilt.
Berberich, who is built like a basketball player, talked with me and
Mackie over lunch. Was there anything I could remember about Ted's
personality that made me suspicious? Anything at all? I searched back
through the years and could find nothing. There was not the slightest
incident that I could enlarge upon. "He seemed to me to be a particularly
fine young man," I responded. "I want to help. I want to help the
investigation, and I want to help Ted, but there just isn't anything
weird about him-nothing that I ever saw. Ted is illegitimate, but he
seems to have come to terms with tha'."
I had thought that Ted might stop contacting me after I'd shown his
letters to the detectives. He knew that I moved constantly in the circle
of the very investigators who were trying to catch him in a slip. But
his correspondence continTHE STRANGER BESIDE ME
153
ued, and my ambivalence rose to a level where I was laboring under more
stress than I could stand.
In an attempt to sort out my feelings, to deal with that stress, I
consulted a psychiatrist. I handed him the letters.
"I don't know what to do. I don't even know what my motivations really
are. Part of me wonders if Ted Bundy is guilty, not only of the cases
in Utah, but of the cases here in Washington. If that is true, then
I can write the book I've contracted for and write it from a position
that any author would envy. I want that, selfishly for my own career,
and because it would mean financial independence. I could send my
children to college, and we could move to a house that isn't falling
down around our ears." He looked at me. "And?"
"And, on the other side of it, the man is my friend. But am I supporting
him emotionally, writing to him, because I just want to solve all those
Page 171
murders, because I owe something to my detective friends too? Am I,
in essence, trying to trap him? Am I being unfair? Do I have the right
to correspond with Ted when I have a niggling feeling that he might
be guilty? Am I playing straight with him?"
"Let me ask you a question," he countered. "If Ted Bundy proves to be
a murderer, if he is sent to prison for the rest of his life, what would
you do? Would you stop writing to him? Would you drop him?"
That answer was easy. "No! No, I would always write to him. If what
the detectives believe is true, if he is guilty, then he needs someone.
If he had that on his conscience. No, I would keep writing, keep in
touch."
"Then that's your answer. You're not being unfair." "There's another
thing. I can't understand why Ted is reaching out to me now. I haven't
seen or heard from him in almost two years. I didn't even know he'd
moved away from Seattle until he called me just before his arrest. Why
me?"
The psychiatrist tapped the letters. "From these, I get that he
apparently locks upon you as a friend, perhaps as a kind of mother
figure-He needs to communicate with someone he feels is on his
fitellectual level, and he admires you as a writer. There is the
possibility of a more manipulative side. He knows you are close to the
police and he may want to use you as a conduit to them, without his
actually having to talk to them himself. If he has committed these crimes,
he is probably an exhibitionist, and one day he'll want his story told.
He
154
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
senses that you would do that in a manner that would portray the whole
man."
I felt somewhat better after that visit. I would try not to look ahead,
but I would keep up my contacts with Ted. He knew about my book contract;
I hadn't lied. If he chose to stay close to me, then I would let him
Page 172
call the shots.
17
If I was feeling guilty and somewhat disloyal to Ted during fall, 1975,
Meg Anders was going through sheer hell. The information she had given
to the Salt Lake County Sheriff's office had been discounted until Ted's
first arrest on August
16th. Now, detectives in Utah, Colorado, and Washington were anxious
to know everything Meg remembered about Ted, all the bits and pieces
of information that had made her suspect her lover. They were trying
to find the man responsible for the most brutal series of killings in
their memories, and it looked very much indeed as if Ted Bundy was that
man. Ted's privacy, Meg's privacy, did not matter any longer.
Meg had adored Ted from the moment she met him in .the Sandpiper Tavern.
She never had been able to understand what it was that made him stay
with her; she'd had an overwhelming sense of failure for most of her
life. She'd always felt she was the one member of her immediate family
who hadn't lived up to their expectations. Everyone but Meg worked in
a prestigious profession, and she considered herself "only a
secretary." The love of a brilliant man like Ted had helped to assuage
her feelings of inferiority, and she was about to see that relationship
exposed to merciless probing.
Neither the Salt Lake County investigators nor the Seattle Task Force
detectives liked what they had to subject Meg Anders to, the questioning
that would delve into the most intimate details of her life, the slow
tearing down of all that she had built up in the six years before. But
one thing was apparent; Meg Anders knew more about the hidden Ted Bundy
than anyone alive} with the possible exception of Ted himself.
On September! 16th, Jerry Thompson and Dennis Couch from the Salt Lake
County Sheriff's Office and Ira Beal from the Bountiful, Utr,h Police
Department had flown to Seattle to talk with Meg. They had first spoken
with her father in
155
Page 173
156
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
Utah who suggested that it might be of inestimable value to the
investigation if they would speak directly with Meg.
Thompson was aware that Meg's doubts about Ted had predated the murders
in Utah, had gone all the way back to the disappearance of Janice Ott
and Denise Naslund in July of 1974.
The three Utah detectives met Meg in an interview room in the King County
Police Major Crime Unit's offices. They noted her nervousness, the
terrible emotional strain she was under. But they also saw that she
was determined to lay out all the information that had led her, finally,
to the police.
Meg lit the first of a whole pack of cigarettes that she would smoke
during the long interview. She stated firmly that she did not want the
proceedings recorded on tape.
"Ted went out a lot in the middle of the night," she began. "And I didn't
know where he went. Then he napped during the day. And I found things,
things that I couldn't understand."
"What sort of things?"
"A lug wrench, taped halfway up, under the seat of my car. He said it
was for my protection. Plaster of paris in his room. Crutches. He had
an oriental knife in a kind of. wooden case that he kept in the glove
compartment of my car. Sometimes, it was there; sometimes it was gone.
He had a meat cleaver. I saw him pack it when he moved to Utah."
Meg related that Ted had never been with her on the nights the girls
in Washington had vanished. "After I saw the cornposite pictures of
'Ted' in the paper in July of 1974, I checked back through the papers
in the library to get the dates the girls disappeared, and I checked
my calendar and my cancelled checks, and he just. . . well, he just
was never around then."
Meg said she had been more afraid after her friend, Lynn Banks, returned
from Utah in November of 1974. "She pointed out that the cases down
Page 174
there were just like the ones up here, and she said, 'Ted's in Utah
now.' That's when I called my father and asked him to get in touch with
you down there.
"Will you tell Ted that I've told you all this?" Meg asked Thompson,
as she lit another cigarette.
"No, we won't," the detective promised. "What about you? Will you tell
him?"
"I really don't think I will. I keep praying about it, and I
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
157
keep praying you'll find out. And I guess I keep hoping that you'll
find out it's not Ted, that it's someone else . . . but deep down, I'm
just not sure."
Asked to explain her doubts in detail, Meg talked about the plaster
of paris she'd seen in Ted's room at the Rogers's. "I confronted him
about it, and he told me he'd stolen it from that medical supply place
where he was working. He said he didn't know why. 'Just for the hell
of it,' he said. He said the crutches were for his landlord."
Meg said that she'd once found a paper sack full of women's clothing
in Ted's room. "The top item was a bra, a large size bra. The rest was
just clothing, girls' clothes. I never asked him about it. I was afraid,
and kind of embarrassed."
The detectives asked Meg if Ted had changed in any way in the last year
or so, and she told them that his sexual drive had diminished to almost
nothing during the summer of 1974, of his explanations about work
pressures. "He said there was no other woman."
The questions were excruciatingly embarrassing for Meg.
"Had he changed in any other way, in his sexual interests?"
She looked down. "He got this book, this Joy of Sex book, sometime in
December, 1973. He read about anal intercourse, and he insisted on trying
it. I didn't like it, but I went along with him. Then there was something
in that book about bondage. He went right to the drawer where I kept
Page 175
my nylons. He seemed to know which drawer they were in."
Meg said she had allowed herself to be tied to the four bedposts with
the nylon stockings before having sex. The whole thing had been
distasteful to her. She had acquiesced three times, but, during the
third occasion, Ted had started to choke her, and she'd panicked. "I
wouldn't do that anymore. He didn't say much, but he was unhappy with
me when I said, 'No more.' "
"Anything eJse?"|
Meg was mortified, but she continued. "Sometimes, after I was as\eep
at mghj| Vd wake up and find him under the covers. He was looking at ...
at my body . . . with a flashlight."
"Does Ted like your hair the way it is now?" Ira Beal asked. Meg's hair
was long and straight, parted in the center.
"Yes. Whenever I talk about cutting it, he gets very upset.
158
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
He reallv 1Uce^ lorsçc h^Vr TV.». osrvVv a\r\ \'->ie. ss^act-J^sst
^WK?- -
tuai ne oated besides me has hair just like mine." The three detectives
exchanged glances. "Does Ted always tell you the truth?" Thompson asked.
Mâg tfiûGk kéf Aèâ(f. 'Tve caught him in several lies. He told me that
he was arrested down there for a traffic violation, and I told him I
knew that wasn't the truth, that there'd been items in the car that
looked like burglary tools. He just said they didn't mean too much,
that it was an illegal search."
Meg told them that she knew Ted had stolen in the past. "I know he stole
a television in Seattle and some other things. One time, just one time,
he told me if I ever told anyone about it, that he'd . . . break my
fucking neck."
Meg said that she was in constant touch with Ted, that she had spoken
to him only the night before, and that he'd been his old, tender self
again, telling her how much he loved her, planning their marriage. "He
Page 176
needs money: $700 for his attorney, $500 for tuition. He still owes
Freda Rogers $500."
Meg knew too that Ted's cousin had told him that he was illegitimate
when Ted was eighteen or nineteen. "It really upset him. Nobody had
ever told him before."
"Does Ted ever wear a moustache?" Beal asked her suddenly.
"No, sometimes a full beard. Oh, he had a fake moustache. He used to
keep it in his drawer. Sometimes he stuck it on and asked me how he
looked in it."
The interview ended. Meg had smoked an entire pack of cigarettes. She
had pleaded with the Utah investigators to tell her that Ted could not
be involved, but they couldn't.
The picture of Ted Bundy that was emerging was far different than that
of the perfect son, the modern day prototype of an Horatio Alger hero.
Meg Anders was living a dual existence, something that was intolerable
for her, something that was standard for her lover. She talked often
to Ted on the phone, and he played down the police interest in him,
even though, as he talked, he was under constant surveillance by the
Utah lawmen. And she continued to answer questions put to her by the
detectives who were trying to place him during all those essential time
periods, some of them now a year and a half before.
July 14, 1974 was an infamous day in Washington-the
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
159
da^ tkal Ta.tii.ce Oil •a.M. Qe.tûsft Ng&\\isçl ^aâ. "^si^.ÇSl ^ISSk
Lake Sammamish State Park.
Meg remembered that Sunday. "We'd had an argument the night before.
I was surprised to see him that morning. He came over, and L told him
I was going to church and then planned to lie out in the sun. We quarreled
again that morning. We just weren't getting along. I was really surprised
to see him later."
Ted had called Meg sometime after six that evening and asked her to
Page 177
go out to eat.
"Was there anything unusual about him that night?" "He looked exhausted,
really wiped out. He was getting a bad cold. I asked him what he'd done
that day because he was so tired out, and he said he'd just lain around
all day."
Ted had removed a ski rack from his car-a rack that belonged to Meg-and
placed it back on her car that night. After they'd gone out to eat,
he'd fallen asleep on her floor, and gone home at 9:15.
Beal and Thompson wondered if it was possible. Could a man leave his
girlfriend on a Sunday morning, abduct, rape, and kill two women, and
then return casually to his friend's home and take her out to dinner?
They questioned Meg again about Bundy's sex drive. Was he-they tried
to phrase it tactfully-was he the kind of man who normally had several
orgasms in a period of lovemaking?
"Oh, a long time ago, when we first started going together. But no,
not lately. He was just normal."
Thompson made a decision. He pulled out a picture of all the items found
in Ted's car when he'd been arrested by Sergeant Bob Hayward on August
16th. Meg studied them. "Have you ever seen any of these things?" "I
haven't seen that crowbar. I've seen the gloves, and the gym bag. Usually,
it's empty. He carries his athletic supplies in it."
"Did you ever confront him about the taped lug wrench that you found
in your car?"
"Yeah, he said%ou never know when you can get caught in the middle of
a jtudent riot."
"Where was it l&pt?" Thompson asked. "Usually in the trunk of my car.
He borrowed my car a lot. It was a Volkswagen bug too, a tan one. Once,
I saw the wrench under the seat in front."
Meg recalled that Ted had often slept in his car in front of
160
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
her house. "I don't know why. He was just there. This was a long time
Page 178
ago, and there was a crowbar or a tire iron or something that he left
in my house one night. I heard him come back in, and I opened the door
to see what he wanted. He looked really sick, like he was hiding something,
and I said, 'What have you got in your pocket?' He wouldn't show me.
I reached in and pulled out a pair of surgical gloves. Weird. He didn't
say anything. It seems incredible now that I didn't just say, 'Go away.'
"
It was weird. But, until the events of 1974 and 1975, Meg had never
connected Ted's nocturnal habits to anything definite. Like so many
other women in love, she had simply put it all out of her mind.
18
Ted wrote me in October, 1975 that he felt as if he were "in the eye
of a hurricane," and, indeed, he had been in the center of some manner
of storm ever since his arrest in August. I hadn't known of this arrest
until he phoned me at the end of September, and he had passed it off
with a shrug to me just as he had with Meg and his other Washington
friends. It would be a long time before I learned of the investigation
that went on throughout the entire autumn. Once in a great while in
the years ahead, a detective would let something slip, and then say
hastily, "Forget I said that." I didn't forget, but I didn't tell anyone
what I'd heard, and I most assuredly didn't write anything about it.
Occasionally, odd bits and pieces would leak to the press, but the
entire story would never be known to me until after the Miami trial,
four years hence. As it was, having only fragments of the story, I tried
to withhold judgment. Had Ted been a complete stranger to me-as all
the other suspects I'd written about had beenresolution of my feelings
might have come sooner. I don't believe it was because I was dense;
better minds than mine continued to support him.
In each case that I researched after the "Ted" murders, each young
woman's murder where a suspect was arrested, I traced back to see where
that man had been on the days of crimes where Ted was a suspect. And,
for the "Ted" crimes, the men had solid alibis.
Page 179
By the fall of 1975, there were more than a dozen detectives in Washington,
Utah, and Colorado working full-time on Ted Bundy: Captain Pete Hayward
and Detective Jerry Thompson fromjthe Salt Lake County Sheriff's Office;
Detective Mike Fisner from the Pitkin County District Attorney's Office
in Aspen, Colorado; Detective Sergeant Bill Baldridge from the Pitkin
County Sheriff's Office; Detective Milo Vig from the Mesa County
Sheriff's Office in Grand
161
162
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
Junction, Colorado; Detective Lieutenant Ron Ballantyne and Detective
Ira Beal from the Bountiful, Utah Police Department; Captain Nick Mackie,
and Detectives Bob Keppel, Roger Dunn, and Kathy McChesney from the
King County, Washington Sheriff's Office; Detective Sergeant Ivan
Beeson, and Detectives Ted Fonis and Wayne Dorman from the Seattle Police
Homicide Unit.
Ted had stated to Jerry Thompson and John Bernardo that he had never
been to Colorado, had explained away the maps and brochures of the ski
areas by saying "Somebody must have left them in my apartment." Mike
Fisher, in checking Bundy's credit card slips, found that that was not
true. Moreover he was able to place Bundy's car-the VW bug, bearing
two separate sets of plates-in Colorado on the very days that the victims
in that state had vanished, and within a few miles of the sites of the
disappearances.
The Chevron Oil Company duplicate records noted that Ted had purchased
gas as follows: on January 12, 1975 (the day Caryn Campbell disappeared
from the Wildwood Inn) in Glenwood Springs, Colorado; on March 15, 1975
(the day Julie Cunningham walked away from her apartment forever) in
Golden, Dillon, and Silverthorne, Colorado; on April 4,
1975 in Golden, Colorado; on April 5, in Silverthorne; and on April
6 (the day Denise Oliverson vanished) in Grand Junction, Colorado.
But only once had "Ted" ever been seen, and that was in Lake Sammamish
Page 180
State Park on July 14, 1974. The King County detectives began to chart
as much of Ted Bundy's life as they could ferret out. That was why his
law school records had been subpoenaed. Because their probe into Ted
had been carried out with a minimum of fanfare, Detective Kathy McChesney
had been very startled when I had called her at Ted's behest. The
investigators had not known that Ted was even aware that he was under
suspicion in Washington.
At the same time that Ted's Utah law school records were subpoenaed,
his telephone records were requested from Mountain Bell in Salt Lake
City, records going back to September, 1974 when he'd first moved to
Utah.
Kathy McChesney asked if I would come in for an interview in early
November, 1975; she had been given the assignment of interviewing the
women Ted had known in Seattle, however peripherally.
Again, I repeated-this time for the record-the circumTHE STRANGER BESIDE ME
163
stances under which I'd met Ted, our work at the Crisis Clinic, our
close, but sporadic, friendship over the intervening years.
"Why do you think he called you just before his arrest in Salt Lake
City?" she asked.
"I think it was because he knew that I worked with you all the time,
and I don't think he wanted to talk to detectives directly."
Kathy thumbed through a stack of papers, pulled one out, and said
suddenly, "What did Ted say to you when he called you on November 20,
1974?"
I looked at her blankly. "When?"
"Last year on November 20th."
"Ted didn't call me," I answered truthfully. "I hadn't talked to Ted
since sometime in 1973."
"Yes, we have his telephone records. There's a call to your number a
little before midnight on Wednesday, November
Page 181
20th. What did he say?"
I had known Kathy McChesney since we had both been in the King County
Police Basic Homicide School in 1971 (she as a deputy sheriff and myself
as an invited "auditor"). She had been promoted to detective, although
she looked more like a high school girl, and she was sharp. I'd
interviewed her countless times when she worked in the sex crimes unit.
I wasn't trying to evade her question, but I was puzzled. It's difficult
to remember what you were doing on a particular date a whole year before.
And then it dawned on me. "Kathy, I wasn't home that night. I was in
the hospital because I'd had an operation the day before. But my mother
told me about a funny call. It was a call from a man who wouldn't leave
his name, and .. . yeah, it was on November 20th."
That mystery was solved, but I have often wondered since if the events
to follow might have somehow been different if I had been home to take
that call. In the years ahead, I would receive dozens o£ phone calls
from Ted-calls from Utah, Colorado, Florida-as well as scores of letters,
and we would have several fac^to-face meetings. I would be caught up
in his life again, Tom between belief in him completely and the doubts
that grew stronger and stronger.
Kathy McChesney believed me; I'd never lied to her and I never would.
If I'd known who the man was who'd called me, I would have told her.
164
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
Ted also made two other calls on the night of Novembd
20th-two calls between eleven and midnight. Although he had broken his
"secret" engagement to Stephanie Brooks in January of that year, sent
her away without any apologies or explanations, he had placed a call
to her parents' home in California at 11:03 P.M. Stephanie hadn't been
there. A woman friend of the family recalls that she talked to a friendly
sounding man who asked for Stephanie. "I told him that Stephanie was
engaged, and living in San Francisco . . . and he hung up."
Ted had next dialed an Oakland residence where none of the occupants
Page 182
had ever heard of Ted Bundy or Stephanie Brooks. The couple who lived
there had no contacts in Seattle or Utah, and the man who answered figured
it had been a wrong number.
By the time Ted reached my number in Seattle, he'd been very upset,
according to my mother. In wondering who that call might have been from,
Ted's name had never entered my mind. Now, as Kathy asked me about it,
I knew that the timing of the midnight call might be imperative; Ted
had called me twelve days after Carol DaRonch had escaped her kidnaper,
and after Debby Kent had vanished, twenty days after Laura Aime
disappeared, a month after someone spirited Melissa Smith away.
"I wish I'd been home that night," I told Kathy.
"So do I." \
Kathy's assignments took her to the elder Bundys' residence in Tacoma.
They believed none of the charges against their son. There would be
no permission to search their home or the area around their cabin on
Crescent Lake. What was unthinkable would not be helped along by the
Bundys. And there was no probable cause to obtain search warrants.
Freda Rogers, Ted Bundy's landlady for five years, was also fiercely
protective of him. From the day he had located his room at 4143 12th
N.B., by knocking on doors, Freda had liked him. He had been a good
tenant, more like a son than a roomer, often putting himself out to
help them. His room in the southwest corner of the old house had rarely
been locked, and it was cleaned every Friday by Freda herself. Surely,
if he had something to hide, she reasoned, she would have sensed it.
"His things are all gone; he moved everything
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
165
out in September of 1974. Look around, if you like, but you won't find
anything."
Detectives Roger Dunn and Bob Keppel checked the Rogers's house from
top to bottom, even climbing up into the attic. If anything had been
hidden up there, the insulation would have been disturbed, and it had
Page 183
not been. They moved over the grounds with metal detectors, looked for
spots where something might have been buried. Clothes? Jewelry? Parts
of a bicycle? There was nothing.
Kathy McChesney talked with Meg Anders. Meg produced checks that Ted
had written in 1974. They were not incriminating in the least; simply
small checks written for groceries. Meg's own checks helped her to
isolate what she had done on particularly important days and to determine
whether she had seen her fiance on those days.
Asked about the plaster of paris she had seen in Ted's room, Meg said
she'd seen it first a long time ago, perhaps in
1970. "But I saw a hatchet under the front seat of his car, a hatchet
with a pinkish leather cover, in the summer of 1974, and the crutches.
I saw them in May or June of 1974. He said they belonged to Ernst Rogers."
"We'd been to Green Lake one day. I asked him about the hatchet, because
it bothered me. I can't remember what his explanation was, but it made
sense at the time. It was in August of 1974; I'd just come back from
a trip to Utah. He was talking about getting a rifle that day. The cleaver,
and the meat tenderizer ... I saw those when he was packing. And the
oriental knife. He said someone gave him the knife as a ' present."
"Can you think of anything else that bothered you?" McChesney asked.
"Well, it didn't then, but he always kept two pair of mechanic's overalls
and a tool box in the trunk of his car."
"Did Ted have any friends at Evergreen College in Olympia?"
"Just Rex St£|rk, the man he worked with on the Crime Commission. Rex
was on the campus in 1973 and 1974, and Ted stayed somf nights with
him when he worked in Olympia. Rex had a place on a lake there."
"Did he have friends in Ellensburg?"
"Jim Paulus; he knew him from high school. And his wife. We visited
them once,"
Meg knew of no one Ted might know at Oregon State
166
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
Page 184
University. No, there had never been any pornography in hisl room. No,
he didn't own a sailboat, but he had rented one! once. Ted often liked
to search out lonely country roads I when they went on drives. M
"Did he ever go to taverns alone?" •
"Only O'Bannion's and Dante's." Ï
Meg consulted her diary. There were so many dates toi remember. I
"Ted called me from Salt Lake City, on October 18th last I year, three
times. He was going hunting with my father the I next morning. He called
me on November 8th after 11:00. I (Salt Lake City time zone would make
it after midnight I there.) There was a lot of noise in the background
when he I called." I
Melissa Smith vanished on October 18th. On November I
8th, Carol DaRonch was abducted at 7:30, and Debby Kent I vanished
forever at 10:3 0. I
Recalling July, 1974, Meg remembered that Ted had gone I to Lake
Sammamish State Park on July 7th-the week before I Denise and Janice
disappeared. "He told me he was invited I \o a viator skïmg party. When
he came over later, he said he | hadn't had a very good time. " j
In fact, there had been no party, although the King County detectives
learned later that two couples who knew Ted from Republican Party
functions had been at Lake Sammamish water-skiing, and they'd seen Ted
walking along the beach alone. "We were surprised to see him there
because he was supposed to be at a political meeting in Tacoma that
weekend." Asked what he was doing, Ted had responded "Just walking
around." They had invited him to join them skiing, but he'd demurred
because he had no shorts with him. Ted had had a windbreaker slung around
his shoulders. They had seen no cast.
On the next Sunday, the 14th, Meg, of course, had seen Ted only early
in the morning and then again sometime after six when he came to her
home to exchange the ski rack and to take her out for hamburgers.
"My mother always keeps a diary," Meg said. "My folks came up to visit
me on May 23, 1974. On Memorial Day, the 27th, Ted went with us for
a picnic on Dungeness Spit."
"What about May 31st?" Kathy McChesney asked. That was the night Brenda
Ball had vanished from the Flame Tavern.
Page 185
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
167
'That was the night before my daughter was to be baptized. My parents
were still in Seattle and Ted took us all out for pizza, and then dropped
us off before nine." (Brenda had disappeared some time after 2 A.M.,
twelve miles south of Meg's apartment five hours later.) Liane had been
baptized at 5 P.M. the next day and Ted had arrived to attend the ceremony.
Afterward, he stayed at Meg's place until 11 P.M. "He was very tired,
and he fell asleep on the rug that night too," she told McChesney.
Meg furnished the name of a woman that Ted had dated during the summer
of 1972, a woman who had caused her to break up with her lover briefly.
This woman, Claire Forest, was slender, brunette, with her long straight
hair parted in the middle. When she was contacted by detectives, Claire
Forest remembered Ted well. Although she had never been seriously
interested in him, she said, they had dated often in
1972.
"He didn't feel that he fit in with my ... my 'class.' I guess that's
the only way to describe it. He wouldn't come to my parents' home because
he said he just didn't fit in."
Claire recalled that she had once taken a drive with Ted, &
drive over country roads in the Lake SnrnmamÎBV> rirr-^. iVV\c
told me that someone, an older woman-I think he said his
grandmother-lived around there, but he couldn't find the house. I
finally got fed up with it and asked him what the address was, but he
didn't know."
Ted, of course, had no grandmother near Lake Sammamish.
Claire Forest said that she had had intercourse with Bundy on only one
occasion, and although he had always been tender and affectionate with
her before, that sex act ifseff h'ad been harsh.
"We went on a picnic in April on the Humptulips River, and I had quite
a lot of wine. I was dizzy, and he kept dunking my head undes. He was
trying to untie the top of my bikini. He couldn't manage it, and he
Page 186
suddenly pulled my bikini bottom off dmd had intercourse with me. He
didn't say anything, and he had his forearm pressed under my chin so
hard that I couldn't breathe. I kept telling him I couldn't breathe
but he didn't let up the pressure until he was finished. There was no
affection at all.
"Afterward, it was like it had never happened. We drove
168
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
home and he talked about his family . . . everyone but his father.
"I broke up with him because of his other girlfriend. She was almost
hysterical when she found me with him once."
Claire Forest was not the only woman who would recall that Ted Bundy's
manner could change suddenly from one of warmth and affection to cold
fury. On June 23, 1974, Ted had shown up at the home of a young woman,
a woman who had known him on a platonic basis since 1973. She introduced
him to a friend of hers, Lisa Temple. Ted didn't seem particularly
interested in Lisa, but, later, he invited the two women and another
male friend to go on a raft trip with him on June 29th. The two couples
had dinner with friends in Bellevue on June 28th, spent the night, and
set out the next morning for Thorpe, Washington. The man who accompanied
them was later to recall that, while searching for matches, he had found
a pair of panty hose in the glove box of Ted's Volkswagen. He had grinned
and thought nothing of it.
The raft trip had started out with great hilarity, but, halfway down
river, Ted's attitude had changed suddenly and he seemed to delight
in tormenting Lisa. He insisted that she ride through the white water
on an innertube tied behind the raft. Lisa had been terrified, but Ted
had only stared at her coldly. The other couple were ill at ease too.
Ted had put the raft into the water at Diversion Dam, a dangerous stretch
where rafts were rarely launched.
They had made it, finally, through the rough water with both girls
thoroughly frightened. Ted had had no money so Lisa bought dinner in
Page 187
North Bend for the quartet.
"He drove me home," she remembers, "and he was nice again. He said he
would be back about midnight. He did come back, and we made love. That's
the last time I ever saw him. I just couldn't understand the way he
kept changing. One minute, he was nice, and the next he acted like he
hated me."
Kathy McChesney located Beatrice Sloane, the elderly woman who'd
befriended Ted when he worked at a Seattle yacht club.
"Oh, he was a schemer," the old woman recalled. "He could talk me out
of anything."
Mrs. Sloane's recollections of Ted and Stephanie corresponded with what
Kathy had already learned about that
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
169
early romance. There was no question that the woman had known Ted, and
known him quite well. Kathy drove her around the University District
and she pointed out addresses where Ted had lived when she knew him.
She recounted the things she'd loaned him: the china, silver, money.
She recalled rides she'd given him when he had no car. He seemed to
have been like a grandson to her, a highly manipulative grandson.
"When was the last time you saw him" McChesney asked.
"Well, I saw him twice, actually, in 1974. I saw him in the Albertson's
store at Green Lake in July, and he had a broken arm then. Then I saw
him on the 'Ave' about a month later and he told me he was leaving soon
to go to law school in Salt Lake City."
The King County detectives contacted Stephanie Brooks, happily married
now, and living in California. She recalled her two romances with Ted
Bundy-their college days, and their "engagement" in 1973. She had never
known about Meg Anders; she had simply come to the conclusion that Ted
had courted her a second time solely to get revenge. She felt lucky
to be free of him.
There seemed to be two Ted Bundys emerging. One, the perfect son, the
Page 188
University of Washington student who had graduated "with distinction,"
the fledgling lawyer and politician, and, the other, a charming schemer,
a man who could manipulate women with ease, whether it be sex or money
he desired, and it made no difference if the women were eighteen or
sixty-five. And there was, perhaps, a third Ted Bundy, a man who turned
cold and hostile toward women with very little provocation.
He had juggled his concurrent engagements with Meg and Stephanie so
skillfully that neither of them knew of the other's existence. Now,
it seemed that he had lost them both. Stephanie was married, and Meg
declared that she no longer wanted to marry Ted. She was deathly afraid
of him. Yet, within a matter» of weeks, she would take him back and
blame herself foi ever doubting him.
As far as women went, Ted always had a back-up. Even as he sat in the
Salt Lake County Jail, unaware that Meg had talked volubly about him
to detectives, he had the emotional support of Sharon Auer. Sharon seemed
to have fallen in love with him. I would soon realize that it was not
prudent to
170 THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
mention Sharon's name to Meg, or to speak of Meg to
mention Sharon's name to Meg, or to speak of Meg to Sharon.
It is interesting to note that through all the trials, through all the
years of black headlines that would label Ted a monster, and worse,
he would always have at least one woman entranced with him, living for
the few moments she could visit him in jail, running errands, proclaiming
his innocence. The women would change as time passed; apparently, the
emotions he provoked in them would not.
19
Ted had his detractors as he languished in jail in Salt Lake City during
Page 189
the fall of 1975, but he had his staunch supporters, too; one of them
was Alan Scott, the cousin he'd grown up with since he'd moved to Tacoma
when he was four years old, Scott, himself a teacher of disturbed
youngsters, insisted that he had never detected the slightest signs
of deviant behavior in Ted. He, his sister Jane, and Ted had always
been close, closer than Ted had ever been with his half-brothers and
-sisters. His cousins were not Bundys, and Ted had never really felt
part of the Bundy clan.
It is ironic then that Jane and Alan Scott would prove to be further
links in the chain of circumstantial evidence tying Ted with the missing
Washington girls. They did not do so willingly. Indeed, they believed
in his innocence completely. They worked to solicit funds for Ted's
defense, and many of his old friends contributed.
Dr. Patricia Lunneborg of the psychology department at the University
of Washington stated flatly that Ted Bundy could not possibly be a killer,
and said that there was absolutely no reason to believe that he had
ever known Lynda Ann Healy, despite the fact that they had both taken
abnormal psychology (Psych. 499) in the winter and spring quarters of
1972. "There are hundreds of students, in many different sections of
499," she said scornfully. "There's no way to prove they were in the
same sections."
Lunneborg said she intended to do everything she could to support Bundy
against the ridiculous charges and innuendos
about him.
But there was another link between Bundy and Lynda Ann Healy, and that
link was through his cousin Jane. When Lynda had lived in McMahon Hall,
her roommate was the woman who would later be Jane Scott's roommate.
Detective
171
172
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
Bob Keppel located Jane on a fishing boat in Alaska and interviewed
Page 190
her in a phone call to Dutch Harbor.
Jane was not a willing witness; she too said her cousin had been normal,
kind, not the kind of boy or man who would kill. She had seen him, she
said, three or four times during the first half of 1974. Jane had met
Lynda Healy; she could never recall that Ted had. Yes, there had been
some parties over the years but she didn't know for sure Ted had ever
attended the same parties that Lynda had.
"Did you ever speak of Lynda's disappearance to Ted?" Keppel asked.
"Yes," she said reluctantly. "But I can't remember anything specific.
We just talked about what a terrible thing it was."
Alan Scott was even less cooperative, an understandable position. Alan
had lived at Freda Rogers's home from September 1971 to February 1972.
He and Ted had remained in close contact, and Alan had talked to Ted
within days of the disappearances of Roberta Parks, Brenda Ball,
Georgeann Hawkins, Denise Naslund, and Janice Ott. "He was relaxed,
happy, excited about going to law school in Utah, and looking forward
to marrying Meg."
Scott didn't add that a man who had abducted and killed young women
couldn't have acted so calm, but that was his implication. Scott had
gone sailing with his cousin on Lake Washington, and they often hiked
together.
"Where?" Keppel asked.
"In the Carbonado area. And off Highway 18 near North Bend."
Taylor Mountain, the resting place of four of the Washington victims'
skulls, was off Highway 18 near North Bend.
Keppel said quietly, "When did you hike up there?"
"July, 1972, through the summer of 1973."
Scott did not want to show the King County detectives just where they
had hiked. He was reluctant to incriminate his cousin and, in the end,
it would take the threat of a subpoena to make him lead them over the
trails that had become familiar to Bundy.
On November 26, 1975, a subpoena was served on Alan Scott and he
accompanied Bob Keppel to the area where he had hiked with Ted. They
drove toward Taylor Mountain, and Scott pointed out rough fields and
woods along the Fall City-Duvall Road, the Issaquah-Hobart Road. "Ted
knew
Page 191
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
173
the roads around here, and we drove around in my car, looking at old
farms and barns. There was one place with a great footbridge^ along
the Fall City-Preston Road. That's the only tiine we really got out
and hiked." He pointed out the road, three-quarters of a mile north
of Preston. "We hiked about two hours up the hillside."
The area was only a few miles from Taylor Mountain.
Apparently, the region between Issaquah and North Bend had been a
favorite haunt of Ted's. He had driven Meg there, and Claire Forest,
mentioned it to his elderly woman friend, and taken his cousin there.
He had gone to Lake Sammamish State Park, alone, only a week before
July 14th. Was it merely coincidence or was it meaningful to the
investigation?
Contrary to published reports, there were some eye-witness
identifications of Ted Bundy. One witness was "contaminated," however,
by the zeal of a newswoman. When Ted was arrested in the DaRonch
kidnapping case, the television reporter rushed to the home of one of
the women who had been approached by the stranger at Lake Sammamish
on July
14th. The anchorwoman held out a photo of Ted Bundy, and asked, "Is
this the man who asked you to help him?" The woman could not identify
him; the man in the picture shown to her looked older than the handsome,
tanned man she had seen. When King County detectives later showed her
a mug lay-down of eight pictures-including one of Ted Bundyshe admitted
that it was too late; she'd already been shown a picture and, now, she
was confused. It was a major blow to the investigation.
The tearing hurry of the news media to show Ted to the public continued
to get in the way of the probe. Two other women who had seen the "Ted"
at the park recognized him at once-but they recognized him from the
pictures they saw in the paper and on television. They were convinced
that Ted Bundy and the other Ted were one and the same-but any defense
Page 192
lawyer would contend that they had been subconsciously swayed by
glimpsing Ted's picture in the media.
A male witness!,who was present at Lake Sammamish on July 14 was out
o£ the state when the news of the Utah arrest broke, and he'd seen no
pictures of Ted at all-yet he picked Ted Bundy's picture from a mug
lay-down without hesitation. So did the Oregon district attorney's son
who had been in Ellensburg on April 17th when Susan Rancourt vanished.
He was "seventy percent" sure, far from being as valuable in
174
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
court as one hundred percent would have been. "I drove back to Seattle
from Ellensburg late that night," he recalled. "When I was about ten
miles east of Issaquah, I noticed a small foreign car pulled off on
a side road. The tail lights were small and round, like a VW's."
The spot he mentioned was close to Taylor Mountain. Another tiny link?
For a fiction writer, it would have been enough. For an actual criminal
investigation, it was circumstantial evidence, block upon block piled
up until there was no doubt in the Washington detectives' minds that
Theodore Robert Bundy was the "Ted" they had sought for so long. But
enough to bring charges? No. They didn't have so much as a single hair,
a button or an earring, nothing that locked Ted Bundy tightly to any
of the victims. No prosecutor in his right mind would touch it. They
would count over forty "coincidences," and, even taken all together,
it wasn't enough.
The final "coincidence" was a case that Seattle Morals Detective Joyce
Johnson had investigated, a rape case that occurred on March 2, 1974,
at 4220 12th Avenue N.B., only a few houses from Freda Rogers's rooming
house.
The victim, an attractive twenty-year-old woman, had gone to bed around
1 A.M. on that Saturday morning. "My shades were drawn, but there's
a place where one of the curtains doesn't meet the sill and someone
could look in and see that I was alone. About three-quarters of the
Page 193
time, I have someone with me. That morning, I'd forgotten to put the
wooden slat in the window to lock it. The man took off the screen, and,
when I woke up about four, I saw him standing in the doorway. I saw
his profile. There was a light shining through from the living room
where he'd left his flashlight on. He came over and sat on my bed and
told me to relax, that he wouldn't hurt me."
The woman had asked him how he'd gotten in and he answered, "It is none
of your business."
The man had worn a tee shirt, jeans, and had a dark navy watchcap pulled
over his face to below his chin. "It wasn't a ski mask, but I think
he had made slits in it for his eyes because he could see. His voice
was well-educated. He'd been drinking; I could smell it. He had a knife
with a carved handle, but he said he wouldn't use it if I didn't fight."
The man had taped her eyes, and then he had raped her.
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
175
She didn't fight him. When he was finished, he'd taped her hands and
feet, telling her it was just to "slow her down."
She heard him go into the living room and crawl through a window, then
the sound of footsteps running toward the alley.
She heard no car.
She told Detective Johnson, "He was so calm and sure of himself. I think
he's done it before."
The Seattle Police detectives, and Captain Nick Mackie and Ms
detectives-Bob Keppel, Roger Dunn, Kathy meChesney-were convinced that
they had found "Ted." They listed the tie-ins in the missing girls'
cases:
Ted Bundy matched the physical description-so much so that four people
had connected him to the composite drawing of the man seen at Lake
Sammamish. *He often wore white tennis outfits. *He had lived within
a mile of Lynda Ann Healy, Georgeann Hawkins, and Joni Lenz. *He drove a light tan Volkswagen. *He often
Page 194
affected a British accent. *He played racquet ball.
*He had had a knife, a cleaver, a taped wrench, a crowbar, a hatchet,
crutches, plaster of Paris, surgical gloves, and unexplained women's
clothing in his possession. *His whereabouts on the vital days could
not be accounted
for.
*He had missed work for three days before and two days after the Lake
Sammamish disappearances.
*He regularly traveled 1-5 between Seattle and Olympia.
*He had a friend on the Evergreen State Campus, often stayed with him.
*He had a friend in Ellensburg-a friend who recalled Ted's visiting
in the spring of 1974.
*He'd had panty hose in the glove compartment of his car.
*His cousin knew Lynda Healy; he had taken the same classes LyndaJiad.
*He'd been seenlat Lake Sammamish State Park a week before Janice anti
Denise vanished.
*He had hiked in the Taylor Mountain area.
*He liked to sneak up behind women; he liked to frighten
women. *He preferred women with long dark hair, parted in the
middle.
176
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
] *He had tried to choke at least two women while making J
love to them. 1
*He frequented Dante's Tavern, the tavern Lynda had gone
to the night she vanished. *His manner toward women could change in
an instantfrom tenderness to hostility. *He often wore a false moustache. *He
liked to sail, had rented sailboats. *In the Colorado cases, his credit
cards had been used in
the same areas and towns, on the same days the women
vanished.
Page 195
*He had lied and he had stolen.
*He appeared to be fascinated with bondage and sodomy. *He'd been
arrested with a ski mask, panty hose mask,
handcuffs, gloves, garbage bags, strips of cloth, and a
crowbar in his possession. *He'd reported his license plates missing
in Utah, but kept
them and used them interchangeably with the new plates
issued to him.
*His blood type was O, the type found on kidnap victim's
Carol DaRonch's coat.
*He'd been identified by DaRonch, Graham, Beck, the young man in
Ellensburg, and by three witnesses at Lake Sammamish State Park on July
14th. *He'd been seen by his elderly benefactress in July, 1974
with his arm in a cast. *During 1974 he'd slept during the days and
was gonesomewhere-late at nights. *A woman was raped by a man answering his
description
only three doors from the Rogers's rooming house. *One of his high
school friends was acquainted with
Georgeann Hawkins's family. *He was intelligent, charming, and could
approach women
easily and successfully. *He habitually wore corduroy trousers (the
ribbed pattern
in the blood of Lynda Healy's bed?).
The list went on and on, and the investigators always came back to the
fact that wherever Ted Bundy went, there was soon a lovely young woman,
or two, or three, missing . ..
On the other hand, there were dozens of people who were willing to swear
that Ted Bundy was a perfect citizen, a man who worked to wipe out
violence, to bring about order and peace through the "system," that
Ted Bundy was a lover, not
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
Page 196
177
I a destroyer, of mankind. If he was what detectives believed, a I mass
killer, he had been cast from an entirely new mold.
On November 13, 1975, while Ted remained in the Salt Lake County jail
and his friends and relatives sought to raise the $15,000 needed to
bail him out, what came to be known as the Aspen Summit Meeting was
held. Mackie, Keppel, and Dunn were there, Jerry Thompson and Ira Seal
from Utah, Mike Fisher from Aspen, and dozens of other detectives who
had unsolved cases of missing and murdered girls. Inside the Holiday
Inn, the details of all those investigations were exchanged, and the
name Theodore Robert Bundy was heard often. A tremendous amount of
information was exchanged, only making each department involved more
certain that they now had their killer in jail. In jail, but with not
enough physical evidence to bring further charges. Newspapers were full
of suppositions, but few facts.
If the mysterious, unknown "Ted" had frustrated them before, the known
Ted Bundy still eluded them.
On November 20th, Ted was freed on bail-$15,000 raised by Johnnie and
Louise Bundy. When, and if, he returned to face trial on the kidnaping
charges involving Carol DaRonch, that money would be returned and then
given to John O'Connell to pay for Ted's defense.
In Seattle, Meg Anders was so frightened of her ex-lover that she made
detectives promise that she be notified the minute he crossed into the
state of Washington. It is indicative of his persuasive powers to note
that, within a day or so of his return to Washington, he was back with
her, living in her apartment. All her doubts had been erased, and she
was completely in love with him again. She did not deny published reports
that they were engaged to be married. She berated herself for having
betrayed him and would, for years, stand by him.
Ted was free, but not truly free; wherever he went, he was under constant
surveillance by officers recruited from both the King County and Seattle
Police departments. Mackie explained it to me, 'NVe can't charge him,
but we can't risk letting him out of <$ir sight. If anything should
happen while he's up here, if another girl should disappear, there'd
be hell to pay."
And so, from the moment Ted's plane landed at SeattleTacoma airport,
Page 197
he was tailed. He seemed, at first, to ignore
178 THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
the sneaker cars that followed him as he spent his days with Meg and
her daughter, or stayed in a friend's apartment.
I didn't know if I'd hear from Ted when he was in Seattle, but several
detectives took me aside and said, "If he calls you, we don't want you
going anywhere alone with him-not unless you tell us where you're going
to be first."
"Oh, come on," I said. "I'm not afraid of Ted. Besides, you're following
him everyplace anyway; if I'm with him, you'll see me."
"Just be careful," a Seattle homicide detective warned. "Maybe we'd
better know where to find your dental records in case we need to identify
you."
I laughed, but the words were jarring; the black humor that would
surround Ted Bundy evermore had begun.
20
Ted called me shortly after Thanksgiving, and we made arrangements to
meet for lunch at the Brasserie Pittsbourg, a French restaurant in the
basement of an old building in Pioneer Square, a restaurant only two
blocks from both the Seattle and King County Police headquarters.
I hadn't seen him for two years, yet he seemed hardly changed, except
that his beard was fuller. He was a little thinner perhaps, I thought,
as he walked toward me through the rain, grinning. He wore corduroy
slacks, a beige and brown coat sweater.
It was strange; his picture had been on the front page of Seattle's
papers so often that he should have been easily recognizable, but no
one even glanced at him as we spent three hours together. With all the
"sightings" there had been of the phantom "Ted," no one noticed this
real Ted at all. We stood in line, ordered the daily special, a carafe
of Chablis, and I paid for it. "When this is all over," he promised,
"I'll take you out to lunch."
We carried our plates into the back room and sat at one of the old tables
Page 198
with its butcher paper cloth. It was good to see him, good to know that
he was out of the jail that he'd hated so. It was almost as if nothing
had happened at all. I knew that he was a prime suspect, but that was
all I knew at the time; I had no knowledge at all beyond the few innuendoes
I'd read in the papers. Now, it didn't seem that any of the charges
could be possible. I didn't know that Meg had told detectives so mudd,
didn't know a single detail of the dayand-night investigations that
had gone on since August.
I was a little nervous, and I glanced around, half-expecting to see
several detectives I would recognize sitting at other tables. In fact,
I had had lunch with Nick Mackie and Dr. Berberich at the same restaurant
a few weeks before, and the
179
180
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
Brasserie Pittsbourg was a popular eating spot for detectives. The food
was excellent, and it was convenient.
"I wouldn't be surprised to see Mackie here," I told Ted. "He eats here
about three days a week. He wants to talk to you. Maybe you should do
it. He's not a bad guy."
"I have nothing to talk to him about. I'm sure he's a nice enough guy,
but there's no point in our meeting. If they were alert, they could
have seen me yesterday. I walked right through the first floor of the
courthouse, right by their offices, and nobody spotted me."
The surveillance had become a game to him. He found the men tailing
him clumsy and awkward and was taking delight in losing them. "A few
turns down alleys, around a few corners, and they can't find me. Or
sometimes, I go back and talk to them, and that really throws them.
What do they expect? I've got nothing to hide."
He took particular pride in having lost Roger Dunn in the library at
the University of Washington. "I went in the front door of the men's
room and out the back. He didn't know there was another door. For all
Page 199
I know, he's still standing out there, waiting for me to come out."
He was not amused, however, at the prevailing attitude about his guilt
in the minds of the public. He was particularly incensed because he
had planned an afternoon of fun foi' Meg's twelve-year-old daughter
and the girl's best friend. "Her mother wouldn't even let her child
Jo to a hamburger stand with me. It's ridiculous. What did she think
I was going to do? Attack her daughter?"
Yes, I thought to myself, she probably did. I had certainly not made
up my mind about Ted's guilt at that fall meeting in 1975, but I wouldn't
have gambled my daughters' safety on my own feelings.
Ted's stance was that of an innocent man; he was hurt by the accusations,
and he'd just spent eight weeks in jail. I tried to put myself in his
place, to deal with his outrage. And still, I was consumed with curiosity.
But there was no way I could come right out and ask, "Ted, did you do
it? Did you do any of it?" There are no rules of social etiquette for
questioning an old friend accused of crimes that were so awful.
He continued to toss away the Utah charges as if they were no more
important than a slight misunderstanding. He was supremely confident
that he would win in court in the DaRonch case; the burglary tools charges
were too ridiculous
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
181
to discuss. Things were fine with Meg. If only the police would leave
them alone, allow them to enjoy this time together. She was a wonderful
woman, supportive, sensitive.
We sipped wine, ordered another carafe, and watched the rain run down
the windows, windows in the basement restaurant that were at sidewalk
level so that we could see only the lower legs and feet of those who
passed by outside. He seldom met my eyes. Instead, he sat sideways in
his chair, his gaze fixed on the wall opposite.
I toyed with the fresh red carnation in the vase between us, smoked
too many cigarettes, as did he. I offered him some from my pack when
Page 200
his ran out. The tables around us were vacated, and we were finally
the only people left in the room.
How could I phrase it? I had to ask something. I studied Ted's profile.
He looked as young as he ever had, and, somehow, more vulnerable.
"Ted ..." I said at last. "Were you aware of all the girls up here who
were missing last year? Had you read about it in the papers?"
There was a long pause.
Finally, he said, "That's the kind of question that bothers me."
Bothers how? I couldn't read his face; he still looked away from me.
Did he think I was accusing him? Was I? Or did he find it all a deadly
bore?
"No," he continued. "I was so busy going to law school at U.P.S. I didn't
have time to read the papers. I wasn't even aware of it. I don't read
that kind of news."
Why wouldn't he look at me?
"I don't know any of the details," he said. "Just things my lawyer is
checking out."
Of course he was lying to me. He had been teased by a lot of people
about his resemblance to the "Ted" in the park. His own cousin, Jane
Scott, had talked to him about her friend, Lynda Ann Healy. Carole Ann
Boone Anderson had kidded him incessantly in their offices at the
Department of Emergency Services. Even if he had no personal knowledge
or guilt in the cs^es, he did know about them.
He simply dian't want to talk about them at all. He wasn't angry with
me for asking; he just didn't want to discuss it. We talked of other
things, old friends, the Crisis Clinic days, and promised to meet again
before he had to go back to Utah to stand trial. When we stood outside
in the rain, Ted
182
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
reached out impulsively and hugged me. Then he was dashing off down
First Avenue, calling back, "I'll be in touch!"
Page 201
As I walked up the hill toward my car, I felt the same emotions that
would tear me up so many times. Looking at the man, listening to the
man, I could not believe he was guilty. Listening to the detectives
whom I also liked and trusted, I could not believe he was not. I had
the distinct advantage of not being physically attracted to Ted. Any
tender feelings I had for him were those of a sister for a younger brother,
perhaps more compelling because I had lost my younger brother.
I didn't see Ted again until Saturday, January 17, 1976. My ex-husband
died, suddenly but not unexpectedly, on December 5th, and, once again,
family concern had blocked thoughts of Ted from my mind. I talked to
him on the phone once or twice in December, and he was up, confident,
anxious for the court battle that lay ahead.
When he called and asked me to meet him on January
17th, I was surprised to hear from him. He said he'd suddenly wanted
to see me, that he was leaving soon to go back to Salt Lake City to
stand trial, and asked if I minded driving out to the Magnolia District
of Seattle to meet him in a tavern there.
As I drove the twenty-five miles, I realized that no one knew I was
meeting Ted. I also knew somehow that he had lost his ever-present
surveillance team. When he svalked up to meet me a little after noon
at the tavern that was a popular watering hole for soldiers from nearby
Fort Lawton, I looked up and down the street for the sneaker cars that
I had long since learned to recognize. There were none.
He grinned. "I lost 'em. They aren't as clever as they think they are."
We found a table on the other side of the tavern from the shouting
soldiers. I had a package under my arm, a dozen copies of magazines
with my stories in them that I'd picked up from the post office. It
wasn't until Ted had glanced at it several times that I realized he
suspected I might have a tape recorder. I ripped open the package and
handed him a magazine.
He seemed to relax.
We talked for five hours. My memory of that long conversation is just
that; it is indicative of my belief at that time in his innocence that
I didn't bother to jot down notes when I
Page 202
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
183
got home. In many ways, it was a much more relaxed meeting than the
earlier lunch. Again, we drank white wine, so much white wine for Ted
at least, that, by the end of the afternoon, he was unsteady on his
feet.
Because of the wine, or perhaps because we'd gotten our first meeting
since his arrest over with, Ted seemed less edgy than he had been before.
Considering the turns that our conversation took, this was remarkable,
and yet I felt able to bring things up that might well have angered
him.
The din on the other side of the tavern seemed far away; no one could
overhear us. A fake gas log blazed merrily in the fireplace next to
our table. And, as always, rain droned steadily down outside.
I asked Ted at one point, "Ted, do you like women?"
He considered the question and said slowly, "Yes ... I think T do."
"You seem to care for your mother. I guess it all goes back to that.
Remember, when you to'la me 'ntsw jffu feffivi <V& f.Qt sure that you
were illegitimate and I reminded you that your mother had always kept
you with her, no matter how difficult it might have been for her?"
He nodded. "Yes, she did. I remember when we talked about that."
He volunteered information. He told me that it had been Meg who had
turned him in to the police. I felt the old tug of guilt because he
didn't know that I had given them his name too. He evidently thought
I was privy to more information than I really was. "Those crutches in
my room-the crutches she told them about. Those were for my landlord.
I used to work for a medical supply house, and I got them and the plaster
of Paris there."
I didn't show it, but I was surprised. I hadn't heard about the crutches
or the plaster of Paris, and I certainly didn't know before this that
Meg had gone to the police.
Ted seemed to have no rancor at all toward Meg, who had plunged him
into, about as much trouble as a man can be in. His mild, forgiving
stance seemed inappropriate. I wondered what Meg had tojd detectives
Page 203
about him. I wondered how he could forgive her so easily. Here, he was
telling me that he loved her more than he ever had, and yet, if it were
not for Meg, he would not be on his way back to Utah in a few days to
stand trial for kidnaping; the most he would have had to
184
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
worry about were the charges of evading an officer, and possession of
burglary tools.
I would have thought most men would have despised a woman who had done
that to them, but Ted talked of the wonderful times they had had together
while he was home during Christmas, their closeness-even though they
were constantly followed by police.
It was too mystifying for me to even question him about; it was something
I would have to ponder on. I nodded agreement when he asked me to look
after Meg, to see that she had someone to talk to. "She's shy. You call
her, will you? Talk to her."
Ted was still confident. It seemed as though the trial in Salt Lake
City'was more of a challenge than a threat; he was like an athlete about
to enter the Olympics. He would show them.
At one point during that long afternoon, I got up to go to the ladies'
room, walked past tables full of half-drunk soldiers, past a couple
of dozen people who hadn't seemed to recognize Ted as the infamous Ted
Bundy. As I walked back to our table, suddenly someone was behind me,
his hands lightly gripping my waist. I jumped, and then I heard a laugh.
Ted had come up behind me, so quietly that I hadn't even realized he'd
left the table. Later, I learned that Ted enjoyed sneaking up on women
(according to Meg and Lynn Banks), that he delighted in leaping ou\at
them from behind bushes and hearing them scream. And I remembered how
he had startled me that day in the tavern.
As the afternoon lengthened and it grew dark outside, the impenetrable
murkiness of a January night in Seattle, I decided to tell Ted where
I stood. I chose my words as carefully as possible. I was probably more
Page 204
honest with him about my feelings than I would ever be again. I told
him about my visit to the psychiatrist, about my dilemma in being fair
to him, while I knew I had a book contract on the story of the missing
girls.
He seemed to understand completely. His manner with me was the same
as it had been five years before when I'd talked about my problems in
the Crisis Clinic offices. He assured me he could relate to my
ambivalence.
"And, you know ... I have to tell you this," I continued. "I cannot
be completely convinced of your innocence." , He smiled. The same flat
response I was to grow used to.
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
185 things
"That's O.K. I can understand that. There are . . . things I'd like
to tell you, but I can't."
"Why?"
"I just can't."
I asked him why he didn't just take a polygraph examination and get
it over with.
"My lawyer, John Henry Browne, feels that it's best."
It was a paradox in itself that Browne should be advising Ted. Ted hadn't
been charged with anything in Washington, although he certainly was
under continued surveillance, and he'd been accused by the press and
most of the public. But Browne worked for the Public Defender's Office,
an agency funded to defend suspects actually charged with crimes.
It seemed to be a game with no rules. It wasn't usual either for a man
to be convicted by the media. Ted had been asked not to use the University
of Washington's Law School library any more; it frightened women
students to see him there.
"Ted," I said suddenly. "What did you want when you called me from Salt
Lake City that night in November in
1974?"
Page 205
"What night?" He seemed puzzled.
"It was November 20th, when I was in the hospital. You talked to my
mother."
"I never called you then."
"I saw the phone records from your apartment phone in Salt Lake City.
You called just before midnight."
He didn't seem upset, just stubbornly resistant.
"The King County Police are lying to you."
"But I saw the records."
"I never called you."
I let it go. Maybe he didn't remember.
Ted bragged more about how clever he'd become at losing the men tailing
him, of how he taunted them.
"I know. Billy Baughman says you walked back to his car and asked him
if he was with the Mafia or the police, that you just wanted to*be sure."
"Who's he?" *
"He's a Seattle Jomicide detective. He's a nice guy."
"I'm sure they're all princes."
Ted had talked in any depth to only one of the detectives who dogged
his tracks. John Henry Browne had told him not to talk with police,
that he was under no obligation to do so,
186
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
but Roger Dunn had come face to face with Ted as he parked his car near
a friend's apartment on December 3rd.
The two men, hunter and hunted, had stared at each other, and Ted had
asked Dunn if he had a warrant.
"No. I just want to talk to you."
"Come on in. I'll see what I can do."
If Dunn had expected any voluntary give and take, he was disappointed.
Ted had immediately gone to the phone and called Browne's office,
informing an aide that Dunn was with him.
Page 206
Before Dunn had finished reading Ted the Miranda warning, Browne called,
asked to speak to him, and told him to leave the apartment as soon as
possible; he didn't want Ted talking to any Washington state officers.
Ted had been more sympathetic. "I'd really like to help you out. I know
the pressure on you from the press is heavy. I personally feel no pressure,
but I won't talk to you now. Maybe later, John and I might get in touch
with you."
"We'd like to eliminate you as a suspect if we could. So far, we haven't
been able to."
"I know there are things I know that you don't know, but I'm not at
liberty to discuss them."
Roger Dunn had heard much the same sentiment that Ted would repeat to
me often, had also noted that Ted would not meet his eyes. And then
the interview had quickly ended. Ted had held out his hand and they
shook.
They had taken each other's measure; they were never to meet again.
Sitting in the smoky tavern, I felt that there was more Ted wanted to
say to me. It was nearing six, and I had promised my son I'd take him
to a movie that night for his birthday. Ted didn't want the visit to
end. He asked me if I would go with him someplace to smoke marijuana.
I demurred. •! didn't use marijuana, and I had promised my son I'd be
home early. And too, although I was not frightened, I may have been
a little ill at ease.
Ted was quite intoxicated as he hugged me outside the tavern, and then
disappeared into the misty rain. I would see him again, twice, after
we said good-bye, but I would never see him again as a free man.
21
It is my belief that Ted's trial in Salt Lake City on the aggravated
kidnapping charge involving Carol DaRonch was the only legal proceeding
where he had everything going for him. He had chosen to leave his fate
up to a judge alone and to dispense with a jury. On Monday, February
23, 1976, the trial opened in Judge Stewart Hanson's courtroom. Ted
Page 207
was enthusiastic about Hanson's reputation as a fair-minded jurist;
he truly believed that he would walk away a free man. He had John
O'Connell on his side, a veteran of twenty-nine murder trials, and
considered to be one of the top attorneys in Utah. He had friends in
the courtroom: Louise and Johnnie Bundy, Meg, others who had flown in
from Seattle, those who still believed in him from Utah: Sharon Auer
and the friends who had convinced him to join the Mormon Church shortly
before his first arrest.
But Midvale Chief of Police Louis Smith, Melissa's father, was also
there, and the parents and friends of Debby Kent and Laura Aime. There
could be no charges involving their daughters, but they wanted to see
what they felt to be only
token justice done.
In the end, the verdict would depend on the reliability of the eye witness,
Carol DaRonch, and on Ted Bundy's own testimony. O'Connell had attempted
to have Sergeant Bob Hay ward's testimony about Bundy's arrest on August
16th suppressed, but Hanson refused to do so.
There was, of course, no mention during that first trial of the other
crimes in which Ted Bundy was a prime suspect, no mention of the fait
that the Volkswagen he'd sold to a teenage boy (coincidectally an
ex-classmate of Melissa Smith's) on September 17, t975 had been seized
by the police and systematically ripped apart as criminalists looked
for physical evidence that would tie in to other cases in which Ted
was
suspected.
187
188
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
Carol DaRonch was not a confident witness; she appeared to be upset
by the way Ted stared steadily at her. She sobbed during her testimony,
recalling her terror of sixteen months before. But she pointed to Ted
as he sat impassively at the defense table, identifying him positively
Page 208
as the man who had told her he was "Officer Roseland."
Ted sitting there, clean shaven, wearing a light gray suit, white shirt,
and tie, looked anything but a kidnapper; the accusing witness was
plainly hysterical, buckling again and again under O'ConnelPs questions,
questions intimating that Carol DaRonch had been led to her
identification of Ted by the subtle and not-so-subtle persuasion of
the detectives under Captain Pete Hayward's command. For two hours,
the defense lawyer cross-examined the weeping girl.
"You identified pretty much what law enforcement officers wanted you
to, didn't you?"
"No . . . no," she replied softly.
Ted continued to stare at her implacably.
When Ted himself took the stand, he admitted that he had lied to Sergeant
Bob Hayward at the time of his arrest for evading an officer, that he
had lied to O'Connell. He explained that he had "rabbited" when Hayward
chased him in the patrol car on August 16th-but only because he'd been
smoking marijuana. He'd wanted time to get the "joint" out of the car,
to let the smoke clear. He admitted that he had not been to a drive-in
movie, but had told Hayward that. He had not admitted the real story
to John O'Connell at first.
Bundy had no firm alibi for the night of November 8th, but he denied
that he had ever seen Carol DaRonch before he saw her in court.
The handcuffs? Only something he'd picked up at a dump and kept for
a curio. He had no k_ey for them. ,,
Assistant County Attorney David Yocum questioned Bundy under
cross-examination.
"Have you ever worn a false moustache? Didn't you wear one when you
were a spy in the Dan Evans campaign?"
"I wasn't 'spying' for anyone, and I never wore a fake moustache during
that period," Ted answered.
"Didn't you brag to a woman acquaintance that you like virgins and you
can have them any time?"
"No."
"Didn't you tell that same woman that you saw no difference between
right and wrong?"
Page 209
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
189
"I don't remember that statement; if I made it, it was taken out of
context and does not represent my views."
"Did you ever use an old license place on your car, after you'd received
new plates from the state of Utah?"
"No sir."
Yocum then produced two gasoline credit slips.
"You notified the state that you had lost plates bearing the numbers
LJE-379 on April 11, 1975. These slips show that you were still using
those 'lost' plates in the summer of 1975. Why was that?"
"I cannot remember the incidents. The attendant probably asked for my
plate numbers and I may have inadvertently given him the old numbers
from memory."
Ted had lied, not big lies, but lies, and it tainted all the rest of
his testimony. He admitted that he had lied to O'Connell about the
marijuana until two weeks before trial. A jury might have believed him;
Judge Hanson did not.
Hanson had retired to ponder his decision after final arguments on Friday,
February 27th. On Monday, March 1, the principals were summoned into
the courtroom at 1:35 P.M.
The thirty-seven-year-old judge by his own statement had spent an
"agonizing" weekend. And he had found Ted Bundy guilty of aggravated
kidnapping beyond a reasonable doubt. Ted, who had been free on bail,
was remanded to the custody of the Salt Lake County Sheriff's Office
to await sentencing.
Ted was stunned; Louise Bundy's sobs were the only sound in the courtroom
on that snowy afternoon. Convicted, Ted said nothing until he was
handcuffed by Captain Hayward and Jerry Thompson, and then he said
scornfully, "You don't need these handcuffs. I'm not going anywhere."
Meg Anders watched as Ted was led out of the courtroom, seeing it all
happen. It had been what she thought she wanted when she called police
with her suspicions. Now she was sorry; she wanted Ted back.
Page 210
Sentencing was set for March 22nd. There would, of course, be an appeal.
Ted was behind fbars again, in a world that he hated. I wrote to him,
vapid letters full of what was happening in my life, trivia. I sent
hfn small checks through John O'Connell's office for use in the jail
commissary, stationery, stamps. And, still, I suspended judgment.
Until / had proof that Ted was guilty of this, and perhaps of other
crimes, I would wait.
190
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
The frequency of his letters to me increased. They were more telling
of his state of mind than what someone else could paraphrase. Some of
them are misdated, as if time itself had no meaning for him any longer.
22
His first postconviction letter was mailed on March 14, 1976, although
he had mistakenly dated it February 14th.
"Dear Ann,
Thanks for the letters and the commissary contribution. I've been slow
in returning letters since this most recent setback. Probably a function
of my need to mentally rearrange my life; to prepare for the living
hell of prison; to comprehend what the future holds for me."
He said he was writing to me as a "pump priming venture," to help him
begin to assess what lay ahead. He was confounded by the guilty verdict
and scornful of Judge Hanson, intimating that the jurist had been
influenced by public opinion rather than by the evidence presented.
He expected to receive a five-to-life sentence, and felt that the
Department of Adult Probation and Parole were doing their presentence
report with bias.
"The report seems to be focusing on the Jekel (sic) and Hyde theory,
Page 211
a thing disputed by all the psychologists who have examined me."
i Ted said he had heard that the probation investigator seemed to believe
that Ted had made some damaging admission to me in letters. Of course,
he had not. I had had only those two letters from him before the trial,
and, with his permission, had turned them over to King County-Police
detectives.
On March 22nd, Judge Hanson announced that he would delay sentencing
for ninety days, pending a psychological evaluation. Ted wrote to me
that night as he crouched on the floor with his back against the steel
wall of his cell, trying to glean enough light from the hall fixture
so that he could see to write. He did not seem to be particularly upset
about the diagnostic evaluation which would take place at the Utah State
Prison at Point-of-the-Mountain.
191
192
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
"If jail life is any indication, prison should be rich in the material
that human suffering breeds, full of the startling tales which prisoners
tell. For several reasons, I must take advantage of this opportunity
and begin to draw upon this valuable reservoir of ideas. I will start
writing."
What Ted wanted from me was my editorial advice and for me to serve
as his agent to help him sell the books he wanted to write about his
case. He was anxious that we move rapidly in establishing our roles
as collaborators and to agree on a percentage agreement on the
distribution of the profits that would surely be forthcoming. He asked
that I keep his proposal confidential until the time was right and that
I correspond with him through his attorney's office.
I didn't know just what it was that he intended to write, but I responded
with a long letter detailing the various avenues of publishing, and
explaining the correct manuscript form for submission. I also repeated
again the information about the book contract I already had with W.W.
Page 212
Norton on the missing girls cases, and stressed my belief that his story
would have to be a part of my book, just how much I couldn't know. I
offered to share my profits with him, gauged by the number of chapters
he might write in his own words.
And I urged him to wait a bit with his attempts to publish-for his own
protection. His legal entanglements in Utah and Colorado were not over.
Colorado was moving rapidly in their investigation, although the
public-of which I was a part-knew few of the details. The discovery
of the credit card purchases had leaked out, however.
And I had news. I was about to take a trip to Salt Lake City as part
of the preparation for a travelogue book I was editing for an Oregon
publishing house; I would try to get clearance to visit him in prison.
That clearance would not be easy to come by. I was not a relative, and
I was not on the approved list of visitors for Theodore Robert Bundy.
When I called Warden Sam Smith's office in the old prison in Draper,
Utah, I was told that, if I called again when I arrived in Salt Lake
City, they would make a decision. I was quite certain that the answer
would be "no."
On April 1, 1976, I flew to Utah. I had never flown in a jet, hadn't
flown at all since 1954, and the speed of the flight, the knowledge
that I could leave Seattle's rain and be in a
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME 193
comparatively balmy Salt Lake City within a few hours only added to
my sense of unreality.
The sun was shining, and a dusty wind blew puffs of tumble weed over
the brown landscape as I drove my rented car from the airport. I felt
disoriented, much as I would three years later as I arrived in
Miami-again because of Ted.
I called the prison and learned that visitors were not usually allowed
on days other than Sundays and Wednesdays. It was Thursday, and already
4 P.M. I talked to Warden Smith who said "I'll have someone from the
diagnostic staff call you
Page 213
back."
The call came. What was my purpose in wanting to visit Bundy? "I'm an .old
friend." "How long would I be in Utah?" "Only today and tomorrow
morning." How old was I? "Forty." That answer seemed right; I was too
old to be a
"Ted Groupie."
"O.K. We're granting you a special visit. Be at the prison
at 5:15. You'll have one hour."
The Utah State Prison at Point-of-the-Mountain was about twenty-five
miles south of my motel, and I had barely enough time to find the right
freeway, going in the right direction, and reach Draper, the post office
stop, population 700. I looked to my right and saw the twin towers with
guards armed with shotguns. The old prison and the landscape around
it seemed to be all the same gray brown color. A feeling of hopelessness
seized me; I could empathize with Ted's despair at being locked up.
I'd spent a summer working as a student intern at the Oregon State
Training School for Girls when I was nineteen and I'd carried a heavy
ring of flat keys wherever I went, but that was a long time before:
I'd forgotten the security needed to keep human beings behind walls
and bars. The guard at the door told me I couldn't take My purse inside.
"What can T do with it?" I asked. "I can't lock it in my car because
my kevs are in it. May I bring my keys in?" "Sorry. Nothingdnside."
He finallv relented and opened up a glassed-in office where -ti~ TM
in<-.v<>H My purse in the
He finallv relented ana openeu up a ^,u.^~~ ... I could leave my ear
keys after I'd locked my purse in the
rental car. I carried my ciearettes in my hand.
-<._i-„ »
I could leave my «ai K^, „.^. , _ . rental car. I
carried rny ciearettes
in my hand.
"Sorry. No cigarettes. No matches."
I put them on a counter, and waited for Ted to be brought down. I was
feeline the claustrophobia I always feel in jails, even though my work
Page 214
may take me into almost every jail in
194
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
Washington sooner or later. I felt my chest tighten, my breath catch.
To get my mind off my cloistered feelings, I glanced around the waiting
room. It was, of course, empty; it was not regular visiting hours. The
dull walls, sagging chairs, seemed not to have changed in fifty years.
There was a candy machine, a bulletin board, pictures of the staff,
a left-over religious Christmas card. To whom? From whom? Disciplinary
notations on prisoners. For Sale notices. An application to sign up
for self-defense classes. Who? The staff? The visitors? The inmates?
Where would we talk? Through a glass wall via phones? Through steel
mesh? Some people hate the smell of hospitals. I hate the smell of jails
and prisons, all the same:'stale cigarette smoke, Pine-Sol, urine,
sweat, and dust. I didn't want to see Ted in a cage. It would be too
humiliating for him.
A smiling man walks toward me-Lieutenant Tanner of the prison staff-and
asks me to sign in. But first, we move through an electric gate that
clangs shut behind us heavily. I sign my name, and Lieutenant Tanner
sees me through a second electric gate. "You can talk here. You'll have
an hour. They'll bring Mr. Bundy down in a few minutes."
It is a hallway! A tiny segment of space between two automatic gates
on either side. There are two chairs shoved against a rack of hanging
coats, and, for some reason, buckets of varnish beneath them. A guard
sits in a glass enclosure four feet away. I wonder if he will be able
to hear what we say? Beyond me is the prison proper, and I can hear
footsteps approaching. I look away, the way one averts his eyes from
someone crippled or malformed. I cannot stare at Ted in his cage.
The third electric door slides open and he is there, accompanied by
two guards. They search him, pat him down. I was not searched. Had they
Page 215
checked me out? How did they know I had no contraband, no razor up my
sleeve?
"Your I.D. Ma'am?" Someone is talking to me.
"It's in the car. I had to leave everything in the car."
The doors open again as I run back to retrieve my driver's license,
something to prove who I am. I hand it to a guard and he studies it,
hands it back. I have not looked directly at Ted. We both wait.
And now he stands in front of me. For a crazy instant, I wonder why
prisoners wear tee shirts proclaiming their reliTHE STRANGER BESIDE ME
195
gious preferences. His is orange and says "Agnostic" on the front. I
look again. No, it reads "Diagnostic."
He is very thin, wears glasses, and his hair is cut shorter than I have
ever seen it. He smells of acrid sweat as he hugs
me.
They leave us alone to talk in this funny coatroom-hall. The guard behind
the glass across from us appears to be disinterested, and we are
interrupted only by a steady stream of people-guards, psychologists,
prisoners' wives headed for an Al-Anon meeting. One of the psychologists
recognizes Ted and speaks to him, shakes hands.
"That's a doctor who did a psychological profile on me for John
[O'Connell]. He told John, off the record, that he couldn't see how
I could have done it."
Many of the people moving past us, wearing civilian clothes, nod and
speak to Ted. It is all very civilized.
"Ilm in the 'fish tank,' " he explains. "There are forty of us in the
diagnostic center. The ~Ju<Jge
ortfèTéb%di\%chsM,ip« protective
custody, but I turned it down. I don't want to be
isolated."
I Still, he admits to a good deal of trepidation on his arrival at
Page 216
Point-of-the-Mountain. He is aware that men convicted of crimes against
women have a high mortality rate inside the walls. "They were lined
up to see me when I arrived. I had to
walk the gauntlet."
But he has found prison much better than jail. He is rapidly becoming
a "jailhouse lawyer." "I'll survive inside-if I do-because of my brain,
my knowledge of the law. They seek me out for legal advice, and they're
all in awe of John. I only had one really bad moment. This one guy-a
killer who literally ripped out the throat of the man he killed-walked
over to me and I thought I'd had it. He was only interested in knowing
about John, in finding out how he could get John to represent him. I
get along fine with all of them."
He glances at the locked gate behind me. "They left it open when you
went for your I.D. I saw the coats here, the door open, and th^ thought
of escaping flashed through my mind, but only for a minute."
The trial just finphed rankles Ted and he wants to discuss it. He insists
that Carol DaRonch was talked into her identification of him by the
Salt Lake County detectives. "Her original description of the man said
he had dark brown eyes. Mine are blue. She couldn't make up her mind
about the
196
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
moustache and she said his hair was dark, greased back. She I.D.'d my
car from a polaroid and the film was over-exposed; it made the car look
blue and it's really tan. They showed her my picture so many times.
Of course, she recognized it. But, in court, she couldn't even identify
the man who picked her up and drove her to the police station.
"Jerry Thompson said he saw three pair of'patent leather shoes in my
closet. Why didn't he take a picture of them? Why didn't he pick them
up for evidence? I've never owned patent leather shoes. Somebody said
I wore black patent leather boots to church. Would I wear a maniac's
costume to church?
Page 217
"She never saw the crowbar. All she said she felt was a many sided steel
or iron tool when she grasped it from behind. She said it was over her
head."
Ted is as scornful of the psychologist, Al Carlisle, who is administering
the tests to him as he is of the Utah detectives. Most of the tests
are the standard ones that any psychology student is familiar with:
the MMPI (Minnesota Multiphasic
Personality Index) consisting of
hundreds of questions that can be answered "yes" or "no" with some
deliberate "lie" questions repeated at intervals. I spotted the lie
questions when I was a freshman in college, particularly, "Do you ever
think about things too bad to talk about?" The "correct" answer is
"yes"-everybody does, but many people write "no." For Ted Bundy, that
test was kindergarten stuff. The TAT (Thematic Apperception Test) :
look at a picture and tell a story from it. The Rorshach or "ink blot"
test. Ted had administered these tests himself to patients. The Utah
State Prison had its own psychological test, a series of adjectives
where the subject underlines those that apply to his personality.
"He wants to know about my childhood, my family, my sex life, and I
tell him what I can. He's happy and he says do I want to see him again?
So I tell him 'O.K.' Why not?"
We pause as another group moves through the hallway.
"The next time I meet him, he's smiling. He has a diagnosis. I am a
passive-aggressive personality. The man is so pleased with himself,
Ann, and he sits back waiting. He expects more from me. What does he
want? A full confession?"
I say little during our visit; he has so much to get off his chest,
and, with the exception of visits from Sharon Auer and occasionally
from O'Connell and Bruce Lubeck, his associate,
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
197
j Ted feels he has had no one to talk to who can communicate
Page 218
on his level.
: "John thinks T should have
gotten angry in court. He went I' to
law school with Judge Hanson, and he knows the man. I was sitting there
jxist trying to understand the motivations behind the prosecutors, and
it was just too ridiculous to show emotion about. But John thinks I
should have gotten mad!"
We talk about Sharon and Meg. He has known Sharon for
• more than a year, and she visits him faithfully every Wednesday and
Sunday. "Don't mention Sharon to Meg. Sharon's jealous of Meg, and Meg
doesn't really know about Sharon."
I promise that I won't involve myself in his complicated romantic life,
and I marvel that he can keep two intense relationships going while
he's locked up with a possible life sentence hanging over him.
"My mother's upset with Meg for telling the King County Police that
I was illegitimate." The legitimacy of Ted's birth will eventually
become the least of Louise Bundy's worries.
"This place . . . they've got everything they want in here: drugs, speed.
I won't do drugs. I'm not going to do the visual prison trip. I'm
adjusting, and I want to work for prison reform. I'm innocent, but I
can work from the inside."
Ted still wants to write, and he feels that he can get writing out to
me through Sharon. Sharon regularly carries papers, legal briefs, in
with her when she visits. She could carry his writing out and send it
to me.
"I need $15,000 to hire private detectives; I think Carol DaRonch, or
someone close to her, knew the man who attacked her. I need money to
hire a team of independent psychologists to submit a report to the
sentencing board. Everybody makes decisions about me and I'm not even
allowed to sit in on the meetings . . ."
"I don't think you should try to publish anything before the first of
June," I said. "And Colorado. There's still Colorado."
"I talked to Color^o; they have no claim on me."
"What about those credit card slips in Colorado?"
He smiles. "It's ifbt against the law to be in Colorado. Sure, I was
there, but a lot of people go to Colorado."
Page 219
I ask him if, when he writes, he will include a description of the murder
cases, and he tells me that he believes those "sensational cases" will
be essential to selling his book. "Sam
198
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
Shepard was found innocent after years in prison," he recalls, "and
his book on an innocent man's ordeal sold."
Sitting there in that airless cubicle, I am once again on his side.
He seems too frail, so beleaguered by forces over which he has no control.
And yet the charisma is still there. I believe his position as a man
who is, as he has been most of his life, in a situation that has no
relevance to the real Ted inside.
He remembers my world, and politely asks how my house sale is going,
how my children are. He begs me to stand by Meg, tells me how much he
loves her and misses her.
And then the guards are back. They tap him on the shoulder. They have
given us an extra fifteen minutes. He rises, hugs me again, kisses me
on the cheek. They pat him down again. That's why they didn't search
me; if I'd given him anything, they would find it before I left.
The door slides open for me, and I pause for a minute, watching him
as he is led back into the belly of the prison, dwarfed by the two guards.
"Hey lady . . . Goddammit! Watch out!"
The door is automatically closing, and I leap forward just in time to
escape being caught in its metal jaws. The guard stares at me as if
I'm retarded. Lieutenant Tanner thanks me politely for coming, walks
me to the prison's front door.
And then I am outside again, past the twin towers, in my car and on
the road back toward Salt Lake City. The wind has kicked up a dust storm
and the prison behind me is almost obliterated from view. Suddenly,
there are red lights whirling atop a van in back of me. I have become
paranoid in that hour and a half at Point-of-the-Mountain, and I wonder
why they are chasing me. What did I do? The van pulls up, closer, closer,
Page 220
and I prepare to pull over, and then it turns off on a side road, its
wail fading in the wind.
I realize I am talking to myself. No, no ... he couldn't have done it.
He's been railroaded in there by public opinion. That man I just talked
to is the same man I've always known. He has to be innocent.
Driving toward the city, I pass the turn-offs for Midvale, for Murray,
names that had never been anything before but places on a map, now the
sites of two of the abductions. I pass commuters, bored with their daily
routine, and I am so thankful to be free. I can go to my motel, have
dinner with a friend, get on a ptane and go back to Seattle. Ted can't.
He is locked up with the rest of the "fish." How could this happen .
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
199
to a young man with such a future ahead of him? I am so caught up in
my reverie that I miss the turn to my motel, and wander, lost, in the
wide, clean, but confusing streets of Salt Lake City.
It was that night-April 1, 1976-when I had the dream. It was very
frightening, jarring me awake in a strange room in a strange city.
I found myself in a large parking lot, with cars backing out and racing
away. One of the cars ran over an infant, injuring it terribly, and
I grabbed it up, knowing it was up to me to save it. I had to get to
a hospital, but no one would help. I carried the baby, wrapped almost
completely in a gray blanket, into a car rental agency. They had plenty
of cars, but they looked at the baby in my arms and refused to rent
me one. I tried to get an ambulance, but the attendants turned away.
Finally, in desperation, I found a wagon-a child's wagon-and I put the
injured infant in it, pulling it behind me for miles until I found an
emergency room.
I carried the baby, running, up to the desk. The admitting nurse glanced
at the bundle in my arms. "No, we will not treat it."
"But it's still alive! It's going to die if you don't do something."
"It's better. Let it die. It will do no one any good to treat it."
Page 221
The nurse, the doctors, everyone, turned and moved away from me and
the bleeding baby.
And then I looked down at it. It was not an innocent baby; it was a
demon. Even as I held it, it sunk its teeth into my hand and bit me.
I did not have to be a Freudian scholar to understand my dream; it was
all too clear. Had I been trying to save a monster, trying to protect
something or someone who was too dangerous and evil tosurvive?
I
23
Something deep in my unconscious mind had surfaced, had told me
forcefully that I perhaps believed that Ted Bundy was a killer. But
I had made my commitment to keep in contact with him, no matter what
the future would hold. I suspected that he did not feel things the way
I did, but I could not believe that he was not laboring under a terrible
weight. I felt that perhaps I might one day be the vehicle through which
he could rid himself of that weight. If he would talk to me about what
had happened, could reveal the facts still hidden, it would not only
help him to receive the redemption he had alluded to in his poem, it
could give some measure of relief, of finality, to the parents and
relatives who still waited to learn what had happened to their daughters.
Oddly, I could never picture Ted as a murderer, never visualize what
had happened. It was probably best that I couldn't. When I wrote to
him, my letters had to be to the man I remembered, or I couldn't do
it.
Once before, Ted had called me when he was in the grip of some emotional
anxiety. Although he had denied making that call to me on November 20,
1974, I had seen the phone records. He had called that night, and I
sensed that there would come a day when he would need me again. Something
seemed to have gone so terribly wrong with Ted's mind, and I now suspected
the "sick" part of him was capable of murder. If that was true, then
he would need someone who could listen, who would not judge, but who
might help to make his confessions easier. I felt that Ted might be
Page 222
able to expiate his guilt through his writing, and I continued to
encourage him to write.
He had asked me to call Meg. In our prison visit, he had told me "I
love Meg spiritually," and I wondered if that did not mean that Meg
was caught up with a man who, even if he were not in prison, would never
marry her. For her sake, I
200
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
201
wrote to him: "My
discussions we have had
wrote to him: My gut reaction to discussions we have had about Meg
recently-and years ago-is that you do not ultimately see your future
with her as much as you love her and as much history as you share with
her. There is something missing, something essential to a forever-after
relationship. This, of course, is not something I would discuss with
her, but I will encourage any effort she puts forth to become a complete
person in her own right, so that she does not need any man quite as
much as she needs you now."
He seemed to agree, but there would be letters where he was terrified
that he would lose her. Even so, there was Sharon, and I kept my promise
not to discuss either woman with the other.
I did call Meg, and she remembered me from that long-ago Christmas party.
She seemed anxious to meet me again and we set up an appointment to
have dinner together.
On April 7th (although he misdated the letter again as March 7, 1976),
I had a letter from Ted, the first since I'd returned from Utah.
The small white envelopes furnished by the prison all had a preprinted
return address giving a post office box in Draper, Utah, and above that,
Ted wrote "T.R. Bundy."
Ted had pulled himself together now, an effort that would never fail
to make me pause and consider the ability he had to do that. He could
Page 223
somehow manage to recoup and recover under such tremendous stress and
adjust to each new situation.
His letter was an apology, in part, because he had usurped much of the
conversation in our visit in prison. "I have developed a typical
prisoner's syndrome: the obsession with my legal case . . . the trial
and the verdict live in me like some cerebral ulcer."
He was writing many letters and observations in his cell, and commented
that his left hand (he is left-handed) had become so strong th»t he
broke his shoe laces without even trying. I
Ted commenteqfon the link between us, a lit**, that seemed to be growing
stronger: "You've called it Karma. It may be. Yet, whatever supernatural
force guides our destinies, it has brought us together in some
mind-expanding situations. I must believe this invisible hand will pour
more chilled Chablis for us in less treacherous, more tranquil times
to come." Again, he urged me to take care of Meg for him, and he
202
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
asked that I suggest to Meg that she read me some of the love poems
he had sent to her. He enclosed one of those poems, a poem he had printed
on blue paper in the prison's printing facility. It ended,
I send you this kiss deliver this body to hold. I sleep with you tonight
with words of love untold. I would love you, if I might with words that
unfold these arms to press you tight.
When I met Meg for dinner on April 30. 1976. she carried with her a
dozen or more poems, love poems from Ted. She had typed them carefully,
with copies for herself and for Ted. They were romantic sonnets,
something any woman in love would have clung to. And Meg was certainly
a woman in love. Yet, even as I read them. I was struck with the
incongruity of the situation. This was the woman who had placed Ted
in his present jeopardy, and / knew that Sharon Auer was also in love
with him-Sharon who thought Ted loved her.
Meg wept as she read over the poems, pointing out particularly tender
Page 224
phrases to me. "T can't understand how he can forgive me after what
I did to him, how he can write me poems like this."
Meg slipped the poems back into the large manilla envelope and glanced
around the room. No one had noticed her tears; the heavy-weight
championship fight was on the television set above the bar and everyone
was staring at it.
"You know," she said softly. "I don't make friends easily. I had one
boyfriend and one woman friend. And now, T've really lost them both.
I don't see Lynn any more. I can't forgive her for making me doubt Ted,
and I don't know when I'll ever see him again."
"What was there, Meg," I asked. "What was there that made you go to
the police? Was there anything besides Lynn's suspicions?"
She shook her head. "I can't tell you. T know you're writing a book.
I hope you understand, but I just can't talk about it."
I didn't press her. I wasn't with her to try to squeeze inTHE STRANGER BESIDE ME
203
formation out of her. I was with her because Ted had asked me to stand
by her. Pushing her would be too much like poking a creature with a
stick, a creature already hurt.
And yet, Meg wanted information from me. She was jealous of Ted, even
when he was locked up in the Utah State Prison. She wanted to know about
Sharon. I told her, truthfully, that I really didn't know much about
Sharon Auer. I didn't mention that I had talked to Sharon on the phone
when I was in Salt Lake City, and that I'd heard Sharon's voice turn
icy when I mentioned Meg. That was my first realization that Sharon
was seemingly as unsure of Ted, as possessive, as Meg was.
Meg struck me as terribly vulnerable, and I wondered why Ted could
not let her go. She was thirtv-one.
 and she
wanted-needed-a marriage, a chance to have the children -si«? icsjgea
JOT- bsfsœ- îbsœ 5&as too JESat a gap between them and Liane, before
Page 225
Meg was too old. Ted must have known that he would not be free for years,
and yet he bound her to him through his poems, letters, calls. If anything,
she loved him more than she ever had, and she was trying to cope with
TBat?_^dlt.*has^4ïa,r'is.'iJd.vs»s..
It was odd; even as I mused about how Meg would survive with her complete
dependence on Ted, I received a letter from him-on May 17th-wherein
he seemed terrified of losing her! He was sweating out his last two
weeks before the June sentencing date, and that may have contributed
to his anxiety. He seemed to i~el that Meg was pulling away from him,
and he asked me to go to her and plead his case. He had no real reason
to doubt Meg's loyalty, but he "sensed vibrations."
"You are the only person whom I trust," he wrote, "who is both sensitive
and in a position to approach Meg for me. I think it would be easier
for Meg to express herself to you than to me."
The letter ended with his opinions on the psychiatrists and
psychologists who had spent three months examining him:
. . . after conducting numerous tests and extensive examinations, (they)
have found me normal and are deeply perplexed. Both of us know that
none of us is 'normal.' Perhaps what I should say is that they find
no explanation to substantiate the verdict or other allegations. No
seizures, no psychosis, no disassociative reac204 THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
tion, no unusual habits, opinions, emotions or fears. Controlled,
intelligent, but, in no way, crazy. The working theory is now that I
have completely forgotten everything, a theory which is disproved by
their own results. 'Very interesting,' they keep mumbling. I may have
convinced one or two of them that I am innocent.
I did call Meg on Ted's behalf and found that she was completely unchanged
in her devotion to him. She had managed to tell him that in a two-minute
phone call to the prison, and urged me to assure him that she wasn't
dating anyone else. He did not want to let her go, and Meg apparently
did not want to leave him.
Page 226
On June 5th, Meg came to my home to spend the evening. She had just
seen her parents off after a week-long visit and •WHS tense became they
-were -not sympathetic about her continued allegiance to Ted. She was
also apprehensive about Sharon, more aware of Sharon's relationship
with Ted than he realized. I was in the middle of a situation that made
me uneasy; I didn't want to cover for Ted if he was deluding Meg, but
I didn't want to tell her about Sharon's twice weekly visits to the
Utah State Prison either. I suspected that I was being subtly manipulated
in keeping Meg bound to Ted.
I wrote to him about Meg on June 6th: "I think that she is aware of
Sharon's relationship to you, but I stressed that I really know nothing
about it, and I don't know, and I don't want to know. When the time
comes to thinking of everyday conflicts, you will have to get your act
together."
Ted's future was still in limbo. The sentencing on the DaRonch kidnapping
conviction, set for June 1st, had been postponed for thirty more days.
It was conceivable-but not likely-that he would receive probation. Or
he could receive life in prison. Psychologists were still wrestling
with his personality. I had received a phone call from Al Carlisle,
the psychologist in charge of the report on Ted, one Sunday evening.
He began abruptly, "Do you know Ted Bundy?"
"Who wants to know?" I'd responded; knowing Ted Bundy was becoming
something that one did not brag about.
He had then identified himself, sounded a shy, diffident man. I told
him only what I had seen-there was no point in my getting my dreams
and fears into what was allegedly a rational psychological study. I
explained that, in all my contacts
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
205
with Ted, I had found him normal, empathetic, friendly, gentle. And
that was true.
"Well," he said. "I've talked to a lot of people about him and I've
Page 227
been surprised at the widely divergent opinions about him."
I wanted to ask what they were, but it didn't seem the proper response.
I waited.
"I like him myself. I've spent about twelve hours with him, and I like
him." Carlisle wanted copies of the two "Ted letters" which had accrued
such undeserved fame, and I said I would send them-but only with Ted's
permission. Ted gave that, and I mailed them to the prison psychologist.
Ted wrote again on June 9th. With sentencing just around the corner,
he had geared up for a fight. "The prospects are exciting!"
Ted found the psychological examinations "malicious, slanted, and
infernal." Harking back to his own psychology training, he felt prepared
to deal with the questions that the doctors asked him and his
friends-questions which suggested that he might be strange, homosexual,
or deviant in his demands during sexual intercourse. He was angry because
his examiners had told him that some of his friends had had negative
things to say about him, but would not reveal the content of interviews
or the names of friends.
"I was aghast! Is this America? Am I to be ''tacked anonymously? I listed
the names of several close friends, people who know me well. None had
been contacted. Who are my detractors? No response . .."
He had received some answers. The testing team had reported to him that
the nameless interviewees had indicated that he was changeable.
"Well, sometimes you would appear happy, pleasant. Other times you would
seem like a different person and unresponsive," they had told him.
"They are trying so desperately to create a split personality," he wrote
angrly. "I'll tear them apart."
He was, indeeda looking forward to the hearing on his mental
capabilities* positive that he could tear down all that the diagnostic
team had constructed in the three months just past.
Ted had begun to enter into the legal fight for his own freedom, and
his participation would escalate over the years ahead. He was "up,"
confident that his mind, his intelligence,
Page 228
206
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
could surpass whatever the psychiatric examination purported to reveal.
I think he truly believed that, through his own rhetoric, he would be
free. Ted did make his statements to Judge Hanson. As he made his plea,
he was the cocky, witty Ted, the man so removed from the facts that
the whole situation was ridiculous. It was a posture that would irritate
several judges and juries in his future court wranglings, but it was
seemingly an attitude necessary for the survival of his ego. I have
always felt that Ted would, literally, rather die than be
humiliated-would face life in prison or the electric chair before
humbling himself in any way.
At the hearing, Ted was scornful as he attacked the arrests in August
and October of 1975. He admitted to a certain "strangeness" of behavior
when he'd been confronted by Sergeant Bob Hay ward, but could see no
connection with his actions, with the contents of his car, and the
DaRonch kidnapping. He had had no alibi for the night of November 8,
1974, and he argued, "If I cannot remember precisely what occurred on
a date which is now eighteen and one half months prior to my arrest
for kidnapping, it is because my memory does not improve with time.
It is safe to say what I was not doing, however. I was not having heart
surgery, nor was I taking ballet lessons, nor was I in Mexico, nor was
I abducting a complete stranger at gunpoint. There are just some things
a person does not forget and just some things a person is not inclined
to do under any circumstances."
Then Ted was sentenced on June 30th, despite his tearful plea that his
being in prison would serve no purpose. "Someday, who knows when, five
or ten or more years in the future, when the time comes when I can leave,
I suggest you ask yourself where we are, what's been accomplished, was
the sacrifice of my life worth it all? Yes, I will be a candidate for
rehabilitation. But not for what I have done, but for what the system
has done to me."
He drew a comparatively light sentence. One to fifteen years. Because
no other charges of such magnitude had been brought against him, he
was sentenced under provisions for a lesser second-degree felony. All
things being equal, he could hope to be paroled as quickly as eighteen
Page 229
months hence.
But, of course, all things were not equal. The investigation into the
murder of Caryn Campbell in Aspen, Colorado was accelerating.
Investigator Mike Fisher had the credit card slips, and he had received
word from the FBI lab's criminalTHE STRANGER BESIDE ME
207
ist, Bob Neill, that, among the hairs found when Ted's Volkswagen was
processed and vacuumed, were hairs that were microscopically alike in
class and characteristic to not one-but three-of Bundy's suspected
victims: Caryn Campbell. Melissa Smith, and Carol DaRonch.
Hairs are not as individual as fingerprints, yet Bob Neill, a FBI crime
lab expert for two decades, stated he had never found three victims'
purported hairs in one spot before. "The chances of three different
hair samples being so microscopically alike and not belonging to the
victims are one in 20,-
000. I've never seen anything like it."
One Washington detective mentioned to me that the crowbar found in Ted's
car matched the depression in Caryn Campbell's skull. There was said
to be an eye witness, the woman who had seen the strange young man in
a second floor corridor of the Wildwood Inn minutes before Caryn vanished.
The word among law enforcement networks was that the Colorado case was
much stronger than the Utah kj1napping case had been.
If Ted was aware of the burgeoning Colorado case, and I suspect he was,
he was still more caught up in the emotions that lingered after the
sentencing in Utah when he wrote to me on July 2, 1976. That letter
was classic in that it was the evaluation by the subject himself-an
honors psychology graduate-of the psychiatric evaluation done on him.
The letter was typed, typed on an ancient machine with letters clotted
with ink, but Ted's pride in his hour-and-ahalf dissection of the
psychiatric evaluation transcended the blurred pages.
I was whistling in the wind, yet in a curious sort of way, I felt a
Page 230
deep sense of fulfillment. I felt relaxed but emphatic; controlled,
but sincere and filled with emotion. It didn't matter who was listening,
although I desired each word to strike the Judge as forcefully as
possible. Briefly, all too briefly, I was myself again, amongst free
people, usinf all the skill I could muster, fighting the only way I
know how: with words and logic. And all too briefly, I was testing the
dream of being an attorney.
He knew he had lost, but he blamed that loss on the police, the
prosecutors, the judge, on what he termed "the weak208
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
nesses of men who were too timid, too blind, too frightened, to accept
the cruel deception of the state's case."
The psychiatric diagnoses had concluded that Ted Bundy was not psychotic,
neurotic, the victim of organic brain disease, alcoholic, addicted to
drugs, suffering from a character disorder or amnesia, and was not a
sexual deviate.
Ted quoted DT. Austin the psychiatrist, the one member of
the team whom he had thought most forthright: "I feel that Mr. Bundy
is either a man who has no problems or is smart enough and clever enough
to appear close to the edge of 'normal.' . . . Since it has been determined
by the Court that he is not telling the truth regarding the present
crime, I seriously question if he can be expected to tell the truth
regarding participation in any program or probation agreement."
Ted's conclusion was that Judge Hanson had swayed the entire evaluation
by bis originaJ verdict, and that the diagnostic team had merely groomed
their report to match the verdict.
Carlisle had evidently concluded that Ted was a "private person," one
not known intimately by others. "When one tries to know him, he becomes
evasive."
"Ann, think of me as you know me," Ted wrote. "Yes, I am a private person
but so what . . . and the part about being someone incapable of being
Page 231
intimate ... is absurd."
Ted had been given the California Life Goals Evaluation Schedules test.
His answers had shown that he had six goals:
To have freedom from want.
To control the actions of others.
To guide others with their consent.
To avoid boredom. '
To be self-fulfilled.
To live one's life one's own way.
None of these goals could be considered abnormal, and Ted was quick
to point that out to me in his letter. He admitted readily that he was
insecure, as Dr. Carlisle had suggested, and that perhaps he tried to
structure his relationships with other people.
"Again, think of me, our Crisis Clinic days and more recently our
conversations during our meetings in Seattle. It is entirely possible
that I do structure my relationships with
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
209
other people, maybe not consciously, but there must be some order in
my life."
One of the conclusions that galled Ted the most was that Dr. Carlisle
had found Ted to have a strong dependency on •women, and deduced that
that dependency was suspect.
"That I am dependent on you women has got to mean
Something. V/hat thcmgVi? 1 am
-undenïaV>ly dependent
or»
women. Given birth by a woman, taught in school by women, and deeply,
deeply in love with one woman. I ask any woman with whom I have been
involved, socially, professionally, or intimately, to look at our
relationship. Was I some twisted mass of nerves . . . subjugating myself
to superior womanhood?"
Page 232
Carlisle had found that Ted had a fear of being humiliated in his
relationships with women, and Ted sardonically confessed a: "personal
distaste for being put down and hvb miliated . . . Draw whatever
inferences you must, but, like Brer Rabbit, throw me in that briar patch
[female companionship] any time you want. We are still a long way from
running about scooping up teenage girls."
For every conclusion that Dr. Carlisle asserted, Ted had a comeback.
He denied that he "ran from his problems," or that he was unstable,
pointing out his amazing strength under the rigors of the DaRonch trial,
and his ability to function under stress. No one could fault him there.
Ted continued in his incisive critique. Citing Carlisle's report, he
could not agree that the profile emerging was, as the psychologist noted,
"consistent with the nature of the crime for which he was convicted."
"If this is true, (Ted wrote) there are a lot of potential kidnappers
running around loose out there . . . The conclusion is preposterous
and indicative of the strenuous attempt to satisfy the presumptions
underlying the verdict. The report was a despicable fraud."
Ted's pain and hopelessness came through in the last paragraphs of that
long, long letter.
"I am exhausAd. The bitter reality has dawned, but the full impact of
my fate has not been fully understood. Since the sentence was handed
down, the first flashes of intense anger and despair have grown out
of the knowledge that Meg and I shall never have a life together. The
most beautiful force in my life has been separated from me."
He asked me to share the letter with Meg, explaining that
210
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
it was the first he had written since being sentenced, and asked me
to comfort her. "There can never be any goodbyes for Meg and I, but
I weep bitterly to think that there can be no more hellos."
I was mightily impressed by Ted's ability to think like a lawyer, in
the polished order of his evaluation. His I.Q. had been tested at the
Page 233
Utah State Prison and found to be 124not on the genius level, about
what a student in a four-year college needs to graduate-but he was
clearly superior to the test results. My loyalties wavered once again.
It would always be so.
And yet, even as I read Ted's declaration of his great love for Meg,
I was aware that he seemed to be able to dismiss his concurrent
relationships with other women. If he could not be faithful to Meg,
how could I fully believe in his steadfast love for her? It was so hard
for me to know. Despite my dream, despite the bombardment of opinions
from lawmen, there were still so many facets of his story that were
hidden from me, and still that chance that Ted was being railroaded.
If he was manipulating me, he was doing an excellent job of it
24
While Ted had been sentenced in the DaRonch kidnapping, it had been
the most minor of the crimes he was suspected of, and, although Colorado
authorities seemed to be putting a case together in the Campbell slaying,
Washington State detectives were supremely frustrated.
In the fall of 1975, Captain Herb Swindler had been transferred out
of the Seattle Police Crimes Against Persons Unit and became commander
of the Georgetown Precinct in the South End of Seattle. There were rumors
that Herb's preoccupation with psychics and astrologers, in all the
occult possibilities in the mass killings, had begun to annoy the brass.
With the reassignment to Georgetown, Herb would be out of the missing
girls' cases for all intents and purposes; his duties would involve
supervising the uniformed contingent of patrolmen in his precinct now.
It was still a position calling for a high ranking officer and one with
uncommon good sense, but Herb's contact with detectives would be minimal.
And the hierarchy upstairs in the Public Safety Building would no longer
hear tales of Swindler's bizarre investigative techniques.
It was not a slap in the face, it was more the gentle rapping of knuckles.
Swindler had been the only detective who had believed that Kathy Parks
of Oregon was part of the Seattle pattern-and he'd been right. It was
Page 234
September, 1975 when he'd been transferred out of the probe, ironically
only a few weeks before Ted's arrest.
Swindler's replacement, Captain John Leitch, is a tall, blond veteran
cop-*-a man my age, and a man of some brilliance. Herb had liked to
talk over everything that was happening; Leitch was as close-mouthed
as a Sphinx, and leery of me. In time, he would come to regard me with
a certain grudging trust and took delight in teasing me about my
"boyfriend, Ted." But, in 1976, John Leitch and I circled each other
somewhat warily. I found him a solid administta211
212
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
tor, who left the detectives in his unit alone to do their work, a
cerebral kind of policeman. I don't know what he thought of me, although
he tended to view me as part of the media rather than an ex-cop myself.
I liked him, but he intimidated me.
He, on the other hand, was very concerned that I might be regarded as
a "police agent" in the Ted Bundy transactions. He needn't have worried;
it was a role I most assuredly did not want to play. I was still walking
the tightrope between Ted and the detectives, a rope that seemed to
wend over higher and higher precipices. It was imperative that I continue
to write fact-detective stories, and any breach of faith with a police
agency would mean the end of that. Neither did I want to be disloyal
to Ted, although it was becoming more and more difficult not to believe
that Ted was the man the police sought.
Nick Mackie, over in the county offices, had known me for so long that
I wasn't much of a threat. During most of the spring and summer of 1976,
we met sporadically to talk about Ted. Ted knew it, because I continued
to forward messages from Mackie. At times, he grew churlish about my
suggestion that he talk to the King County commander, but he never seemed
truly angry about it.
Although Mackie never revealed to me exactly what the detectives had
Page 235
on Ted, he tried continually to convince me that they were right. I
don't know how many times he asked me with some exasperation, "Come
on. Admit it. You really think he's guilty, don't you?"
And I would always answer, "I don't know. I just don't know. Sometimes
I'm sure he's guilty, and then, again, sometimes I wonder."
On two or three occasions my discussions with Mackie continued through
lunch and far into the afternoon. Both of us were searching for answers
that seemed always just beyond reach.
I was quite sure of one thing; after writing up at least a dozen cases
in the Northwest dealing with "mass" killers of young women in the eight
years preceding, I felt that the 'Ted" had "souvenirs" hidden someplace,
that he had kept a trophy from each killing.
"Nick, I think that somewhere, he's hidden earrings, clothing, possibly
even polaroids, something from each girl. I've
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
213
never found a case similar where the suspect didn't keep momentoes."
"I agree-but where? We've been through the Rogers's rooming house-the
attic, the garage, and we've dug up the garden. We didn't find anything."
Of course, the elder Bundys had absolutely refused to allow their Tacoma
home to be searched', nor would they permit a search of the grounds
of their A-frame cabin vacation home on Crescent Lake. Senior Deputy
Prosecutor Phil Killien had advised Mackie that there was not sufficient
probable cause to obtain a search warrant for those properties. His
inability to search for physical evidence to tie Ted in with the
Washington cases-particularly at the Crescent Lake location-tormented
Mackie. I didn't blame him, but without a search warrant anything
detectives found would be considered "fruit of the poisoned tree," that
is, inadmissible as evidence in a court of law because it would have
been obtained illegally. If Keppel or Dunn-or McChesney-were to go to
the A-frame cottage and find something like Georgeann Hawkins's purse,
or Janice Ott's bike, or Lynda Healy's turquoise rings, it would be
Page 236
absolutely useless. Tainted evidence. I had had that concept hammered
into my head when I'd taken a course entitled, "Arrest, Search, and
Seizure."
Mackie mused. "We can't go-but I wish someone could, that someone could
just bring us in one piece of physical evidence."
And, indeed, that was the only way it would be admissible. If I, myself,
were to search any private property Ted was known to frequent-after
this conversation with Nick-anything I found would be "fruit of the
poisoned tree;" I would be an extension of the arm of the police
department, because I had never considered searching on my own.
The detectives' hands were tied. The rules of the justice system in
criminal investigations are so intricate, and most of them seem to be
weighted heavily on the side of the suspect.
It was unlikely that Ted Bundy would ever be charged or tried in the
Washington homicide cases. There was nothing more than the dozens of
circumstances that seemed to defy probability.
Months later, when Captain John Leitch felt free to talk to me with
cautious candor, he concurred that he felt the same way. It was his
opinion that the only way Ted might be tried for the Washington cases
would be if the eight cases were
214
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
combined. "If all the known facts came out, on all the girls up here,
I think there would be a conviction. But that seems to be the only way."
And no defense attorney would allow the Northwest cases to be lumped
together. John Henry Browne would fight like a tiger if such a suggestion
arose.
25
Page 237
Caught in the Utah State Prison, Ted's ego seemingly remained intact.
Our letters continued, in that odd intimacy that is sometimes maintained
through the written word, an intimacy, and, occasionally, an honesty
that is more difficult to keep alive in a face-to-face situation. If
I could manage to suspend disbelief, I could continue to support him-if
not wholeheartedly, then through my letters. The truth was caught
somewhere, suspended, in an intricate cobweb of suspicion, denial, and
continuing investigation.
I kept in touch with Meg too, and found her to be gathering new resolve;
she signed up for some evening classes, started looking for a home to
buy. And she was becoming increasingly suspicious of Ted's ties to Sharon
Auer. When Louise Bundy returned from Ted's sentencing, she had made
the tactical error of repeating over and over to Meg her feelings that
Sharon was a "lovely person." Meg had finally deduced that Sharon was
much more to Ted than an errand girl. When I spoke to her in August,
1976, Meg was vacillating between saying good-bye to Ted forever-not
because of the charges against him, but because he had lied to her about
Sharon-and continuing to support him with her love. She mailed him one
letter to pave the way for a break, and then was instantly sorry, "I've
been rethinking it ... maybe I was too hasty."
Ted spent that summer in prison, becoming more acclimated to confinement;
I didn't hear from him again until August 25th. I hadlsuggested to him
that I pass his letter on his feelings about the psychiatric report
on to Nick Mackie, a suggestion that was not met with glee. Yet, this
letter, arriving eight weeks after the outraged "evaluation" letter,
seemed to reflect the emotions of a man who was getting it together
again.
He was pleased to note that he had a new typewriter,
215
216
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
earned, he said, when he wrote his first writ after being moved into
Page 238
the general population of the prison.
"General Population is the faceless mass of real prisoners we fish are
always afraid were trying to rape us, and worse, steal our commissary.
They were greatly overrated; they never steal commissary," Ted wrote.
Indeed, he was doing well among the general population. He had been
afraid to move among these cons-cons for whom any man convicted of crimes
against women or children is anathema, the lowest rung in prison
hierarchy. Such men are often beaten, raped, or killed. But no one had
threatened Ted, and he said he could move about the entire prison without
fear because he had something of value to give the inmates of
Point-of-the-Mountain: legal advice. He was often stopped and asked
to help other prisoners prepare their appeals for new trials. Just as
he had told me during my visit when he was still a "fish," he would
survive because of his brain.
Further, he was something of a celebrity, and his outspoken defense
in his own legal encounters had impressed prison leaders. The old-timers
made a point of being seen with Ted, of putting their stamp of approval
on him.
"I think they also enjoy seeing a once-Republican, oncelaw student,
one-time white-middle-class member attack the system as vigorously as
they think it deserves," he commented. "I keep in close touch with the
blacks and the Chicanos and my work for men in these groups has helped
my image. One thing I have successfully avoided is the 'Wholly
(sic)-than-thou; I'm so smart-I shouldn't be here with you criminals'
image."
His days were spent working in the prison printshop, listening to other
prisoners' grievances, and "wishing I were not here." He seemed happy
to report that Meg was becoming more independent, even though it meant
she didn't write to him as often as before, but he was looking forward
to a visit from her on August 28th.
However, Ted had not become completely mellow; he launched into an
harangue directed at Nick Mackie and other members of the law enforcement
field. He did not want Mackie to read his letter on the psychiatric
evaluation, although he forgave me for suggesting it.
I think you should know where I stand on the subject of
Page 239
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
217
policemen in general and Mackie in particular. Policemen have a job,
a difficult job, to do, but I am sorry because I don't care one bit
for the "job" they did on me no matter how genuine the devotion to duty.
I have a standing policy from this point forward never to talk to a
law enforcement officer about anything except the time of day and the
location of the toilet. Mackie has earned my particular disrespect.
True, he may be a good cop, feeds his dog Alpo, and doesn't eat his
young alive, but my empathy for him ends there.
Someday, Ted said, he would be interested to hear the "monstrous theory"
held by the King County Police Department, but he was not presently
interested in "story book fiction." He asked me to continue to stay
in touch with Meg, and to "tell Mackie only that he has earned a special
place in my heart, as I have probably earned one in his."
Ted's letters that summer and fall of 1976 ranged from the anger and
humor of this one, to requests for information, to the blackest lines
of depression. The mood swings, given his circumstances, were to be
expected. His bid to remain free pending his appeal had been denied,
and the Colorado murder charge hovered just ahead.
There were several letters where he asked me to check out the credentials
of Northwest reporters who were attempting to interview him. I tracked
most of them to their sources and reported that they seemed to be
essentially innocuous writers from small publications.
Something happened to Ted's stability during the first week of September,
something that seemed to make him despair completely. Reconstructing
the time sequence later, I deduced that Meg had said something to him
during their August 28th visit that made him think he had lost her
forever.
The letter Ted sent me on September 5th was typed on the cover from
a pad of typewriter paper, and its contents seemed steeped in the
bleakest loss of hope. It could not be interpreted as ^ything other
than a suicide note, and it frightened me.
Page 240
Ted explained that the letter was like a call to the Crisis Clinic,
but that there could be no reply. "I am not asking for help, I am saying
goodbye."
He wrote that he could no longer struggle for justice, that he was not
having just a bad day, but that he had reached "the end of all hope,
the darkening of all dreams."
218
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
The letter as a whole-each sentence in it-could only mean one thing.
Ted planned to kill himself: "What I am experiencing now is an entirely
new dimension of loneliness mixed with resignation and calm. Unlike
times of low morale I have survived in the past, I know I will not wake
up in the morning refreshed and revived. I will wake up knowing only
what has to be done-if I have the courage."
As my eyes raced down the page, I felt the hairs on the back of my neck
stand up; it might already be too late. He'd written this three days
before.
The last sentences were a plea to the world who believed him guilty
of any number of terrible crimes against women: "Lastly, and most
important, I want you to know, I want the whole world to know that I
am innocent. I have never hurt another human being in my life. God,
please believe me."
Although he had said the letter could have no answer, I remembered that
Ted and I had both had been taught at the Crisis Clinic that any contact
made by someone in emotional distress-any reaching out-must be regarded
as a cry for help. Ted had written to me, and I had to assume that meant
he wanted me to stop him from destroying himself. I called Bruce Cummins,
our long-ago mentor at the Clinic, and read him the letter. He agreed
that I had to take some action.
I called John O'Connell's office in Salt Lake City. It was either that
or notify Warden Sam Smith's office in the prison, and Ted had better
friends in his lawyer's office. I reached Bruce Lubeck and told him
Page 241
that I feared Ted was about to kill himself. He promised to go out to
Point-of-the-Mountain and see Ted.
I don't know if he went or not. I wrote a special delivery letter, a
letter full of "Hang in there's" and sent it, holding my breath for
days, expecting to hear a news bulletin.
It never came.
Instead, on September 26th, Ted wrote me a letter that was a partial
explanation. He referred obliquely to hanging himself, but assured me
that he was "hanging in there with nothing but my soul, I will add to
your relief."
Apparently, it was not my letter that had turned him around, but a session
of handball which he'd found to be an effective method of catharsis.
"It (handball) has a curious way of draining the bitterness away. Or
perhaps it's the body's way of asserting itself over the destructive
impulses of the mind, temporarily mindless of
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
219
the body's uncompromising, unquestioning, eternal desire to survive.
The body may only appear as host to the brain, but the intellect, fragile
and selfish, is no match for the imperative of life itself. Hanging
around, intangibly, is better than being tangibly nothing at all."
Ted apologized for alarming me; I wonder if he realized how very upset
I had been to receive that suicide note, if he remembered how guilty
I'd felt because I hadn't been able to save my own brother's life when
he'd reached the point of suicidal thoughts.
Ted had decided to live, and, with this decision, his anger and bravado
burst forth in his ensuing letters.
Again and again, he castigated the police. "Police detectives are a
curious breed, but one learns quickly that when they have something
they act first and talk later ... I never underestimate the inventiveness
and dangerousness of such men. Like wild animals, when cornered they
can become very unstable."
Page 242
Ted had reason to fear the "dangerousness" of police detectives. On
October 22, almost exactly a year since he had been charged in the DaRonch
kidnapping case in Utah, he was formally charged with the murder of
Caryn Campbell in Pitkin County, Colorado. I suspect that he was as
eager to confront his accusers as he told me he was. His strength in
the face of attack seemed to be real, as it would always be. The overt
challenges he could face; he was best on his feet, scornfully denying
charges against him.
However, it is possible that Ted had not planned to be around when those
charges finally came down. On October
19th, Ted had not returned to his cell from the yard. Warden Sam Smith
announced that Ted had been discovered behind a bush, and that he'd
had an "escape kit" on his person: a social security card, a sketch
of a driver's license, road maps, and notes on airplane schedules.
Ted had written that his "pristine" behavior had allowed him more freedom
around the prison, and now there was speculation that,|with his job
in the printshop, he might have intended to print up phony identification
papers. He was immediately placed in solitary confinement. In
retrospect, viewing Ted's propensity for escape that was to surface
in the months ahead, it is likely that he had planned an escape from
Point-of-the-Mountain, an escape that was aborted.
On October 26th I received a letter from Sharon Auer,
220
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
who enclosed a brief note that Ted had sent her to send to me. Sharon
was still very much a part of his life, even though his letters to me
extolled no one but Meg. Sharon was horrified at the maximum security
cell where Ted was being held, although her impressions of the "hole"
were based on Ted's description of it as he was allowed no visitors.
Ted had written to her that he envisioned his cell as something
resembling a Mexican prison. "Eight feet high, ten feet long, six feet
wide. Two feet in from the front are steel bars running from floor to
Page 243
ceiling. A solid steel door-with only a peephole for the guard to look
in-closes off the front of the cell. The walls have graffiti, vomit,
and urine coating them."
Ted's bed was a concrete slab with a thin mattress, and the only item
of hope in the cell was a crucifix hanging over the wash basin. He could
have nothing to read, but was allowed to receive letters. He would be
there fifteen days, and Sharon was angry that he had received this
harshest punishment possible for such a minor infraction as having a
social security card on his person. She wrote that she was trying to
write him three or four letters a day. "The bastards may not let me
visit, but they're sure going to tire of carrying mail to him ..."
Reading her letter, I was again bemused and somewhat dismayed at what
the denouement might one day be when those two women who loved Ted
realized they had been deluded into believing that each was the only
one. And I? I made up the third corner of the three-woman network giving
Ted emotional support. I had managed to remain relatively unscathed.
Tom by conflicting feelings and doubts still-but 7 was not in love with
Ted. Sharon and Meg were.
Ted wrote to me from solitary confinement on Halloween. He said he had
had only a woman's social security card, and not the kind used for
identification, and blamed Warden Smith for blowing the circumstances
out of proportion. I never found out what woman's name was on that card.
Ted was angry, but he was not chastened.
Adversity of this kind only serves to make me stronger, especially when
it is clear to me that it is designed to create the pressure some believe
will shatter my "normal facade." How absurd. Said one prisoner, when
he heard of the decision to place me in isolation, "They're trying f
to break ya, Bundy. Yeah, they're just tryin' to break
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME 221
ya." I couldn't have agreed with him more, but since there is nothing
to "break," I'll have to suffer instead. The fact that some persons
continue to misjudge me has become almost humorous.
Page 244
Ted commented on the Colorado case only to the extent that he insisted
he was innocent of any involvement. He hinted that he had documents
that would destroy Colorado's case. "The Colorado trial will mark the
beginning of the end of a myth."
He said he had sent me a note via Meg-which was a slip because it had
not been Meg who forwarded it, but Sharon. And he chided me gently for
living in luxury in my new house, for writing to him on my new
personalized stationery. "Personalized stationery is one of the small
but truly necessary luxuries of life."
Ted was attempting to push my guilt buttons. I was free, and living
in splendor, and he was in the "hole." I refused to take the bait, and
wrote back,
You said you'd given the message for me to Meg-but it was Sharon who
sent me one. You probably just misspoke yourself. Don't go getting the
two of them confused or you'll be in hot water! While you're envying
my security, remember you have two members of the opposite sex in love
with you, and I haven't got any. Fortunately, I've been so busy lately
with work, housing, and the kids' problems, there hasn't been much time
to ponder this glaring lack. I am still sleeping with my typewriter
and it's still cold, lumpy and unresponsive.
Ted's reply came after his extradition arraignment on the Colorado
murder charge, an arraignment that took place on his thirtieth birthday.
I had sent him two humorous birthday cards (explaining that Hallmark
didn't put out a card specifically for his prlflicament: "Hi there . . .
Happy Thirtieth Birthday and Haopy Arraignment."). He had chosen to
view his situation witfi wry, angry humor and I geared my responses
to that.
Ted wrote after the extradition hearing that he had drawn the largest
crowd of reporters he'd seen in one place since his ordeal began, and
he denigrated the press's sense of fairplay and justice "-since it has
none." He assured me that the
222
Page 245
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
"eye witness" in Aspen was of no consequence since she had picked out
his picture a full year after the Campbell disappearance.
Although Ted's extradition arraignment on November 24,
1976 had drawn a flock of reporters, he was not the most famous prisoner
in the Utah State Prison that week. It was a fellow convict-Gary
Gilmore-a convicted murderer with a death wish, who made the cover of
Newsweek on November 29th. Compared to Gary Gilmore, Ted was decidedly
second string news. It would not always be so.
Gilmore was an habitual criminal who had shot two young men during
robberies, and he had a kind of bitter mystique about him. He too was
involved in a doomed romance with a woman who seemed as bedazzled and
driven as Ted's Meg was. The tragic child-woman, Nicole Barrett, who
had entered into an abortive suicide pact with Gary Gilmore, reminded
me of Meg in her obsession with her lover-but Ted apparently saw no
correlation at all between his romance and Gilmore's and detested the
other man for his manipulation of Nicole. He had studied Gary and Nicole
when they met in the visitors' area.
"The Gilmore situation grows curiouser and curiouser. Have seen him
on occasion in the visiting room with Nicole. I'll never forget the
deep love and anguish in her eyes. Gilmore, however, is misguided,
unstable, and selfish . . . The media preys on this Romeo and Juliet
saga. Tragic. Irreconcilable."
Nor did Ted have anything good to say about Gilmore's legal advisors.
Ted had little time to ruminate on the "saga" of Gary and Nicole; he
was busy reviewing and indexing 700 pages of testimony from the DaRonch
trial, and, at the same time, studying Colorado criminal law. After
reviewing the Utah trial, he could not see how the judge could have
found him guilty, and he was sure that there would be no guilty verdict
in Colorado.
"I feel like a general conducting a battle, not General Custer either,"
he wrote enthusiastically. "Legally, I am on very solid ground!"
Ted never failed to comment on what was happening back in my world,
even if it meant only a sentence or two at the end of his letters. This
time, he wrote:
Page 246
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
223
I am anxious that Cosmopolitan et al return payment so you'll be able
to rent a helicopter and get me out of here. The prison maintains, falsely,
that I had airline schedules. Can you imagine! If I were foolish enough
to go to an airport, I certainly wouldn't give a damn which flight I
jumped on as long as I was assured the plane could take off and land.
Doing well, battling like hell. You know what it takes for the tough
to get going.
love, ted,
The talk of escape, however flippant, had begun to flash a warning light
on and off like a subliminal message on a television screen, hidden
among Ted's discussions of legal battles. But then, all prisoners dream
of escape, and all of them talk about it-the possibilities, the odds.
A miniscule number actually try.
Ted had mentioned that he would be "having a change of scenery" and
that meant that one day he would stop fighting extradition to Colorado,
but he would do it in his own good time; he had much research to do
first. There was no more money for lawyers, nothing more to be counted
on from family and friends in Washington, and that meant he would be
in the hands of public defenders. More and more, he was seizing his
own legal destiny; like the Little Red Hen, he would do it himself.
Almost from the moment I moved into my new home, leaving the sea and
the wind to take over the little beach house we'd vacated, my writing
fortunes took an upward turn. I had assignments from Cosmopolitan, Good
Housekeeping, and Ladies Home Journal. After years with the pulps, I'd
finally broken into the "slicks." Interestingly enough, all my
assignments had to do with victims of violent crimes; the American public,
in 1976, had finally begun to show concern for the fate of crime victims.
Too many people had become victims or knew victims. Because I'd been
busy moving and meeting publishing deadlines, I had not written to Ted
for threlfe or four weeks, and I got a rather plaintively hostile letter
from him in mid-December.
Page 247
Dear Ann,
I surrender. Did I say something offensive? Worse yet,
is my breath offensive? Have my letters been stolen by
224 THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
the C.I.A. and you think I don't write you anymore so you don't write
to me? Am I too hopeless a case? (Don't answer that.) I can take it.
Yessiree, never let it be said that I lost my cool just because my friends
have forgotten me.
It was not a happy season for Ted. For the first time, he was behind
bars at Christmastime. Only a year before, we had sat together at the
Brasserie Pittsbourg; it seemed that twenty years had passed.
Ted's letter was his Christmas message, poems scrawled on the lined
paper.
This note must do as my Christmas card to you; a way of thanking you
for the merriment you have brought into my life, not to mention the
life-sustaining support. Now all I need is one of those quaint verses
that all the store-bought cards have:
May Santa's reindeer be so kind Not to leave their droppings On your
roof.
It's here!
Don't pretend you couldn't tell.
If you're not into Christmas
Catch the first train to hell.
So just tack up those house lightsi
And mummify the tree
Don't forget, without Christmas cards
You'd never hear from me.
The final poem was a departure from the bitterness of the first two-a
religious poem. Ted often referred to God in his letters, although he
had never mentioned Hun in any of our conversations outside prison walls.
I wrote immediately, and then called Meg to learn that she was on her
way to Utah for Christmas and yet another reunion with Ted. I hoped
Page 248
that this visit would not be the catalyst for a renewed spate of dark
depression for Ted as her last trip to Utah had been. His days at
Point-of-the-Mountain were growing short; he would have to make the
decision
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
225
about going to Colorado soon. His name was still not well known in
Aspen-except to policemen. Claudine Longet's murder trial was set in
Aspen in January, and she was reaping the big headlines.
Evidently Meg's Christmas visit was more successful than their meeting
in August had been. Ted wrote me two days before Christmas, describing
their visit. "She came to me yesterday. In a visit so short and sweet,
I am reunited with the missing element in my life. Seeing her is a glimpse
of heaven. Touching her gave me a belief in miracles. So often I had
dreamed of her that seeing her for real was a dazzling experience. She
is gone again, and, again, I feel her absence in each unconscious
moment."
He recalled the fight that he and Meg had had after I'd driven him to
the Crisis Clinic Christmas party in 1972. After I had dumped him in
his inebriated state at the Rogers's rooming house, he had gone to his
room and fallen fast asleep.
"Meg and I had had an argument and she was scheduled to fly out early
the next morning. She decided to stop by before the flight, kiss and
make up ... she threw rocks at my window and called me . . . Believing
that I would have awoken if I was there, she rushed away heartbroken
because she thought I was 'sleeping' with someone else. She has never
fully believed my fervent assurances that I was in a deep, intoxicated
sleep. I have never told her that I went with you to a party."
But, of course, / had told Meg on the night we met in December, 1973.
Perhaps Ted hadn't heard me explain, or perhaps he had forgotten.
Ted wrote that he was trying to bring the Christmas spirit into his
cell, putting all his Christmas cards on his desk. He had even bought
Page 249
and wrapped presents for his "neighbors." The presents were tins of
smoked oysters and Snickers bars. "Now I am attempting the impossible:
suggesting all us hardened cons skig carols on Christmas Eve. Thus far,
I have been designated a sicko degenerate for such a perverse idea."
As far as I caf determine, this Christmas of 1976 would be the last
such holiday that Ted and Meg would share, even separated by mesh screens
in a visitors' room. And yet, she seemed to be more than a love to him;
she seemed to be a life force itself.
"What I feel for Meg is the ultimate omnipresent emotion. I feel her
living inside me. I feel her giving me life when
226 THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
there is no other reason for it than appreciating the gift of life
itself."
Ted enclosed a witness list for the Campbell trial in Colorado, pointing
out that many names were misspelled. And he ended his Christmas letter:
As for the New Year, it is going to start out so bad that it will have
to get better. Perhaps if you put some Chablis in Hawaiian Punch cans
and send me a case for the New Year, I can forget the ominous beginnings.
But what the hellHappy New Year.
love, ted.
Ted would be leaving Utah for the last time on January
28th, headed for Colorado. He sent me a brief note on the
25th, telling me not to write again until he contacted me from his "new
address."
The year ahead-1977-would bring tremendous upheavals in Ted's life,
and in mine. I doubt that either of us could have possibly envisioned
what lay ahead.
26
Page 250
On January 28, 1977, Ted was removed from the Utah State Prison, spirited
by car to Aspen, Colorado, and placed in a cell in the antique Pitkin
County Jail. He had a new judicial adversary: District Judge George
H. Lohr, but Lohr didn't appear all that tough. After all, he had just
sentenced Claudine Longet to a modest thirty days in jail for shooting
"Spider" Sabich. Claudine would begin her sentence in April in the same
jail, although her cell would be freshly painted for her and friends
would cater in noninstitutional food.
Sheriff Dick Keinast was leery of Bundy and argued that he was an escape
risk, because of the escape kit that had been allegedly discovered on
him in the Utah prison. He wanted Ted to be handcuffed during his court
appearances, but Lohr overruled him and declared that Ted could wear
civilian clothing and appear unfettered.
The ancient courthouse which housed the jail had been built in 1887,
and offered spartan accommodations, but Ted liked the change from the
looming walls of the Utah prison.
When I phoned him in February, I was pleased and surprised to find that
the Pitkin County Jail was operated much like the jail under my
grandfather's jurisdiction so many years before in Michigan. It was
a "Mom and Pop" jail where I called, heard a deputy yell down the hall,
and then Ted's voice on the line. He sounded happy, relaxed, and
confident.
Throughout hfc eleven-month stay in Colorado, I would speak with Ted
frequently by phone. When he would assume more and more of his own defense,
he would be allowed free phone privileges to help in preparing his case.
Many of these calls, however, would be to me and other friends, and
there was seemingly no limit put on the time he spent on long distance
calls.
I can remember Bob Keppel and Roger Dunn shaking
227
*
Page 251
228
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
their heads at Ted's nerve combined with his easy access to a phone.
"You aren't gonna believe this," Keppel told me one day when I was in
the King County Major Crimes offices. "Guess who called us up?"
Of course, it had been Ted, brazenly phoning two of his most dedicated
trackers to get information that he wanted for his Colorado defense.
"What did you tell him?" I asked Keppel.
"I told him that I'd be glad to trade information. If he wanted to talk
with us, to ask questions, well, we had a couple of questions we'd been
wanting to ask him for a long time. He didn't want to discuss our
questions though. He was just calling us up as if he were a defense
lawyer gathering facts. I can't believe his gall."
Ted called me often too. I was awakened many mornings around eight to
hear the sound of Ted's voice, calling from Colorado.
There were not many letters, but I did get one mailed on February 24th.
It was a happy letter. He was enjoying the vacationlike atmosphere of
Aspen, even though he was in a jail cell. "I feel super. . . . Feel
no pressure from the case. I mean no pressure... . They are
beaten."
Ted deemed Pitkin County a "Mickey Mouse operation," and he was
particularly scornful of Pitkin County District Attorney, Frank Tucker.
Tucker was attempting, he wrote, to find areas of commonality between
the Colorado killing and the Utah cases, and trying to gain insight
into Ted's personality. Ted felt he could see completely through
Tucker's case, and that he, the defendant, was a threat to the D.A.
because of his self-confidence. "This man should never play poker. And
from what I saw of him the other day, this man should never enter a
courtroom."
Ted quoted from an interview D.A. Tucker had given about him.
"He (Ted) is the most cocky person I have ever faced. He tells his lawyer
what to do. He arrives carrying armloads of books, as if he were an
attorney himself. He sends notes to the judge and calls him at night.
He refuses to talk to me or any other prosecutor."
It was, of course, exactly the image Ted wished to promulgate. "Flattery
will get him nowhere. His story touches my heart but someone should
Page 252
tell him I didn't ask to come to
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
229
Colorado. Imagine, the nerve of me telling my attorneys what to do!
Never called a judge at night in my life."
Ted expected that he would get a fair trial in Aspen, and that it would
not be difficult to pick an impartial jury in Pitkin County. He
encouraged me to come for that trial if I could, and thought that the
trial date would be set for sometime in early summer.
As I read this letter, this letter where Ted seemed so in control, I
remembered the young man who had cried "I want my freedom!" from that
first jail cell in Salt Lake County. He was no longer afraid; he had
acclimated to his incarceration and he was reveling in the prospect
of the fight ahead. The letter closed with, "We are looking at a trial
date in late June or early July-God willing and the D.A. doesn't shit
in his expensive trousers."
Yes, Ted had changed radically from the outraged, desperate man who
wrote to me from jail in Salt Lake City eighteen months before. There
was an asperity, a caustic bitterness now. I detected it in his phone
calls to me. He hated policemen, prosecutors, the press. It was, perhaps,
a natural progression for a man so long behind bars, for a man still
proclaiming his innocence. He no longer talked or wrote to me about
writing anything himself.
Although he hated the food in the Pitkin County Jail, he rather liked
his cellmates and fellow prisoners, mostly drunks and small-time crooks
brought in for short stays. He was working hard on his case, and by
March he had plans to serve as his own defense lawyer. He was unhappy
with the public defender, Chuck Leidner. Having been used to the skill
of John O'Connell, he expected more, and public defenders are generally
young lawyers, untried, without the experience of the big-time pros,
the criminal defense attorneys who charge huge fees.
In March, the Colorado Health Department declared that the Pitkin
Page 253
Coui|jy Jail was a short-term facility, and that no prisoner should
Le held there for more than thirty days. That produced a prolmem; Ted
would have to be moved.
He told me he was reading a good deal, the only respite he had from
television soap operas and game shows. His favorite book was Papillon,
the story of an impossible prison escape from Devil's Island. "I've
read it four times."
Again there was a subtle hint, but it seemed incredible to think that
Ted could escape from the Pitkin County Jail,
230
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
deep in the bowels of the old courthouse. And if the case against him
was so full of holes-as he proclaimed-why should he escape? The Utah
sentence had not been that severe, and it was doubtful that any charges
would be forthcoming from Washington State. He could well be free before
his thirty-fifth birthday.
Chuck Leidner was still representing Ted as they went into the
preliminary hearing on the Caryn Campbell case on April
4th. Aspenites, who'd cut their courtroom gallery teeth on the
Longet-Sabich case, jammed the courtroom. Rumor was that the Ted Bundy
case might transcend even the histrionics seen earlier in the year.
Ted and his attorneys wanted the trial, if there was to be one, held
in Aspen; they liked the laid-back atmosphere and, as Ted had told me
in his letter, they felt that Aspenites had not yet made up their minds
about his guilt or innocence.
Furthermore, D.A. Frank Tucker was under the gun. He had lost Claudine
Longet's diary, a diary said to be of utmost importance to the
prosecution in her murder case, an intimate journal that had somehow
made its way to his home only to be strangely misplaced. Potential jurors
in Aspen would remember that. Aware perhaps of his diminishing
credibility, Tucker had brought in some manpower from Colorado Springs,
two .pros: District Attorneys Milton Blakely and Bob Russell.
Page 254
In a preliminary hearing the prosecution lays out its case before the
judge to establish cause to go to trial. Pitkin County's case was
hinged-as were Salt Lake County's before it and the Florida cases after
it-on an eye witness identification. This time, the eye witness was
the woman tourist who had seen the stranger in the corridor of the
Wildwood Inn on the night of January 12, 1975.
Aspen Investigator Mike Fisher had shown her a lay-down of mug shots
a year after that night-and she'd picked Ted Bundy's. Now, during the
preliminary hearing in April of
1977, she was asked to look around the courtroom and point out anyone
who resembled the man she'd seen.
Ted suppressed a smile as she pointed-not to him-but to Pitkin County
Undersheriff Ben Meyers.
The steam had gone out of the state's case. Judge Lohr listened as Tucker
pointed out other evidence: Bundy's credit card slips, the brochure
on Colorado ski areas found in Ted's Salt Lake City apartment with the
Wildwood Inn marked,
Ted Bundy with Stephanie, the woman to whom he was secretly engaged
September 2, 1973.
**
JBe». JL "^ ' Janice Ott. -«u jBfe lk
kfc "^ * t
mjife ^t^H^.
ïN ' \MriKK ^fe
Page 255
am
Captain Herb Swindler of the Seattle Police Department, with
photographs of some of the missing women. Lynda Ann Healy (top and bottom
left), Donna Manson (top middle), Susan Bancourt (top right), Roberta
Kathleen Parks (bottom middle), and Georgeann Hawkins (bottom right).
The detective who took this picture was standing next to Brenda Ball's
skull on Taylor Mountain near Seattle. In this dense underbrush on the
lonely mountain foothill were found the skulls of Brenda, Roberta
Kathleen Parks, Lynda Ann Healy, and Susan Rancourt.
m
Roger Dunn, King County Po- Bob Keppel King C
lice. Dunn was the only mem- |ice, who bore the
ber of the task force who actu- the Bundy investigat
ally met Ted face-to-face and county for six years talked to him.
lice, who bore theHfflfflRffl
the Bundy investigaHBSfflM
Nick Mackie, head of Task Force to investigate the case
Washington State.
BBBSMiBSUa^^^SMmlM^^HJEBE^a
KiiraaiTKaiiKiWsKWîUK
Bjt*j||BiSuBjJ^fl*jpjf?T*M
^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^ï
Page 256
Carol DaRonch testifying in Florida as Judge Cowart listens.
WIDE WORLD PHOTOS.
Bra?Msilm?^BBiiBnt^ls^TO3ïs»siMiiis»Nt=i
KfgMn^^^HI^^^^^^^^^^^^H^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^
^^^^^^^^^^HI
^ .0^*»^. a^Éii^^l WBBFH,
^«^PSItf
The last victi
disappeared from Lake City, Florida on February 9, 1978. She was 12
years old.
WIDE WORLD PHOTOS.
Ted Bundy in court in Florida.
WIDE WORLD PHOTOS.
Ted Bundy waving to reporters while the charges against him are beina
read. WIDE WORLD PHOTOS.
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
231
two hairs taken from the old Volkswagen which microscopically matched
Caryn Campbell's, the match between Bundy's crowbar and the wounds on
the victim's skull.
It was a chancy gamble for the prosecution, unless they could tie in
some of the Utah cases. Judge Lohr ruled that Ted Bundy would stand
trial for the murder of Caryn Campbell, adding that it was not his job
to consider the probability of conviction, or the credibility of the
evidence, only its existence.
After the preliminary hearing, Ted summarily "fired" his public
Page 257
defenders, Chuck Leidner and Jim Dumas. He wanted to get involved in
his own defense. He was beginning a pattern that he would repeat again
and again, a kind of arrogance toward those designated by the state
to defend him; if he could not have what he considered the best, then
he would go it alone. Judge Lohr was forced to acquiesce to his decision
to defend himself, although he assigned Leidner and Dumas to remain
on the defense team as legal advisors.
Although Ted opposed it, he was transferred on April 13,
1977 from the Pitkin County Jail to the Garfield County Jail in Glenwood
Springs forty-five miles away, in accordance with the order sent down
from the state Health Department.
The Garfield County Jail was only ten years old, and considerably more
pleasant than his old basement cell in Aspen. We talked often on the
phone, and he commented that he liked Garfield County Sheriff Ed Hogue
and his wife, but that the food was still lousy. Despite the modern
facilities, it was another "Mom and Pop" jail.
It wasn't long before Ted began to inundate Judge Lohr with requests
for special treatment. Since he was serving as his own attorney, he
needed a typewriter, a desk, access to the law library in Aspen, the
free and uncensored use of a phone, help from forensic laboratories,
investigators. He wanted three meals a day, and said neither he nor
the other prisoners could survive without lunch. He pointed out his
own weight loss. He wanted an order rescinded forbidding other prisoners
to «Ik to him. (Hogue had issued this order soon after Ted arrijed,
after jailers intercepted a diagram of the jail, a chart outlming exits
and the ventilation system.)
"Ed's a good guy," he told me on the phone. "I don't want to get him
into trouble but we have to have more to eat."
His requests were granted. Somehow, Ted Bundy had managed to elevate
the status of a county jail prisoner to that of
232
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
Page 258
visiting royalty. He not only had all the paraphernalia he wanted, but
he was allowed several trips weekly, accompanied by deputies, to the
law library in the Pitkin County Courthouse in Aspen.
He grew friendly with the deputies, learned about their families, and
they liked him. He told me, "They're O.K. They even let me take a stroll
along the river because it was such a nice day. Of course, they went
with me."
I did not hear from Ted during the first four weeks of May, and I wondered
what had happened. Although he seemed to be growing constantly more
bitter, more sarcastic-as if he'd developed an impervious outer
shell-he had written or called me regularly up until May. I finally
got a letter written May 27th.
Dear Ann,
Just returned from Brazil and found your letters piled up in my post
office box here in Glenwood. Jesus, you must have thought I got lost
in the jungles down there. I actually went down there to find out where
the sons of bitches are hiding the 11 billion tons of coffee they say
the bad weather destroyed. Didn't find any coffee but brought back 400
pounds of cocaine.
Ted was still in contact with Meg, at least by phone, and she had passed
on my concern about not hearing from him. No, he was not angry with
me, he assured me. However, someone had told him that I had "developed
an opinion relative to my innocence, which opinion was not in any way
consistent with my innocence." Now, he wanted me to write to him and
make a "frank statement" about how I felt regarding his guilt or
innocence. He said he understood that I was very close to the police
and that he knew they had convinced many people of his guilt, but he
wanted a letter from me spelling out my feelings.
And he had yet another message for Nick Mackie, "Tell Mackie, if he
doesn't stop thinking about me that he will end up at Western State
[Washington's State Mental Hospital.] Deals indeed. I have got them
up against the wall down here, and there (sic) are eternal optimists
talking about deals."
The trial date had been put ahead to November 14, 1977, and Ted was
proceeding without counsel. He was most enthusiastic about his new role,
and felt he had the instincts of an
Page 259
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
233
investigator. "But most important, I will persist, and persist, and
work and act until I succeed. No one can outwork me, because I have
more at stake than anyone else."
He was also elated because he was costing the county a great deal of
money. A local reporter had complained in print about the escalating
costs of investigators, expert witnesses, extra personnel needed to
guard Ted during his library trips, dental costs, supplies, the phone
calls; Ted found this criticism "Goddam outrageous. No one asks the
prosecutor or the police how much of the people's money they piss away.
Dismiss the case, send me home and save all that money is my response."
He had used the $20 I'd sent him to pay for a haircut, his first since
December 1976, and Judge Lohr had ordered that he be taken to a doctor
to see if his loss of weightwhich he blamed on the paucity of food in
the Garfield County Jail-was as profound as Ted said. The day after
the order, the jail had begun to serve lunch for the first time in its
history, and Ted claimed a moral victory for that.
Ted suspected that the sheriff was trying to fatten him up before he
went to the doctor, but he still termed Hogue a "good man." The sheriff
had also consented to having Ted's friends and family send food in from
outside. Packages of raisins, nuts, and beef jerky would be appreciated.
Although Ted had begun the letter with a touch of suspicious hostility,
a request for a declaration of loyalty from me, his mood mellowed as
he wrote.
Thank you very much for the money and the stamps. I
know your recent successes have by no means put you
on easy street, so donations to me no doubt represent
sacrifices.
I will not take so long to write again. Promise.
Love, ted.
But he did. He^took a long, long time to write, because Ted Bundy had
Page 260
go^e away. Very suddenly.
27
That letter troubled me; Ted was, in essence, asking me to tell him
that I believed wholeheartedly in his innocence, something that I could
not do. It was something he had never asked of me before, and I wondered
what had happened to make him wary of me. I had not betrayed his
confidence. I had continued to keep the letters and calls rolling into
Colorado and I had not shown Ted's replies to anyone. If I could not
tell Ted that I believed he was innocent of all the charges and suspicions
against him, I was maintaining my emotional support as always.
It had been the first week in June when I received Ted's questioning
letter, and I was wrestling with how I could reply as Ted prepared for
a hearing on whether the death penalty would be considered in his trial;
it was a decision that was being made individually in each homicide
case in Colorado. The hearing was set for June 7th.
As usual, Ted was chauffered to Aspen from Glenwood Springs on the
morning of June 7th, leaving a little before eight. He was wearing the
same outfit he had worn when we had lunch at the Brasserie Pittsbourg
in Seattle in December,
1975: the tan corduroy slacks, a long-sleeved turtleneck shirt, and
the heavy, variegated brown coat-sweater. Instead of his usually
preferred loafers, however, he wore his heavy prisonissue boots. His
hair was short and neat, thanks, somewhat ironically, to the twenty
dollar check I had sent him.
Pitldn County deputies Rick Kralicek and Peter Murphy, his regular
guards, picked him up that morning for the fortyfive-mile ride back
to Aspen. Ted talked easily with the two deputies he'd come to know
well, asking again about their families.
Kralicek drove with Bundy sitting beside him, and Peter Murphy sat in
the back seat. Later Murphy would recall that as they left the outskirts
of Glenwood Springs Ted had sud234
Page 261
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
235
denly turned around and stared at him, making several quick movements
with his curled hands. "I unsnapped the leather strap holding rny .38,
and it made a loud unmistakable 'snap!' Ted turned around and stared
straight ahead at the road all the way into Aspen."
When they reached the courthouse, Ted was handed into the custody of
Deputy David Westerlund, a lawman who had ' been his guard for only
one day and was not familiar with j him.
Court convened at 9:00 A.M., and Jim Dumas-one of the public defenders
fired by Ted earlier but still serving himargued against the death
penalty for an hour or so. At 10:30 Judge Lohr ordered a break, saying
that the prosecution could give its arguments when they reconvened.
Ted moved, as he often did, to the law library, its tall stacks hiding
him from Deputy Westerlund's view.
The deputy stayed at his post at the courtroom door. They were on the
second floor, twenty-five feet above the street. Everything was normal,
or seemed so. Ted was apparently doing some research back in the stacks,
while waiting for court to begin again.
On the street outside, a woman passing by was startled to see a figure
dressed in tans and browns suddenly leap from a window above her. She
watched as the man fell, got to his feet and ran, limping, off down
the street. Puzzled, she stared after him for a few moments before
entering the courthouse and heading for the sheriffs office. Her first
question galvanized the officers on duty into action, "Is it normal
for people to jump out of windows around here?"
Kralicek heard her, swore, and headed for the stairs.
Ted Bundy had escaped.
He wore no handcuffs, and the leg irons he usually wore when he was
outside the courtroom had been removed. He was free, and he'd had ample
time to observe the area around the Pitkin County Courthouse when the
deputies had kindly allowed him to watt; near the river during exercise
Page 262
periods.
Chagrined, Shenff Dick Keinast would admit later, "We screwed up. I
feel iiitty about it."
Roadblocks were set up, tracking dogs were called in, and posses on
horseback fanned out around Aspen looking for the man who had telegraphed
in so many ways that he was going to run for it. Whitney Wulff, Sheriff
Keinast's secretary, recalled that Ted had often walked over to the
windows during
236
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
hearings, glanced down, and then looked at the sheriff's men j to see
if they were watching.
J "I thought he was always testing us. Once he walked up
i • close behind a girl court aide, and looked at us. I got worried
• about the possibility of a hostage and alerted the officer es-
]H cort to stay closer to the prisoner."
m But Westerlund had been a new man on the job, unaware
!JB of others' suspicions that Bundy was perhaps planning a
l| break.
Ted had "double-dressed"--in the lingo of the con-wearing extra
clothing beneath his standard courtroom outfit. His plan was so
audacious that it went off like clockwork at the beginning. He had hit
the ground on the front courthouse y| lawn, hit it so hard in fact that
he'd left a four-inch-deep
gouge in the turf with his right foot. Officials suspected that he might
have injured that ankle-but evidently not enough to slow him down much.
Then Ted had headed immediately for the banks of the Roaring Fork River,
the spot four blocks from the courthouse where he'd walked often before.
There, hidden in the brush, he quickly removed his outer layer of
clothing. He now wore a dress shirt; he looked like any other Aspen
resident as he strolled with controlled casualness back through town.
It was the safest place he could have been; all his pursuers had scattered
Page 263
to set up roadblocks.
The word of Ted's escape was a news flash on every radio station between
Denver and Seattle, down into Utah. In As:t pen, residents were told
to lock their doors, hide their chilj dren, garage their cars.
! Frank Tucker, the District Attorney who was the chief object of Ted's derision that summer, commented in I-told-youso terms,
"I am not surprised. I kept telling them." ; Apparently everyone had
been expecting Ted to run, but
| no one had done anything about it, and now they ran in
circles trying to get him back. The roadblocks on the two ^ roads leading
out (of town took forty-five minutes to set up;
(à the dogs were delayed for almost four hours on their flight
2| from Denver because carriers could not be located and the
ijm airlines refused to fly them without carriers. If there is a patron saint of escapees, he was looking down favorably on Ted Bundy.
Back in Seattle, I began to receive phone calls from friends and law
officers, warning me that Ted was loose. It was their
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
237
feeling that he might head toward me, thinking that I would hide him
or give him money to get across the Canadian border. It was a
confrontation that I didn't relish. I doubted that he would head back
toward Washington; there were just too many people who would recognize
him. If he got out of the mountains around Aspen, he would do better
to head for Denver, or some other big city. Nevertheless, Nick Mackie
gave me his home phone number, and my sons were instructed that they
must get to their phone and call for help if Ted appeared at our front
door.
My phone rang three times on the evening of June 7th. Each time I answered,
there was no one there ... or no one who spoke. I could hear sounds
in the background as if the calls were coming from a phone booth on
Page 264
a highway, cars racing by.
I finally said, "Ted . . . Ted, is that you?" and the connection was
broken.
When Ted made his desperate jump for freedom, it had been a beautiful
sunny warm day in Aspen; but nightfall brought the temperature drops
common to mountain towns even in summer. Wherever Ted was, he was
undoubtedly cold. I slept restlessly, dreaming that 7 had gone camping
and discovered that I'd forgotten to bring blankets or a sleeping bag.
Where was he? The tracking dogs had stopped, confused, as they'd reached
the Roaring Fork River. He must have planned that. They couldn't pick
up his trail beyond his first four block run to the river shores.
It began to rain in Aspen late in the afternoon of that Monday in June,
and anyone unlucky enough to be without shelter would have quickly been
soaked to the skin. Ted wore only a light shirt and slacks. He was
possibly suffering from a badly sprained or broken ankle . .. but he
was still free.
He must have felt like the protagonist of Papillon, the book he'd almost
committed to memory during his long months in jail. Beyond the cleverness
of escape, Papillon had dealt with mind "control, man's ability to think
himself past despair, to contAl his environment by sheer force of will.
Was Ted doing tnat now?
The men who tracked Ted Bundy looked like something out of a Charles
Russell or Frederick Remington painting, garbed in Stetsons, deerskin
vests, jeans, cowboy boots, and carrying sidearms. They could have been
possemen of a cen238
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
tury earlier, looking for Billy the Kid or the James boys; I wondered
if they would shoot first and ask questions later when-and if-they found
Ted.
Aspenites vacillated between utter fear and black humor. While deputies
and volunteers made a house-by-house search in the resort city,
Page 265
entrepreneurs hastened to capitalize on this new folk hero who was
capturing the imagination of a town where ennui can set in quickly.
Ted Bundy had thumbed his nose at the system, had beaten the "dumb cops,"
and hardly anyone stopped to think about the broken body of Caryn
Campbell that had been found in the snowbank way back in
1975. Bundy was news, and good for laughs.
Tee-shirts began to appear on well-endowed young women, reading: "Ted
Bundy" is a One Night Stand"; "Bundy's Free-You can bet your Aspen on
it!"; "Bundy lives on a Rocky Mountain High!"; "Bundy's in Booth D."
(This last slogan referred to a national magazine article which stated
that, if one sat in Booth D in a local restaurant, one could purchase
cocaine.)
One restaurant put "Bundy Burgers" on its menu . . . open the bun and
the meat has fled. A "Bundy Cocktail" served locally was made of tequila,
rum, and two Mexican jumping beans.
Hitchhikers, wanting to be assured of a ride out of Aspen, wore signs
reading, "I am not Bundy."
Paranoia reigned along with the high-jinks. One young male reporter,
after interviewing three young women in a café about their reactions
to' Bundy's escape, was promptly turned in as a suspect; his
identification and press card had meant little.
Everywhere, fingers of blame were being pointed. Sheriff Keinast blamed
Judge Lohr for allowing Ted to represent himself, and for letting him
appear in court without his leg irons and handcuffs. Tucker blamed
everyone, and Keinast admitted to one reporter wearily that he wished
he'd never heard of Ted Bundy.
By Friday, June 10th, Ted had been missing three days and the FBI joined
the manhunt. Louise Bundy appeared on television and begged Ted to come
back. She was worried about Ted being out in the mountains. "But most
of all I'm worried about the people who are looking for him not using
good common sense and pulling the trigger first and asking questions
later. People will think, 'Oh, he must be guilty;
Page 266
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
239
that's why he's running.' But I think just all the frustrations piled
up and he saw an open window and decided to go. I'm sure by now he's
probably sorry he did."
The number of searchers had dropped from 150 to 70 by Friday. The feeling
was that Ted had made his way out of the search area, and possibly had
had an accomplice. Sid Morley, thirty, serving a year for possession
of stolen property, had become friendly with Ted in the Pitkin County
Jail and transferred with him to the Garfield County Jail. Morley had
failed to return from a work release job on the Friday before Ted's
jump from the courthouse and the searchers felt he might have been
waiting to help Ted.
However, Morley was taken into custody on June 10th near a tunnel on
Interstate 70, fifty miles west of Denver. Questioned, he insisted that
he'd known nothing about Ted's escape plans and he did not, indeed,
seem to be involved. Morley's own opinion was that Ted was still in
Pitkin County, but outside of Aspen.
Nationwide, it was a big week for escapes. Even as Ted Bundy was being
tracked in Colorado, James Earl Ray, along with three other inmates,
escaped from Brushy Mountain State Prison in Tennessee on June 11th.
For one day, the story of that escape would take western headline
precedence over Bundy's.
Ted Bundy was still in Pitkin County. He had made his way through town
on June 7th to the foot of Aspen Mountain, and then hiked easily up
the grassy slope; it had been a bad year for snow, but the warm winter
was lucky for Ted. By the time the sun set that first night, he was
up and over Aspen Mountain and walking along Castle Creek, headed south.
Ted had maps with him of the mountain area around Aspen, maps which
were being used by the prosecution to show the location of Caryn
Campbell's body. As his own defense attorney, he had rights of discovery!
If he could have kept going south until he came to the hamlet of Crestad
Butte, he might have been able to catch a ride to freedom.*But the winds
and rain had driven him back to a cabin he'd rfissed along the way,
a well-stocked and temporarily unoccupied mountain cabin.
Ted rested there after breaking in. There was a little food in the cabin,
Page 267
some warm clothing, a rifle. On Thursday morning, June 9th, better
equipped and carrying the rifle, he headed south again. He might have
made it to Crested Butte,
240
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
but he didn't keep going straight south. Instead, he cut west over
another ridge that wasn't so choked with lingering snow, and found
himself along the East Maroon Creek.
He was going in circles now, and soon found himself again on the outskirts
of Aspen. He headed back up Castle Creek for the cabin where he'd found
shelter days earlier. He was too late. Searchers had found that he'd
been there; in fact searchers were fanning out around the cabin as he
watched behind vegetation a couple hundred yards away.
The posse members found scraps of dried food in the cabin and learned
that the gun and ammunition were missing. They identified one
fingerprint found in the cabin as being Ted's. Then they learned that
someone had broken into a Volkswagen camper in a resort area on Maroon
Lake-apparently on Friday, June 10th-and had taken food and a ski parka.
Despite the stolen bits of food, Ted had lost a lot of weight, his injured
ankle was swelling, and he was close to exhaustion. He headed back north,
toward Aspen. On Saturday night, June llth, he slept in the wild, and
Sunday found him skirting the edges of town. On Sunday night, he had
been gone almost a full week; he was still free, but he was right back
where he'd started and he needed a miracle to get out of town. Huddled,
exhausted and shivering, in the tall bushes at the edge of the Aspen
Golf Course, he saw an old Cadillac parked nearby. He checked and keys
were in it. Ted seemingly had his miracle-wheels.
Crouching low in the seat, he steered first toward Smuggler's Mountain
and the propitiously named Independence Pass route that headed east
away from Aspen. Then he changed his mind; he would go west, instead,
toward Glenwood Springs, back toward the jail where he'd been
incarcerated, but further than that, beyond that, west to complete
Page 268
freedom.
It was now 2:00 A.M. on Monday, June 13th.
Pitkin County Deputies Gene Flatt and Maureen Higgins were patrolling
the streets of Aspen, headed in an easterly direction that early morning
when their attention was drawn to a Cadillac coming toward them. The
driver appeared to be drunk; the car was wavering all over the road.
They weren't even thinking of Ted Bundy as they turned around and
followed the Cadillac. They expected to find a drunk driver inTHE STRANGER BESIDE ME
241
side. Actually, Ted was cold sober, but his reflexes were dulled by
exhaustion; he couldn't control the Cadillac.
The patrol car pulled up alongside the fishtailing Cadillac and signaled
it to pull over. Gene Flatt walked over to the driver's side of the
car and looked in. The man inside wore glasses and had a band-aid
plastered over his nose. But Flatt recognized him; it was Ted Bundy,
who was about to be captured only blocks from where he had escaped.
Ted shrugged and smiled thinly as Flatt said, "Hello, Ted."
The mountain maps were found in the stolen car, indicating that Ted's
leap from the courthouse had not been a spur of the moment impulse.
He had planned the abortive escape attempt. Now, he was in more trouble
than he'd been in before; he was lodged temporarily in the Pitkin County
Jail until June 16th when he was arraigned on charges of escape, burglary,
and theft. Judge Lohr handed down an order that Ted would henceforth
wear handcuffs and leg irons when he was being moved from place to place.
But he would still be allowed to have most of the privileges he'd been
granted before so that he could participate in his own defense: the
law library access, the free long distance calls, all the other
investigative tools.
A week after Ted was recaptured, my phone rang a little before 8 A.M.
Awakened from a sound sleep, I was startled to hear Ted's voice.
"Where are you?" I mumbled.
Page 269
"Can you come and pick me up?" he asked, and then laughed.
He had not escaped again, but for a moment, I'd believed that he had
somehow gotten out of jail once more.
He told me he was fine, a little tired, and suffering from the loss
of about twenty pounds, but fine.
"Why did you do it?" I asked.
"Would you believe I just looked out the window and saw all that lovelv
green grass and blue sky out there and I couldn't resist?'^-
No, I wouldirt, but I didn't have to say so; it was a rhetorical question.
I
It was a short conversation, and when I wrote to him I couldn't help
starting with, "Tried to answer your last letter but you'd moved and
left no forwarding address."
I had not yet expressed my answer to his question in the letter written
just before his escape. He wanted to know my
242
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
i
feelings about his guilt or innocence. What I told him was that I felt
the same way I had felt on the Saturday afternoon in January, 1976,
our last meeting before he was returned to Utah for trial in the DaRonch
kidnapping case. I had told him then that I could not fully believe
in his innocence. I don't know if he recalled what I'd said or not,
but my reference to that afternoon in the tavern seemed to be enough.
I also reminded him that I had never written one line about him for
publication. Although he was big news, and getting bigger, I had managed
to keep that promise. It seemed to satisfy him.
His first letter after his capture was not as bitter or scathing as
those just before had been; perhaps his taste of freedom had softened
him somewhat.
Ted said he was recuperating from the effects of the failed escape,
and that he thought very little of his few days of freedom. He was trying
Page 270
to forget being free, but he didn't regret taking the chance. "I learned
much about myself, my weaknesses, my capacity to survive, and the
relationship of freedom to pain."
Everything about this letter was muted; he had tried and he had failed,
and it was as if he'd turned down the energy in his emotions. After
he was recaptured, he had learned from Meg that she was involved with
another man. A year before, he would have been beating his breast in
agony; now he viewed Meg's final defection rationally and soberly.
"Accepting the loss of her will never be easy. In fact, I doubt that
I could ever truly say I accept her loving and living with another man.
I will always love her so I could never say that I do not dream of our
life together. But this new development, like my capture, must be taken
calmly. My survival is at stake."
Perhaps that was the essential word: "survival." If he allowed himself
to grieve for Meg, he would not be up to the fight ahead. He wrote that
he could only hope for a belief in a life to come. "I would dream of
loving Meg again in another time."
In retrospect, there is evidence that Carole Ann Boone (who had dropped
the "Anderson" from her name) was in constant touch with Ted during
this period, that Ted was not without a woman to stand beside him. He
did not mention it to me at that point.
If survival was all, then Ted had to build up his body. He felt he had
lost about thirty pounds during his days in .the
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
243
mountains, and he had been twenty pounds underweight to begin with.
Jail food wouldn't do it. Every day there was a new cook-a trusty, a
hired cook "who quits two days later," a secretary from the front desk,
a jailer, a jailer's wife. Ted asked again for help from friends. He
was healing much too slowly, and he needed healthy food. My assignment
was to locate some powdered protein supplement. He told me I could
probably find it in a health food store and that he preferred the
Page 271
two-pound can containing about 15 grams of protein per ounce. "Maybe
some dried figs . . . maybe some canned nuts too, if you can afford
it."
It seemed, from that letter, that Meg had gone out of Ted's life. Yet
I wondered at her telling him she was involved with someone else. I
had talked to her on the phone only a few days before and she had said
there was no one, but that for her own survival she had to pull away
from Ted. Perhaps she had made up a fictitious man, knowing that that
was the only way Ted would release her. It must have been that; Meg
and I had commiserated with one another over the seeming impossibility
of finding a single man who met our qualifications and would also even
consider accepting a woman with a child, or-in my case-with four children.
No, I didn't think Meg had found anyone, not yet.
I felt sorry for Ted, picturing him all alone at last, and yet he had
been largely responsible for his own plight. He'd lied to Stephanie,
Meg, Sharon, and even to his casual romantic partners. I needn't have
worried about him; Carole Ann visited him in jail whenever she could,
worked as an "investigator" to refute the allegations against him. When
she finally surfaced as his female defender, I was startled. Who was
this woman who was giving countless anonymous interviews in support
of Ted? I could never have guessed that it was the same woman who had
teased him years before about being the infamous "Ted."
In response to Ted's requests, I sent him a large package containing
ten pounds of protein supplement, vitamins, fruit, and nuts. When 5
carried it into my local post office, theclerk raised his e|ebrows a
bit as he looked at the addressee, but he said nothing. Postal clerks
are like priests, doctors, and lawyers; they feel ethically bound to
protect privileged information, and they respect their client's
privacy.
28
I had no doubt that Ted had planned his escape; he had alluded to escape
to me so many times. Although he hadn't wanted to discuss it in his
Page 272
first phone call to me or in his letters, he did tell Pitkin County
Sheriff Sergeant Don Davis about his adventures during his week in the
mountains. Yes, he had taken the rifle from the cabin, but he had thrown
it away in the woods. A man with a rifle in June might have looked too
suspicious. He had met few people out there in the wilderness, and when
he did bump into some campers, he had pretended to be a man looking
for his wife and children, just part of a happy family camp-out.
Later, he would tell me how he'd felt when he returned to the cabin.
"They were there, so close I could hear them talking about me. They
didn't even know I was watching them from behind some trees."
All in all, it had been an adventure for him, albeit a desperate adventure,
and had only honed his will to be free. He was the prisoner in Papillon.
I didn't think that his escape necessarily marked him as a guilty man;
an innocent man, seeing himself railroaded into a lifetime behind bars
would have been as likely to run. He had felt trapped by the inexorable
grinding of the wheels of justice and, despite his protestations that
he felt no pressure, he felt tremendous pressure-not only from Colorado
but from Utah and Washington.
Now he was in a hell of a mess. The murder trial in the Campbell case
still loomed ahead. Now he was charged with escape, burglary,
misdemeanor theft, and felony theft. Charges connected with his escape
carried with them a possible ninety more years in sentences.
Lawmen had a higher opinion of Chuck Leidner and Jim Dumas as attorneys
than Ted did. "They're damned goodalmost awesome," one detective
commented. Dumas, who
244
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
245
had just finished his arguments against the death penalty when Ted made
his two-story leap for freedom, also had a sense of humor. When he learned
that his client had escaped, he said wryly, "That's the poorest show
of faith in this argument that I've seen yet."
Page 273
Ted hadn't wanted the public defenders however, and, with recent events,
it was impossible for them to continue; Leidner was named as a potential
witness for the prosecution on the escape charges.
Ted's longtime supporter and advisor, John Henry Browne from the Public
Defender's Office hi Seattle, had flown to Aspen as soon as Ted was
captured. Browne, who could not officially represent Ted since he had
never been charged in Washington State, had always been offended by
the way the "Ted" case was handled and felt Bundy was being convicted
in the public's eye through suspicion and innuendo. He spent his own
funds to fly to confer with Ted in various states where he was being
held.
In mid-June, 1977, it was Browne's mission to serve as an arbitrator
between Ted and Leidner and Dumas. Browne was delighted when a new
attorney was appointed to defend Ted: Stephen "Buzzy" Ware.
On June 16th, Judge Lohr appointed Ware as the new counsel for the defense.
Ware looked anything but a winning defense attorney as he stood beside
Ted, dressed in jeans and a sports coat. Buzzy Ware's hair was tousled,
he wore glasses, and had a luxuriant moustache. Indeed, he looked more
like a ski bum from the Aspen après-ski bars than he did a potential
F. Lee Bailey. But Ware had made a name for himself; he had never lost
a jury trial in Aspen. He flew his own plane and rode a motorcycle and
he was known as the man to have on your side in narcotics cases. After
being appointed to Ted's case, Ware flew off to Texas as defense counsel
in a major federal racketeering case.
Ware was a winner, and Ted sensed that. At last, he again had someone
beàde him whom he could respect. In a phone call to me Ted was ebullient
as he talked about his attorney. Any residual efjbcts of his failed
escape were forgotten by August as he filed a motion for a retrial in
Utah in the DaRonch case (based largely on what he felt were Detective
Jerry Thompson's suggestions to DaRonch that she pick Ted's picture).
The prosecution team in Colorado was attempting to beef
246
Page 274
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
up its case against Bundy by bringing in "similar transactions," trying
to introduce testimony about the kidnapping conviction, the murders
and disappearances of Melissa Smith, Laura Aime, and Debby Kent in Utah,
perhaps even the eight Washington cases. Taken in toto, the crimes
attributed to Ted Bundy bore a familiar pattern, a commonality; taken
separately, each case was lacking in clout.
One can only speculate what might have happened if Ted had had the
continued support from Buzzy Ware that fed new energy into the defense.
On the night of August llth, Ware and his wife were involved in a
motorcycle crash, an accident that killed Mrs. Ware instantly and left
the brilliant young attorney will skull and facial fractures, internal
injuries, and a broken leg. Ware was in a coma, and there was some
question about whether he would be permanently paralyzed, but no
question at all about whether he could continue assisting Ted.
Ted was desolate; he had counted on Buzzy Ware to extricate him from
his Colorado difficulties and now, once again, he was alone. He also
felt that he was aging rapidly, that recent newspaper photos of him
made him look years older than his true thirty years.
I wrote to him in mid-August, commiserating with him about the loss
of Ware, and assuring him that the photos in the paper were only revealing
the residual effects of his ordeal in the mountains, and that they were
also the result of harsh lighting.
His answer was the last letter I would receive from Colorado.
Fate does have a way of taking me by surprise, but the past two years
have been so filled with surprises and shocking occurrences that my
'down periods' have become progressively shorter. Am I becoming shock
proof? Not exactly. There was a definite moistness in my eyes when news
of Buzzy's accident arrived. However, they were genuinely tears for
him and not for me. He is such a beautiful person. As for my case, my
confidence in it could not be diminished if every defense attorney in
the country expired.
He wrote that he felt it was almost a sacrilege to continue on with
his case without pause, that he should stop for a time
Page 275
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
247
in respect for Ware, but that he had to continue. He seemed to see some
light far ahead of him, and he was heading directly toward it.
In many ways the dark, far corner has been turned.- I sense it now.
The escape episode was at the end of a stretch, and the movement made
now is toward a return. The media even seems to be humanizing me a little.
More important, the DaRonch case has been broken. More later. My love,
ted.
But, by September, Ted was screaming "injustice" and "political
maneuvering" when El Paso County D.A. Bob Russell sought to include
the Utah cases in the Campbell trial by introducing the hairs found
in Ted's old Volkswagen-hairs that matched the pubic hair of Melissa
Smith in Midvale, and head hairs from Caryn Campbell and Carol DaRonch.
Ted countered by saying that his understanding after reading the autopsy
reports on Laura Aime and Melissa Smith was that the young murder victims
might have been held captive for up to a week before they died. His
argument was that this showed a clear lack of commonality since Caryn
Campbell was known to have succumbed within hours of her abduction.
Further, the Utah women had been struck with a blunt instrument,
according to the post mortem reports, and Caryn Campbell with a sharp
instrument. Ted argued that these differences made the diverse cases
ineligible as "similar transactions."
Despite the vigorous fight going on in his legal arena, despite Carole
Ann Boone, Ted did not forget Meg that September. He called me on
September 20th and asked that I send a single red rose to Meg, to arrive
on the 26th. "It's the eighth anniversary of the night I met her. I
want just one rose, and I want the card to read, 'My heart valves need
adjusting. Love, ted "
I sent Meg thai last red rose, after arguing with the florist who insisted
thatjl could get four red roses for the $9 minimum. Ted had stipulated
it be only one. He never offered to pay for the rose. I don't know what
Meg's reaction was. I never talked to her again.
Ted spent the fall of 1977 working feverishly on his defense for the
Page 276
trial ahead. He didn't write any longer, but
248
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
called me when he had something to talk about. Security was tighter
now; he was not allowed to dial the phone numbers himself and had to
wait for a deputy to do it. On his daily trips to the law library, he
wore both handcuffs and leg irons. But again, he began to be so familiar
to his captors, so affable, that the cuffs and irons were removed. He
seemed to have nothing on his mind but winning in court; the escape
several months behind him was dimming in everyone's memory.
On November 2, 1977, a suppression hearing was held behind closed doors
in Judge Lohr's courtroom. Ted was elated when Lohr refused to allow
either the Debby Kent or the Laura Aime cases to be introduced at the
Campbell trial.
Two weeks later, a similar hearing was held where pathologists testified
pro and con on the similarities of the head wounds suffered by Melissa
Smith and Caryn Campbell. For the prosecution, Dr. Donald M. Clark said
that such fractures were "unusual-not in the common area," and that
the fractures were "strikingly similar" both in the assumed weapon used
and in the fractures themselves.
For the defense, Dr. John Wood, the Arapahoe County Coroner, testified
that the only similarity in the two skull fractures was that they had
occurred in the same spot on the skull. Wood first said that Melissa
Smith's wound had been caused by a blunt instrument, while Caryn
Campbell's had been dealt with a sharp object. Under cross-examination,
however, Dr. Wood admitted that if Ms. Campbell's scalp had been bruised
as well as cut (which it had been), then the same weapon could have
caused the wounds on both victims' heads. Looking at the pry bar taken
from Ted Bundy's Volkswagen, he agreed that it could have caused the
injuries sustained by both women.
Lohr pondered on the pathologists' testimony, and finally ruled that
the information on the Smith case would be inadmissible in the Campbell
Page 277
trial. Ted had won and won big, in keeping the three Utah cases hidden
from jurors' ears, but he lost when Lohr ruled to admit Carol DaRonch's
testimony, and the ski brochure found in Ted's Salt Lake City apartment
with the Wildwood Inn marked.
In that November week, too, Ted learned that the higher court in Utah
had rejected his appeal on the DaRonch kidnapping case.
He would try again one day on that. Now, Ted wanted a
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
249
change of venue before the January 9th trial date. He had once approved
the idea of being tried in Aspen-but that was before his escape, before
he became a household word and a joke in the wealthy ski resort town.
It was unlikely that there was anyone in Aspen now who didn't know exactly
who Ted Bundy was, and who hadn't memorized the smallest details of
the crime he was accused of. A trial in Aspen would be a circus; it
was unthinkable.
Surprising circumstances removed me even further from Ted's world at
the end of November; one of my magazine articles had sparked the interest
of a Hollywood production company and, after two brief phone calls,
I found myself on a plane headed for Los Angeles. After a day-long meeting,
it was agreed that I would return for three weeks in December to write
the screen "treatment" of the story. I was thrilled, terrified, and
unable to believe what had happened. After six years of making an
adequate-but somewhat precarious-living for us, I could glimpse an
easier life ahead. Of course, I was naive, as unworldly as any Cinderella
stepping into the Hollywood ball.
I phoned Ted and told him that I would be at the Ambassador Hotel in
Los Angeles for most of December, and he wished me well. He was seeking
funds to pay for an impartial public opinion survey to determine just
where-if anyplace-in Colorado he might get an unbiased trial. He
suspected that Denver would be the place, a city big enough so that
the name "Ted Bundy" didn't ring a bell.
Page 278
His arch enemy, D.A. Frank Tucker of Pitkin County, had been struck
down but not through any machinations by Ted himself. Tucker had been
indicted by a grand jury on thirteen counts of unlawful use of public
funds!
One of the charges against Tucker alleged that he had arranged for a
seventeen-year-old girlfriend's abortion and billed the surgery to
Garfield County. Others contended that he had made double billings to
two separate counties for pleasure junkets he had taken with the young
woman. The Rocky Mountain News quoted Tucker's ex-wife as saying she
had confronted the beleaguered D.A. with questions about the purported
abortion and "he admitted it."
If nothing else, Aspen could be counted on to make headlines. There
were Tucker's problems, Claudine Longet-who had taken up with her
defense attorney (after neatly separating him from his wife)-and Ted.
250
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
My trip to Hollywood paled in comparison. I spent my days working with
writer-director Martin Davidson and my evenings wandering around the
lobby of the Ambassador Hotel. I ate supper several times with Adela
Rogers St. Johns who also lived in the hotel, and listened to her tales
of Clark Gable, Carole Lombard, and William Randolph Hearst, and her
shock at hearing that this was the first time I had ever left my children
for more than an overnight trip. She found me an overprotective mother.
I could now identify more easily with some of Ted's cultural shock as
he'd gone from the life of a law student to his existence as a prisoner.
I was homesick, wilted by the 90 degree heat, bemused by the pink Santa
Clauses skipping past palm trees and roof-high poinsettias, and
attempting to learn an entirely new form of writing: movie scripts.
Everyone in Hollywood seemed to be under thirty, and I would never see
forty again. Just as Ted had, I longed for the sight and sound of rainy
Seattle.
A few days before Christmas, I turned in my treatment and the producers
Page 279
liked it. I signed a contract to write the whole movie. They told me
it would take six weeks. Could I leave my children that long? I would
have to; it was too big an opportunity to turn my back on. I had no
way of knowing I would be away from home for seven months.
That Christmas was frantic; two days to shop, one day to celebrate,
and a week to find babysitters and pack up to return to California.
Ted's Christmas was bleak; he had learned on December
23rd that the change of venue he'd requested had been granted-not to
Denver but to Colorado Springs, sixty miles south, the El Paso County
bailiwick of D.A. Bob Russell who'd been brought in by Tucker to aid
in prosecuting him. Three of the six inmates on death row had been sent
there by juries in Colorado Springs. It was not a beneficent region
for accused killers.
Ted faced Judge Lohr after hearing of the decision and said flatly,
"You're sentencing me to death."
On December 27th, he got better news. Judge Lohr ruled on Bundy's motion
to eliminate the death penalty as an alternative penalty in his trial.
Lohr became the first judge in Colorado who would find the death penalty
unconstitutional. Of course, Ted said he did not expect the final verdict
to be
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
251
guilty, but he felt this was a landmark decision for all who opposed
the death penalty.
On December 30th, I received a phone call from Ted, a call to wish me
Happy New Year, We talked for about twenty minutes. On the surface the
only thing unusual about that call was that he seemingly had called
only to visit; his calls before had invariably been initiated because
he had something on his mind, or he needed a favor done. This call was
low-key, companionable, as if he were a friend calling from across town
instead of across several states.
He commented that the jail was empty and lonesome; all the short-time
Page 280
prisoners had been released to spend the Christmas holidays with their
families, and he was the only prisoner left in the Garfield County Jail.
And he complained, as always, about the food.
"The cook took off too-he left everything to be warmed up, and they
even warm up the jello. The stuff that's supposed to be hot is cold,
and vice versa."
I laughed at his standard lament about the omnipresence of jello-warm
jello-in his life. There was so much more unsaid than said; he was less
than two weeks away from his murder trial, but there was little I could
say that might alleviate the stress connected with that event. It had
all been said. I wished him luck and told him that even though I would
be in Los Angeles, I would keep in touch. Inwardly I tried to block
the picture of what it must be like to be all alone in jail while the
rest of the world celebrated the new year.
"I need your address . . . where you'll be in Los Angeles," he said,
and I gave it to him, waited while he wrote it down.
He wished me luck too, in my new venture, and then "Happy New Year."
Ted was saying "goodbye" to me, but there was nothing in his conversation
that indicated that. I hung up, troubled, thinking of the holiday season
six years before. So much had happened since then and so few of the
events of the past half dozen years hadibeen happy for either of us.
I mused that it was fortunate ttaat humans have not the power of second
sight, that we don't know what lies ahead.
Ted made several other calls on that next-to-last day of
1977: to John Henry Browne, to a reporter in Seattle, a man whom he
alternately liked and deprecated. To the reporter, he commented
inscrutably that he intended to watch the Washington Huskies in the
Rose Bowl game, "but not from
252
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
my cell." I don't know if he called Meg, but I suspect that he called
Carole Ann Boone. Carole Ann, who had visited him in his jail cell,
Page 281
who is rumored to have given him a lot of money, who had held his hand
and gazed at him with lovejust as so many other women had before her.
And then Ted reviewed his plan. He was no longer worried about the
upcoming trial; he didn't intend to be there to attend it.
He knew the Garfield County Jail better than any jailer did. He knew
the habits and peccadilloes of the four jailers better than they did
themselves. He'd become adept at charting their movements. His
ex-cellmate, Sid Morley, had given him the lay-out of the jail months
before, and Ted had memorized every corner and cubbyhole in the building.
He had a hacksaw, passed to him by someone whose name he would never
reveal; he had long since adopted the prison code that one never
"snitched."
There was a metal plate in the ceiling of his cell, a plate where a
light fixture was to be installed. There had been a long delay in getting
the electrical work done although electricians were scheduled to
complete it within a few days. With his hacksaw, Ted had spent six or
eight weeks tediously cutting a 12 X 12 inch square out of the ceiling.
He'd cut it so precisely that he could replace it at will . . . and
no one had noticed it. At times, he had been away from his cell for
two days, and still his "trap door" hadn't been discovered.
He'd worked at night, when other prisoners were taking showers, the
noise of the drumming water and their shouts drowning out his handiwork.
The hole had been limited in diameter by steel reinforcing rods in the
ceiling. To allow himself to crawl through that hole, he had dieted
down to 140 pounds. His complaints about the jail food were only a cover.
During the last two weeks in December, Ted had often wriggled through
the ceiling and crawled through the dusty space above him, crawled,
in fact, all over the space between the jail's ceiling and the roof
above. Each time he returned to his cell there would be the
heart-stopping moment when he thought that he'd been discovered, fully
expected to find deputies below him "waiting to blow me away."
Incredibly, there never were, even though Detective Mike Fisher had
warned Sheriff Hogue that he felt in his bones that Ted was getting
ready to run. The taciturn Fisher was not a man to cry "Wolf," but no
one listened to his warnings.
Page 282
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
253
Ted was packed, ready to go. All he needed was the right spot and the
right time. The ceiling route was the only way. His cell door was made
of solid steel, and there were two more locked doors between him and
freedom. His knees ached from crawling around on the cinderblocks above
his cell. He was looking for the easiest way down, and then, on December
30th, he had found it. A single shaft of light, filled with floating
bits of dust, pierced the darkness from below. There was a hole in the
plasterboard above a closet in jailer Bob Morrison's apartment.
The place was an echo chamber where a pin drop sounded like a crashing
rock and Ted had waited, poised, over the hole in the plasterboard.
Morrison and his wife were eating dinner; he had heard their conversation
clearly. Could they hear him as well?
"Let's go to a movie tonight," Mrs. Morrison said.
"Sure, why not?" the jailer answered.
Ted was paranoid; he suspected it was all a plan to trap him. He knew
Morrison had a muzzle loader, could well be waiting to shoot him as
he lowered himself through the closet ceiling. He sat there, scarcely
breathing for half an hour. He heard the Morrisons put on their coats,
heard their front door slam.
It was perfect. All he had to do was drop into their apartment, change
clothes, and walk out the front door.
He knew he would have a head start when he went. For the past few weeks
he had changed his pattern, telling the jailers he felt ill and couldn't
face the thought of eating breakfast. He'd worked on his legal briefs
all night and slept late, always leaving his breakfast tray outside
his cell undisturbed.
No one ever checked his cell after supper was served. And no one would
check it until lunch was served the next day.
Locked in his windowless cell, Ted had no idea what the weather was
like outside; he couldn't know that six inches of fresh snow had f^len
during the day, adding to the foot already on the ground, and
Page 283
temperatures were well below freezing. If he had? it wouldn't have
mattered.
His decision made, Ted returned to his cell, stuffed the legal papers
he would need no longer beneath the blanket on his bunk, and looked
around his Garfield County jail cell for the last time.
Then he was up through the ceiling, replacing the square
254
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
of ceiling-board, and crawling over to the opening above the closet.
He climbed down, fell from a shelf, and found himself in Morrison's
bedroom. He shed his jail garb for a pair of blue jeans and a gray
turtleneck shirt, some blue tennis shoes. He put Morrison's two working
replicas of antique guns-a rifle and a derringer, both muzzle loaders-in
the attic, just in case Morrison came back before he left the apartment.
And then Ted Bundy walked out the front door into "the beautiful Colorado
snowy night."
He found an MG Midget, saw it had studded radial tires. Even though
it looked as though it wouldn't make the summit of the pass, it had
keys in it.
Ted Bundy drove out of Glenwood Springs. The car blew up on the pass,
as he'd expected, but the man who picked him up took him to the bus
station in Vail. Ted caught the
4:00 A.M. bus to Denver, arriving at 8:30 A.M.
Back in the jail, a jailer knocked on the door of Ted's cell at 7 A.M.
with the breakfast tray. There was no response. He peeked through the
door's small window and saw what he assumed was Ted's figure asleep
in the bunk.
Jailer Bob Morrison, off duty, went to his closet around
8:15 and took out some clothing; he noticed nothing unusual.
In Denver Ted took a cab to the airport and boarded a plane for Chicago;
no one even knew he was gone. By 11:00 A.M. he was in downtown Chicago.
Lunchtime came in the Garfield County Jail; Ted's breakfast tray,
Page 284
untouched as usual, sat on the floor outside his cell. This time the
jailer looked at the lump in the bed and called Ted's name. Still no
response. The cell was unlocked, and the jailer let go an oath as he
stripped the covers from the bunk. There was nothing underneath but
Ted's law reference books and legal papers. They had, indeed, brought
him freedombut not in the accepted sense.
There was hell to pay around the Sheriffs office, with recriminations
flying right and left. There were cries that the captors had been warned,
and that they'd let this man, this man accused of almost a score of
murders, walk away.
Undersheriff Robert Hart commented that he doubted that Ted had taken
to the mountains this time. "He couldn't take the chill in the hills
around Aspen in June, so I don't think he would try it around here in
December. We're dealing with a highly intelligent person. He would have
this escape worked out thoroughly. Bundy had unlimited use of the
telephone.
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
255
He had a credit card to place calls wherever he wanted. And the court
ordered us not to listen in on his calls. Hell, he could have called
President Carter over in Europe if he was of a mind to do it."
Roadblocks were set up, tracking dogs called in again, but the spirit
had gone out of the chase; Ted had a seven teenhour headstart on his
pursuers.
He was sitting in the club car on the train from Chicago to Ann Arbor,
sipping a drink in comfort as the men far behind him called each other
names, and waded through snowbanks. . How he would have relished the
sight.
In Aspen Ted achieved the status of Billy the Kid at the very least.
By God, Bundy had done it; he had made the police look like Keystone
Kops! A poet took pen in hand and wrote:
So, let's salute the mighty Bundy Here on Friday, gone on Monday All
Page 285
his roads lead out of town It's hard to keep a good man down.
The Aspen State Teacher's College humor magazine, The Clean Sweep,
hastened into print with several articles on Bundy:
Bundy Bound for Berkeley: Apparently bored by seclusion in the Garfield
County Jail, Theodore Bundy decided to leave on New Year's Eve in search
of intellectual stimulation and some holiday cheer. Bound for Berkeley,
California, he plans to participate in the University atmosphere by
both teaching and studying. Called by some the Houdini of prisoners,
Bundy will teach courses in escapism, disguise, and also will give an
intricate study in what has become known as the Bundy Bread and Water
Diet. The intellectual and multitalented Bundy plans to study while
attending the University at Berkeley. Hevwill complete his law degree
and also take courses in fcoth criminology and theatre so that he can
successfully pursue one of several career possibilities. Future avenues
include Garfield County Sheriff and the television lead in an updated
version of "The Fugitive" series. Rumors of Bundy working as the wine
steward at the Bacchanal and opening a light fixture company in Utah
have both been proven false.
256 THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
Under the Student Forum Advice Column:
Dear FreddieI'd like to open a light fixture company in town. How
should I go about it?
Bundy
Dear TedWait until the reward gets bigger... . then call me.
 And, beneath a picture of an
old car, the question in the Snap Quiz
of the Month:
What celebrity drove this car to Aspen?
A. Marlon Brando
B. Jack Nicholson
Page 286
C. Linda Ronstadt
D. John Denver
E. Theodore Bundy Answer: Theodore Bundy.
It was all hilarious-and frustrating for law enforcement. There would
be no trial in January now. Ted had tried the unthinkable, and won.
29
Back in Seattle, I read the newspaper accounts of Ted's second escape
incredulously; I had detected no hints at all that he planned to bolt
and run when we'd talked earlier on December 30th. But, of course, I
would probably have been the last person he would telegraph his thoughts
to. I was too close to the police. And yet, he'd wanted to say goodbye.
I studied a map of the United States. If I were Ted, where would / go?
To a big city, certainly, and then where? Would he bury himself in a
sea of faces in a metropolis, or would he try to cross national borders?
He had asked for my address in Los Angeles. I felt a vague stirring
of unease. Los Angeles was a big city indeed, and only 120 miles from
the Mexican
border.
The FBI came to the same conclusion. Ray Mathis, in charge of public
information for the Seattle office of the FBI, and an old friend-a man
I had once introduced Ted to at a Christmas party-called and asked for
my address in Los Angeles. He wanted to know when I would be flying
down to
California.
I had planned to leave on January 4th, but my car had been struck from
behind by a drunk driver. It had almost totaled the first new car I'd
ever had and had left me with a severe whiplash. I put ofi my flight
until January 6th.
Ray gave me the names of two agents in charge of the Fugitive Unit in
the Los Angeles FBI office. "Call them the minute you get off the plane.
They'll be in touch with you, watching you. We don't know where he is-but
he may try to contact you there." *•
Page 287
All of it was Areal. Only a few years before, I had been-if there is
such a creature-a typical housewife, a Brownie leader. Now, I was off
to Hollywood to write a movie, with the FBI waiting for me. I felt as
if I belonged in an episode of "Mary Hartman, Mary Hartman."
* 257
258
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
259
The two FBI agents met me as I arrived at my new apartment in West
Hollywood. They checked the double locks on the door and found them
sound, satisfied themselves that my third floor apartment was not
accessible from the ground; any intruder would have to shinny up
reed-thin bamboo trees.
"Do you think he'll call you?"
"I don't know," I said. "He has my address and my phone number."
"If he does, don't let him come here. Arrange to meet him some place
public, a restaurant. Then call us. We'll be in disguise at another
table."
I had to smile. The ghost of J. Edgar Hoover still prevailed: I had
always found that FBI agents looked exactly like FBI agents, and I
commented on my impression. They were chagrinned and assured me that
they were "masters of disguise." If I doubted their expertise at disguise,
I did appreciate their concern, however.
I have often been grateful that Ted did not run in my direction. I was
saved a scene I could only imagine. All writers have a sense of the
dramatic, but I couldn't quite see Ann Rule from the little town of
Des Moines, Washington in the midst of an arrest of one of the country's
Ten-MostWanted criminals-that "criminal" an old friend.
Joyce Johnson, who was to be a faithful-if sometimes
needling-correspondent during my sojourn in Hollywood wrote,
Dear Ann,
Page 288
Just to let you know that Fm protecting your interests
here in the police department. I told Captain Leitch that
you are hiding Ted in your apartment, and is he mad!
1 He says you'll never get
another story, but he really likes
the new guy who's writing crime stories, and lets him see
! all the files. If you and Ted
go to Mexico, send me a
postcard.
Love, Joyce
The weeks ahead were uncomfortable, but not frightening. I had no fear
of Ted Bundy. Even if he was what he was said to be-a mass murderer-I
still felt he would never harm me, but neither could I help him in his
escape. That was something I just couldn't do.
When I returned to my apartment complex each night, I parked my rental
car in the dark underground garage, traversed its length, and emerged
among the lush flowering shrubbery that threatened to overgrow the
swimming pool. Shadows were everywhere, and the last stretch of sidewalk
before I came to my building in the rear of the complex was pitch dark;
the lights had burned out. I sprinted for the door, pushed the elevator
button, made sure no one was inside the self-operated lift, and ran
from there to the door of my
apartment.
Actually, I was more leery of some of the peculiar occupants of my
building than I was of bumping into Ted. He was a known quality to me;
they were not. My only fear as far as Ted was concerned was that I didn't
want to have to
face turning him in.
I needn't have worried. On the night I arrived at the Los Angeles airport
on January 6th, Ted was pulling out of Ann Arbor, Michigan, my girlhood
home, in a stolen car, headed for Tallahassee, Florida. By the time
Marty Davidson and I began work on our script in earnest, Ted was
Page 289
comfortably ensconced in the Oak in Tallahassee, calling himself Chris
Hagen. If he thought of me at all, it was only in passing. I was part
of the other world, the world left behind forever.
Living in his shabby room, Ted was as happy and contented as he'd been
in years. Just to open his eyes in the morning and see the old wood
door, paint peeling and scarred, instead of a solid steel door, was
glorious. At first, simply freedom itself was enough. He was around
people, part of a college group, a group he had always found healthy
and exciting.
He had meant to be completely and utterly law abiding, to get by without
a car, without even a bicycle. He had meant to get a job-construction
work preferably, but maybe even as a janitor. He wasn't in as good
physical shape as he'd been most of his life; the months in jail had
caused his taut muscle tone to waste aws^, despite the pacing he'd done
in his cell, despite the push-ups and sit-ups he'd made himself do
faithfully. And then, rjs was drastically underweight; he'd had to
starve himself so he could get through the hole in the ceiling. It would
take awhile to build up again.
He had gone through the records of graduates of Florida State University
and decided that a graduate student named Kenneth Misner, a track star,
would be the first man he'd be.
260
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
He researched Misner's family, his home town. He had an I.D. card made
up in Misner's name, but he didn't want to use it yet; he needed a driver's
license, other I.D. After he had all the verification that he needed
to prove he was Kenneth Misner, then he would develop two or three more
sets of I.D.-American first, and then Canadian. But he mustn't hurry
if, there was time now, all the time in the world.
His days were simple; he arose at six and bought a small breakfast at
the cafeteria on campus, skipped lunch, and had a hamburger for supper.
In the evening, he walked to the store and bought a quart of beer, took
Page 290
it back to his room and drank it slowly. God! Freedom was so sweet;
there was such pleasure in the simplest things.
He thought a lot about jail as he sipped the beer, smiling to himself
as he went over the escape again and again. It had worked far better
than he himself could have imagined. They had never understood what
he was capable of. They'd been so grim and self-righteous about those
damnable leg irons, irons they'd chained to the floor of their police
cars. Hell, he'd had keys for those leg irons all along, made for him
by a cellmate. He could have unlocked them at any time, but what good
would it have done? Why should he jump out of a moving police car in
the winter mountains when he could go through the ceiling any time he
chose and get a fourteen-tosixteen-hour headstart on the bastards?
He knew he should be working harder at finding a job, but he'd never
been much of a job hunter. The days melted into each other, and it was
all so good.
He knew he was acquisitive-that "things" meant a lot to him. He'd had
his apartment in Salt Lake City exactly as he wanted it, and the damned
cops had taken it all away from him. Now he wanted some things to brighten
up his world again. He'd passed the bicycle several times on his way
to the store. It was a Raleigh; he'd always been partial to Raleighs.
They had a good, strong frame, but whoever owned this one apparently
didn't give a damn about it. The tires were flat, and the rims had rusted.
He took it, fixed the tires, polished up the rims. Riding it felt great.
He'd ride it to the store to buy milk, and nobody ever looked twice
at him.
There were other things he took, things he needed, things anybody needed
if they were going to live like human beings: towels, cologne, a
television set, racquet-ball racquets, and balls. Now he could play
on the courts at F.S.U.
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
261
In the evenings, he mostly stayed in his room, watching television,
Page 291
finishing off the beer. He tried to be in bed by 10:00 P.M.
Stealing those things he needed seemed O.K. It was like going to the
supermarket and slipping a can of sardines into his pocket to have for
supper. He had to steal if he wanted to have anything; the $60 left
after he'd paid his deposit was melting away, no matter how spartan
he tried to keep his meals.
Friends were one thing he really couldn't afford. There was an unemployed
rock band living down the hall, and he chatted with them occasionally,
but he couldn't get really close to anyone in the Oak. As far as a
girlfriend, that was impossible. He had no past; he might only get
attached to someone and then have to disappear. How could he approach
a woman when he-Chris Hagen-Ken Misner-who-knowswho-else-had only been
"born" a week before?
With each day that passed, he berated himself because he wasn't actively
looking for work. If he didn't have a job, there'd be no paychecks,
and how was he going to explain that to the landlord of the Oak on February
8th when the $320 came due?
Still, he couldn't seem to make himself move on the job. It was too
great just to be able to play ball, ride his bike, go to the library,
watch TV, feel part of the human race again.
His room was becoming better furnished all the time; it was so easy
to pick things up. And then it was so easy to slip women-shoppers' wallets
out of their purses left in shopping carts. Credit cards. Credit cards
would buy anything; he just 'had to remember to keep changing them before
they were reported as stolen.
The world owed Ted Bundy. It had taken everything he had away from him,
and now he was just making up for those stolen years, those years of
humiliation and deprivation.
He was trained to take short cuts. Maybe that's why he couldn't bring
himself to take buses when it was so easy to steal a car. He never kept
them long. Later, he wouldn't even be able to count tiow many cars he'd
stolen during the six weeks he spent as a free man in Florida. There
was one he'd picked up in the Mormon Church parking lot. He had only
driven it a few blocks before he realized the thing didn't have any
brakes. He'd kill himself if he tried to drive that one. He dumped it
in another churchyard.
Page 292
262
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
And thief that he was, he had ethics. There was one little Volkswagen
that he picked up, and realized at once that it must belong to some
young girl. It was old and had a couple hundred thousand miles on it,
but she'd had it souped up and polished and reupholstered. It was clearly
somebody's pride and joy and he couldn't steal it. He made it a point
never to steal from someone who couldn't afford it. If the car was new,
and loaded with fancy extras, that told him that the owner could afford
to lose it. But the little Volkswagen, he couldn't steal that one; he
parked it a few blocks from where he'd taken it.
And so the days passed in Tallahassee-warm, almost dreamy days, and
chilly nights when he was safe in his room, watching television, planning
for the future, a future he could not quite manage to get running
smoothly.
With the Florida metamorphosis, his appearance changed once again.
Where he had been gaunt and skinny, the milk, beer, and junk food now
began to add pounds; his face took on a rounded look. There was a hint
of jowls around his chin. His body, trapped for so long in the confines
of a cell, built up muscle from the bikeriding and racquet ball. He
kept his hair short, and combed flat to discourage waves and curls.
He'd always had the pronounced dark mole on the left side of his neck-one
reason he'd worn turtlenecks almost exclusively-but none of the wanted
posters mentioned it; perhaps no one had noticed it. Now, he penciled
in a fake mole on his left cheek, started a real moustache. Other than
that, he made no effort to disguise himself. He knew that he had been
blessed with features that seemed to change imperceptibly through no
will of his own, always attractive, but somehow anonymous. He would
capitalize on it.
The one thing that ate at him was that he had no one to talk to, no
one at all, beyond an occasional "How ya doin?" exchanged with the band
guys down the hall, a few meaningless words with a pretty girl who also
Page 293
lived at the Oak. Before, although he had never been in a position to
and never really wanted to bare his soul, there had always been someone
to talk to, even if it meant the rhetoric of the courtroom, jokes with
his jailers. And there had been letters to write. Now, there was no
one. He had to savor what he had accomplished inside his own head, and
the loneliness took much of the joy out of it. Theodore Robert Bundy
had achieved a measure of fame back in the West; in Florida, he was
noTHE STRANGER BESIDE ME
263
body. There were no reporters fighting for interviews, no news cameras
trained on him. He had heen "on stage"-admittedly in a negative way-but
he had been someone to reckon with.
Ted Bundy had arrived on the Florida State University Campus on Sunday
morning, January 8, 1978, and
settled into his room at the Oak.
Unheralded, unrecognized, he moved about the campus, sometimes even
sitting in on classes, eating in the cafeteria, playing racquet ball
in the athletic complex south of the campus proper. He knew no one and
no one knew him; to the rest of the inhabitants of the college society,
he was only a shadowy figure-a nobody.
The Chi Omega sorority house, a sprawling L-shaped edifice of brick
and frame, is located at 661 W. Jefferson only a few blocks away from
the Oak, but it is a world apart-expensively constructed, clean,
decorated with impeccable taste, one of the top sororities on campus,
and home for thirty-nine coeds and a housemother.
I had pledged Chi Omega-another in the string of coincidences that have
seemed to bind me to Ted-pledged it, indeed, way back in 1950 in its
Nu Delta chapter on the Willamette University campus in Salem, Oregon.
I remember the white carnations, the treasured pin with the owl and
the skull, and, through the odd computer indexes of the brain, remember
even the secret password. But that was in the days when sentiment reigned,
Page 294
when we gathered breathlessly on the house balcony to hear serenades
from fraternity boys, much as the first Chi O's did when the sorority
was founded in the deep South. The girls who lived in the Chi O House
in Tallahassee were young enough to be my daughters.
The Chi Omega House on West Jefferson was the college home for the most
beautiful, the brightest, the most popular, and, as always, the
"legacies," pledged because their mothers and grandmothers had been
Chi O's before them. Where we had been honor bound to be safely home
by 8:00 P.M. on week nights and 1*00 A.M. on weekends, there were no
curfews in 1978. Eacn resident had memorized the combination lock to
the back dâor, a door which opened into the rec room on the first floor.
They could come and go at will, and. on Saturday night, January 14,
1978, most of the girls who lived in the sorority were out very late-into
the wee hours of the morning. There were several "keggers" on campus
that night, functions that we had referred to as "beer busts," and many
264
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
of the Chi O's were slightly intoxicated when they arrived home. Perhaps
that may explain in part how the horror could happen only thin walls
away from the girls who were spared, without their hearing so much as
a footfall.
The downstairs of the Chi Omega House contained the rec room, and, to
the west of it, a formal living room, seldom used except to entertain
visiting alumni and during rush week. Beyond that, there was the dining
room and kitchen. There were two "back" staircases, one leading up to
the sleeping rooms from the rec room-the route usually taken by girls
returning home late-and one opening off the kitchen. The front staircase
led up from the foyer just inside the double front doors. The foyer
was papered in a bright metallic blue and was illuminated by a chandelier,
illuminated quite brightly according to the witnesses who would testify
later.
For parents, sending their cherished daughters off to college, there
Page 295
would seem no safer place than a sorority house, full of other girls,
watched over by a housemother, doors always locked. The only male usually
allowed upstairs was Ronnie Eng, the houseboy who'd been dubbed the
"sorority sweetheart." All the Chi O's were fond of Ronnie, a dark,
slender, shy young man.
On that Saturday, most of the girls who lived in the Chi Omega House
had plans for the evening. Margaret Bowman, twenty-one, daughter of
a wealthy and socially prominent family in St. Petersburg, Florida,
was going out on a blind date at 9:30, a date arranged for her by her
friend and sorority sister, Melanie Nelson. Lisa Levy, twenty, also
from St. Petersburg, had worked all day at her parttime job, and she
decided she'd like to go out for a little while. Lisa and Melanie went
to a popular campus disco-Sherrod's-which is located right next door
to the Chi Omega House, at 10:00 P.M.
Karen Chandler and Kathy Kleiner, who were roommates in number 8 in
the sorority, went in opposite directions that evening. Karen went home
to cook dinner for her parents, and returned before midnight to work
on a sewing project in her room. Kathy Kleiner attended a wedding with
her fiancé, and then went out to dinner with friends. Both of them were
in their beds and sound asleep before midnight. Nita Neary and Nancy
Dowdy had dates too that night. They would not
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME 265
return until late. "Mom" Crenshaw, the housekeeper, retired around
11:00. She was on call if her girls needed her.
Lisa Levy was tired from her day's work and stayed only about half an
hour at Sherrod's. Then she left, alone, and walked next door to the
Chi O House and went to bed in number 4; her roommate had gone home
for the weekend.
Sherrod's many levels were crowded that night, as they always were on
weekends. Melanie sat with another sorority sister, Leslie Waddell,
and Leslie's bovfriend, a Sigma Chi.
Mary Ann Piccano was at Sherrod's that night too, accompanied by her
Page 296
apartment mate, Connie Hastings. Mary Ann had a somewhat disturbing
encounter with a man she had never seen before. The slender, brown-haired
man had stared at her until she grew uncomfortable. There was something
about the way his eyes bore into her that made her skin crawl. At length,
he had come over to her table, bringing her a drink, and asked her to
dance. He was handsome enough, and there was no rational reason for
her to feel so wary, no reason to refuse really; Sherrod's was a place
where one often danced with strangers. But, as she rose to join him
on the dance floor, she whispered to Connie, "I think I'm about to dance
with an ex-con . . ."
During the dance, he did or said nothing to substantiate her gut feeling
about him, but she found herself trembling. She couldn't look at him
and when the music finally ended, she had returned gratefully to her
table. When she looked for him later, he was gone.
Melanie, Leslie, and her friend left Sherrod's a little after
2:00 when it closed, and walked next door. When they reached the back
door, Melanie commented to Leslie that the combination lock wasn't
working. "This is strange," she murmured. "The door isn't locked."
Leslie only shrugged. They had been having trouble with the door's
closing and locking tightly for the past few days.
The trio walked through the rec room, lighted now with only a few dim
ta%le lamps. Margaret Bowman was already home and was waiting in the
rec room, anxious to talk to Melanie about her»date. Leslie's boyfriend
didn't have a ride home, and Margaret loaned Leslie the keys to her
car.
Melanie and Margaret walked to Melanie's room, discussing the events
of Margaret's date while Melanie got into her pajamas. Then they walked
to Margaret's room, number 9, and continued
talking as Margaret
undressed.
266
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
Page 297
Nancy Dowdy returned from her dinner date a few minutes after Melanie
and Leslie did; she too found the door mechanism ineffective and tried
to make sure the door was shut tight. She paused for a moment at the
top of the front stairs to say "goodnight" to Melanie and Margaret,
and then went to bed. She was asleep by 2:15.
It was 2:35 A.M. exactly on
Margaret's clock when Melanie said
"goodnight" to her. Margaret wore only her bra and panties at that time.
Melanie shut the door to Margaret's room tightly, heard it click, and
then walked down the hall to the bathroom where she chatted with another
sorority sister, Terry Murphree, who had just gotten off work at
Sherrod's.
The time sequence would become extremely important.
Melanie Nelson had a digital clock in her room, and she glanced at it
as she turned out the light; it was 2:45 A.M. She was asleep almost
at once.
It was 3:00 A.M. when Nita Neary arrived at the Chi Omega House,
accompanied by her boyfriend. They had attended one of the beer parties
on campus, but Nita had had only a few beers; she had a cold and wasn't
feeling very well.
When Nita came to the back door, she found it standing open. This didn't
particularly alarm her; she too was aware that it hadn't been working
right. Nita stepped inside and moved through the rec room, turning off
the lights. Suddenly, she heard a loud "thump!" Her first thought was
that her date had tripped and fallen on his way to his car. She ran
to the window, but saw that he was fine, just getting into his vehicle.
A moment later, she heard running footsteps in the corridor above.
Nita moved to the doorway leading into the foyer, hidden there from
anyone coming down the front stairs. She could see the foyer well; the
chandelier was still lit. The double white front doors were about sixteen
feet away.
The footsteps sounded on the front stairway now, running.
And then she saw him, a slender man, wearing a dark jacket. A navy blue
knit cap (what she called a "Toboggan") something like a watch cap,
was pulled down over the top half of his face. She saw him only in profile,
but she could make out a sharp nose.
Page 298
The man was crouched over, his left hand on the doorknob. And. in his
right hand, incredibly, he held a club, a club that seemed to be a log.
She could see it was rough, as
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
267
if covered with bark. At the base of the club, where he held it, there
was some cloth wrapped around it.
One second. Two. Three . . . and the door was open and the man was gone.
Thoughts flashed through Nita Neary's mind. She hadn't had time to be
frightened. She thought, "We've been burglarized ... or maybe one of
the girls had the nerve to sneak somebody upstairs."
The only man who she was used to seeing around the sorority house was
Ronnie Eng, and for a moment, she wondered, "What was Ronnie doing here?"
She hadn't seen the man's eyes at all, only that glimpse, now frozen
in her conscious mind, of the crouching figure with the club. She ran
up the stairs and woke her roommate, Nancy Dowdy. "There's someone in
the house, Nancy! I just saw a man leave."
Nancy grabbed the first thing at hand-her umbrella-and the two girls
tiptoed downstairs. They checked the front door and found it locked;
Nita had shut and locked the rear door when she came in. They debated
what they should do. Call the police? Wake Mom Crenshaw? Nothing seemed
to be missing. Nothing seemed to be wrong. Nita demonstrated to Nancy
the way the man had crouched, described the club. "At first, I thought
it was Ronnie, but this man was larger and taller than Ronnie."
They walked back up the stairs, still discussing what they should do.
As they reached the top, they saw Karen Chandler come out of number
8 and begin to run down the hall. She was staggering and she held her
head in both hands. They assumed she was ill, and Nancy ran after her.
Karen's head was covered with blood, blood that streamed down over her
face, and she seemed to be delirious. Nancy led her into her own room
and gave her a towel to help staunch the flow of blood.
Nita ran to wake Mom Crenshaw, and then went into number 8, the roo|a
Page 299
Karen shared with Kathy Kleiner. Kathy sat in her bed, hokling her head
in her hands. She was moaning unintelligibly afcd blood gushed from
her head too.
Nancy Dowdy dialed 911, almost hysterical herself, and said that help
was needed at once at the Chi Omega House at
661 West Jefferson. The first call was garbled. The dispatcher
understood that "two females were fighting over a boyfriend." That was
the way Tallahassee Police officer Oscar Brannon
268
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
received the call. "To my sadness," he would later remark, "I found
out differently."
Brannon was a mile or two away from the Chi O House and arrived at 3:23
A.M. Within three minutes, he was joined hy a fellow Tallahassee officer,
Henry Newkirk, Florida State University police officers Ray Crew and
Bill Taylor, and paramedics from Tallahassee Memorial Hospital.
Neither the officers nor the paramedics had any idea what lay ahead
of them.
Brannon and Taylor remained downstairs and got a description of the
man Nita had seen and broadcast it to all units working the area; Crew
and Newkirk ran upstairs. Mrs. Crenshaw and eight or ten of the girls
were milling around in the hall. They pointed to Karen and Kathy; both
girls seemed to be terribly injured.
Paramedics Don Allen, Amelia Roberts, Lee Phinney, and Garry Matthews
were directed to the second floor where the victims lay moaning. Allen
and Roberts worked on Kathy Kleiner. Kathy was conscious, but she had
lacerations and puncture wounds on her face, a broken jaw, broken teeth,
possible skull fractures. Someone had given her a container to catch
the blood that gushed from her mouth. She called for her boyfriend and
for her pastor. She had no idea at all what had happened to her; she'd
been sound asleep.
Allen's supervisor, Lee Phinney, moved to help Karen Chandler. She too
Page 300
had a broken jaw, broken teeth, possible fractures of the skull, and
cuts. The paramedics fought to open an airway for both the injured girls
to keep them from choking to death on their own blood.
The injured girls' room-number 8-looked like an abattoir, with blood
sprayed on the light walls. Bits of bark-oak bark-covered their pillows
and bedclothing.
Karen did not remember anything either. She too had been sleeping when
the man had hammered blows on her head.
Pandemonium reigned. While the other policemen moved down the corridor,
checking room by room, Officer Newkirk gathered the girls into number
2. No one could answer his questions; no one had heard a thing.
Officer Ray Crew came to number 4, Lisa Levy's room, with Mrs. Crenshaw
trailing behind. Lisa had gone to bed around 11:00 and she apparently
hadn't awakened, despite the chaos on the second floor. Crew opened
Lisa's door. He
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME 269
saw her lying on her right side, the covers pulled up over her shoulders.
The housemother told Crew her name.
"Lisa?"
There was no answer. "Lisa! Wake up!" Crew called. The figure on the
bed didn't move at all. Crew reached out to shake her shoulder gently,
started to roll her over on her back. It was then that he observed a
small blood stain on the sheet beneath her. He turned to Mrs. Crenshaw
and said tightly, "Get the medics."
Don Allen grabbed his gear and ran to Lisa. The paramedic checked for
a pulse, and found none. He pulled her i oato the floor,
and
immediately began mouth-to-mouth resus: citation
 and
cardio-pulmonary massage. Lisa's complexion was pallid, her lips
blue, her skin already cooling, and yet the i paramedics could not
see exactly what was wrong with her. She wore only a nightgown; her
Page 301
panties lay on the floor
beside the bed.
Allen cut off her nightgown, searching for some injury that had caused
her condition. He saw pronounced swelling around her jaw, a condition
usually produced by strangulation, and an injury on her right shoulder,
an ugly purpling bruise. Her right nipple had been bitten almost off.
There was no time to dwell on the horror of what had happened; Allen
and Roberts inserted an airway into the girl's trachea, forcing oxygen
into her lungs so that, to the lay observer, it seemed that she was
actually breathing on her own as her breasts rose and fell rhythmically.
They inserted a catheter needle into her vein and started a solution
of D3W to keep the vein open preparatory to the administration of drugs.
They were on standing orders to follow all these procedures in the case
of a patient near death. Next, they called the emergency room doctor
on standby via radio-telemetry for drug orders. They administered drugs
that might start her heart beating for ten to twenty minutes.
It was hopeless and they knew it, but the girl who lay motionless on
the floor before them was so young. They never got a pulse; all they
elicited was a slight, irregular pattern on their heart monitortlt was
only electrical-mechanical-disassociation, the electrical impulses of
a dying heart. Lisa Levy's heart itself never b^|it at all. Lisa Levy
was dead.
Still, she was transported to the hospital with sirens
wailing. She would be pronounced D.O.A.
270
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
Melanie Nelson was still asleep in her room. She wakened suddenly as
she saw a man beside her bed, a man shaking her and calling her name.
She heard him breathe, "My God! We have another one."
But Ray Crew was relieved to see that Melanie was not dead; she'd only
been sleeping. She sat up and followed him out into the hall, grabbing
a coat against the chill of the early morning.
Page 302
Melanie didn't know what had happened. She saw her sorority sisters
huddled together in one room, saw the policemen and paramedics milling
about, and assumed that the house was on fire. She asked, "Is everyone
home?"
And the answer came. "Everyone but Margaret."
Melanie shook her head. "No. Margaret's home. I talked to her." She
grabbed Officer Newkirk's arm and said, "Come on, I'll show you."
The two walked down the hall to room number 9. The door was ajar now,
although Melanie distinctly remembered shutting it when she'd left
Margaret after saying goodnight forty-five minutes earlier. She pushed
the door a little and could see Margaret's figure in the bed; there
was just enough light from the streetlight outside the window so that
she could recognize Margaret's long dark hair on the white pillow.
"See," Melanie said. "I told you she was home." Newkirk stepped into
the hall, turned on the light. What he saw made him push Melanie into
the hall, and shut the door firmly. He felt as if he were walking through
a nightmare.
Margaret Bowman lay on her face, the covers pulled up around her neck,
but he'd seen the blood on her pillow. Moving closer, he could see the
red liquid that had welled up on the right side of her head and clotted
in her ear. Oh God, he could actually see into her brain; her skull
had been shattered.
Newkirk pulled the bedspread down a little. A nylon stocking had been
cinched so cruelly around her neck that the neck appeared to be half
its normal size, and was probably broken.
Almost without thinking, he touched her right shoulder, lifted her a
bit off the bed. But he knew she was dead, that nothing more could be
done for her. He let go of her shoulder and placed her gently back in
the position he'd found her in.
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
271
Newkirk looked around the room. There was bark everywhere-on the bed,
Page 303
caught in the girl's hair, glued to her face by blood. And yet, there
seemed to have been no struggle at all. Margaret Bowman still wore a
shortie yellow nightgown, and a gold necklace was caught up in the
stocking around her neck. Her panties, however, lay on the floor at
the end of the bed.
Newkirk sealed off the room after paramedic Garry Matthews confirmed
that Margaret was dead, and had been for some time. The post mortem
lividity that begins soon after death, the purplish red striations that
mark a body's nether side, pooled blood no longer pumped by a living
heart, was already apparent.
Newkirk notified Tallahassee Police headquarters that there was a
confirmed "Signal 7," a dead body at the Chi Omega House.
The terrible toll now stood at two dead, two critically injured, but
the rest of the sorority girls were safe, all gathered in number 2,
shocked, weeping, unbelieving. How could they have slept through such
mayhem? How was it possible that a killer could enter their sleeping
area so easily without anyone knowing?
It had to have happened with such rapidity as to be unimaginable. Melanie
Nelson had seen Margaret Bowman alive and happy at 2:35, and Nita Neary
had seen the man with the club leaving at 3:00 A.M. Melanie had gone
back and forth across the hall until 2:45 A.M.!
One of the coeds who huddled, shivering, in number 2 was Carol Johnston.
Carol had come home about 2:55, parked her car behind the Chi O House,
and entered through the back door. Like Nita would moments later, Carol
found the door ajar. She went through the foyer and up the front stairs.
When she reached the second floor hall, she was somewhat surprised to
see that all the lights were off-a most unusual occurrence. The only
light at all was from a desklamp her roommate always left on when Carol
was out, and it made just a slice of lighl under her door.
Carol had changed into her pajamas and made her way down the black hall
to the bathroom. The door to the bathroom is a swinging door. As Carol
stood inside, brushing her teeth, the bathroom door creaked, something
it invariably did when someone passed by in the hall just outside. Carol
had thought nothing of it, assuming it was one of the
Page 304
272
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
other girls. A moment later, she emerged and walked down the hall, guided
by the light from her room.
Carol Johnston had gone to bed, unaware that she had missed the killer
by no more than a fraction of a second.
The man in the dark knitted cap may have entered the Chi Omega House
earlier in the evening, may have waited until he thought all the girls
were in and asleep, or he may have entered through the unlocked rear
door after 2:00 A.M. Some investigators feel that Lisa Levy was attacked
first, and her killer waited in her room for other victims to come home.
It is more likely that Margaret Bowman was the first victim, Lisa the
second, and Kathy and Karen almost afterthoughts. If that is true, the
man, in the grip of compulsive, maniacal frenzy, moved through the Chi
Omega House second floor with his oaken club, killing and bludgeoning
his victims-all within a space of less than fifteen minutes! And all
within earshot of almost three dozen witnesses, witnesses who didn't
even hear him.
Lisa Levy and Margaret Bowman were now lying in the morgue of Tallahassee
Memorial Hospital, awaiting post mortem examinations early Sunday
morning. The area around the Chi Omega House, indeed the whole campus,
was alive with patrol cars and detectives' cars from the Tallahassee
Police Department, the Leon County Sheriffs Office, and the Florida
State University Police Department, all looking for the man in the dark
jacket and light trousers. They had no idea what he looked like-no hair
color, no facial description beyond the fact that he'd had a large,
sharp nose. It was unlikely that he still carried the bloodied oak club.
It was likely that he might have bloodstains on his clothing; there
had been so much blood let in that catastrophic fifteen minutes as he
ravaged the four sleeping girls.
In the Chi O House itself, room numbers 4, 8 and 9 were littered with
the debris left by both the killer and the paramedics, the walls sprayed
with droplets of scarlet, the floors and beds full of blood and bits
of bark from the death weapon. Officer Oscar Brannon went to the rec
Page 305
room, and, on his hands and knees, collected eight pieces of the same
bark on the floor of that room; entry had obviously been made through
the back door where the lock had been nonfunctional.
He found a pile of oak logs in the back yard of the sororTHE STRANGER BESIDE ME
273
ity house. It appeared that the killer had picked up his weapon on the
way in.
Brannon and Sergeant Howard Winkler dusted for latent prints in all
the rooms-doorways, wall posters, around the combination lock that had
failed. They took photographs. In Margaret Bowman's room, Brannon
noticed a Hanes "Alive" stocking package lying across the wastepaper
basketempty-only the cardboard and cellophane remaining. A new pair
of pantyhose lay on her roommate's bed. It seemed that the killer had
brought his own garottes with him.
A BOLO (Be On the Look-Out) bulletin was quickly in the hands of every
officer in Tallahassee and Leon County.
There had been no pictures taken of Lisa Levy in her room; she had been
rushed to the hospital in the vain hope that some spark of life remained,
but Tallahassee I.D. Officer Bruce Johnson bad taken photographs of
Margaret as she lay on her bed, her face pressed into her pillow, her
right arm straight down beside her body, her left arm, hand palm up,
bent over her back, her legs straight. No, Margaret had not fought her
murderer at all. It had been the same with Lisa; she had been found
with her right arm beneath her.
Sheriff Ken Katsaris of Leon County was there, Captain lack Poitinger,
Chief of Detectives, and Detective Don Patchen of the Tallahassee Police
Department. In fact, there wasn't a lawman in all of Leon County who
was not aware of what had happened within an hour after the mass slaughter.
Not one of them had ever had to deal with anything like the savage
violence they were faced with.
Patrol officers fanned out through the neighborhood in door-to-door
Page 306
canvass. Nothing. A surveillance van parked on the street stopped
everyone who passed by. Nothing. The suspect was simply gone.
The paramedics had delivered the victims, alive and dead, to the hospital,
and were back on the street shortly after 4:00 A.M.
Their night's wdtk was far from over.
The old frame duplex at 431 Dunwoody Street was approximately eight
blocks from the Chi Omega House, closer as the crow flies. Two-tenths
of a mile. It was typical of many of the twenties vintage structures
bordering the campus proper which had been turned into rental
housing-nothing fancy, but adequate. There were two "shotgun"
apartments at
431 Dunwoody. Debbie Ciccarelli and Nancy Young lived in
274
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
A, and Cheryl Thomas lived in B. Each apartment opened onto a common
screened front porch with a single door, but the duplexes had separate
entries-entries leading into a living room, a bedroom, and, in the rear,
a kitchen. They shared a central wall and when the place had been
remodeled into two units, nobody had been much concerned with insulation
against noise.
That didn't matter in the least to the three girls who lived at Dunwoody
Street; they were close friends. Cheryl and Nancy were both dance majors
and had once been dorm roommates on campus. The trio visited back and
forth and often went out together socially.
On Saturday night, January 14th, the three girls-and Cheryl's date,
a dance student--had gone dancing at Big Daddy's, another popular spot
for young people in Tallahassee. Cheryl and her date had left before
closing and as Cheryl had a car and her date didn't, she had driven
him home, arriving about 1:00 A.M. He served her tea and cookies and
they talked for about half an hour. Then she drove the two miles to
the Dunwoody duplex and was in her apartment by two. She flipped on
the television set, walked to the kitchen and made herself something
Page 307
to eat, fed her new kitten.
Within minutes of her arrival home, Nancy and Debbie drove up. They
shouted at her, complaining good-naturedly that her TV was too loud;
she laughed, and turned it down.
Cheryl Thomas is a tall, lithe girl with the body of a ballerina,
dark-eyed, with long dark hair falling to the middle of her back, dimpled,
pretty, somewhat shy. She glanced around the neat kitchen with its
red-and-white print curtains and tablecloth, and turned out the
overhead light, leaving just a nightlight on.
Cheryl waited for her kitten to follow her, and then closed the
accordion-pleated divider separating the kitchen from her bedroom. She
changed into panties and a sweater-it was a chilly night-and then pulled
back the blue madras spread on her bed, a bed that was just on the other
side of the wall from the bedroom of her friends next door. She was
asleep almost as soon as her head hit the pillow.
Something roused her a short time later-a noise, something falling?
She listened for a moment, and then decided it must have been the kitten.
Her window sills were full of plants and the cat liked to play there.
There were no more sounds, and she turned over and went back to sleep.
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
275
Next door, Debbie and Nancy had also settled down for the night. To
the best of their recollection, they were asleep by 3:00 A.M.
Debbie woke from her sound sleep around 4:00. She sat up, listened.
It sounded as though there was someone beneath the house with a hammer,
banging again and again. Debbie slept on a mattress on the floor and
felt it as the whole house seemed to reverberate from the thumping sound
that came from some place just beneath her bed or the wall between her
bed and Cheryl's.
Debbie shook Nancy awake. The sounds continued for about ten seconds,
and then it was quiet again. The two girls in A waited, trying to identify
the noises Debbie had heard. They were afraid.
Page 308
Then they heard new sounds, sounds coming from Cheryl's apartment. She
was moaning, whimpering, as if in the grip of a bad dream.
Debbie crept to the phone and called her boyfriend, asking him what
they should do. He told her just to go back to sleep, that everything
was probably fine. But Debbie had a gut feeling; something was terribly
wrong.
The three girls had long since established a security check. They were
always to answer their phone-no matter what time of day or night. Nancy
and Debbie huddled together and dialed Cheryl's number. They could hear
her phone ring once .. . twice .. . three times ... four ... five... .
No one answered.
"O.K. That's it," Nancy said. "Call the police ... now/"
Debbie reached the Tallahassee Police dispatcher at 4:37 A.M. and gave
their address. As she was doing this, a terrible crashing noise came
from Cheryl's apartment, a noise that seemed to emanate from her kitchen,
as if someone was running, banging into the kitchen table, the cabinets.
And then there was only silence.
Debbie and Nancy stood trembling in the middle of their bedroom, heard
uie sound of cars pulling up in front. It had been only three |or four
minutes since they had called for help. When they looked out their front
door, they were astounded to see-not one squad car, but a dozen!
Debbie and Nancy stood in their doorway and pointed to Cheryl's door,
told the first officers-Wilton Dozier, Jerry Payne, Mitch Miller,
Willis Solomon-Cheryl's name. The
276
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
patrolmen banged on Cheryl Thomas's door, calling her name. There was
no answer. Dozier sent Miller and Solomon to the rear of the house to
spot anyone who might be attempting to exit at the back.
Dozier found Cheryl's door would not open. Solomon shouted from behind
the duplex that a screen was off a window to the kitchen, and that that
window could be opened. Dozier attempted to crawl into Cheryl Thomas's
Page 309
apartment that way, but, at that moment, Nancy remembered that a spare
key to Cheryl's apartment was usually hidden just above the screen door
to the porch. No one knew it was there other than the three girls who
lived at Dunwoody Street.
Dozier inserted the key, and the door finally gave. As their eyes
adjusted to the dim light inside the duplex, Payne and Dozier could
see the girl lying diagonally across the bed in the middle room, could
see blood on the bed and the floor.
Next door, Nancy and Debbie heard a shout, "My God! She's still alive!"
and they started to cry; they knew that something awful had happened
to Cheryl. The next shout instructed Officer Solomon to call the
paramedics, and then other officers came to the sobbing girls' duplex
and told them gently to go inside and shut their door.
Dozier and Payne attempted to help the girl on the bed; Cheryl was
semiconscious, whimpering, unresponsive to anything the policemen said
to her. Her face was turning purple with bruises; it was swollen, and
she seemed to have suffered severe head wounds. She lay on the bed,
twisting with pain and groaning. Cheryl wore only panties; her breasts
were exposed; the sweater she'd worn when she went to bed had been ripped
off.
Paramedics Charles Norvell and Garry Matthews, who had just cleared
the Tallahassee Memorial Hospital after transporting Karen Chandler
and Kathy Kleiner to the Emergency Room, got the call to return to the
Florida State Campus, and they arrived within minutes to treat this
latest victim. Cheryl Thomas was carried out of her apartment and rushed
to the hospital. Like the others, she had been bludgeoned about the
head and was critically injured.
It seemed almost too incredible to believe, but it looked as though
the Chi Omega assailant, his blood lust unsatiated, still in the grip
of whatever compulsion drove him, had run from the sorority house to
the little duplex on Dunwoody,
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
Page 310
277
ran as if he'd known exactly where he was going, knew who lived inside . ..
and there had attacked still another victim.
Dozier secured the scene of this latest attack until detectives arrived,
and I.D. technicians: Mary Ann Kirkham from the Leon County Sheriff's
Office and Bruce Johnson from the Tallahassee Police Department.
Johnson took photographs of the bedroom, the three-quarter bed pushed
up against the white siding walls, the tumble of bedding pushed to the
floor at the side of the bed, the piece of wood lath-red-stained-at
the foot of the bed, the curtain ripped from its rod in the kitchen
window, while Deputy Kirkham painstakingly bagged and marked the
evidence.
As Kirkham prepared to pick up the bedding from the floor, she found
something tangled in the sheets. At first, she thought it was only a
pair of nylons. Then she looked again. It was a pair of pantyhose,
pantyhose that had been fashioned into a mask with eyeholes cut out,
the legs tied together. There were two wavy brown hairs caught up in
the mask.
There were no keys in the apartment, and the deadbolt on the kitchen
door was still locked, although the chain was off. It was likely that
the suspect had entered and left through the kitchen window.
As the Chi Omega bedding had been collected-folded carefully and slipped
into large plastic bags so that nothing would be lost-Cheryl Thomas's
sheets, blankets, and pillowcase were bagged into evidence.
Again, all likely surfaces were dusted for latent prints, all rooms
vacuumed and the residue picked up, retained for evidence.
The piece of lath, possibly eight inches long and less than an inch
thick, hardly seemed heavy enough to have inflicted the kind of damage
Cheryl Thomas had suffered; it was more the type of stick used to prop
windows open, and the red stuff staining one^end was long dried. It
would prove to be only paint.
This time, thf investigators found no bark. Whatever weapon the intruder
had used, he had apparently taken it with him in his flight.
Karen Chandler, Kathy Kleiner, and Cheryl Thomas had been
lucky-although they would always bear the physical and emotional scars
of that long night. When they would apPage 311
278
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
pear eighteen months later in a Miami courtroom, when they would face
the man accused of injuring them-Ted Bundythey bore few outward signs
of the damage done to them. Only Cheryl would walk with a hesitancy,
a distinct limp; she, of course, had once dreamed of a career as a dancer.
Physicians at Tallahassee Memorial found that Karen Chandler had a
concussion, a broken jaw, had lost teeth, suffered facial bone fractures
and cuts, and had one finger crushed. Kathy Kleiner's injuries were
similar: she had a broken jaw in three places, a whiplash injury to
her neck, deep lacerations on her shoulder. All of Kathy's lower teeth
were loosened, permanently, and it was necessary to place a pin in her
jaw.
Cheryl Thomas's injuries were the worst. Her skull was fractured in
five places, causing her permanent hearing loss in her left ear. Her
jaw was broken, her left shoulder dislocated. Her eighth cranial nerve
was damaged to such an extent that not only was she deafened, but the
young dancer would never have normal equilibrium.
Karen and Kathy would be in the hospital for a week; Cheryl would not
be released for a month.
Not one of the three girls had any memory at all of being attacked;
not one could describe the man who had beaten them with such frenzy.
Lisa Levy and Margaret Bowman would, of course, never have their day
in court, never face the man accused of their murders. For them, there
would be a kind of silent testimony: the terrible pictures taken of
their bodies, the almost expressionless reading of their autopsy
reports.
Dr. Thomas P. Wood, a pathologist on staff at Tallahassee Memorial
Hospital, performed the post mortem examinations on the dead girls on
Sunday, January 15th-one week to the day since Ted Bundy had gotten
off the bus at the Trailways Station in Tallahassee.
He began the autopsy on Lisa's body at 10:00 A.M. Lisa had been strangled,
Page 312
leaving the characteristic petechial hemorrhages in the strap muscles
of her neck, a ligature mark on her throat. She had a bruise on her
forehead, scratches on her face. X-rays showed that her right collarbone
had been broken by a tremendous blow. It was Wood's opinion that she
had been rendered unconscious by the blows to the head. If she was,
it was a small blessing.
Her right nipple was attached by only a thread of tissue.
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
279
But this mutilation was not the worst: there was a double bite mark
on her left buttock. Her killer had literally Tom at her buttock with
his teeth, leaving four distinct rows of marks where those teeth had
sunk in.
Lisa had been sexually assaulted-but not in the usual sense; an
unyielding object bad been jammed into her body, tearing and bruising
the rectal orifice and the vaginal vault, causing hemorrhage in the
lining of the womb and other internal organs.
The weapon which had inflicted this damage was later found in the room.
It was a Clairol hair mist bottle with a nozzle-top. The bottle was
stained with blood, fecal matter, and hair.
The man who attacked Lisa Levy as she had lain asleep had struck her.
strangled her, Tom at her like a rabid animal, and then ravished her
with the bottle. And then, apparently, he had covered her up and left
her lying quietly on her side, the covers pulled up almost tenderly
around her shoulders.
The post mortem on Margaret Bowman began at 1:00 P.M. that gray Sunday.
The blows dealt to the right side of the girl's head had caused depressed
fractures, driving the broken pieces of skull into her brain itself.
The area of trauma was "complicated," meaning, to the layman, that there
was such extensive splintering of the skull that it was hard to tell
where one fracture ended and the next began. The ugly wounds began above
the right eye, and continued to behind the right ear, crushing and
Page 313
pulverizing the delicate brain tissue beneath. One fracture was
two-and-a-half inches in diameter, and the damage behind the ear was
four inches in diameter. Oddly, it would seem at first, there was more
damage to the left side of the brain than the right. But there was an
explanation: the force dealt to Margaret Bowman's head was so tremendous
that her brain had been slammed against the left side of the skull when
she was struck with the oak club on the right.
The pantyhose, ligature was cut from Margaret's neck, buried so deep
thai it could hardly be seen in the flesh. It was a Hanes "Alive" |Support
brand, a fabric of great tensile strength. One leg Tiad been cut off
by the killer, but the legs had been knotted above the panty portion-just
as the pantyhose mask found in Cheryl Thomas's apartment had been. The
delicate gold chain the dead girl had worn was still entangled in the
garotte.
280
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
In Dr. Wood's opinion, Margaret, like Lisa, had been unconscious from
the head blows when the ligature was tightened around her neck, killing
her by strangulation.
Unlike Lisa, Margaret Bowman bore no evidence of a sexual assault, but
she had "rope burn" abrasions to her left thigh where her panties had
been pulled off with force.
Neither girl had broken nails, no damage at all to their hands that
would indicate they had had a chance to fight for their lives.
Pathologist Wood had been in practice for sixteen years; he had never
seen anything like what he was seeing before him.
Rage, hate, animalistic mutilation. And why?
I •
Page 314
30
Almost anyone living in the vicinity of the Florida State University
campus on that terrible weekend would have heard the sirens of the medic
units, been aware that police activity was profound, realized that
something more than an accident or a usual investigation was the cause.
Henry Polumbo and Rusty Gage, two of the musicians who lived in the
Oak, returned to their rooms at 4:45 on Sunday, January 15th, even as
the paramedics were carrying Cheryl Thomas to the aid unit a few blocks
away. They heard the sirens, but they didn't know what had happened.
As Polumbo and Gage walked up on the front porch, they saw the man who'd
moved into number 12 a week before: Chris Hagen. He was standing at
the front door. They spoke to him and he said "Hi." He was staring out
in the direction, of the campus; they don't remember what he was wearing
exactly, but Gage recalled a windbreaker, a shirt, possibly jeans-dark
in color all of it. They don't remember that he seemed nervous or upset.
They went upstairs to bed and assumed Hagen had too.
By the next morning, as the post mortems began on Lisa Levy and Margaret
Bowman, the radio news broadcasts were full of information about the
killer in the Chi Omega House, about the attack on Dunwoody Street.
There was a shocked gathering of residents in Polumbo's room; they were
horrified, and they were discussing what kind of man could have done
such a thing.
As they talked, iChris Hagen walked in. Chris had never come right out
arud said what he was doing in Tallahassee. He'd told them th$t he'd
been a law student at Stanford University in Palo Alto, and they'd
assumed he was continuing his studies at Florida State but he hadn't
said it in so many words. He had boasted to them that he knew law very
well,
281
282
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
and that he was a lot smarter than any policeman. He'd said, "I can
Page 315
get out of anything because I know my way around."
They'd put it down to bull-shitting.
Henry Polumbo remarked that he felt the killer was a lunatic, and was
probably lying low as the police investigation accelerated.
The others started to agree, but Hagen argued with them. "No . . . this
was a professional job; the man has done it before. He's probably
long-gone by now."
Maybe he was right; Hagen had said he knew about such things, knew the
law, and felt cops were stupid.
While the students at Florida State tentatively began their regular
routines, moving-especially the coeds-in a kind of quiet dread, the
search for the killer went on. The Leon County Sheriff's Office, the
Tallahassee Police Department, the Florida State Police Department,
the Florida Department of Law Enforcement all worked side by side. The
streets in and around the campus were staked out constantly by officers
sitting quietly in their vehicles, patrolling. After dark, those
streets were almost deserted, and all doors were doublelocked,
blockaded. If it could happen the way it had in the Chi O House, in
the duplex on Dunwoody, could there be safety for any woman in the region?
The evidence, handled through a tight chain-of-evidence so that its
progress from the attack sites to the lab at the Florida State Department
of Law Enforcement could be traced exactly, was tested, examined, placed
under lock and key.
There was a lot of evidence; it would one day take eight hours to log
it into the trial, and, yet, there was so little that could help in
the probe as far as leading the investigators to the man they sought.
Blood samples-not of the killer-but of the victims. Dr. Wood had deeply
excised the section of flesh bearing the teeth marks in Lisa's buttock
and refrigerated it in normal saline solution to preserve it. He
personally saw Sergeant Howard Winkler, head of the Crime Scene Unit
of the Tallahassee Police Department, take possession of it.
In trial, there would be defense arguments that the tissue sample had
been improperly preserved-that it had shrunk. It had been taken from
the saline solution and placed in formalin.
Yet Winkler had photographed the bite marks, to scale, with a standard
morgue ruler beside them; whatever shrinkPage 316
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
283
ing occurred, the scale photos would never change, and a forensic
odontologist would be able to match those bite marks to a suspect's
teeth almost as precisely as a fingerprint expert could identify the
loops and whorls of a suspect's fingers.
// a suspect was ever found.
There was the Clairol hair mist bottle, stained with type O blood-Lisa's
type.
There were the two hairs found in the pantyhose mask beside Cheryl
Thomas's bed.
There were cards upon cards of latent prints lifted, all of which would
prove of no value; the killer apparently knew about fingerprints.
There was a wad of chewed gum found in Lisa's hair, gum that would
inadvertently be destroyed in the lab and made useless for testing for
secretion, or for teeth impressions. There were all the sheets, pillows,
blankets, nightgowns,
panties.
There were the fragments of oak bark. But how could one piece of bark
be traced to a certain source-even if the death weapon was ever found?
There were the pantyhose. The Hanes's garotte from Margaret's neck,
stained deeply with her blood, the Sears-brand mask from Cheryl's
apartment. That mask would be found to resemble almost exactly the mask
taken from Ted Bundy's car when he'd been arrested in Utah in August
of 1975.
There were tests on all the victims' sheets and bedding for the presence
of semen. When acid phosphotase is applied to material, the presence
of semen produces a purplish-red stain. There was no semen found on
Lisa's, Margaret's, Karen's, or
Kathy's sheets.
There was, however, a semen stain approximately three inches in diameter
on Cheryl Thomas's bottom sheet. Richard Stephens, an expert in serology
Page 317
at the Florida Department of Law Enforcement's crime lab, did intensive
testing on that semen stain. I
Approximately ^sight-five percent of all human beings are "secretors."
Enzyfnes are secreted in bodily fluids-saliva, mucous, semen,
perspiration, urine, feces, and these enzymes will tell a serologist
what blood type that person has. If a sample of cloth bearing a bodily
fluid stain is dropped into a control sample with the same blood type,
the sample will not agglutinate (the cells will not clump together).
If it is
284
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
dropped into a control sample of another blood type, there will be
agglutination.
Stephens's agglutination tests for known blood types all showed cell
clumping when the Thomas sheet samples were inserted. The test was
inconclusive.
Next, he used a process known as electro-phoresis. A sample of the
semen-stained sheet was placed in starch gel and heated until it took
on a "jellolike" consistency. It was then put on a glass slide and
stimulated electrically, causing the proteins to move, and a small
metabolyte was added to show the rates of movement. There was no
detectable PGM enzyme activity.
It would appear then that the man who'd ejaculated that semen was a
non-secretor. Yet, to Stephens, the results were inconclusive; there
were too many variables that could affect the tests: age of stain,
condition, the material it was on, environmental factors such as
humidity and heat. Also, the rate of secretion varies in individuals
depending on the condition of their systems at any given time.
Ted Bundy has type O positive blood, and he is a secretor.
It was a puzzle. In his trial, the defense would claim that the enzyme
tests, the agglutination tests, had proved that Ted could not have left
the semen in Cheryl's bed. Perhaps. The prosecution would stress only
Page 318
that Cheryl Thomas could not remember if she had changed her sheets
that Saturday, January 14th. Neither side would go a step further, would
ask Cheryl if she had had sexual relations with another man in that
bed earlier in the week, and the question was left suspended. If Cheryl
had not changed her sheets, the inference left unspoken by the
prosecution was that the semen stain, the stain where the blood type
could not be determined, had been left there by someone else before
the man who bludgeoned her entered her apartment. This stain of ejaculate
was one piece of physical evidence that Ted's supporters would refer
to again and again as proof positive that he was innocent.
For a lay jury, it seemed to be a moot point anyway. The scientific
testimony would appear to pass over their heads like so much
gobbledy-gook.
What the case would come down to was Nita Neary's eyewitness
identification of the man in the "Toboggan" cap, the man she saw leaving
the Chi Omega House with a bloodstained club, the bite marks in Lisa
Levy's flesh, the hairs in the pantyhose mask. The rest would all be
circumstantial.
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
285
But, on January 15th, that was academic. The lawmen didn't even have
a suspect, and none of them had ever heard of Theodore Robert
Bundy-missing now for sixteen days from his jail cell in Colorado.
1
I
31
Ted still lived at the Oak, and he had stepped up his thefts. With the
stolen credit cards, he could eat and drink luxuriously at expensive
Page 319
restaurants in Tallahassee, he could buy items that he needed, but he
couldn't figure out a way to get the $320 he needed for his upcoming
rent.
I was in Los Angeles, still half-expecting to see him step out of the
shadows in the apartment complex in West Hollywood, still expecting
to see his friendly grin.
Someone tried to steal my car, pried the whole ignition out of the
battered Pinto my producers had rented for me from Rent-a-Wreck. When
the deputy from the Los Angeles County Sheriffs substation a block away
came to take my report, he glanced around my apartment and asked me
if I had chosen it myself, or if someone had rented it for me. I told
him my producers had picked it out.
He grinned. "Do you know you have the only apartment on this floor that
isn't a hooker's pad?"
No I didn't. But it explained why there were so many knocks on my door
in the wee hours of the morning.
Like the FBI men before him, he double-checked my locks and warned me
to be careful. I could be forgiven for a slight tinge of paranoia.
I got another car from Rent-a-Wreck and life went on. Florida was a
long, long way away. I'd never been there, and had no plans to ever
go there.
I received a letter from my mother in Oregon; in it, she enclosed a
two-inch clipping giving the sparsest of details of the Chi Omega murders.
And she wrote, "It sounds alot like the 'Ted' murders. I wonder .. ."
No, I didn't think so. If Ted had been guilty of the crimes he was accused
of in Washington, Utah, and Colorado, and I'd always had great difficulty
really believing that, he had
286
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
287
made a clean escape. He was free. Why would he jeopardize that freedom
which meant so much to him? The Chi Omega murders, the other attacks,
Page 320
had been different, the work of an almost clumsy, rampaging killer.
t
I
32
A young man named Randy Ragan lived in a house just behind the Dunwoody
Street duplex. If he stood in the back door, he could look directly
at Cheryl Thomas's back door. On January 13th, he'd found the license
tag missing from his
1972 Volkswagen Camper. It couldn't have just dropped off; it had been
firmly attached with nuts and bolts.
The license number was 13-D-11300.
Ragan reported the tag as lost, and then received a new tag.
Ragan lived so close to Cheryl's apartment, so close to the Chi Omega
House, in fact, and so close to the Oak.
On February 5th, Freddie McGee,
who worked for the Florida State
Audio-Visual Department, reported that a white Dodge van owned by the
department had been stolen, driven off by someone after he'd left it
parked on campus. It had borne Florida plates which were bright yellow
and read 7378; in addition, it had a Florida State University number,
343, painted on the back.
"Thirteen" is a state designation meaning that a vehicle has been
licensed in Leon County. The "D" is for a small vehicle, and Ragan's
camper would have fit in that category. If someone attempted to put
Ragan's plate on a larger vehicle, he would ultimately be spotted by
a trooper and pulled over. But no one spotted the Dodge van stolen from
the Audio-Visual Department-no one in Tallahassee or its environs at
any rate.
Tallahassee is in the northwestern portion of Florida; Jacksonville
is 200 miles away in the northeast, along the St. Johns River which
leads out into the Atlantic Ocean.
On Wednesday, February 8, 1978, fourteen-year-old Leslie Ann Parmenter
Page 321
left Jeb Stuart Junior High School on Wesconnett Boulevard in
Jacksonville a little before 2:00 P.M. Leslie's father is James Lester
Parmenter, Chief of Detectives
288
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
289
for the Jacksonville Police Department, an 18-year veteran on that force.
She expected to be picked up by her twentyone-year-old brother, Danny,
and she crossed the street in front of the junior high school and entered
the K-Mart parking lot, keeping an eye out for Danny.
Policemen's children tend to be a bit more careful than the average,
are warned of dangers a bit more often. It had not saved Melissa Smith
in Midvale, Utah almost four years earlier. It would save Leslie.
It was raining that day in Jacksonville, and Leslie Parmenter bent her
head against the sprinkles that were gaining momentum. She was startled
when a white van moved toward her and stopped suddenly.
A man, a man needing a shave, with dark-framed glasses, wavy dark hair,
plaid slacks, and a dark navy-type jacket jumped out of the van and
walked over to her, blocking her path.
The teenager saw that he had a plastic badge pinned to his jacket; it
read "Richard Burton," and "Fire Department."
"I'm from the Fire Department and my name is Richard Burton," he began.
"Do you go to that school over there? Someone told me you did. Are you
going to the K-Mart?"
She stared at him, perplexed, and more than a little frightened. Why
should it matter to him who she was? The man was nervous, seemed to
be choosing his next words. Leslie didn't answer him; she looked around
for the sight of her brother's truck, the truck that bore the name of
the construction firm her father owned and Danny worked for.
The man didn't look like a fireman. He was too disheveled, and he had
a strange look in his eye, a stare that made her shiver. She tried to
side-step him, but he continued to block her path.
Page 322
At that moment, Danny Parmenter drove into the lot. He'd stopped work
early because of the rain, another factor that probably saved Leslie.
He saw the white Dodge van, saw the door was open, ar$f the driver was
standing beside it talking to his sister. He didji't like the look of
it.
Danny Parmentlr pulled up beside the stranger and asked him what he
wanted.
"Nothing," the man mumbled. He seemed agitated by the arrival of the
girl's brother.
"Get in the truck," Danny said quietly to Leslie, and then he got out
and walked toward the man in the plaid pants.
290
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
The man backed away, and hurriedly climbed into the van. Again, Parmenter
asked him what he wanted.
"Nothing . . . nothing ... I just thought she was someone else. I was
just asking her who she was."
And then the van's window was hastily rolled up. and the man drove out
of the lot. Parmenter had noticed that he'd been so nervous that he
was actually trembling, his voice quavering.
Danny Parmenter followed the van, then lost it in traffic, but not before
he wrote down the license number: 13-D11300.
Had Leslie not been a detective's daughter, the incident might have
been forgotten, but Parmenter had a feeling in his bones when Danny
and Leslie told him about what had happened that evening. The whole
thing smelled bad. and he was grateful that his daughter was safe. But
he didn't stop there; his whole orientation was to protect every man's
daughter.
He knew that the "13" meant Leon County way across the state. He would
check it out with detectives in Tallahassee. His own duties kept him
busy for most of February 9th; he would not have time to call the capital
Page 323
city until late afternoon.
Lake City, Florida lies about halfway between Jacksonville and
Tallahassee. Pretty, dark-haired, twelve-year-old Kimberly Diane Leach
lived in Lake City. She was a tiny girl, five feet tall, 100 pounds.
On February 9th, she was very happy; she'd just been elected first
runner-up to the Valentine Queen at Lake City Junior High School.
Thursday, February 9th was a gusty, rainy day in Lake City, but Kim
was at school on time. She was there when her homeroom teacher took
roll. Perhaps because she was so excited about being on the court for
the Valentine's Dance, Kim forgot her purse when she left her homeroom
and went to her first period P.E. class. When she did discover that
she'd left it behind, her teacher gave her permission to go back and
get it. It meant running through the rain to another building, but Kim
and her friend, Priscilla Blakney, didn't mind. They ran from the back
door which opens onto West St. Johns Street. They reached their homeroom
without incident, and Priscilla started to follow Kim back out into
the rainswept courtyard, then remembered something she had to get. When
she ran after Kim, she was startled. She saw a
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
291
stranger beckoning Kim toward a white car. Later, her recollections
would be somewhat garbled-perhaps by her shock at Kim's fate. Had she
seen Kim in the vehicle? Or had she only imagined it? But she had seen
the man.
And Kim was gone.
Clinch Edenfield, an elderly school crossing guard, working that
morning in the 35 degree chill,
buffeted by winds that reached
25-miles-per-hour, had noticed a man in a white van. The van had been
blocking traffic, and Edenfield saw that the driver was staring at the
schoolyard. He forgot that van quickly; it was irritating-nothing more.
Clarence Lee "Andy" Anderson, a lieutenant and paramedic in the Lake
Page 324
City Fire Department, drove past the junior high school a few minutes
later. Anderson had been working double shifts, and he had problems
on his mind which distracted him. He too was annoyed that the white
van was blocking traffic, and he braked behind it.
On his left, Anderson noticed a teenaged girl with long dark hair. The
youngster seemed to be on the verge of tears. The girl was being led
toward the van by a man who appeared to be in his early thirties, a
man with a full head of wavy brown hair. The man was scowling, and
Anderson had the impression that he was an angry father, retrieving
a daughter who'd been sent home from school. He mused that somebody
was going to get a spanking as the man pushed the girl into the passenger
seat of the van, and then hurried to the driver's side, gunned the motor,
and roared away.
Anderson said nothing to anyone. The incident hadn't seemed that unusual.
A man called away from the job because his kid had gotten into trouble
at school could be expected to be angry. The firefighter drove on to
work, to the fire department which is housed in the same building as
the Lake City Police Department.
Jackie Moore, the wife of a Lake City surgeon, was driving east on Highway
90 that morning, after picking her maid up. She saw a dirt$. white van
approaching, and gasped as the van suddenly sweryed into her lane, swung
back, and then swerved toward hef car again almost forcing her off the
road. She caught a glimpse of the driver. It was a brown-haired man,
a man who seemed angry, enraged. He was not looking at the road at all;
he was looking down toward the passenger seat, and his mouth was open-as
if he were shouting.
And then the van disappeared westbound, leaving Mrs.
292
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
Moore and her maid trembling at how close they had come to a head-on
collision.
Kim's parents, Thomas Leach, a landscaper, and Freda Leach, a
Page 325
hairdresser, went through their work day, unaware that their little
girl was missing. It was late in the afternoon when the school's
attendance office called Freda routinely to ask if Kim was ill. She
wasn't in school.
"But Kim is in school," her mother answered. "I drove her there myself
this morning."
"No," was the answer. "She left during first period."
The Leaches felt stark dread, something that only parents can know.
They tried to hope that Kim had varied her usual dependable pattern,
that she would come home after school with a good explanation. When
she didn't, they hurried to Lake City Junior High School and searched
the grounds. School authorities felt that Kim had run away, but her
parents wouldn't believe that; she had been too excited about the
Valentine's Day dance for one thing. But the most important element
was that Kim simply wouldn't run away.
Kim didn't arrive home for supper, as the streets outside grew dark,
and the wind whipped sheets of rain against their windows. Where was
she?
Her parents called her best friend, all her other friends. None of them
had seen Kim. Only Priscilla-who had seen her walk away toward the
stranger.
The Leaches called the Lake City Police. Chief Paul Philpot tried to
reassure them. The most dependable of youngsters sometimes runs away.
Even as he tried to believe what he told her frantic parents, he sent
a call out to all patrolmen to watch for her. Kim was a straight A student,
again, like all the others, superior in every way. She would not have
run away.
The BOLO on Kimberly Leach listed the clothing she had been wearing
when she was last seen: blue jeans, a football jersey with 83 on the
back and chest, a long brown coat with a fake-fur collar. Brown hair,
brown eyes, pretty; she looked a few years older than her age, but she
was really only a child.
Kimberly Leach was the same age that Meg Anders's daughter had been
when Ted Bundy was first arrested in Utah, Meg's daughter who looked
upon him as a father substitute. The same age that the little girl had
been whose mother would not allow her to go out for hamburgers with
Page 326
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
293
Ted, the ruling that had so insulted him. "What did she think?" he'd
asked me indignantly, "That I'd attack her daughter?"
That afternoon, Detective James "Lester" Parmenter in Jacksonville
didn't know that Kim Leach was missing in Lake City, but he was still
very concerned about the man in the white van who had approached his
daughter. He called Detective Steve Bodiford at the Leon County
Sheriff's Office.
"I need a little help. I'm trying to check out the ownership on a white
Dodge van-license number 13-D-11300. The computer's got it listed to
a Randall Ragan in Tallahassee. I'd like to have him checked out.
Somebody with his license number frightened my daughter yesterday. I
think he was trying to pick her up. She's only fourteen."
Parementer told Bodiford of the incident in the K-Mart lot, and Bodiford
agreed that it was worth following up.
He had no idea how valuable the tip was, with its farreaching
ramifications.
On Friday, February 10th, Bodiford tracked down Randy Ragan in the frame
house behind Dunwoody Street. Sure, Ragan said, he'd lost his plate,
on about January 12th. "I didn't report it stolen. I just got a new
tag."
Bodiford noted the proximity to the Dunwoody crime scene, noted that
a white Dodge van had been stolen on campus on February 5th, and put
the two together.
And then he read the bulletin out of Lake City, and he felt cold; if
there was a connection between the cases in Tallahassee and
twelve-year-old Kimberly Leach's disappearance, he didn't want to think
about the child's fate. She was alone, and the girls in Tallahassee
hadn't had a chance, even surrounded by other people.
Parmenter, hearing how all the coincidences linked up, felt a chill
too; his daughter had come so close. If it hadn't been for Danny's
Page 327
arriving just when he did. . . .
Parmenter knew that his children might hold the key to the missing
stranger iivthe white van. He arranged for them both to be hypnotized
by a fellow officer, Lieutenant Bryant Mickler. Perhaps there Ivas
something in their subconscious minds that they were blocking.
It proved to be an ordeal for Leslie Parmenter. She was a good subject
for hypnosis; Leslie not only recalled the man who'd approached her-she
actually relived the experience, and she became hysterical. There was
something about the
294
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
man's face-this "Richard Burton, Fire Department"-that terrified her,
as if she had sensed the evil there, the danger.
Parmenter explained, "When he got her to the point where she saw his
face, she went hysterical. He had to stop right then and bring her out
of it. She was fighting it, because she didn't want to see his face.
And what happened to make her so fearful, I don't know."
A half hour after the session, still trembling and afraid, Leslie
nevertheless cooperated, along with her brother, with Police Artist
Donald Bryan. They worked up a composite sketch of the man with Danny
and Leslie separated. First one, and then the other. Each of the young
Parmenters came up with almost identical likenesses.
Later, a few days after Ted Bundy's arrest in Pensacola, Florida on
February 15th, Parmenter would look at Ted's mug shots. "I thought,
well, shucks. . . . you put glasses on
that, and you've got a duplicate
almost."
And, also a few days after Bundy's arrest, Tallahassee Investigator,
W. D. "Dee" Phillips showed the Parmenter children a stack of mug shots,
including one of Ted Bundy, and Danny Parmenter picked two photos. He
chose Bundy's second.
Leslie Parmenter didn't hesitate at all. She picked Bundy's mug shot
Page 328
instantly.
"Are you sure?" Phillips asked.
"I'm positive," she answered.
But Kimberly Leach was gone. No one would find any trace of the child
for eight weeks, despite a massive search that would cover four counties
and nearly 2,000 square miles. Gone . . . like the others before her,
young women that she had never even heard about, young women almost
a continent away.
33
It was February 10, 1978, and things were dosing in on Ted Bundy. Still,
no one knew he was Ted Bundy, but the "dumb cops" whom he detested and
reviled were beginning to pick up on him. He'd stalled his landlord,
told him that he would have the money for the two months' rent in a
day or so, and that was smoothed over for the moment, but he was planning
to leave Tallahassee. He wouldn't have the money and couldn't see any
way to get it.
Stake-outs by the Tallahassee Police Department and the Leon County
Sheriffs Office were still beefing up the surveillance on the Florida
State campus. Some of the cars were marked; some were not.
Roy Dickey, a six-and-a-half-year veteran of the Tallahassee force,
sat in his patrol car near the intersection of Dunwoody Street and St.
Augustine at 10:45 P.M. on the night of the 10th. He'd been there for
two or three hours, and he was getting bored. Stake-outs are tiresome,
muscle cramping, and often nonproductive. Occasionally, he talked by
walkie-talkie with Officer Don Ford who watched and waited on the corner
of Pensacola and Woodward.
And then Dickey saw a man walking toward the intersection, a man who
had come from the Florida State stadium and driving range area. The
man was in no hurry. He walked east on St. Augustine, and then cut north
on Dunwoody, before disappearing between Cheryl Thomas's duplex and
the house next to it.
The man wore blue jeans, a red quilted vest, a blue cap, and jogging
Page 329
shoes. j\s he passed under the street light on the corner, he looked
^er at the patrol car-briefly-and Dickey saw his face clearly.
Later, when he saw a picture of Ted Bundy, Dickey would recognize him
as the man who'd passed him so casually.
Leon County Deputy Keith Daws was working surveillance
295
296
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
on the next shift-midnight to 4:00 A.M.-in an unmarked Chevy Chevelle.
It was now the early morning of February llth-1:47 to be exact.
Daws turned onto West Jefferson near the Chi Omega House and saw a "white
male fiddling with a car door" up ahead of him. Daws eased his car up
to where the man was bending over the door of a Toyota. When he saw
the deputy's car in the middle of the street, the man stood up and looked
around.
Daws identified himself and asked, "What are you doing?"
"I came down to get my book."
Daws saw that the man had a key in his hand . . . but no book.
"Maybe I'm stupid or something," the deputy drawled. "But you say you've
come to get your book, and you don't have no book."
"It's on the dash on the other side of the car," the man answered easily.
Daws studied him. He looked to be in his late twenties, wore blue jeans
that looked brand new, an orange-red quilted "lining" vest. When he
bent over with the key, the deputy could see there was no wallet in
the back pocket of the jeans. The brown-haired man also looked
"wasted. . . . completely exhausted."
There was a book on the passenger side dashboard, but the man said he
had no I.D. He'd just come down from his room. He hadn't parked on West
College Avenue where he lived because all the spots were filled.
That made sense; parking on campus was tight. First come, first serve.
Daws shined his flashlight into the green Toyota's interior, and saw
Page 330
that the seat and floorboards were covered with papers. He saw the tiny
tip of a license tag under the papers on the floor.
"Whose tag is that?"
"What tag?" The man was fumbling with the papers and his hand hit the
tag.
"That tag you've got your hand on."
The man in the vest handed the tag to Daws, explaining that he'd found
it somewhere, and never thought that someone might miss it.
The tag read, 13-D-11300.
Daws didn't recognize the number, but he routinely walked
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
297
over to his car radio to check it with "Wants and Warrants" for stolen.
He left the man standing by the Toyota. Daws had one hand on his
microphone and the tag in the other.
And then the man suddenly sprinted, running across the street, between
two apartment houses, and leaping over a retaining wall.
Daws was caught by surprise. The man had seemed to be cooperative. He
would later ruefully describe the scene to a Miami jury. "The last time
I saw him, I could have hit him with a baseball. You're talking about
the width of this courtroom."
The runner had leapt over the retaining wall, directly into the back
yard of the Oak . . . and disappeared.
The tag, of course, was registered to Randy Ragan, but, when Daws went
to Ragan's house, he was obviously not the same individual who had run
from the deputy. The man who had "rabbited" was later picked out of
a photo line-up by Daws; it was Ted Bundy.
Daws, whose frustration at the near-miss was still evident when he
testified in court, was even more disgusted when he read the next morning
of the search for a Dodge van. There had been a white Dodge van with
a flat tire parked-illegally-just behind the Toyota that the suspect
was unlocking. When the detectives returned to look for it, it was gone.
Page 331
1
I
34
The man later identified as Ted Bundy had leapt over the retaining wall
backing on the Oak and disappeared in those early morning hours of
February llth. His landlord, who knew him, of course, as Chris Hagen
saw him on the llth and noticed that he seemed "tired-like he'd really
been through it. .."
Ted's stay at the Oak-and in Tallahassee itself-was about to end, but
first, on the evening of February llth, he treated himself to one last
meal at the Chez Pierre in the Adams Street Mall, a meal where the tab
for the French cuisine and wine came to $18.50. He paid for it with
one of the stolen credit cards, also charging a $2.00 tip.
The waitresses at the Chez Pierre remember him because he had such "a
cold air about him. He kept to himself. You couldn't make conversation
with him. He ordered good wine. One night, he drank a full bottle and
on another occasion he ordered a bottle of sparkling white wine and
drank half of it."
Ted had always liked good wine.
On February 12th, he gathered up the possessions he'd accumulated; he
had considerably more paraphernalia to carry with him than he'd had
when he arrived in Tallahassee on January 8th-the television set, the
bicycle, his racquet ball equipment. He gave a box of cookies to a girl
down the hall, and he left.
He had wiped the room down completely. Later, detectives would find
no fingerprints at all, no sign that anyone had spent a month in room
number 12 at the Oak.
The white Dodge van, stolen from the Audio-Visual Department, was no
longer useful; he abandoned it in front of
806 West Georgia Street in Tallahassee. On February 13th, it would be
spotted and recognized by Chris Cochranne, an Audio-Visual employee,
and would be taken in by police for mePage 332
298
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
299
ticulous processing. The van was covered with a thick layer of dust
and dirt-except for the area around the door handles and on the passenger
door. There, the technicians processing the vehicle found "wipe marks"
as if someone had deliberately tried to remove fingerprints.
Doug Barrow, fingerprint expert for the Florida Department of Criminal
Law Enforcement, also found wipe marks on some of the windows, and on
the armrests and in other spots inside the filthy van. In other parts
of the van he was able to lift fifty-seven latent prints-prints which
all proved to have been left by Audio-Visual employees.
There was so much dirt, so many leaves and particles of vegetable debris,
in the back part of the van that it looked as if it had been placed
there to obliterate whatever might be on the carpet beneath. And through
this pile of soil and leaves, there remained the imprint of something
heavy, something that had been dragged from the van.
Serologist Stephens found two large dried bloodstains smeared on the
synthetic carpeting, an unusual carpeting made up of green, blue,
turquoise, and black man-made fibers. The stains proved to be from a
person with type B blood. Mary Lynn Hinson, a crime lab expert in cloth
fibers, was able to isolate a great many fiber strands which were caught
and twisted in the van's carpet. She also photographed some distinct
footprints in the pile of dirt-footprints left by a pair of loafers
and by a pair of running shoes.
The criminalists had weeks of work ahead of them, and most of that work
would have to wait until they had some shoes, some blood, some fibers
for comparison purposes. Police didn't know the man they sought, and
they didn't have Kim Leach's body, or the clothes she had worn when
she disappeared. Nor could they know the significance of two small bright
orange price tags found caught under the front seat of the van. One
read $24, and the other, stuck on top of it, read $26. The store name
Page 333
was Green Acre Sporting Goods, a sports equipment dfompany with
seventy-five outlets in Alabama, Georgia, and Florida. Detective J.D.
Sewell was assigned to find whilh store used that reddish-orange type
of price sticker, that marking pencil, and what item might have sold
for $24 or $26.
Ted had always favored Volkswagen bugs; on that last day in Tallahassee,
he spotted a little orange VW, a car belonging
300
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
to a young man named Ricky Garzaniti, a construction worker for Sun
Trail Construction. Garzaniti would report to police that someone had
stolen his car on February 12th from 529 East Georgia Street.
The keys had been in it; it was a sitting duck for Ted. He had a stolen
tag, a tag he'd taken off another Volkswagen in Tallahassee: 13-D-0743.
He stowed his Raleigh bike and the television set in the back, and left
Florida's capital city for what he fully expected would be the last
time.
This time, he headed not east, but west. At nine the next morning, a
desk clerk, Betty Jean Barnhill, in the Holiday Inn in Crestview, 150
miles west of Tallahassee, had an argument with a man who'd arrived
in an orange Volkswagen. When he'd finished his breakfast, he'd
attempted to pay for it with a Gulf credit card, a card bearing a woman's
name. When he started to sign the woman's name to the charge slip, she
told him that he couldn't do that. He became so angered that he threw
the card in her face and left hurriedly. Later, when she perused articles
about the arrest of Ted Bundy, she recognized him as the man who'd been
so furious.
There are no sightings reported of Ted Bundy and the orange car between
9:00 A.M. on February 13th and 1:30 A.M. on the morning of February
15th.
David Lee, a patrolman in the city of Pensacola, a city so far west
that it is almost in Alabama, was working "third watch" on February
Page 334
14-15th-8 P.M. to 4 A.M.--in West Pensacola. He knew his area well,
knew the closing hours of most of the businesses in his sector.
Lee's attention was drawn to an orange Volkswagen bug emerging from
an alley near the Oscar Warner's Restaurant. On that Tuesday evening,
Lee knew that Warner's had closed at 10:00 P.M. He also knew what the
vehicles of all the employees looked like. There was a driveway all
around the building, with the alley leading up to the restaurant's rear
door. When the officer first saw the bug, he thought it might have been
the cook's-but then saw it was not.
Lee did a U-turn and came back; the Volkswagen cruised slowly as the
squad car pulled in behind it. There had been no violations; at this
point, Lee was simply curious to see who was driving, since the alley
up to the restaurant was not a short cut.
He picked up his microphone and requested a "Wants and Warrants" check
on the license plate. Then he flicked on his
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
301
blue lights, signaling the Volkswagen to pull over; the tag came back:
stolen.
As the lazy blue beam revolved atop Lee's cruiser, the orange car ahead
picked up speed. The chase continued for a mile, over the line into
Escambia County, with speeds up to sixty miles per hour. Just past the
intersection of Cross and West Douglas Streets, the Volkswagen pulled
over.
Lee drew his service revolver and walked up to the driver's side; he
suspected there was someone else in the front seat. He was wary, and
his back-ups were far behind him.
Ted Bundy's life has a way of running in circles. Once before, he had
raced away from a policeman in a Volkswagen; once before, he had finally
pulled over. That had been way back in August of 1975, way back in Utah.
This was Pensacola, Florida and the officer ordering him out of the
car had a deep southern drawl. Otherwise, it was almost a repeat. Only
Page 335
this time Ted was at the end of his rope. This time he would fight.
David Lee was a year younger, and about twenty pounds huskier than Ted,
but his attention was divided between the man who sat in the driver's
seat and the possibility that someone else was hidden in the car. He
knew that was the way most cops got killed.
He ordered Ted out and told him to lie face down on the pavement. Ted
refused, and Lee couldn't see his hands. Finally, Ted obeyed, but as
Lee handcuffed his prone suspect's left wrist, Ted suddenly rolled over
and kicked Lee's feet out from under him, and then hit the officer.
Now, Ted was on top of the scramble of arms and legs.
Lee still had his revolver out; he fired one round-straight up-to get
the suspect off him.
And then Ted was running south on West Douglas Street. Lee was right
behind him, shouting "Halt! Halt or I'll shoot!"
Ted made the intersection and turned left on Cross Street. His only
response 1to Lee's shouts was to turn to the left slightly. Lee saw
something in his left hand; he'd forgotten about the handcuff in the
excitement of the moment and thought the man he was chasing had a gun.
He fired another round, this time directly at the suspect.
Ted hit the ground, and Lee thought he'd hit him. The officer ran up
to see how badly the runner was injured, and his quarry came up fighting
again. He hadn't been hit at all, and
302
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
he was struggling to grab Lee's gun. The fight lasted for a long time,
at least it seemed a long time to Lee.
Someone was yelling "Help!" over and over. Lee was startled to realize
it was the suspect.
As he recalled the incident later in court, he would cornment, "/ was
hoping there was help coming for me. Some guy came out of his house
and asked me what / was doing to the man on the ground. I was in uniform,
too."
Page 336
Finally, Lee's strength prevailed and he managed to subdue the suspect
and cuff his hands behind his back.
He had not the slightest idea in the world that he had just arrested
one of the FBI's Ten-Most-Wanted criminals.
Lee took the man to his patrol car, read him his rights under Miranda,
and headed for the station. The suspect, all the fight gone out of him,
seemed strangely depressed. He kept repeating, "I wish you had killed
me."
As they neared the jail, he turned to Lee and asked, "If I run from
you at the jail, then will you kill me?"
Lee was puzzled; the man wasn't drunk, and he'd only been arrested for
possession of a stolen vehicle. He couldn't understand the black,
suicidal mood that had suddenly gripped his prisoner.
Detective Norman M. Chapman, Jr. was on call that night. Chapman is
a man with a voice like warm maple syrup. If he weighed fifty pounds
more, the dark-haired, moustachioed, detective would look like Oliver
Hardy's twin; if he weighed fifty pounds less, he could double for Burt
Reynolds. When he walked into Pensacola headquarters at 3:00 A.M. on
February 15th, he saw the suspect lying on the floor asleep. He woke
the prisoner and took him upstairs to an interview room, where he read
him his rights again from a Miranda warning card.
The suspect nodded and gave his name: Kenneth Raymond Misner.
"Misner" had three complete sets of identification, all in the names
of coeds, twenty-one stolen credit cards, a stolen television set, a
stolen car, stolen tags, the bicycle. He gave his address as 509 West
College Avenue, Tallahassee.
"Ken Misner" agreed to a recorded statement. He appeared somewhat the
worse for wear; he had scratches and bruises on his lips and cheeks,
blood on the back of his shirt. He signed his rights' waivers, and
admitted that he had stolen the credit cards from women's pocket books,
the car, and liTHE STRANGER BESIDE ME
Page 337
303
cense tags. He'd stolen the I.D.'s from taverns. Why had he attacked
Officer Lee? That was simple enough: he'd wanted to get away.
At 6:30 A.M. on February 15th, the interrogation was stopped when
"Misner" requested a physician. He was taken to a hospital for treatment
of his injuries-injuries that were limited to the cuts and bruises.
Then he slept through the morning back in jail.
In Tallahassee, 200 miles away, the real Ken Misner was astounded to
learn of his "arrest." The F.S.U. track star had had no idea, of course,
that someone had appropriated his name, his life.
Tallahassee Detective Don Patchen, and Leon County Detective Steve
Bodiford drove to Pensacola on the afternoon of the 15th; they knew
the prisoner was not Misner, but they didn't know who he really was,
only that he had some connections in their jurisdiction. They talked
briefly with the suspect, saw that he was in good condition, but
exhausted. "We know you're not Ken Misner," they told him. "We'd like
to know who you are."
He refused to tell them, but said he would talk to them the next morning.
At 7:15 A.M. on February 16th, the still unidentified prisoner listened
to his rights, and again signed the waivers, "Kenneth Misner." He was
quite willing to discuss the thefts. He admitted stealing the credit
cards: Master Charge, Exxon, Sunoco, Gulf, Bankamericard, Shell,
Phillips
66, many copies of each with different names. He couldn't remember
exactly where he'd gotten them, but most of them had come from purses
and billfolds in shopping malls and taverns in Tallahassee. Some of
the names were familiar; some were not. There had been so many.
The interview ended as Bodiford said, "State your name."
The suspect laughed. "Who me? Kenneth R. Misner. John R. Doe."
The still unknown prisoner asked to make some phone calls. He wanted
to call an attorney in Atlanta, explaining that he wanted advice on
just when he should reveal his true identity, and what plea he should
make.
The attorney was Millard O. Farmer, a well-known criminal defense lawyer
whose particular area of expertise is the defense of those indicted
in homicide cases where the death penalty was involved. Farmer allegedly
Page 338
told Ted that an asso304
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
date would fly down to Pensacola the next day and that he could give
his name then, but not to admit to anything.
Until that unveiling, Ted requested that he be allowed to call friends,
that no news of his arrest or his identity be released until the next
morning, the 17th.
Ted placed a call sometime after 4:30 P.M. on February
16th-a call to John Henry Browne, his old lawyer-friend in Seattle.
Browne learned that Ted was in Pensacola, that he'd been arrested, but
that no one knew who he was yet. Browne found Ted's condition distraught,
had difficulty in eliciting the facts. It took Ted three or four minutes
to explain why he was in custody, and Ted didn't much want to talk about
that; he wanted instead to talk about the old days in Seattle, to learn
what was happening in his hometown.
Browne told him a dozen times not to talk to anyone without the advice
of an attorney. Given Ted's rambling state of mind, he felt that Ted
would jeopardize himself if he talked to detectives. Ted had always
listened to Browne's advice before. That all changed on February 16th.
Ted didn't seem to be listening any longer.
Pensacola Public Defender, Terry Turrell, went to Ted's cell at 5:00
P.M. and stayed with him until 9:45 P.M. He could see the man was caving
in; his head was bowed, he was crying, smoking cigarettes one after
another.
During the time Turrell spent with Ted, Ted made several long distance
phone calls-to whom Ted wouldn't say.
And, strangely for a former Protestant, a somewhat-failed Mormon, Ted
requested to see a Catholic priest. Father Michael Moody was closeted
with him for awhile, and then left, carrying with him whatever privileged
information Ted may or may not have given him.
Pensacola detectives say that they shared hamburgers and french fries
Page 339
with him that evening, that he ate. I don't know.
I only know that the carefully constructed facade was cracking apart,
falling away in shards of despair. I know, because I talked to Ted Bundy
several hours later; for the first time, he wanted to loosen a terrible
burden from his soul.
35
On that Thursday night, February 16, 1978, I was in my apartment in
Los Angeles. Somehow, the news of Ted's arrest had filtered out to the
Northwest news sources-even before Pensacola and Tallahassee
detectives knew for sure who they had. Ted was being interrogated in
Pensacola when my father called me from Salem, Oregon about 11:00 P.M.
(Pacific Coast Time) and told me, "They've caught Ted Bundy in Pensacola,
Florida. It's on the news up here."
I was shocked, relieved, incredulous-and then, I remembered the single
clipping I'd seen about the Chi Omega murders in Florida. I looked at
my mother, who had just flown down that day to attend a premiere with
me the next night, and said, "They've caught Ted ... and he was in
Florida."
That was all the information I had. The details-all the details of the
Florida cases-would become known to me over the next eighteen months,
but I had a terrible feeling that Ted Bundy was inextricably bound up
with those murders on the campus of Florida State University. Until
that point, I had always nourished a small hope that the police, the
media, the public, might be wrong in their assumption that Ted was a
killer. Now, knowing he was in Florida, that hope crumbled. I fell asleep,
and dreamed-not dreams, but haunting nightmares.
I was awakened by the shrill ring of the phone just beside the couch
where I slept in the one-room apartment. I fumbled for the phone in
the dark.
A deep, distinctly southern voice asked if I was Ann Rule. I said I
was, and ne told me he was Detective Norman Chapman of the Pensac^ila
Police Department.
Page 340
"Will you speak to Theodore Bundy?"
"Of course. .. ." I looked at the clock.
It was 3:15 A.M.
 Ted's voice came on the
line. He sounded weary, disturbed, confused.
305
306
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
"Ann ... I don't know what to do. They've been talking to me. We've
been talking a lot. I'm trying to decide what I should do."
"Are you all right? Are they treating you all right?"
"Oh yeah . . . we've got coffee, cigarettes . . . they're O.K. I just
don't know what I should do."
Perhaps because I had been roused from a sound sleep, because / had
no time to think, I responded with the honesty that can come with surprise;
I decided the time had come to face whatever facts had to be faced.
"Ted," I began. "It's been a long time, and I think maybe now it's time
to get it all out. I think maybe you should tell someone about it ...
all of it ... someone who understands you, someone who's been your friend.
Do you want to do that?"
"Yes . .. yes.. . . can you come? I need
help . .."
In a sense, it was a call I had expected for years-ever since I'd learned
that Ted had called me that midnight in November of 1974, when he had
been obviously disturbed about something. That had been after the last
victim-Debby Kent-had vanished in Utah. I had always felt since that
Ted knew I knew that he could tell me the terrible things bottled up
in his mind, and that I could take it. Was this the call?
I told him that I thought I could come, but that I didn't have enough
money for a plane ticket, didn't even know when planes left Los Angeles
for Florida. "I can find the money-someplace-and I'll get there as soon
as I can."
Page 341
"I think they'll pay for your plane ticket from here," he said. "I think
they want you to come too."
"O.K. Let me have a cup of coffee and get my head together. I'll check
with the airlines, and I'll call you back in a few minutes. Give me
the number where you are."
He gave me the number, the number in the captain's office in the Pensacola
Police Department, and then we hung up.
I immediately called the airlines, found I could get a plane out early
in the morning, and would get to Pensacola, via Atlanta, the next
afternoon. I felt Detective Chapman wanted me to be there; why else
would he have called me? I later learned he had contacted my babysitter
in Seattle on my home phone, and had had to put his captain on the line
before my sitter would release my number. They had gone to a lot of
trouble to find me.
Yet, when I tried to call back to the interrogation room
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
307
only minutes later, I was told by the desk sergeant that no calls were
being allowed in! I explained that I had just talked to Norm Chapman
and Ted Bundy and that they were expecting my call, but the answer was
still no.
I was completely mystified until I received a phone call 30 hours later
from Ron Johnson, an Assistant Florida State Attorney. "I want you to
come. I think you should come, but the detectives here want three days
to get a confession from Ted Bundy. Then, if they don't get one, they
will send for you."
They never did. I would never see any of those involved until I walked
into Ted's Miami trial in July of 1979. And only then would I learn
what had occurred during that long, long night of February 16-17, 1978,
and in the days that followed. Some of the interrogation was on tape,
an hours'-long tape played aloud in the Miami pretrial hearing. Some
of it came out in preliminary hearings, testified to by the detectives
Page 342
themselves, these men who spent so many hours closeted with Ted: Norm
Chapman, Steve Bodiford, Don Patchen, and Captain Jack Poitinger.
If I had been allowed to talk to Ted during those first days after his
arrest in Pensacola, would things have been any different? Would there
now be more answers? Or would I have flown to Florida only to be met
with the same evasive, meandering statements that Ted gave to the
detectives?
I will never know.
1
I
36
Detective Norm Chapman of the Pensacola Police Department is a most
likable man. There is much evidence that Ted liked him; it would be
hard not to. I think the man is sincere, that his earthy, "good-ole-boy"
quality is genuine, and I think he wanted desperately to find out what
had happened to Kimberly Leach, for her parents' sake. And he wanted
to clear up the murders and beatings in Tallahassee. I think he also
had self-aggrandizing motivations, just as we all do. For a cop with
six years' experience on a department stuck way up in the panhandle
of Florida to elicit a confession from one of the most infamous fugitives
in America would be something to remember. The detectives' decision
to block my phone call and my presence in Florida may have been the
right one; it may have been tragically wrong.
In July, 1979, Norm Chapman sat on the witness stand in Judge Edward
Cowart's Dade County courtroom, his shoulders and belly straining at
his sports jacket, his white socks visible beneath his slacks. He was
not a braggart. He was what he seemed to be, a smiling, garrulous man,
a man who carried a tape that would electrify the courtroom.
Late on the evening of February 16th, Ted had sent word to Norm Chapman
that he wanted to talk, and talk without counsel. The tape of that long
conversation with Chapman, Bodiford, and Patchen began at 1:29 A.M.
on February 17th. Ted's voice is strong, confident.
Page 343
"O.K. Let's see: it's been a long day-but I had a good night's sleep
last night and I'm coherent. I've seen a doctoiy called a lawyer."
If Ted had expected a grand hurrah when he revealed that he was Theodore
Robert Bundy, he was to be disappointed. The three detectives had never
heard of him. It was anticlimatic. What good did it do a man to be one
of the most hunted fugitives in America if there was such a blank re308
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME 309
sponse when he finally announced who he was? It wasn't until Officer
Lee walked in with a copy of the FBI TenMost-Wanted flyer (to have Ted
autograph it) that they really believed him.
Chapman offers, "We'll listen-whatever you want to talk about. .."
Ted laughs. "It is a bit formal."
"Anytime you get tired of our worn-ouut faces, just say so," Chapman
says.
"I'm in charge of entertainment..." Ted begins.
"You got plenty of cigarettes?"
"Yeah... . It was a big deal not to
tell my name .. ."
"I think we all understand since you told us. We can see why you were
reluctant. I must admit you kept your coolstanding before the judge
and not telling your name. It's more than I could do."
"You know my background?"
"Only what you told me. I deal on a one-to-one basis. We'll listen."
"The name business is a good way to start. I just knew the kind of
publicity-if I got arrested in Omaha, Nebraska . . . I knew it was
inevitable you'd discover my I.D. picture. I'd gone through such an
effort, so much to get free the first time, it seemed like such a waste
to give up so easily."
Chapman says he's interested in hearing about Ted's escapes. And Ted
is so anxious to tell about them. So clever, so well-thought-out, and
then he'd been unable to tell anyone. It is ironic that it is to
Page 344
policemen-the "stupid cops" he's put down for so long-that he finally
talks.
There is frequent laughter on the tape as he starts at the beginning
with the leap for freedom from the Pitkin County Courthouse and continues
through until he reaches Tallahassee. His voice drops and he takes deep
breaths as he berates himself for not finding a job. He mentions how
much he enjoyed playing racguet ball and offers to sign permission for
his stolen car to be searched. And then his voice breaks.
"You start crying in certain areas, like when you're talking about
racquet ball," Chapman comments.
"It was just so good to be around people, to be a part of people. I
have a habit that makes me want to acquire things-little things. I had
a nice apartment in law school, and it was all taken away from me. I
told myself I could live
310
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
without cars and bicycles and stuff-just being free was enough-but
I wanted things."
More tears . . . his voice is choked as he describes stealing himself
for being so stupid. "I never got a job. It was really stupid. I do
like to work but I'm just reluctant to get a job. It was a terrible
time not to get a job."
Chapman asks Ted if he's ever been to Sherrod's in Tallahassee.
"I never went there until a week and a half ago. The sound's unbearable
in there; it's a disco."
"You ever crash fraternity or sorority parties for free beer or food?"
"No, I had a bad experience that way a long time ago. I walked in with
a friend and there was a belligerent drunk. I was able to run fast
enough."
"You remember Rush Week-the beer busts out on the lawns in January?"
"Yeah, I heard noise from some frats close to where I live."
"What did you do at night? Walk around?"
Page 345
"I'd go to the library. I made a point of going to bed early. Once I
had the TV, I'd stay in my room 'cause I had something to do."
Asked to describe his Saturday nights, Ted veers away. He does not
remember stealing a license tag around January 12th or 13th, but he
remembers one tag stolen six days after he got to Tallahassee, a tag
from an orange and white van.
Asked if he'd ever wiped his prints off the cars he'd stolen, he replied
with surprise, "Well ... I wore gloves, just leather gloves."
Tears brim in his eyes, blur his words.
"Anything else in Tallahassee you can clear up for us?"
More tears ... his voice is choked as he described stealing the neglected
Raleigh bicycle. It seems to be an almost animate companion.
"I asked you about a white van-taken off campus .. ."
"I really can't talk about it."
"Why?"
"Just because I can't talk about it." Ted is crying.
"Because you didn't take it, or . . ."
Ted's voice is muffled by sobs. "I just can't . . . it's a situation-"
Chapman quickly shifts gears, changing the subject to
Ted's arrest in Utah. Ted explains he got one to fifteen on a kidnapping
charge.
"Man or woman?"
"Oh well . . . it's all so complicated. I thought you'd have all that
background by now. I was in prison from March to late October, 1976,
in Utah when the murder charge came down from Colorado."
The detectives take a picture, and someone asks, "What's your best
profile? Hell, you made the top ten last week . .."
"They'll take credit for my arrest."
"You don't like the FBI?"
"They're overrated bastards."
Chapman asks Ted about what happened in Colorado.
"Standard Oil slips ... I don't really understand how that came down.
Page 346
Oh yeah. .. . I had bought gas in
Glenwood Springs the same day Caryn
Campbell disappeared from Aspen about fifty miles away. If the bells
rang before, they were clanging-especially since the Washington
situation. I had a lot of connections in Washington-Governor's office,
etc. The pressure was really on."
"What kind of homicide was it?"
"Well, I know because it was communicated to me-they were young women.
The captain of King County Homicide was under pressure-but they never
questioned me. They had no evidence."
"What kind of murders were they?"
"No one knows because the parts are scattered."
"How about Colorado?"
"I saw the autopsy pictures. Blunt trauma and strangulation ..."
"In what way?"
"I don't know."
Chapman switches gears again, asking Ted if he ever went in sorority
houses to take wallets.
"No . . . too jnuch risk. Too much security. I'd assume they'd have
locks,lock devices, sound systems ..."
At this point, TJ6d requests that the tape recorder be turned off; he
asks that no notes be taken.
According to Detective Chapman's courtroom testimony, a "bug" had been
activated in the interrogation room-a bug that failed to record.
In Washington State, such surreptitious recording of an in312
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
terview would have made the whole interrogation tainted; in Florida,
no.
The interrogation went on throughout the night, and Bodiford, Patchen,
and Chapman insist that Ted made statements that were far more damaging
than those captured on any tape. Judge Cowart would eventually rule
Page 347
that none of the statements Ted Bundy made on the night of February
16-17,
1978, would be admitted into the Miami trial, but the conversation that
is alleged to have taken place after the recorder was turned off is
the most chilling.
The three detectives say that Ted told them he was a night person-"a
vampire," and that he'd been a "voyeur-a peeping Tom." He said he had
never "done anything" but that his voyeurism had to do with his
fantasies.
He had apparently described one girl to them, a girl who had walked
down a street in Seattle years before, when he was in law school in
Tacoma. "I felt I had to have her at any cost. I didn't act on it though."
He had allegedly discussed a "problem," a problem that surfaced after
he'd been drinking and driving around, a problem having to do with his
fantasies.
"Listen," he said, after the tape was off. "I want to talk to you, but
I've built up such a block so that I could never tell. You talk to me."
"Do you want to talk about the Chi Omega murders?"
"The evidence is there. Don't quit digging for it."
"Did you kill those girls?"
"I don't want to lie to you, but, if you force an answer, it would be
a no."
"Did you ever act out your fantasies?"
"They were taking over my life ..." ^
Bodiford asked again, "Did you ever carry out your fantasies?"
"The act itself was a downer . .."
"Did you ever go to the Chi Omega House? Did you kill the girls?"
"I don't want to have to lie to you ..."
There were more statements alleged to have been made by Ted that night
and the next. One must decide whether to believe police detectives or
Ted Bundy as to their authenticity.
According to the FBI information and several reporters who were deluging
the Pensacola detectives with calls, they
Page 348
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
313
had caught a man suspected of thirty-six murders, a figure they found
hard to believe.
When Chapman asked him about that during the posttaping conversation,
Ted had reportedly replied, "Add one digit to that and you'll have it."
What had he meant? Was he being sarcastic? Did he mean thirty-seven
murders? Or, no, it couldn't be ... did he mean a hundred or more murders?
The FBI figure had included several unsolved cases pulled in from left
field, including some in northern Californiacases that the detectives
who'd dogged his trail didn't believe had strong links to Ted. But,
off the record, Ted reputedly hinted to the Florida detectives that
there were six states who would be very interested in him. Six? They
say he talked of making a deal, of wanting to give information in return
for his life, that he felt he had things in his mind that would be
invaluable to psychiatric research. None of these statements is on tape,
and, just as Ted seemed to approach specifics, the investigators say
he backed off, teasing them, offering the "carrot," only to retreat.
When the statement "Add one digit to that and you'll have it," filtered
down to Washington detectives, they immediately thought of two
long-unsolved cases in their state.
In August of 1962, when Ted was sixteen, nine-year-old Anne Marie Burr
vanished forever from her home in Tacoma, a home that was only ten blocks
from the Bundy residence. Anne Marie had awakened during the night and
told her parents that her little sister was ill. Then the freckled,
blonde child had presumably gone back to bed. But, in the morning, Anne
Marie was gone, and a window fronting the street was found wide open.
She had been wearing only a nightgown when she disappeared.
Despite a tremendous investigation, headed by Tacoma Police Detective
Tony Zatkovitch, no trace of Anne Marie was ever found. The former Tacoma
detective remembers that the street in front of ^er home was Tom up
for repaving on the night she disappeared, and wonders if her small
body was buried hastily in fie deep ditches, to be covered over with
tons of earth and asphalt in the days that followed. Now retired,
Zatkovitch says that the name of Ted Bundy was never listed in the endless
Page 349
roster of suspects.
Oh June 23, 1966, Seattle homicide detectives had a case which matches
the M.O. of the cases Ted is suspected of
314
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
very, very closely. Lisa Wick and Lonnie Trumbull, both twenty, lived
in a basement apartment on Queen Anne Hill with another girl. They were
all United Airlines flight attendants, and all extremely attractive.
The third girl was not at home on Wednesday, the 23rd, because she spent
the night with another stewardess. Lonnie Trumbull was dating a King
County deputy sheriff, and he saw her late in the afternoon, called
her at ten that night. The pretty brunette, daughter of a Portland,
Oregon Fire Department lieutenant, told her friend that everything was
fine and that she and Lisa were about to retire.
When Lonnie's and Lisa's roommate returned the next morning at 9:30,
she found the door unlocked-a very unusual circumstance-and a light
on. When she walked into her friends' bedroom, she found them still
lying in their twin beds, but they didn't respond to her greeting.
Puzzled, she turned on the light.
"I looked at Lonnie and I didn't believe my eyes. Then I started to
wake Lisa . . . and she was in the same state," the girl told Detectives
John Leitch, Dick Reed, and Wayne Dorman.
Lonnie Trumbull was dead, her head and face covered with blood. Her
skull had been fractured with a blunt instrument. Lisa Wick was comatose.
She too had been battered on the head, but physicians at Harborview
Hospital speculated she had survived because the curlers she wore had
absorbed some of the force of the blows. Neither girl had been sexually
assaulted, and neither had struggled; they had been attacked as they
slept. There were no signs of forced entry and nothing had been stolen.
Joyce Johnson sat beside Lisa Wick's hospital bed for days, listening
for something the critically injured girl might say if and when she
came out of her coma. Lisa did recover, but she had no memory of what
Page 350
had happened. She had gone to bed and awakened days later in the hospital.
The Seattle detectives found the death weapon in a vacant lot just south
of the apartment building; it was a piece of ^ wood eighteen inches
long and three inches square and it was covered with blood and hair.
The case remains today in the unsolved file of the Seattle Police
Department.
Ted Bundy was twenty years old that summer, and, sometime in the summer
of 1966, he had moved to Seattle to beTHE STRANGER BESIDE ME
315
gin attending classes at the University of Washington. A year later,
he worked in the Safeway store on Queen Anne Hill.
There are no other matches-nothing beyond proximity and M.O.-but both
the Burr cases and the Wick-Trumbull cases came to investigators' minds
when they heard of that throwaway remark Ted Bundy made on February
17, 1978.
Leon County Chief of Detectives, Jack Poitinger, would give a deposition
to the defense team in which he recalled that Ted had told him a day
later he had a desire to cause great bodily harm to females. Poitinger
had asked him why he had such a proclivity for stealing Volkswagens,
and he'd said it was because they got good gas mileage.
"Well, come on, Ted. What else is there about it?"
"Well, you can take out the front seat."
There was a hesitation on Ted's part, and Poitinger said, "It might
be easy to carry someone in the car that way."
"I don't like to use that terminology."
The detectives and the suspect fished around for a word that would suit,
and came up with "cargo."
"It's easier to carry cargo in them."
"Why is it easy to carry cargo?"
"You can control it better. . . ."
According to Poitinger's deposition, Ted had indicated that he
Page 351
preferred to end up in some sort of an institution in Washington State.
An institution where he might be "studied."
"Studied for what?"
Poitinger, responding later to questioning by a Bundy defense attorney,
Mike Minerva, said "I think the gist of the conversation was that his
problem was that he had a desire to cause great bodily harm to females."
Chapman, whom Ted seemed to favor, asked, "Ted, if you will tell me
where the body (of Kimberly Leach) is, I will go and get it and let
the parents know that the child is dead."
"I cannot do that because the site (sight?) is too horrible to look
at."
When Ted wa* subsequently transferred to the Leon County Jail in
TaHahassee in a tightly guarded caravan of cars, Detective Dofi Patchen
asked him again, "Is the little girl dead?"
"Well, you gentlemen knew that you were getting involved with a pretty
strange creature and you have known that for a few days."
"We need your help in finding Kim's body so that her
316
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
parents can at least bury her and go on with their lives."
According to Patchen, Ted raised up in his chair, crumpled a pack of
cigarettes and threw it on the floor, saying, "But I'm the most
cold-hearted son-of-a-bitch you'll ever meet."
If all the off-the-record, and off-the-tape remarks made by Ted Bundy
are to be given weight, there is, indeed, a side to the man never revealed
to anyone but his alleged victimsand they cannot talk.
Norm Chapman swears that Ted did make those remarks, and that, at one
point when Chapman accompanied him to the bathroom on February 17th,
Ted had indicated he didn't want to talk to his Public Defenders, Terry
Turrell and Elizabeth Nicholas.
"He said, 'Norman, you gotta get me away from those S.O.B.'s because
they're trying to tell me not to tell you things I want to tell you.'
Page 352
He said he was wanting to tell us about him and his personality, his
'problem,' because the fantasies were taking over his life. He worked
with people with emotional problems and he couldn't discuss his with
anyone. He said to keep his fantasies going, he had to do acts against
society. We presumed his 'problem' had to do with death. He said when
he got into his 'lawyer' personality, he would talk to the Public
Defenders and we should realize what a big concession it was for him
to talk this way. He kept saying he didn't want to lie to us, but, if
we forced him, he'd have to. He said this many times. I told him that
I couldn't tell his P.D.'s to go away. He'd have to do that himself."
It was 6:15 A.M. (Florida time) when Ted called me on the morning of
February 17th, telling me he wanted to get it all out, to talk. His
Public Defenders waited outside the interrogation room and say that
they were not allowed to see him until 10:00 A.M. At that time, they
say they found him weeping, distraught, and rambling in his speech.
That evening Elizabeth Nicholas went to the Escambia County Jail and
demanded again to see Ted, telling the jailer she had an order for
sleeping pills for Ted. The jailer blocked her way, and she called the
judge. The jailer was furious and said he had the right to search her.
"I hope you have a woman to do it," she said.
"Listen, lady, there are naked men up there," the jailer hedged.
"Then I just won't look," she retorted.
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
317
She was allowed up into the jail area and saw that Ted was sleeping
soundly.
In pretrial, eighteen months later, Ted Bundy testified that he had
only fuzzy recall of that morning, and that he most certainly would
have seen his attorneys if he'd known they were outside the interrogation
room.
There had been a tug-of-war over the prisoner between detectives and
Public Defenders. Just which group Ted really wanted to talk to--if
Page 353
either-is another area that remains clouded.
I
I
37
I had tried for most of that Friday, February 17, 1978, to get through
to Ted, and, of course, I had met a brick wall in Pensacola, Florida.
That Friday night should have been exciting for me; my first Hollywood
premiere. I was guest of the director of the film-who was also my
collaborator on a new movie script-and there were so many movie stars.
It would have been grist for letters to send back to Seattle to my deluded
friends who visualized my life in Los Angeles as something more exotic
than it really was. Instead, it was all ashes. I kept hearing Ted's
terrified voice, a call for help from 3,000 miles away.
I knew what he wanted, although he had not said it outright. He wanted
to come home. He was ready, at that point, to confess it all, if only
he could come back to Washington to be confined in a mental hospital.
He had called me because he had no place else to go, because the running
was over. There were no more corners in his mind where he could go to
forget, and he was frightened.
I tried, literally, to save his life. I began to phone Washington state
agencies to try to arrange something that would allow Ted to confess
to me, and, through plea bargaining, to be returned to Washington for
confinement in a mental hospital. All of Saturday, I was on the phone.
First, I called Nick Mackie at home and asked if he could intervene,
if he could call Chapman or Poitinger and explain that it was likely
that Ted would talk to me, and that that was what the Washington
contingent of investigators wanted. Mackie said he would contact Senior
Trial Deputy Phil Killien, and get word back to me.
As far as funds available to pay for my plane fare to Florida and my
housing there, he didn't know.
I called the Seattle Police Homicide Unit and talked to Lieutenant Ernie
Bisset, assistant commander of the unit. ErPage 354
318
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
319
me felt that I should go to Pensacola if there was any way it could
be managed. The Seattle Police had some money available for
investigation, he said, and he would try to arrange : for a plane ticket
for me.
Bisset called back within half an hour. He had gotten an
° O.K. to pay for a trip to Florida for me, but it was up to me
to see if authorities there would allow me to talk to Ted. The
Seattle Police had no impact on what the Florida detectives
wanted to do.
A short time later, Phil Killien called. I explained to him that Ted
had seemed anxious to talk to me, but that I had been unable to get
through to him by phone since Thursday night.
"Phil," I asked, "who has jurisdiction over Ted? Would it be Washington
because the first of the crimes occurred in Seattle? Or would it be
Florida?"
"Whoever has the body," he answered.
For a moment, I was confused. Which body? Washington had a half-dozen
bodies, and Utah and Colorado had their share, but Florida had two too,
with Kim Leach still missing. And so I asked Phil Killien "Which body?"
"His body. Ted Bundy's body. They have him, and that gives them primary
jurisdiction. They can do what they want."
And so they could. If Florida didn't want me to talk to Ted, then I
couldn't talk to Ted. It was clear that the detectives in that state
did not want me, and what Ted wanted didn't matter in the least to them.
1
I
Page 355
38
Although Ted was the prime suspect in the Chi Omega murders, the Dunwoody
Street attack, the abduction of Kimberly Leach, he was, for the moment,
charged only with multiple counts of auto theft, auto burglary, credit
card thefts, forgery and "uttering" (a somewhat archaic term meaning
to declare or assert that a note, money, or a document is good or valid
when it is actually counterfeit). Conviction on those charges alone
could-like the charges after his first escape in Colorado-bring him
more than a lifetime in prison: seventy-five years. But the State of
Florida was looking for more, and they were taking no chances that the
"Houdini of Jails" would bolt again. Whenever he was outside a cell,
Ted wore handcuffs, chains, and a bulky orthopedic brace from his left
foot to thigh, a brace that made him walk with a pronounced limp. When
a reporter asked him at one hearing why he wore the brace, he grinned
and said, "I have a problem with my leg-I run too fast." For the press,
at least, he could summon up his old bravado.
While the processing of the orange bug and the white Dodge went on,
so did the search for Kimberly; no one believed that they were looking
for anything but a decomposing body. Detectives were also running down
charge slips on the stolen credit cards in Ted's possession when he
was arrested.
On February 18th, even as I had tried-naively-to work out plea bargaining
for him, Ted had been taken from his cell in Pensacola and driven back
to Tallahassee, the city he had never planned to visit again. Throughout
his legal problems, there had always been certain lawmen and prosecutors
who galled Ted: Nick Mackie, Bob Keppel, Pete Hayward, Jerry Thompson,
Frank Tucker. He was about to run into another nemesis-Sheriff Ken
Katsaris of the Leon County Sheriffs Office. Katsaris was a darkly
handsome man of thirty five, a man who would jokingly tell a political
meeting
320
Page 356
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
321
that "Ted Bundy is my favorite prisoner." Ted would come to despise
Katsaris, and more and more would come to depend on Millard Farmer,
the Atlanta attorney who is a founder of Team Defense, legal help for
indigents who face the death penalty. Ted had talked by phone with Farmer
even when he was incarcerated in Colorado, and now he wanted Farmer
at his side. It would not please Florida judicial authorities who thought
Farmer a disruptive force in a courtroom, given to grandstanding ploys.
Farmer gave an interview to the Tallahassee Democrat after Ted's arrest,
an interview in which he characterized Ted as being "a person very
disturbed mentally. He is emotionally disturbed. Attention being drawn
[to him] is of interest to him. He enjoys playing the game. He appears
to enjoy watching law enforcement people muddle in their ignorance."
But Farmer said that his defense team would volunteer to defend Bundy
if he was charged with the Florida murders.
During the first week of March, 1978, Ted appeared in Judge John Rudd's
courtroom twice: to hear the charges against him to date, and to fight
a prosecution request that he be ordered to give samples of his hair,
blood, and saliva. And he was, seemingly, back to his normal, joking
self-confidence, despite the bulky brace on his leg, despite the fact
he still wore a dirty ski sweater, rumpled slacks.
In view of his background, the thirty-four forgery counts and the
uttering charges brought against him because he'd charged $290.82 worth
of purchases on a credit card stolen from the wife of an F.S.U.
criminology student were chicken feed. He appeared more rankled by Ken
Katsaris's enjoyment of the limelight than he did by the innuendoes
surrounding him.
I had written to Ted immediately after I learned that I would not be
allowed to talk to him on the phone or to come to Florida, but I heard
nothing from him until March 9th. The letter, mailed to Los Angeles,
bears the date February 9,
1978. Again, he h%d lost track of time. It was not surprising. That
letter was one of the most depressed communiqués I ever received frorrf
him, and, I believe, it includes key words explaining what had happened.
Ted began by saying it seemed as if his call to me in February had occurred
Page 357
many months before, although he could still remember it very clearly.
He admitted to having been "in bad shape" at that time, but said he
had been able to pull
322
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
himself together within a day or two. He thanked me for my thoughtfulness
and willingness to come to Florida to talk to him at that time, but
said that unfortunate changes in circumstances had made such a journey
"both impossible and unnecessary."
He wrote that each new phase of his existence seemed to be more unbearable
than the last, and that he was finding it more and more difficult to
express his emotions and observations in writing. Indeed, a great deal
had happened to him since his December escape from the Garfield County
Jail, but he said he was so bitterly disappointed that that opportunity
had ended in failure that he was both unable and unwilling to discuss
the events of the prior two months. "Two months, it feels like so much
more time has gone by . . ."
His handwriting wavered on the page, and it was difficult to read; his
writing had always varied with the intensity of his emotions at any
given time.
I try not to look forward. I try not to think back to the precious few
days I had as a free person. I try to live in the present as I have
on past occasions when I have been locked up. This approach worked in
the past but is not working well now. I am tired and disappointed in
myself. Two years I dreamt of freedom. I had it and lost it through
a combination of compulsion and stupidity. It is a failure I find
impossible to dismiss easily.
love, ted. P.S. Thanks for the $10.
How many times had he added that same P.S.? How many $10 checks had
I sent over the years? Thirty . . . forty, maybe. And now, he was back
inside again-far removed from the French restaurants, the sparkling
wines, even the bottles of beer and milk he drank in his room at the
Page 358
Oakwith $10 to buy cigarettes.
Ted blamed his failure and capture on "compulsion," and he speaks of
a "precious few days of freedom." Could fortyfour-and-a-half days be
called a "few," or was he speaking of the days between his escape and
the first murders? Had he tried mightily to overcome his compulsion,
only to find that he could not control it?
From that night of terror in the Chi Omega house-January 14th-15th--was Ted, in essence, not free at all, caught instead
in a kind of mind-prison he himself could not escape? His failure to
find honest work might be construed as stupidity, but I feel compulsion
is the operative word in his letter.
After that one letter, I wouldn't hear from him again for four months,
although I wrote to him several times. He was very busy, repeating and
repeating patterns of behavior as if he were a squirrel on a treadmill.
On April 1, Ted asked for a judicial order that would permit him to
defend himself on the credit card and auto theft charges. Just as he
had done in Colorado, he wanted to be released from his cell three days
a week to visit a law library, he wanted better lighting in his cell,
a typewriter, paper, supplies, and he wanted jail personnel ordered
to desist from interfering with or censoring legal correspondence going
in or coming out. He wanted reduced bail too. A hearing was set for
April 13th.
On April 7th, searchers finally found what was left of twelve-year-old
Kimberly Leach. When the Dodge van was processed, criminalists had taken
samples of soil, leaves and bark found inside and caught in its
undercarriage. Botanists and soil experts had identified the dirt as
coming from somewhere close to a north Florida river. It had not been
much of a clue to pinpoint exactly where Kim's body might be foundbut
it was a start.
Columbia County is bordered by the Suwannee River on the northwest and
the Santa Fe on the south. Adjacent Suwannee County is bounded by the
Suwannee on three of its four borders. The Withlacoocb.ee joins the
Page 359
Suwannee opposite Suwannee River State Park. The banks of these rivers
seemed the most likely area in which to concentrate the search, although
they had been searched before.
Late in February, searchers had found a huge tennis shoe, other debris,
and strands of human hair along the Suwannee near Branford, twenty-five
miles from Lake City. They had gathered the possible evidence and
retained it for testing, testing that did not reveal much.
There had beei| an "extraordinary find" rumored near the entrance to
Suwannee State Park in March, but no specifics had leaked out to the
public and nothing official had come of it. The find had been a pile
of dumped cigarette butts-the same brand as the contents of the ashtray
in the VW bug Ted was driving when he was arrested: Winston's. Suwannee
324
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
River State Park had the kind of soil, the kind of vegetation found
inside the rear doors of the stolen van, and, on April
7, Florida Highway Patrol Trooper Kenneth Robinson worked with a
forty-man search team near the park, just off Interstate 10.
It was a baking hot day for April, with the temperatures heading toward
the 90s, and the searchers fought off clouds of mosquitos as they broke
through thickets, and probed into sinkholes with poles and into the
deeper ones with scuba gear.
The morning's work produced nothing, and the crew stopped for a quick
lunch in the shade. If their mission had not been so grotesque, they
might have enjoyed the dogwood, the redbud blooming. But there was always
the image in their minds, an image of the hidden body of the little
girl gone now so long.
After lunch, Robinson's party organized searchlines radiating out from
the sinkhole. Searchers on horseback had been through the region before,
but it had not yet been searched on foot. Robinson, alone, walked through
the underbrush for perhaps fifteen minutes. Ahead of him he saw a small
shed made of sheet metal, an abandoned farrowing shed for a sow and
Page 360
her litter. A wire fence encircled the shed.
Robinson, a lanky man, hunkered down and peered into a hole on the open
side of the shed. As his eyes adjusted to the dimness inside, he saw,
first, the tennis shoe . . . and then what looked like a pull-over jersey,
a jersey with the number
83 on it.
There was no leg or foot in the sneaker-only a bare bone. He felt sick.
Sure, they had known what they might find, but the ignominy of the site,
the thought that Kim Leach had been tossed away in a pigpen in this
desolate area made him want to vomit.
Robinson stood up and backed away. He called for the men in his party,
and they immediately roped off the pigpen that had become a tomb. It
was 12:37 P.M.
Jacksonville Medical Examiner, Dr. Peter Lipkovic, arrived and the
caved-in roof of the shed was carefully lifted off. There was little
question that it was Kim. She was nude except for the tennis shoes and
a white turtleneck shirt, but her long coat with the fake fur collar,
her jeans, her jersey, her underclothing, and her purse were all there,
piled in an incongruously neat pile beside the body.
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
325
Soon, dental records would verify absolutely that Kim Leach had been
found.
Dr. Lipkovic performed an autopsy on the body, and found "about what
you'd expect after eight weeks." Because the months of February, March
and April had been unseasonably hot and dry, most of the body had
virtually mummified, rather than decomposing. Internal organs were
there, but desiccated. There were no bodily fluids; blood typing had
to be done from tissue samples.
Cause of death was questionable, as it always is when bodies have lain
undiscovered for so long. Lipkovic would say officially only, "She
succumbed to homicidal violence to the neck region. There was a
Page 361
considerable amount of force applied to the neck that tore the skin,
but I have no idea whether it was done with a blunt or a sharp instrument."
He did not know if she had been strangled, but he would not exclude
the possibility. There were no broken bones, but something had
definitely penetrated the neck. A penetrating injury is usually
inflicted with a knife or a gun; there were absolutely no signs of bullet
fragments or gunbarrel debris.
Unlike the girls in Tallahassee, Kim had suffered no skull fractures,
apparently no bludgeon blows at all. There was evidence of sexual battery,
but that too was impossible to confirm either at post mortem or with
tests. Dr. Lipkovic said, somewhat inscrutably, that the injured areas
of a body decompose more rapidly than those untraumatized. He meant
that there was not enough vaginal tissue left to examine for signs of
sexual assault.
Back at the state park, the searchers had continued to look for evidence:
They found a man's khaki military-type jacket, bloodstained, about a
hundred feet from the pigpen.
Kim had, in all likelihood, been dead when her body was driven to Suwannee
State Park. There was very little blood at that site, and the deep
indentation-the drag marks-through the soil in the Dodge van were
consistent with a body's having been laboriously pulled out of the van.
Kim's parents accepted the news that she had, at last, been found with
grief, Jut little shock; theyJiad known she would never run away. They
now had only one child, a younger son. "It's not much better now," Freda
Leach said bitterly. "It's never going to be good."
When Ted was told that Kim had been found, he showed no emotion at all.
39
The Dodge van had already given up physical evidence. The soil and leaf
samples had led searchers to the banks of the Suwannee. Its odometer
showed that it had been driven 789 miles between the time it was stolen
on February 5th and the time it was abandoned on February 12th. Now,
Mary Lynn Hinson and Richard Stephens had some samples for comparison
Page 362
with the evidence they'd been holding. Heretofore, it had been useless,
only half of an intricate puzzle.
Kimberly Leach's blood type was B-the same type as the congealed blood
pooled in the back of the van. However, the desiccated state of her
body made it impossible to break the blood factors down to enzyme
characteristics. Possible, but not probable or absolute, physical
evidence. Semen stains on the child's underpants found next to the body
had been made by a man with type O blood, a secretor. Ted Bundy's blood
type. Again, a possible-not an absolute.
Ms. Hinson had a pair of loafers and a pair of running shoes which Ted
had in his possession when he was stopped by Officer Lee. She compared
the soles of both pairs of shoes-and found them identical to the
footprints left in soil inside the Dodge van. More than possible, more
than probable-but not absolute physical evidence.
The complex make-up of the van's carpeting with its four colors: green,
blue, turquoise, and black would become very important in Hinson's
testing of the hundreds of cloth fibers found in the van. Many of the
fibers had been found intertwined. Shreds of one blue fiber-an unusual
polyester weave with thirty-one strands to the yard-had come from
Kimberly's football jersey. Identical fibers had been found clinging
still to the navy blue blazer that Ted wore when arrested. Fibers from
the blue jacket were identified microscopically with those caught in
Kimberly's white socks. Again and again, Hinson found mute testimony
that Kim's clothing had
326
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
327
come into close contact with the carpet of the van (or with a carpet
microscopically identical) and to the clothing worn by Ted (or clothing
microscopically identical). The microanalist's conclusion was that it
was very probable, "in fact extremely probable," that Kim's clothing
had been in contact with the van's carpet and with Ted Bundy's blue
Page 363
blazer jacket.
Extremely probable-not absolute.
Hinson did not attempt to match any fibers vacuumed from the van except
those that appeared to correspond to clothing worn by Ted or Kim or
the carpeting. Patricia Lasko, a microanalyst from the Florida
Department of Criminal Law Enforcement's crime lab, found no hair
matches to either Kim's or Ted's hair among the one hundred samples
found.
There were no Ted fingerprints; it was impossible to tell if Kim's prints
had been there. Twelve-year-old children rarely have their fingerprints
on file, and Kim's body had been too decomposed to lift complete prints
from her fingertips.
Given the intermingling of the fibers from each subject's clothing,
and the position in which Kim's body had been found, Medical Examiner
Lipkovic surmised that the child had been killed during an act of sexual
attack. Her body had apparently been left in that position as the process
of rigor mortis began, and transported to the hogshed where it was found.
The price tags from the Green Acres Sporting Goods Store, found in the
van, were traced to Jacksonville. The store owner, John Farhat, recalled
that he'd sold a large hunting knife sometime in early February. "I'd
just marked it up from $24 to $26." It had been a cash sale. A brown-haired
man in his thirties had purchased it. But Farhat had first picked a
mug shot of another man-not Ted's. When he later saw a picture of Ted
in a paper, he had called a state investigator and said he was now
positive that the man who'd bought the ten-inch knife was Ted Bundy.
In the orange bug which Ted drove at his arrest in Pensacola, there
was alpair of dark-framed eyeglasses-glasses with clear,
nonprescription lenses. And there was a pair of plaid slacks. Were these
the clothes and glasses of Richard Burton, Fire Department?
As always, Ted's credit card purchases would be worrisome for him,
especially those where he purchased gas. Among the
328
Page 364
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
twenty-one cards found on him when he was arrested by Officer Lee were
cards that had been stolen from Kathleen Laura Evans (Gulf), Thomas
N. Evans in (Master Charge), and William R. Evans (Master Charge), cards
that had all been in Ms. Evans's purse in Tallahassee when they vanished.
Over the years, detectives had found that Ted seemed to have a phobia
about running out of gas, often purchasing gas in small amounts many
times in one day. On February 7th and 8th, the Gulf and Master Charge
cards had been used to buy gas in Jacksonville. One charge was for $9.67,
and another was for $4.56. The license plate? 13-D-l 1300.
The desk clerk of the Holiday Inn in Lake City, Randy Jones, recalled
registering a man he described as "kind of ratty looking, with three
days' growth of beard," on the evening of February 8th. Jones had noted
that the man's eyes seemed "glassy," and another clerk had surmised
that the man was either under the influence of alcohol or drugs. He
had signed in under the name of "Evans," using one of the cards stolen
in Tallahassee. He had charged a meal and several drinks in the lounge.
The next morning, "Evans" had checked out-but not officially. It would
have cost him nothing to pay for his motel room, since he'd stolen the
credit card in the first place, but he left directly from his room at
8:00 A.M.
Less than an hour later, Kimberly Leach was seen being led into a white
Dodge van by an "angry parent." Firefighter Andy Anderson continued
home to change clothing and said nothing about the incident. He was,
he would later say, "half afraid of starting a turmoil ... of seeing
law enforcement sent on a wild goose chase;" he didn't really feel that
the girl he'd seen with her "father" had any connection to the missing
teenager. When Anderson did go to the police six months later, he
willingly allowed himself to be hypnotized to bring back the scene in
detail that he'd witnessed on the morning of February 9th, and he was
able to describe Kimberly's clothing and the man who had taken her away.
"The man was clean shaven . . . 29-30-31, good looking,
160-65 pounds."
Jackie Moore, the surgeon's wife, had gone to the police, but she would
not be able to identify Ted absolutely until she saw him erupt in anger
in an Orlando courtroom two years later as she watched the television
Page 365
newscast of the trial. Only then, when she glimpsed the enraged profile
of the defendant,
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
329
could she superimpose it on the face that lingered in her memory.
Clinch Edenfield, the school crossing-guard, another eye witness, would
prove to be an ineffective witness. Two years later, he would recall
that February 9, 1978 had been a "warm, summery day." In fact, it had
been blustery, near freezing, and drenched with torrents of icy rain.
1
I
40
There would be few periods in the next eighteen months when Florida
papers did not carry at least some story about Ted Bundy, but he would
not be permitted the jail "press conferences" he wanted to hold. Once
his anonymity had vanished, Ted wanted to tell the press his feelings
about the spreading news coverage which pegged him as the number one
suspect in both the Tallahassee and Lake City cases. He did manage to
sneak out a few letters to newspapermen in Colorado and Washington
denouncing the sweeping indictment of him by the Florida press.
The state of Florida was more interested in getting samples of his hahand blood-which were finally supplied. Ted refused to supply
handwriting samples. Judge Charles Miner said that if Ted continued
to refuse, he would be denied his right to be provided with information
on the forgery cases.
On April 10, 1978, he was charged with two more forgery cases. One count
alleged he had used a stolen Gulf Oil card in Lake City to buy gas on
February 9th; the second was for the use of a stolen Master Charge in
Page 366
the same city. Lake City now had a legal hold on him. But Lake City
would have a long wait; there were still sixty-two charges extant in
Leon County. And, of course, he was still wanted in Colorado for murder
and escape.
His legal troubles continued to pile up. On April 27, a warrant was
issued to Ted in his Leon County jail cell, a warrant decreeing that
he would be taken from that cell to a dentist's office where impressions
of his teeth would be made. These impressions would be compared with
the bite marks found on Lisa Levy's body.
Sheriff Katsaris was quoted as saying, "It's not an impossibility that
someone will be charged in the Chi Omega killings in the near future . . ."
At the same time, Judge Minor called off Ted's May 9th trial for auto
theft and burglary,
330
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
331
and said it would not be rescheduled until the suspect agreed to provide
samples of his handwriting. The sudden trip to the dentist's office
appeared to have been deliberately planned as a surprise for Ted; the
word was that authorities did not want to give him a chance to "grind
down his teeth" before the odontology impressions could be obtained.
There was much speculation that murder charges might be immediately
forthcoming, but Katsaris scotched those rumors by saying, "They will
probably be within the next couple of months ... or not at all."
With the months creeping by-and no murder charges-it seemed that the
Florida murders might culminate just as the earlier cases in Washington
and Utah had; perhaps there was not enough physical evidence to risk
going into trial.
In the meantime, Ted seemingly had once again acclimated to jail. The
Leon County Jail is a white brick building four stories high, not new,
but not a sweltering rathole as southern jails are often characterized
in fiction.
Page 367
He was being kept in isolation in a four-man security cell in the center
of the jail on the second floor. He had no contact with the other 250
prisoners, and his only visitors were local public defenders. He seemed
to like his jailers, particularly Art Golden, a lumbering, ruggedly
good-looking man who was in charge, of the jail. But then, Ted had never
had much criticism for his jailers; it was the detectives and prosecutors
who drew his diatribes.
His cell was clean, air-conditioned, and he was allowed a radio and
newspapers. He knew that the Grand Jury seemed to be moving toward his
indictment on murder charges.
Mindful of Ted's previous escapes, his captors were cautious. The light
fixture in his cell was far too high for him to reach. The outer door
had been beefed up with two extra locks, and only one jailer had a key
that would open both. As usual, Ted decried his lack of exercise, the
food, the lighting. He could not see the outside world. There were no
windows in his cell, even barred ones.
Millard Farmer, still not officially Ted's attorney, hinted that he
would filf federal charges because the jail conditions violated Ted's
rights. It was an all-too-familiar chant.
Although J had written to him several times during the spring of 1978.
T didn't hear from Ted again until July. By that time, I had finally
broken free of my sweatbox of a cell, the 8X10 room where I had been
writing a movie script for
332
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
seven months. That room hadn't had windows either, and it hadn't had
air-conditioning. Only the worst smog in Los Angeles in twenty years
had been able to creep through the cracks in the door, and the temperature
in our "writers' room" had hit 105 degrees.
Ted's July 6th letter was an example of the sardonic humor he was often
capable of, and a far cry from the desperate letter he'd mailed soon
after his arrest. It was typed; along with what the jailers called his
Page 368
"stationery store" of legal supplies, he had been given a typewriter
to prepare his defense.
He apologized for failing to answer my last letter sent from California
on May 21st, and, again, thanked me for the check I'd enclosed. Money
was lasting him for quite awhile; he had stopped smoking. Ted had been
surprised to find that I was still working away on the movie script
in Hollywood into the îate spring of 1978, and suggested that perhaps
I had been naive when I'd signed the contract and that I should ask
for additional money for the four extra months I had worked.
At least they could give you 'mugger money' so the buggers don't have
to go away empty handed. You said you lived in a 'trick pad?' Sorry,
I can't interpret the L.A. dialect or whatever, oh there's the wprd:
colloquialism. Does this mean that magicians hang out there; you know,
rabbits out of hats and things. Or do you mean ... do you suggest ...
a ... ahmmmm . . . that persons get to know each other carnally for
a negotiated price? If so, and if it pays better than writing-it would
almost have to-you might consider getting into administration . . .
You could apply for a small business loan to get started.
As far as his own life was going, Ted wrote that there was nothing
happening to him that reincarnation wouldn't improve on. He didn't think
about it; he viewed his world from the position of a "spectator, a captive
audience."
He was due that afternoon to appear to stand trial for fourteen counts
involving the use of credit cards. But. as he'd told me years before,
he didn't sweat the small stuff and he had a "disposition made of duck
feathers." He called the credit cards "damn pesky things," as well he
might.
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
333
"Perfect time to use an insanity defense," he mused. "I saw them used
on television, and, honest, I couldn't help myself."
Ted was not unaware of what was happening with other famous suspects,
Page 369
and he had followed the Son of Sam case, and concluded that if David
Berkowitz could be found sane, it meant that no murder defendant in
the country could be found legally insane.
"So I am pursuing a straight not guilty defense, since, for the record
and the benefit of the censors reading this letter, I am innocent of
those charges as a matter of law and fact. CYA*, my Dear.
"Bon chance, bon voyage, bon appetite, catch you later, don't talk to
strangers unless they talk to you first, down some chablis for me, love,
and so on ... ted."
It had all become a grimly hopeless joke. I smiled a little at Ted's
jest about his "defense." He had stolen the television set that he blamed
for brainwashing him into stealing credit cards. His life was indeed
a vicious circle. And his last admonition to me, "don't talk to
strangers," was, under the circumstances, dark humor.
I answered in the same vein. "Sure, you can give up smoking . . . you're
not under pressure the way / am."
I would write to Ted a few more times, but this was the last letter
I ever got from Ted Bundy. There would be phone calls-hour-long collect
phone calls-but never again a letter.
The net dropped over Ted with a dull thud on July 27th in what has been
termed a "circus," and a "zoo." The latest episode in what Ted referred
to as the "Ted and Ken Show" occurred on that steamy hot night in
Tallahassee.
Sheriff Ken Katsaris had a sealed indictment, and he summoned reporters
for a press conference at 9:30 that evening. Ted had been in Pensacola
all day for a hearing and he was in that city when the Grand Jury handed
down the indictment at 3:00 P.M.
Ted had been back in his cell an hour when he was taken downstairs where
Katsaris waited. The sheriff was impeccable in a black suit, "White
shirt, diagonally striped tie. Ted wore baggy green jail! coveralls
as he emerged from the elevator under heavy guard. The strobe lights
for the cameras blinded him as he walked into the hallway and realized,
instantly, what was happening. He quickly retreated into the elevator,
*CYA-"Cover Your Ass" in police and con lingo.
Page 370
334
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
mumbling that he would not "be paraded" for Katsaris's benefit.
Ted's face was the sick white of jail pallor, and his face was drawn,
giving him an ascetic appearance. Finally, realizing there was no place
for him to hide, he walked out of the elevator almost jauntily.
Katsaris opened the indictment and began to read: "In the name of, and
by the authority of the state of Florida-"
Ted plainly hated his guts.
The prisoner approached the captor and asked sarcastically, "What do
we have here, Ken? Let's see. Oh, an indictment! Why don't you read
it to me? You're running for re-election."
And then, Ted turned his back on Katsaris, lifted his right arm to lean
against the wall, and stared straight ahead, jaw set, head up. He was
the persecuted man and he would play it that way. He seemed to rise
above the nondescript coveralls, the jail slippers. His eyes blazed
into the cameras.
The cameras were all on Bundy, but Katsaris went ahead through the
indictment, ". . . the said Theodore Robert Bundy did make an assault
upon Karen Chandler and/or Kathy Kleiner . . ."
Ted spoke to the press, "He said he was going to get me." And to the
sheriff, "O.K. You got your indictment; that's all you're going to get."
Katsaris ignored him and continued to drone out the legalese which meant
that Ted Bundy was being charged with murder. ". . . did then and there
unlawfully kill a human being, to wit: Lisa Levy, by strangling and/or
beating her until she was dead, and said killing was perpetrated by
said Theodore Robert Bundy, and did then and there unlawfully kill a
human being, to wit: Margaret Bowman, by strangling and/or beating her
until she was dead . . . and that Theodore Robert Bundy, from or with
a premeditated design or intent to effect the death of said Cheryl
Thomas . .."
It seemed to take hours, rather than minutes.
Ted made a mockery of it. He raised his hand at one point and said,
"I'll plead not guilty right now."
Page 371
Ted was gaining control of himself, grinning widely. He continued to
interrupt Katsaris. "Can I speak to the press when you're done?"
Katsaris read on, many of his words lost behind Ted's banter.
"We've displayed the prisoner now," Ted said mockingly. "I think it's
my turn. Listen, I've been kept in isolation for six months. You've
been talking for six months. I'm gagged .. . you're not gagged."
When the indictment was finally completed, Ted was taken back to the
elevator. He took his copy of the papers and held them up for the
cameras . . . and then he methodically tore them in half.
For the first time, Ted Bundy would be on trial for his very life. He
would not betray whatever emotions swept through him as he realized
that.
Things grew gloomier the next day when Judge Charles McClure refused
to allow Millard Farmer to defend Bundy. There had been enough
"carnival," the state said, without allowing a man with Farmer's alleged
reputation for courtroom histrionics into the case. Farmer was not
licensed to practice law in Florida, and the state had the power to
refuse such privileges.
Farmer argued vehemently that Ted was being deprived of his right to
effective legal counsel, but Ted said nothing at all. He refused to
answer any of the judge's remarks addressed to him, and McClure said
implacably, "Let the record reflect that the defendant refuses to
answer."
It was clearly a protest demonstration on Ted's part-a protest over
his loss of Farmer. In all likelihood, he had expected the murder
indictments; he probably did not expect that he would not have Farmer
beside him, and that was a crushing disappointment. Like Buzzy Ware,
Millard Farmer was the kind of lawyer Ted himself could respect. It
was important to his sense of worth. To be an important defendant with
a famous attorney could be dealt with; to be stuck with public defenders
was more a blow to his ego than a threat to his life.
The net cinched more tightly. On July 31st, the sealed indictment that
Page 372
had been handed down in Columbia County (Lake City) lay Citing in Judge
Wallace Jopling's courtroom in Lake City»even as Ted pleaded not guilty
in Tallahassee. Once again* Judge Rudd rejected Millard Farmer as
defense attorney. Ted dismissed his public defenders. As before, he
would go it alone.
No sooner were those proceedings ended than Judge Jopling opened the
sealed indictment before him; Ted Bundy
55o THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
•was now charged with first degree murder and kidnapping in the Kimberly
Leach murder.
The Tallahassee cases were set to go to trial on October 3,
1978, and it was rumored that Ted would probably be facing back-to-back
trials. Ted did not retreat. Instead, he attacked.
On August 4, 1978. Millard Farmer submitted a complaint charging the
sheriff of Leon County, Ken Katsaris, and eight others (county
commissioners, Art Golden, and Captain Jack Poitinger) with depriving
Ted of his minimal rights as a prisoner. Ted sought $300.000 damages.
Ted was asking that he be allowed a minimum of one hour of daily outdoor
exercise--without chains-adequate cell lighting, removal from
isolation, and that Katsaris and the other defendants be stopped from
"harassing" him. He also asked that he be awarded reasonable attorney
fees. It was the audacious Ted Bundy back in action.
The state responded by again blocking Farmer from Ted's defense. Farmer
suggested that Judge Rudd was "in the middle of a lynch mob" and called
the state of Florida "the Buckle of the Death Belt" for prisoners. There
were, at the time, some seventy to eighty prisoners on death row in
Florida, convicted of first degree murder.
In considering a place to run to back in December of
1977, Ted might have done well to weigh other factors beyond the weather.
The headlines continued. Ted told an ABC reporter from Seattle that
he had been cleared of suspicion in the 1974 cases in Seattle by an
"inquiry judge." That was not true. Inquiry judges do not make such
Page 373
decisions in Washington State, and he was stil! regarded as the prime
suspect in the eight Northwest cases.
Ted asked that Judge Rudd disqualify himself from the case, after Rudd
refused Farmer's bid to defend him, calling Farmer's courtroom demeanor
"disruptive." Rudd reacted to the motion that he step down succinctly,
"Motion read, considered and denied. File it."
On August 14th, Ted appeared in Judge Jopling's Lake City courtroom
and pleaded not guilty to the charges involving Kimberly Leach. "Because
I am innocent."
Florida justice would not move swiftly. There were just too many murders,
too many charges. The Chi Omega trial was put off until November, and
there were indications that the Leach trial would also be delayed.
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
337
The indications were right. Ted would not go on trial for either the
Tallahassee or the Lake City cases until mid-1979. In the meantime,
he languished in isolation in the Leon County Jail, still overseen by
his arch enemy: Sheriff Ken Katsaris.
I received a phone call from Ted on September 26,
1978-a collect call, but one which I accepted readily. I had heard
nothing from him and had been following events in Florida only through
the media since July. The connection was blurred; I was not sure that
we were alone on the line.
He explained that a new order had come down, an order that allowed him
to have outdoor exercise. "For the first time in seven months, they
took me outside for something other than going back and forth to hearings.
Two armed guards with walkie-talkies took me up on the roof and let
me walk in circles. Down below, they had three patrol cars and three
attack dogs."
I suggested that even he couldn't leap four stories.
"Who do they think I am?" he laughed. "The Bionic Man?"
He described his cell. "There's no natural light. It's an iron cell
Page 374
in the midst of other walls. There's one 150-watt recessed bulb in the
ceiling with a plastic shield and a metal grating. By the time it filters
down to me, there's hardly any light. It's I/60th of what it should
be for humane purposes. I've got a bed, a combination sink-and-toilet,
and a portable radio that gets two stations. It felt so good today to
be out in the air without shackles, even to listen to the dogs bark-I
haven't heard a dog bark in a long time."
Ted was adamant that "they" would never break him. "All the psychological
evaluations they've done here ... in the last one, they told the sheriff
that, if he read the indictment to me the way he did, that it would
break me, and I'd talk. Immediately after they took me back to my cell,
two detectives came in and said, 'Now you see how much we've got on
you? There's no slace else to go-you might just as well make it easy
on yourself and talk.' But they didn't break me then." I
For the first time, Ted mentioned Carole Ann Boone to me, saying that
he had become "very, very close" to her, and that he was listening to
her advice on how to handle matters of interest to him.
He talked of his chagrin at losing Millard Farmer. "The
338 THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
man's about thirty-seven-looks fifty-and he handles about twenty
capital cases a year. He runs himself into the ground. But now I'm
prepared to defend myself in both cases."
He was angry that he was "being paraded" both in Tallahassee and Lake
City, where he went three times a week for hearings on the Leach case.
And yet, there was an undercurrent of pride that he was in the public
eye again, and would be for a long time to come. "The Chi Omega case
is very bizarre. I'm not going to go into it-but the combination of
Ted Bundy and a case like that! I'll be in the limelight for a long
time. The evidence has all been fabricated. The people here are
absolutely determined to get convictions-even if they know they'll be
overturned later. All they care about is shackling me and getting me
up in front of a jury. And back-to-back trials to boot."
Page 375
He'd said he was talking from the booking room in the jail, but he
apparently had made his feelings about Florida lawmen vocal enough
already so that he had no qualms about annoying them further.
It was September 26th-Ted's anniversary with Meg. A year before he'd
asked me to send the rose. Now, he said that Meg had finally left him.
"I guess she talked to some reporters ... I don't know. I haven't heard
from her in a long time. She told me she just couldn't take this anymore,
that she didn't want to hear anymore about it. How long since you've
seen her?"
A long time, I told him. It had been more than a year. I'm sure he realized
what day it was. Perhaps that was why he had called me-to talk about
Meg. He had Carole Ann Boone now, but he hadn't forgotten Meg.
I asked him what time it was in Florida, and he hesitated. "I don't
know. Time doesn't mean anything any more."
Ted's voice drifted away, and I thought the line had been broken.
"Ted? Ted ..."
He came back on, and he sounded vague, disoriented. He apologized.
"Sometimes, in the middle of a conversation, I forget what I've said
before ... I have trouble remembering."
It was the first time I had ever heard him so unsure, almost slipping
away from what was here and now. But then his voice became strong again.
He was anxious for trial, anxious to face the challenge.
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
339
"Your voice sounds good," I remarked. "You sound like yourself."
His answer was a little strange. "I usually am .. ."
Ted had only one request. He asked me to send him the classified section
of the Seattle Sunday Times. He didn't say why he wanted it. Nostalgia
perhaps. Maybe reading the ads in his hometown paper would help to wipe
out the sight of the iron walls with no windows.
I sent him the paper. I don't know if he got it. I wouldn't talk to
him or hear from him again until just before his Miami trial in June,
Page 376
1979.
I
I
41
It is extremely doubtful that Ted Bundy could ever have received an
impartial trial in the state of Florida. He was becoming better known
than Disney World, the Everglades, and the heretofore all-time media
pleaser: Murph the Surf. Paradoxically, Ted himself both courted and
demeaned publicity. His very attitude made him ripe for headlines.
On October 29, 1978, Dr. Richard Souviron, a forensic odontologist-an
expert in matching teeth impressions to bite marks, in dental
identification-put on a demonstration at a forensic seminar that seemed
premature, at best. Souviron, from Coral Gables, presented slides,
slides he said proved that "this suspect's" teeth matched the bite marks
on the victim's buttock. Naturally, this information was disseminated
throughout the state's media and everyone knew that Ted Bundy was the
suspect referred to. Predictably, Ted screamed "Foul!"
Dr. Ronald Wright, chief deputy medical examiner fojr Dade County,
equivocated when he tried to explain how such a gaffe could happen.
"You have to balance the kinds of problems which might exist in regards
to talking about a case in litigation against teaching the best possible
method for correctly identifying murderers or clearing people of murder
charges," he remarked.
The obvious question of course was why this could not have been done
without hinting broadly at the identity of the principals involved.
Beyond that, there were other cases which could have been offered as
examples where identification had been made through teeth imprints.
A Brattleboro, Vermont man had been convicted in 1976 of the rape murder
of sixty-two-year-old Ruth Kastenbaum-convicted because the
twenty-five bite marks on her body matched his teeth.
Souviron himself had another case where he had made bite mark matches:
he had matched the teeth of a twenty-threePage 377
340
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
341
year-old man from Columbia, South Carolina to the body of
seventy-seven-year-old Margaret Haizlip who lived in a rural area south
of Miami.
But Ted was more newsworthy than an itinerant laborer from South Carolina,
and Ted's teeth got the publicity. The publication of Souviron's
findings seemed to go far beyond normal pretrial publicity. It seemed,
for a time, that charges against Ted for murder might well be dismissed
because of Souviron's statements.
They were not, however, and the state moved ahead, preparing for the
two trials. Pretrial publicity is a two-edged sword; it can prejudice
an innocent man so that he cannot obtain a fair trial, and it can,
occasionally, result in a guilty man's going free when charges are
dismissed. In either instance, such publicity can be tragic.
Two of Ted Bundy's most hated antagonists had dropped completely from
the picture by late 1978, one through personal disgrace and the other
when his health collapsed. I don't know if Ted knew about either of
them, or if it would matter to him any longer.
Frank Tucker, the District Attorney from Pitkin County, Colorado was
convicted-June, 1978, of two counts of embezzlement and acquitted of
two counts. In December, 1978, he was convicted of one count of felony
theft and two misdemeanor counts. Tucker cried-as Ted had about his
own case-that the charges and convictions were all "politically
motivated." He was disbarred, received five years probation, ninety
days in jail (to be delayed,) and a thousand dollar fine. According
to his attorney, Tucker planned to pursue a new career. He would go
to morticians' school in San Francisco.
Now-Major Nick Mackie of the King County Police Major Crimes Unit in
Seattle suffered a near-fatal heart attack in the spring of 1978, and
paramedics had pronounced him clinically dead twice. Mackie survived
Page 378
but was forced to resign from the high-pressure job he'd handled so
well for so long. The loss of Mactâe would be a blow for the department.
Ted himself wasn't doing so well. As the Christmas season approached
in 1978, he was again in jail, looking at a solid steel door-just as
he had been a year before. But this year, there were no plans to escape;
there was no way to escape. Again, he was faced with a murder trial--just
as he had been
342
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
in December, 1977. Indeed, he was faced with two murder trials.
Bundy had moved to have Judge John Rudd removed because of prejudice,
and shortly before Christmas the Florida State Supreme Court acquiesced.
There had been claims by the defense that Rudd had improperly
communicated with the State Attorney's Office, and that he had evinced
hostility toward the defense team. Rudd stepped down. A new judge would
be appointed in the coming year. Larry Simpson, an assistant state's
attorney, would be chief prosecutor in the Chi Omega case and announced
that he was ready to go to trial at any time, but a trial before February
seemed unlikely.
Ted had grudgingly accepted the aid of the Public Defender's Office
and his defense team was headed by Mike Minerva. Ted apparently was
aware finally that he would be a fool to attempt to defend himself in
two murder trials.
In January, a new judge was appointed: Judge Edward D. Cowart of the
Florida Circuit Court. Judge Cowart, fiftyfour, is a great St. Bernard
of a man, jowls bulging over his judicial robes, with a southern soothing
voice. Cowart has been a navy bosun's mate and a policeman, before
graduating from Stetson University Law School in St. Petersburg. His
home court is in Miami, and he controls his courtroom with
authority-authority that is often laced with sharp wit and homilies.
He is given to saying, "Bless your heart" to attorneys and defendants
alike. When an argument is not clear, he will say, "Cripple that and
Page 379
walk it by me slow." He is a man both benign and belligerent depending
on the circumstance, and he knows his law inside out. In court, Cowart
often seems to be giving instruction in law to the attorneys who appear
before him. ~
Ted wasn't going to like him much.
On February 22nd, Cowart announced that Ted would go on trial for the
Chi Omega murders and the Tallahassee attacks, on May 21st. He also
again denied Bundy's request for Millard Farmer. The judge said he would
decide in April if a nonprejudiced jury could be empanelled in the
capital city. He agreed with the defense that it was unlikely that
back-toback trials could be held without prejudicing the defendant.
Ted was still, officially, the lead defense attorney-Minerva was only
there to advise him as far as he was concerned.
The defendant requested on April llth that newspeople be barred from
taking his picture when he was brought to the
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
343
courthouse in chains and wearing his leg brace, and from attending the
proceedings leading up to trial. He would be questioning witnesses
himself, he said, and he didn't want the media listening in. Judge Cowart
denied that request saying, "If you exclude the press, you exclude the
public."
A month later, Ted had had enough of Judge Cowart and moved to have
him step down just as Judge Rudd had, claiming that Rudd's prejudice
had flowed to Cowart too. Cowart denied the motion, saying it was
"legally insufficient." Anyone who has observed Judge Cowart over time
would doubt that he could ever be swayed or prejudiced by other's
opinions; he is a man who patently thinks for himself.
The Bundy hearings were now being recorded by a television camera and
by one still camera-as had been agreed in a recent Florida Supreme Court
edict. Cowart continued to deny Ted's request for the barring of all
cameras. "We're conducting the public's business, gentlemen, and we're
Page 380
going to conduct it in the sunshine. We're sitting in Florida."
Cowart would rarely display any animosity toward the defendant who
railed against him, although, as the months progressed, he would at
times chastise Bundy's temper tantrums as he would a small child. He
seemed to bear no particular ill will toward Ted. Even as Ted had asked
to have him removed from the case, Cowart remarked on Ted's suit and
tie, "You look nice today."
And Ted had responded, "I'm disguised-as an attorney today."
The pretrial hearings began in May in Tallahassee. The defense wanted
the bite-mark testimony out, claiming that there had been insufficient
probable cause for the search warrant that brought Ted to a dentist
to have his teeth impressions taken. The defense claimed that he had
not been a true suspect in the Chi Omega killings at that time. Cowart
delayed his ruling.
Ted Bundy's murder trial was to begin on June llth, but, on the last
day of May there were rampant rumors that he was going to change his
plea-that he would plea bargain to a lesser charge thanlfirst degree
murder, and thus save himself from the specter or the electric chair.
Florida's electric chair was a terribly real threat. Only five days
before, Florida had proved that it would carry out its death sentences.
On May 25th, John Spenkelink, convicted of the murder in 1973 of killing
a fellow ex-con in a Tallahassee
344
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
motel room, had been executed. It was the first execution in the United
States since Gary Gilmore had gone before the firing squad in Utah on
January 19, 1977, at his own request. It was the first where a condemned
man had gone into the death chamber against his will in America since
1967.
Ted Bundy had been geographically close to both men; fully aware of
the fate of both, and he must have realized that Spenkelink's fate might
await him in the not-too-distant future.
Page 381
Louise Bundy flew to Tallahassee, as did John Henry Browne. Carole Ann
Boone joined his mother and Browne in urging him to plead guilty to
lesser charges. There had been a great deal of negotiating back and
forth between Tallahassee, Leon County, Lake City, the prosecution and
the defense. It was rumored that, if Ted would plead guilty to second
degree murder in the two Chi Omega cases and in Kimberly Leach's murder,
he would avoid the chair. The state would agree that he serve instead
three consecutive twenty-five-year terms.
On May 31, there was a private session in Judge Cowart's chambers with
Ted and his attorneys present. Ted filed a secret motion-a motion
believed to be the guilty pleas to second degree murder. It would mean
that he might never walk free again, but he wouldn't die in the electric
chair either.
According to Florida Deputy State Attorney Jerry Blair-- who awaited
his day in the courtroom with Ted in the Leach case-Ted acknowledged
his guilt to everything he was charged with, in both cases. Blair alleged
that Ted, in fact, carried in his hand a written confession. All of
his legal advisors, including Millard Farmer and Mike Minerva, had urged
him to accept the lifeline held out. But the plea bargaining broke down.
Ted tore up the papers in his hand and told Cowart, "I'd like to withdraw
that motion."
Ted moved to have his public defender, Minerva, removed from the
case-claiming that Minerva was trying to coerce him into admitting guilt.
The state attorneys could not enter into a plea bargain in such a case.
With Ted intimating that his own attorney was pressuring him to confess,
any plea bargaining would automatically be overturned by an appellate
court. Blair vowed that "if he [Ted] wanted a trial, he was going to
get it."
None of the specifics of Ted's "almost" guilty plea reached the press,
but rumors were strong. And it had been Ted's last
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
345
Page 382
chance; Governor Bob Graham had predicted he would "sign more death
warrants," and Ted's name seemed already to be written there in invisible
ink.
Minerva wanted out. Ted wanted him out, calling his public defender
"incompetent."
It looked like any trial would be postponed once again. Ted himself
wanted a ninety-day delay, and the defense team wanted a psychiatric
exam to see if he was sane in the legal sense-that is, that he had
sufficient mental and psychological competence to participate in his
own defense. This latter request angered him as much as anything had
angered him before. Ted may have joked in his letter to me about an
insanity defense, but he would not go that route seriously, now that
he was up and confident again.
Judge Cowart was not about to stand for endless trial delays. He agreed
to the psychiatric examinations and ordered that they be done forthwith.
He had 132 prospective jurors on hold. It had already been eighteen
months since the stranger crept into the Chi Omega mansion, since the
man had beaten Cheryl Thomas at Dunwoody Street, and Cowart felt it
was time for the trial to begin.
Two psychiatrists examined Ted during that first week of June, 1979:
Dr. Hervé Cleckly of Augusta, Georgia, and Dr. Emanuel Tanay, a professor
at Wayne State University in Michigan. They agreed with Ted that he
was not incompetent, but said he demonstrated certain antisocial
behavior. Tanay said that Ted's personality disorder was such that it
could affect his relationship with his attorneys and thus, in that way,
hinder his ability to defend himself.
"He has an extensive history of self-defeating, unadaptable, antisocial
behavior," Tanay said.
On June llth, Judge Cowart ruled that Ted Bundy was competent to stand
trial and said that he would delay his decision on granting a change
of venue until he had seen some responses from prospective veniremen
in the Leon County area. He denied the defense request for an extension
and refused to let Ted fire his attorneys. Temporarily, Bundy had a
new attorney: Bi|an T. Hayes, a respected north Florida criminal defense
attorney, but also a man who came with unsettling references at the
time: he had been John Spenkelink's attorney.
Page 383
I had written to Ted to tell him that I would be attending his trial,
to see if I would be able to visit him, and to warn
346
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
him that I would probably be wearing a press badge. It was the only
way I could be sure of getting into the courtroom; the gallery would
be jammed, and there would be long lines of curious court-goers. With
Ted's growing hatred for reporters, I didn't want him to see me among
a sea of media people and think I had defected completely to the fourth
estate.
I had reservations to Tallahassee, but I would never see that city;
Judge Cowart granted a change of venue on June
12th when four of the first five prospective jurors said they knew so
much about the Chi Omega murders that they could not sit on the jury
and be considered unbiased.
Cowart ordered the trial moved to Miami, and said jury selection would
begin there on June 25th. Mike Minerva would not be joining the defense
team; relations between himself and Bundy had become so abrasive that
they probably could not hide their antagonism from a jury. Minerva also
felt that he might bear Ted some unconscious resentment since Ted had
cast so much doubt about his ability.
The defense team would be Leon County assistant public defenders, Lynn
Thompson, Ed Harvey, and Margaret Good. They were all young, all
determined to do their best, and all woefully inexperienced.
A Miami attorney, Robert Haggard, not much older than the rest of the
team, volunteered to help. In my opinion, Haggard was the least apt
of any of the team members. He seemed ill-prepared, and his manner--even
his haircut-appeared to grate on Judge Cowart's nerves.
Peggy Good may have been the most effective of all Bundy's latest team
of attorneys. Ms. Good, in her late twenties, impressed the jury simply
because she was a woman standing beside a man accused of brutal attacks
on other women. Slender, blonde, bespectacled, she chose loose, almost
Page 384
baggy, clothing that did nothing for her basic attractiveness. Her voice
would remain flat and serious. Only when she was tired, would she slip
into the drawl of a true, down-home southern girl. Cowart liked her,
and she would receive many of his "Bless your hearts."
Ted was pleased with her too. He was enthusiastic in his phone call
to me on the evening of June 28th-a call placed from the Dade County
Jail in Miami. Ted sounded confident again and exhilarated. He admitted
that he was exhausted, however. "They flew me down here in a
single-engine plane,
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
347
rushed me into jail, and we began jury selection the next morning. I
lost a little of my momentum. Cowart's hurrying us through. We work
'til 10:30 every other night, and we're going to have Saturday sessions."
Breakfast in the Dade County Jail was, and God knows why, at 4:30 A.M.,
and Ted was tired, but elated over his defense team and his budget.
"The sky's the limit. The state has given us $100,000 for our defense.
I'm glad I don't have Mike Minerva anymore. I like my defense team,
especially the fact that I have a woman on my side. I have an expert
on jury selection who's helping me pick my jury. He can tell by their
eyes, their facial expressions, their body language what they're
thinking. For instance, one prospective juror today raised his hand
to his heart, and that means something to my expert."
Even in Miami, however, most of those in the jury pool had heard of
Ted Bundy. One juror selected, Estela Suarez, had never heard of him.
"She only reads Spanish language papers," Ted said enthusiastically.
"She kept smiling at me . . . she didn't realize / was the defendant!"
There was one young woman Ted had felt ill at ease about, a girl he
described as "a perfect candidate for a sorority . . . a nice, fresh-faced,
rosy-cheeked, pretty young girl. I was afraid she'd identify with the
victims."
Ted extolled Carole An$ Boone's loyalty. "She's thrown in her lot with
Page 385
me, moved down here, given up her job. She has all my files, and I've
given her my permission to talk to the news media. In order for her
to survive, I told her to ask for ,$100-a-day and board-and-room in
payment for interviews."
Ted was eager to see me when I got to Miami. He suggested that I contact
Sergeant Marty Kratz, the jailer on his floor, to arrange for a visit.
"He's a pretty good guy."
He seemed to understand that I would have to be in the courtroom sitting
in the press section, and he assured me he would do everything he could
to see I got into the trial. "If you have any troilble, you come to
me. I'm the 'Golden Boy.' I'll see that you gel in."
He was confident that we would be able to talk too during court recesses
and before evening sessions. He was insistent that I try to get in to
see him in jail as soon as I got to Miami. I fully expected that I would
get to see him, but things would not work out that way.
348
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
Ted felt that he was going to have a fair trial; he even spoke well
of Judge Cowart and said, "I'll never have an appeal based on the
inadequacy of my defense team, because they're good."
"Are you able to sleep?" I asked.
"I sleep like a baby."
The only matter that was really rankling Ted at this point .was Dr.
Tanay's testimony. "I only agreed to talk to him because it was my
understanding the session was to be taperecorded for the benefit of
the defense. Spenkelink's lawyer, Brian Hayes, told me to do that. I
was appalled and shocked when Tanay got up in open court and said I
was dangerous to myself and others, a sociopath, an antisocial
personality, that I shouldn't be allowed to go free. That was when I
realized, and only then, that the court had ordered the examination,
not the defense."
"Are you still not smoking?" I asked.
Page 386
"I wasn't, but I bought a pack just before that flight down here at
night in that single-engine plane. I just finished it, and it's been
several days, so that's not so bad."
He commented that the vast majority of the jurors picked at that point
were black or blue collar workers and that seemed good. I asked if he
didn't feel that the very intelligent potential juror-someone who might
weigh all sides of a question-might not also be the assiduous newspaper
reader.
"No, that doesn't necessarily follow. A lot of the professionals are
so caught up in their careers that they don't read anything but
professional journals. Many of them don't seem to have heard about me."
"Are you at all afraid for your personal safety?"
"Not at all. I'm too well known-a cause célèbre. They won't let anything
happen to me. They want to get me into court safely."
He sounded completely in control; there was none of the vagueness, the
slipping-away, that I'd noticed in his phone call of nine months earlier.
He explained how the trial would run, the pretrial period where all
the 150 witnesses would give brief testimony to see if it could be allowed
into trial itself or would be suppressed. He explained the trial phase,
and the penalty phase, and said that the prosecution was allowing jurors
to be seated who were against the death penalty. Ted was clearly a captain
in charge of his own ship.
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
349
"What's on television in Seattle?" he asked. "Are they covering me very
much back there?"
"Quite a bit. I watched you in Tallahassee when you introduced yourself
to the prospective jurors there. You seemed very confident."
He was pleased.
I have no way of knowing if Ted truly felt the confidence which he
projected, but going into his Miami trial, he seemed to believe that
he could and would win. After an hour's conversation, conversation which
Page 387
he told me was being monitored by Dade County jailers, we hung up,
promising to meet again, this time in Miami.
To newspapermen, Ted declined to predict the trial outcome. "If I was
a football coach, I'd say when you're in your first game of the season,
you don't start looking for the Super Bowl."
Dr. Emil Spillman, the Atlanta hypnotist who had been Ted's jury expert,
told the press that Ted truly had chosen his own jury. They had had
to go through seventy-seven poA tential jurors before they reached a
final selection on June
30th. Spillman felt that Ted had passed over seventeen or eighteen
choices whom he-Spillman-termed "emotionally perfect. But I told him,
'It's your life-not mine,' " Spillman shrugged. "He passed up some
absolutely fantastic jurors."
The final twelve were largely middle-aged, largely black. Ted, and Ted
alone, had chosen. It was his life.
The jurors were:
*Alan Smith, a clothing designer, who leaned away from the death penalty.
*Estela Suarez, a bookkeeper. It was Ms. Suarez who had sparked laughter
in the courtroom during jury selection when she failed to recognize
Ted as the defendant.
*Vernon Swindle, a worker in the mailroom of the Miami Herald, who said
he didn't have time to read the papers he helped to put out.f;
* Rudolph Trergl, a senior project engineer for Texaco, highly
educated-«a man with a scientifically oriented mind who would become
the jury foreman, a man who said he only read technical journals.
*Bernest Donald, a high school teacher, a deacon in his church.
350
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
*Floy Mitchell, a housewife, devout, who watched soap operas more than
she read the daily headlines.
*Ruth Hamilton, a maid, a church-goer too. Her nephew was a Tallahassee
policeman.
Page 388
* Robert Corbett, a sports enthusiast who rarely read the paper beyond
the sports page. He knew Ted was accused of murdering "somebody."
*Mazie Edge, just retired as an elementary school principal. Her bout
with the flu would soon delay the trial.
*Dave Brown, a maintenance engineer for a Miami hotel.
*Mary Russo, a supermarket clerk, who seemed in awe of her call to jury
duty, and who did not favor the death penalty.
*James Bennett, a truck driver, father of five, who had never considered
Ted's guilt "one way or another."
These, then, along with three alternates, would be the jury of Ted
Bundy's peers, the citizens of Bade County, Florida who would decide
whether the young man from Tacoma, Washington would live or die.
42
I flew out of Sea-Tac Airport in Seattle, headed for Miami, at one in
the morning on July 3rd. I had been promised press credentials when
I arrived at my destination: the Dade County Metro Justice Center. I
understood there were three hundred reporters already there, ready to
digest and disseminate every scrap of information on Ted Bundy via phone
and wire to the rest of America.
Once again, I felt the sense of unreality of it all, more so when I
found the in-flight movie was Love at First Bite. The rest of the
passengers flying thousands of feet above a sleeping country laughed
aloud at the high camp of George Hamilton's' Dracula as he plunged his
teeth into beautiful maidens. Under the circumstances, I found no humor
in it.
It would be forty-two hours before I slept again. We crossed the Great
Divide; to the left of the plane, I could see dawn beginning to break,
but it was still pitch black to my right. Soon, I could see the historic
rivers down below as they snaked their way to the sea, cities slumbering
in the distance. We landed in Atlanta at 6 A.M., waited an. hour or
so, and then flew south in a smaller plane. The vast isolation of the
Everglades seemed endless. And then there was Miami ahead. So flat,
Page 389
so spread out; it was the very antithesis of Seattle which is built
on a succession of hills.
The July heat of southern Florida rose up and seemed to knock me backward
as I emerged from the Miami airport. During the weeks I spent in Miami,
I would never adjust to that palpable heat. It was constant; even the
sudden late afternoon thunder storms wept only great drops of hot water
and left the air as oppressive as it had been before. Nor did evening
bring respite a$it always did in the Northwest. The sight of palm trees
assailed me with an attack of homesickness, reminded me of those long
months in Los Angeles, and reminded me also that Ted could probably
never go home again.
351
352
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
I dumped my bags in my motel and took a cab to the Bade County Metro
Justice Center, a lush, new complex which lies in the shadow of the
Orange Bowl. As I entered the reception area of the Dade County Public
Safety Department substation which housed the jail-connected by a sky
bridge to the Metro Justice Building where Ted's trial was being held
on the fourth floor-I was immediately aware of the intense security.
No one was even allowed on the elevators to the upper floors without
first being cleared and handed a badge.
I had to have that clearance badge before I could go upstairs to the
Public Relations Office and get another clearance badge that would allow
me into the trial! They were taking no chances of escape for Ted in
Miami.
Henceforth, I would be "News Media, No. 15." I went first to the ninth
floor of the Metro Justice Building, and found that the entire top floor
of the huge building had been given over to the press. I have never
seen anything like it. The activity there was frantic; three dozen closed
circuit television sets blaring out every word of the trial five floors
below, anchormen, anchorwomen, technicians, reportersscores of
Page 390
them-watching, broadcasting, editing, splicing. The cacophony seemed
to bother no one. The rooms were thick with cigarette smoke, littered
with coffee cups. The indooroutdoor carpet was a squirming network of
wires and cables.
Cables from a single TV camera in the courtroom had been strung from
the fourth-floor courtroom, secured to the building exterior, and fed
into this central control room. There a series of distribution
amplifiers split the signal so that what was happening could be fed
to all three networks at once. The segments chosen by the networks were
relayed to the eighth floor where Southern Bell had installed a
"microwave dish" to transmit the signals to downtown Miami for wire
transmission to a special Florida TV system. The same signals went by
wire to Atlanta where ABC transmitted them to New York via Telstar I
satellite, and by Telstar II to California and the West Coast. CBS had
provided the single courtroom camera, and it was being manned
alternately by cameramen from all the networks.
Ted had told me he was the Golden Boy, and for the media he certainly
appeared to be just that.
I looked around the room. Stations from Colorado, Utah, Washington,
and Flnr-'-*-» had tacked up handwritten signs as
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
353
they established their "territory." The ninth floor of the Metro Justice
Building would run around the clock throughout the trial. I, who have
always bemoaned the loneliness of writing-trapped all alone in my
basement office at home-- wouldn't be lonely here. I was amazed at the
discipline of my fellow reporters who seemed able to turn out finished
copy in this boiler room of noise and scurrying activity.
I stashed my tape recorder upstairs; it would not be allowed in the
courtroom. Later, I learned the trick of turning it on next to the closed
circuit TV set in the backroom, and then racing down to the trial. That
way, I would have both my notes from the "live" action, and the complete
Page 391
trial on tape.
I exited the elevators on the fourth floor and headed toward the
courtroom. Quite frankly, I was terrified, venturing into totally
uncharted territory, about to view the culmina.tion of four years of
ambivalence and worry.
If Judge Edward Cowart is a St. Bernard, then his bailiff, Dave Watson,
is a feisty bulldog, protective, and fiercely so, of Cowart. We would
all come to fear and respect Watson's authority as he bellowed "Please
be seated! Court will come to order!" and "Stay seated 'til the judge
is out of the courtroom!" And woe be unto anyone who might have to visit
the restroom during sessions. Watson would permit no aimless coming
and going.
But now, bless him, he approached me as I stood tentatively outside
the courtroom. In his seventies, white haired, he was wearing his
"uniform" of sparkling white shirt, dark trousers. I didn't know enough
to realize this was the dread Bailiff Watson, and he smiled, put both
his arms around me and said, "You go right on in, honey . . ."
Cowart's courtroom is a vast, octagonal room, the walls panelled with
tropical wood and brass rectangles behind the bench of marble. Fake?
Possibly. Light fixtures of white, aqua, red, and wine were suspended
from the ceiling.
The thirty-three press seats were to the left as one entered; opposite
them wer^ seats reserved for law enforcement officers. Beyond that .were
a hundred or more seats for the gallery. No windows, lint it was
air-conditioned.
I have always found a trial something of a temporary microcosm of life.
The judge is the father, kindly, authoritative, guiding us all-and
Edward Cowart would fill that role well. The rest of us-jury, defense,
prosecution, gallery, press354
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
were to be thrown together in an intense communal experience. When it
Page 392
ends, it is somehow sad; we will never be this close again. Most of
us will never meet again.
This trial would be, for me, akin to having all the characters in a
long, long book finally come alive. I knew the names of almost everyone
involved, had heard of them for years, though Ted was the only character
I had actually seen in person before.
I took a seat in the press section, among strangers who would become
friends: Gene Miller, two-time Pulitzer Prize winner from the Miami
Herald, Tony Polk from the Rocky Mountain News in Denver, Linda
Kleindienst and George McEvoy of the Fort Lauderdale News and
Sun-Sentinel, George Thurston of the Washington Post, Pat McMahon of
the St. Petersburg Times, Rick Barry of the Tampa Tribune, Bill Knowles,
Southern Bureau Chief of ABC News-all scribbling notes in their own
particular fashion.
Ted glanced over, recognized me, grinned, winked. He looked barely older
than the last time I had seen him, but was perfectly attired in suit
and tie, styled haircut. It was odd, somehow-as if time had stood still
for him. Dorian Gray flashed through my mind. I was a grandmother
nowtwice over-and yet Ted was still the same outwardly as he had been
in 1971, perhaps handsomer.
I looked around the courtroom. I saw faces that I have seen in dozens
of trials, those whose whole life revolves around going to court; it
is their only hobby, interest, avocation: neatly dressed old men, an
old woman with garish make-up, her hair hidden by a wrapped stocking,
a huge picture hat on top of it all. Housewives, playing hooky, a priest.
Stolid rows of lawmen in uniform.
The front row-just behind Ted and the defense teamwas jammed with pretty
young women, as it would be each day. Did they know how much they
resembled the defendant's purported victims? Their eyes never left Ted,
and they blushed and giggled with delight when he turned to flash a
blinding smile at them, as he often did. Outside the courtroom, some
of them would admit to reporters that Ted frightened them, yet they
couldn't stay away. It is a common syndrome, this fascination that an
alleged mass killer has for some women, as if he was the ultimate macho
figure.
By tacit agreement, that one front row was somehow reserved for the
Page 393
"Ted groupies," and indeed I would never
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
355
see a trial with more attractive women present-the Chi Omegas,
testifying about the night of January 14-15, 1978, the surviving victims,
even the female detectives, deputies, and the court reporters.
The jury was not present those first days; we were still in pretrial,
and Cowart had yet to rule on what the court would allow in. The jury
remained sequestered in a plush resort on Bay Biscayne.
An uninformed observer would have difficulty distinguishing Ted from
any of the young lawyers in the courtroomLynn Thompson, Ed Harvey, Bob
Haggard, and for the prosecution, Larry Simpson and Danny McKeever,
both from the State Attorney's Office.
The defense wanted many of the state's proposed witnesses out: Connie
Hastings and Mary Ann Piccano, the girls who had seen the man in Sherrod's
Disco earlier on that Saturday night; Nita Neary, the Chi O who had
seen the man with the club; Dr. Souviron with his bite-mark testimony;
Sergeant Bob Hayward on the Utah arrest; Carol DaRonch from Salt Lake
City; Detective Norm Chapman and Don Patchen and their testimony about
the conversations during the interrogation in mid-February in
Pensacola.
Nita Jane Neary was on the witness stand as I entered the courtroom.
She had been badgered by the defense and was almost tearful-but resolute.
Asked if she saw the man in the courtroom that she'd seen that night,
she said, "Yes, I believe I do." But she wanted a profile look.
Cowart ordered every man in the room to stand and turn sideways.
Nita Jane looked, but seemed reluctant to look directly at Ted. Then
she raised her arm, somewhat mechanically and, still with eyes downcast,
she pointed at the defendant.
Ted helped the court reporter by saying (about himself), "That's Mr.
Bundy . . ."
The defense questioned Nita and her mother. Yes, her mother had shown
Page 394
her newspaper pictures of Ted Bundy taken after his artist. But she
had also picked him out of a mug lay-down latej She was positive.
Judge Cowart would subsequently rule to allow her eyewitness
identification, possibly the worst blow that would be dealt the defense.
Ronnie Eng, "the sweetheart" of Chi Omega-the man Nita Neary had first
thought she recognized-had been
356
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
cleared by a polygraph, but he too appeared in pretrial. As he stood
beside Bundy, there was little resemblance. Ronnie was
dark-complexioned, shorter, with black hair. He made a shy, smiling
witness.
Carole Ann Boone, Ted's staunchest ally, sat in the courtroom, her eyes
meeting his often. A tall, big-boned woman of about thirty-two, she
wore thick glasses, had short dark hair-not parted in the middle. She
seldom smiled, and usually carried sheaves of reports. Her connection
to the defendant seemed to be her only interest.
When court ended that first day, I approached Carole Boone and introduced
myself. She glanced at me and said, "Yes, I've heard of you" and turned
abruptly on her heel and walked away. Somewhat bemused, I stared after
her.. Did she dislike me so because I was wearing a press badge, or
because I was an old friend of Ted's? I never found out; she never spoke
to me again.
The next court session began with requests by Ted for more exercise,
law library privileges, a typewriter.
Both the library and the exercise facilities were on the seventh floor
of the jail building. Ted and his jail supervisor engaged in a little
repartee.
"Can you have enough security for me?"
"We better have."
"How many? One? Two? Three?"
"We don't care to be specific. We'll have enough."
Page 395
Cowart asked, "Can you » read while you exercise, Mr. Bundy?"
Ted, wearing on this day a Seattle Mariner's tee-shirt, laughed faintly.
He wanted an hour a day in the law library, an hour's exercise a day,
unlimited visits with Carole Ann Boone who is "relaying my messages
to me from my lawyers out west" and Cowart does not concur. Nor will
there be a typewriter.
A new figure appears, another name from the book in my mind : Sergeant
Bob Hayward of the Utah Highway Patrol, in Miami to describe Ted's arrest
in August of 1975. When Hayward refers to a "panty hose mask," Judge
Cowart objects for "Attorney" Bundy, saying, "You missed that, my
friend-but we'll catch 'em together."
And now began one of the most bizarre sequences I have ever seen in
a courtroom. Ted Bundy would be, at the same
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
357
time, the defendant, the defense attorney, and then the witness.
Ted rose to cross-examine Hayward. He questioned the witness closely
about the Utah arrest, the gear^in his car, what was said, and tried
to point out that he had never given permission to have his VW bug
searched. Hayward, a bit put off by being questioned by the defendant,
answered gruffly. "You told me to go ahead."
And then Ted questioned Deputy Darryl Ondrak of the Salt Lake County
Sheriff's Office, arguing about whether the items found in his car were
burglary tools, pointing out that, though he was charged, on that count,
he was never tried on that count.
Cowart intervened: "You can argue that to the hills of Utah: if they
were burglary tools. It's not relevant here. Quit when you're ahead . . .
but I didn't say how far ahead."
Ted himself now became the witness and took the stand. He testified
that Hayward's first words to him were, "Why didn't you get out of your
car and run? I could have taken your head off."
He explained that he had been intimidated by the number of officers
Page 396
present and that the search was illegal hi his estimation. He opened
himself up to cross-examination by Danny McKeever and the admission
that he had lied about going to the drive-in before being stopped.
Ted wanted the Utah arrest suppressed insisting its evidence was seized
through an illegal search. Judge Cowart would suppress it-but not for
that reason; he found that arrest too "remote" from this trial.
"You may step down, Mr. Bundy. But you may not be excused."
These transactions would result in a blow against the prosecution. They
would not be able to compare the Utah pantyhose mask with the Dunwoody
Street pantyhose mask in front of the jury.
The score now stood one-to-one.
Judge Cowart \4t>uld rarely betray his own feelings during the trial,
but he slk>ped a little as he glanced at a composite picture drawn by
In artist from Nita Neary's description, a picture Peggy Good argued
was meaningless.
"I may be blind," Cowart began, "but, looking at that last picture,
I see a striking resemblance to ... ah ... whoever it was."
358
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
After hearing the tapes taken in Pensacola, and the testimony offered
by Detectives Norm Chapman and Don Patchen of statements alleged to
have been made by Tedafter the tape recorder was turned off-Judge Cowart
made another ruling to suppress, a ruling that caused prosecutors
Simpson and McKeever to sag in their chairs. The jury would not be allowed
to hear or know of any of it. Nothing of the escape, the credit card
thefts, the statements about "vampirism," "voyeurism," "fantasies."
Cowart found that too much of the alleged conversations was missing,
unrecorded. He would not allow the portions that were on tape. The credit
card thefts were not part of the murder charges in Cowart's judgment.
The fantasy tape is out too.
The state is left with Nita Neary's eye-witness identification and Dr.
Richard Souviron. The rest will be principally circumstantial. There
Page 397
are rumbles in the press section that Bundy may be back in the ball
game.
43
Judge Cowart was ready to begin the actual trial; the defense was not.
On July 7th, Ted and his attorneys argued that they had not had time
to prepare the opening arguments.
"We need time between your rulings and our opening statement," Peggy
Good argued. "We're exhausted; we've had only five hours sleep a night.
You're turning this into a trial by endurance."
"You have four lawyers in Miami, one investigator, two law students
helping you. As far as the court is concerned, I care about the entire
system. I'm very satisfied that there is no reason to delay any further.
In this circuit, it's not unusual to proceed until midnight. We vary
the tune, but we've got the same fiddler, the same music. Every minute
you've been here, I've been here; and I'm fresh as a daisy."
Ted tried another tack. "I'm concerned about Your Honor, how you're
going to do this by one o'clock." "You just watch us. I appreciate your
concern." And then, Ted was angry. It was Saturday noon, and he wanted
to start Monday. Cowart did not. "My attorneys are not ready!" "We will
begin, Mr. Bundy."
"Then you'll start without me, Your Honor!" Ted flared. "As you like,"
Cowart said imperturbably, while Ted muttered, "I don't care who he
is . . ."
But Ted was sitting at the defense table as the jury was brought in
for the first time.
Larry Simpson made the opening statements for the prosecution, only
after «porters had sent the youthful state attorney back out to cornb
his hair and re-enter for the benefit of the cameras. |
He did a gooa job, diagramming the four Chi Omega cases, the Dunwoody
Street case on a blackboard, listing the victims' names, the charges:
Burglary (of the Chi Omega
359
Page 398
360
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
house); first degree murder, Lisa Levy; first degree murder, Margaret
Bowman; attempted first degree murder, Kathy Kleiner; attempted first
degree murder, Karen Chandler; attempted first degree murder, burglary,
Cheryl Thomas. He was workmanlike and showed little emotion, but he
was clear and concise.
Ted had picked Robert Haggard, the thirty-four-year-old Miami attorney
who'd been on the case only two weeks, to make the opening statements
for the defense. Judge Cowart had urged the defense to wait until their
"half" of the trial to make the opening remarks, as was their option,
but they forged ahead.
Haggard spoke for twenty-six minutes, rambled, and the prosecution
objected twenty-nine times, an almost unheard-of number. Cowart
sustained twenty-three of those objections.
Finally, Cowart threw up his hands and said to Haggard, "That's argument.
Bless your heart. Come aboard."
I felt Ted himself could have done a better job of it.
Ted did choose to cross-examine Officer Ray Crew about his actions when
he had gone to the Chi Omega House on the morning of the murders. I
have no idea what was in the minds of the jury as Ted elicited information
about the condition of the death rooms, the condition of Lisa Levy's
body, but it seemed to me somewhat grotesque. If this calm, glib, young
attorney might have been there to see Lisa's body himself, might have
done that terrible damage to her, he was completely dispassionate as
he questioned the officer.
"Describe the condition of Lisa Levy's room."
"Clothing strewn about, desk, books . . . some disarray."
"Any blood in any area in the room other than what you testified about
earlier?"
"No sir."
"Describe the condition of Margaret Bowman's body."
Page 399
"She was lying face down, mouth and eyes open. Nylon stocking knotted
around her neck, head bloated and discolored."
Ted had been trying to show that the policeman had left his own prints
in the room, that he had not proceeded carefully; instead he had only
succeeded in impressing a horrible picture in the jury's minds.
And then the young women-victims, witnesses-were a steady parade
through the courtroom doors. Melanie Nelson, Nancy Dowdy, Karen
Chandler, Kathy Kleiner, Debbie CicTHE STRANGER BESIDE ME
361
carelli, Nancy Young, Cheryl Thomas. Dressed in bright cottons, they
all had an innocence about them, a vulnerability.
There were no outward signs that Karen and Kathy had ever been injured;
the pins in their jaws, the concussions, the bruises, had long-since
healed. Only when they told of what had happened to them could one picture
the horror.
They never glanced at Ted Bundy.
Cheryl Thomas had more difficulty. She limped as she made her way to
the witness chair, sat with her right ear toward the prosecutor, so
that she could hear him; she was still completely deaf in the other.
She did not testify about the struggle she had had to regain her health,
of the moments of jogging, sit-ups. When she'd first started to walk,
she had fallen to one side, but she'd learned to compensate by using
her other senses-sight and feeling; she'd learned to develop a sense
of balance with her mind. She did not mention how she had fallen again
and again when she resumed ballet classes, that she'd had to start over
from scratch. She testified very softly, often smiling shyly. The
defense wisely chose not to question the victims.
Dr. Thomas Wood testified about the autopsies he had done on the dead
victims, and then, over objections from Peggy Good, produced 11- by
14-inch color photos of the bodies, pointing out the damage to the jury.
It is standard for defense attorneys to protest autopsy pictures,
Page 400
declaring them "inflammatory and with no probative value," and it is
standard too that the pictures are admitted.
I watched the faces of the jury as those terrible pictures were passed
silently through their tiers of seats. The female jurors seemed to be
managing better than the males, who paled and winced.
There were several shots of Lisa Levy's buttocks-with the teeth imprints
clearly visible. There was one close-up of Margaret Bowman, called the
"hole-in-the-head" picture by Judge Cowart, for want of a better term.
There was a photograph of Lisa Levy's right breast, the nipple bitten
through.
I had neither se|n nor talked to Ted privately. He did not have the
freedom ato hold conversations with those in the courtroom that hetiad
expected. At each recess, he was led, manacled, to a small room across
the corridor. When court recessed for the day, that day when the
post-mortem reports and the victims' pictures had been introduced into
evidence, I stood outside in the hallway for a moment. Ted, carrying
his
362
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
usual pile of legal papers in his cuffed hands, emerged and walked within
a few feet of me. He turned to me, smiled, shrugged, and disappeared.
In Florida reporters are allowed to view all the evidence that has been
admitted. A group of us waited for Shirley Lewis, the court clerk, to
trundle a huge cart full of physical evidence to her office, and there
it was spread out on a table. A miasma, real or imagined, seemed to
rise from the clutter there, and the laughter and black humor common
among the press corps was silenced.
"We're not laughing now, are we?" Tony Polk of Denver said quietly.
We were not.
All the panty-hose masks were there-including the one Sergeant Bob
Hayward had brought from Utah-strikingly similar to one another. The
garotte from Margaret Bowman's neck, still bearing her dried blood,
Page 401
was there. And all the pictures . . .
I had long since managed to deal with the photographs that are part
of homicide cases with a degree of detachment; they no longer upset
me as they once did, although I make it a point not to dwell on them.
By the time I stood in Shirley Lewis's office, I had seen thousands
of body pictures.
I had seen pictures of Kathy Devine and Brenda Baker in Thurston County,
but that was months before it was known there was a "Ted." Of course,
there were no bodies to photograph in the other Washington cases and
I had had no access to Colorado or Utah pictures. Now, I was staring
down at huge color photographs of the damage done to girls young enough
to be my daughters-at pictures of damage alleged to be the handiwork
of a man I thought I knew. That man who only minutes before had smiled
the same old grin at me, and shrugged as if to say, "I have no part
of this."
It hit me with a terrible sickening wave. I ran to the ladies' room
and threw up.
44
The cloyingly hot days in Miami's July took on a pattern. First, the
mass exodus from the Civic Center Holiday Inn by most of the
principals-barring the defendant-to the Justice Center three blocks
away. Virtually all of the defense team, the prosecution team, the media
people from out of town, Carole Ann Boone and her teenage son, the
television cameramen and technicians were headquartered at the Holiday
Inn, and some of the best quotes reporters elicited came in the evening
when the little bar on the first floor was jammed with participants
quaffing cold beers and gin and tonics. Here, the demarcation lines
were not as pronounced as they were in the courtroom.
The dash to the Justice Center. "Get in there before Watson shuts the
door!" The journey was not without its dangers. It was necessary to
cross six lanes of rush-hour traffic, balancing on center islands as
the commuters of Miami whooshed by, inches away. "Don't walk under the
Page 402
viaduct-a reporter from Utah got mugged the other evening by some guy
on a bicycle with a six-inch blade."
But then, the motel itself was not exactly safe; Ruth Walsh, the ABC
anchorwoman from Seattle, had lost her money, her jewelry-even her
wedding rings-to a cat burglar who'd crept into her room from the balcony
six floors up as she slept.
We were a long way from the beaches where the tourists frolicked.
A first cup of coffee of the day on the ninth floor in the communications
center. Already, the phones were busy, reporters putting cofy men on
hold, waiting for a daily update. Here, the black humor mounted. Two
television reporters mimicked a personal interview with Mrs. Bundy,
one of them playing the defendant's mother in a high falsetto:
363
364
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
"And what was Ted like when he was a child, Mrs. Bundy?"
"Oh he was a good boy, a good, normal, Ail-American boy."
"What kind of toys did he like, Mrs. Bundy?"
"The usual things-guns, knives, panty hose-just like any boy."
"And did he have a job?"
"Oh, no. Teddy always had his credit cards."
Hoots of laughter.
Waiting for the proceedings to flash onto the closed circuit TV before
them, the verse writers scribbled.
Teddy came to Tallahassee, Looking for a pretty lassie, Creeping,
sneaking through the dark, Lurking 'til he found his mark, Remember
dear, remember wellHis bite is much worse than his bark.
For some of the news people, the Bundy trial was only a story-and a
great one at that; others seemed disturbed, too conscious of the waste
of lives involved, not only the victims'-but the defendant's. We were
watching a major tragedy unfold before us, and it meant far more than
headlines.
Page 403
Down on the fourth floor, the mood of the public was angry, vengeful.
As I waited in line to pass through the metal detector, to submit to
the search of my purse and papers that transpired everytime I entered
the courtroom, I heard two men talking behind me.
"That Bundy ... he ain't never gonna get out of Florida alive . . .
he's gonna get what's comin' to him."
"They oughta take him out and nail his balls to the wall and leave him
there 'til he dies. And that'd be too good for him."
I half-turned to look at them. Two nice, grandfatherly looking men.
They echoed the feeling of the Florida public.
As the trial progressed, the crowds grew denser and more hostile. Could
the jury feel it? Had they some suppressed anger of their own? You
couldn't tell by looking at them. Their faces-like all jury faces-were
bland, listening. One or two of them regularly nodded off to sleep during
the long afterTHE STRANGER BESIDE ME
noon sessions. Upstairs, in the press room, reporters would spot that
and yell at the television set, "Wake up! Wake up! Hey Bernest! Wake
up! Floy! Wake up!"
Ted still glanced into the press section to see if I was there, still
smiled faintly, but he seemed to be shrinking, his eyes a little more
hollow each day, as if something inside him was drying up, leaving only
an exhausted shell sitting at the defense table.
Despite the long procession of young women, the parade of police officers
who began to blend into one another somehow, the word was that Bundy
might win. There was so much about him that was being held back from
the jury.
Danny McKeever, looking frazzled, gave short press interviews saying
that he was worried-something a prosecutor rarely admits. The press
began to lay odds that that "son of a bitch may pull it off."
We had missed a day in court because Mazie Edge had a virus; we would
miss another when Ted himself came down with a high fever, a deep cough.
Page 404
On those days, with nothing else to do, we interviewed each other and
side-bar stories of faint human interest were sent to home papers,
stories describing how reporters from other areas felt-a kind of inbred
journalism.
Ted was back then, looking paler, tired. Robert Fulford, manager of
the Oak, testified about his first contact with Chris Hagen, of renting
a room with a bunk bed, a table, chest of drawers, and a desk to him.
"He didn't have the rent when it come due. He said he could call his
mother long-distance in Wisconsin and she'd send it down. I heard him
make a call, and it seemed like he was talkin' to someone, but he never
showed up with the rent. When I checked his room a couple of days later,
he was gone."
The jury knew that Bundy had come to and left Tallahassee, but they
would not know from whence-and why.
David Lee testified about his arrest of Bundy in Pensacola in the dark
dawn of February 15th, told of how his prisoner had wanted to diÉ
The next day, July 17th, Ted did not come to court. At 9 A.M., he was
notfn his place at the defense table. The gallery muttered, and the
press box wondered; Bundy was always in his seat, unmanacled, when court
began, now he was not. Something was wrong.
The jury was kept sequestered as jailer Marty Kratz ap366
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
peared. Kratz explained to Judge Cowart that there had been trouble
with Ted in the jail.
At about 1:00 A.M., Ted had thrown an orange between the bars of Cell
406 and succeeded in smashing one of the lights installed outside to
give him better illumination in that cell. Jailers had immediately moved
him to Cell 405 and searched his first cell. Hidden far back in that
cell, they had found shards of broken glass from the splintered lightbulb.
What for? Suicide? Escape?
"When we went to get him for court this morning," Kratz continued, "we
Page 405
couldn't get the key in the lock. He'd jammed some toilet paper in there."
Reminded that he was due in court, Bundy had replied, "I'll be there
when I feel like it."
Cowart did not take kindly to this information, and sent Ted's lawyers
off to plead with their client to get himself to court in a hurry. He
also found Ted in contempt of court for the delaying tactics.
At 9:30, Ted appeared-a Ted who was angry, arguing that his treatment
in Bade County was not satisfactory to him. He again decried the lack
of exercise, the withholding of files, the blocking of his access to
the law library. His voice broke, on the verge of tears, as he talked
to Cowart. "There comes a time when the only thing I can do is passively
resist ... I have potential . . . now . . . now . . . I've only used
that part of my potential which is nonviolent. There comes a time when
I have to say, 'Whoa . . .' "
"Whoa," Cowart answered. "If you say 'Whoa,' I'm going to have to use
spurs."
Ted made a tactical error. He began to list the offenses against him,
shaking his finger at Judge Cowart as he did so. Cowart took umbrage.
"Don't shake your finger at me, young man ... don't shake your finger
at me!"
Bundy tilted his finger slightly toward the defense table.
"That's fine," Cowart said. "You can shake it at Mr. Haggard."
"He probably deserves it better than you do. In the three weeks I've
been here, I've been taken to the law library three times."
"Yeah, and on at least three occasions you've just sat up there and
talked to Sergeant Kratz. You never used the library itself."
"That's not true. It [the library] is a joke. But it's a better
place to read than the interview room. There is no justification for
the treatment I'm receiving. I am given a strip search after I see my
attorney and that is unconscionable. Now, this railroad train is running,
but if I'm going to get off, I'll get off if I need to demonstrate to
this courtroom that they are influencing me and affecting me."
Page 406
Cowart spoke as if to a spoiled child. "This court is going to proceed
on schedule without your voluntary interruptions. We're not going to
have it any more. Now I want you to discuss that with your counsel.
I want you to know your rights, but I also want you to know that as
forebearing as this court can be, it can also be that strong."
"I'm willing to accept the consequences of my actions, Your Honor, and
anything I do I'm aware of what the court will do."
"Then we're together. Bless your heart, and I just hope you stay with
us. If you don't, we'll miss you."
Bundy ended it with bitter humor. "And all these people won't pay their
monev to come see me."
Tempers were ragged for much of the day. When microanalyst Patricia
Lasko testified that the two hairs found in the panty-hose mask at
Dunwoody Street were "from Mr. Bundy or from someone whose hair is
exactly like his," Haggard grilled her unmercifully.
The discussion of hair microanalysis became so esoteric that the jury
appeared lost in the scientific terminology. Haggard badeered Ms. Lasko
until the judge warned him.
When Hasgard asked to examine Ms. Lasko's notes, she hung onto them
stubbornly. Haggard wrenched them away, and Larry Simpson walked over
and began a tug-of-war with the defense attorney over the notebook.
Judee Cowart chastised both attorneys and sent the jury out. Then he
comnlimented the usually mild-mannered Simpson, "It's the first time
I've seen you get your dander up."
It was true. There had been little fire in cross-examination from either
side.
The state's caseïwas coming to a close. Nita Neary had again raised
her arm-this time in front of a jury-and pointed out Ted Bfmdy as the
man she'd seen leaving the Chi Omesa House just after the murders. The
biggest gun of all-Dr. Richard Souviron, the dental odontologist-was
about to begin.
Souviron, a handsome, dapper man with a flair for the thePage 407
atrical, seemed to eniov his time before the jury. He held a pointer
and indicated the teeth on the huge color photo of Ted Bundy's mouth-the
photo which had been taken after the search warrant was served in the
Leon County Jail more than a year earlier.
The jury seemed fascinated; they had been confused, obviously, by the
serology testimony on semen, and by the hair testimony, but they followed
the dental testimony alertly.
The tissue from Lisa Levy's buttock had been destroyed for comparison
purposes through improper preservation; only the bite mark,
photographed to scale, was left. Would it be enou«h?
"These are laterals . . . bicuspids . . . incisors . . ."
Souviron explained that each individual's teeth had particular
characteristics: alignment,
irregularities, chips, size,
sharpness-that these characteristics make them one of a kind. Souviron
had found Ted's teeth particularly unique.
Dramatically, he tacked the enlarged picture of Lisa Levy's buttocks,
bearing the purple rows of bite marks, on the display board in front
of the jury. And then he placed a clear sheet on top of that-a sheet
bearing an enlarged picture of the defendant's teeth.
"Thev line up exactly'."
Explaining the "double bite," Souviron continued: "The individual bit
once, then turned sideways and bit a second time. The top teeth stayed
in about the same position, but the lower teeth-biting harder-left 'two
rings.' " The second bite made it even easier, Souviron said, to compare
the teeth with the marks because he had twice as much to work with.
"Doctor," Prosecutor Simpson began. "Based upon your analysis and
comparison of this particular bite mark, can you tell us within a
reasonable degree of dental certainty whether or not the teeth
represented in that photograph as being those of Theodore Robert Bundy
and the teeth represented by the models that have been introduced as
state's exhibits number
85, 86, made the bite marks reflected on your exhibit as marked and
admitted into evidence?"
"Yes sir."
"And what is that opinion?"
Page 408
"They made the marks."
It was the first time-the very first time in all the years since 1974-that
a piece of physical evidence had been
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
linked absolutely between a victim and Ted Bundy . . . and the courtroom
erupted.
The defense, of course, wanted to show that "dental certainty" and
forensic odontology is a primitive, and not widely accepted science.
Ed Harvey rose for the defense on cross-examination.
He began, "Analyzing bite marks is part art and part science, isn't
it?"
"I think that's a fair statement."
"And that really depends upon the experience and education of the
examiner?"
"Yes."
"And your conclusions are really a matter of opinion. Is that correct?"
"That is correct."
"You've got a given set of teeth, or models, and a given area of skin,
a thigh or a calf. Is there any way tQ test whether those teeth will
make trie same marks over and over?"
Souviron smiled. "Yes, because I did an experiment just like that. I
took models and I went to the morgue and I pressed the models into the
buttocks area on different individuals and photographed them. Yes, they
can be standardized, and, yes, they do match."
Harvey feigned incredulity. "You said cadavers? Is that correct?"
"I couldn't find any live volunteers."
Harvey tried to find some areas of inconsistency, but his line of
questioning failed.
Souviron explained further, and the jury leaned forward to listen. "If
there's an area of inconsistency-out it goes. If there's a Vee'd-out
central that wouldn't make this pattern, you'd say, 'Well, we'll have
to exclude that person even though the arch size is the same, the cuspids
Page 409
are tucked down in behind the laterals and this type of thing. The
centrals don't line up rigr|.' [But] The odds of finding this would
be a needle in a haystack-an identical set like Mr. Bundy'swith the
wear ol the centrals and everything, the chipped lateral incisor,
everything identical. You'd have to be able to combine that with the
three marks on the upper central incisors, and the odds against that
are astronomical."
The state was closing its case with all flags flying. They
370
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
called Dr. Lowell J. Levine, the chief consultant in forensic dentistry
to the New York City Medical Examiner.
Levine testified that he believed Lisa Levy-or the person whose flesh
appeared in the photograph he studied-had been "passive" when the bite
marks were left on her body. "There is very little evidence of motion
or swirling you'd normally get as tissue moves in various directions
as the teeth move on the skin. It almost looks more like an animal which
has bitten and kinda grabs. These things were left slowly, and the person
was not moving. They [sic] were passive when they were left."
"Can you give us an opinion as to the uniqueness of teeth?"
"Everybody's teeth are unique to that particular person for a number
of reasons. One, the shapes of the teeth are unique, in addition to
the juxtaposition or the relationship of each tooth to the other is
unique, the twisting or tipping or bending also adds to that uniqueness.
Present and missing teeth . . . and those
are basically gross
characteristics. We also have other types of individual characteristics
which are accidental characteristics such as breaking."
Mike Minerva, left behind in Tallahassee when Ted had grown disenchanted
with him, was in the courtroom-apparently forgiven-to cross-examine
Dr. Levine.
"When you say 'reasonable degree of dental certainty,' you are speaking
Page 410
of some kind of probability. Is that right?"
"A very high degree of probability. Yes sir."
Minerva was trying to make the "new science" suspect, to make it look
simply "probable" and not "absolute," but Levine would not buckle under.
". . . in my mind it becomes a practical impossibility to come up with
something with all the identical1 characteristics."
"Would you say that it is fair to say that odontology is a relatively
new, newly recognized forensic science?"
"No. I do riot think that is fair at all. Historically, you have a case
of Paul Revere doing identifications. You have testimony admitted to
the bar in Massachusetts in the late
1800s on identification, and you can find citations for bite-mark cases
even in the legal justice system that go back twenty-five years. So
what's new?"
The prosecution rested. Ted Bundy asked that Dr. Souviron be held in
contempt of court for speaking out at the OrTHE STRANGER BESIDE ME
371
lando meeting prior to his trial on his case, and Cowart denied his
request. In the empty courtroom, Ted studied the dental exhibits of
his teeth and the pictures of Lisa Levy's bite marks.
I have no idea what his thoughts were.
i
I
45
Things were not good in the defense camp. Robert Haggard had resigned,
hinting that the defendant's insistence on questioning Ray Crew, the
police officer who was in the death rooms on the night of January 14-15,
Page 411
had been a mistake. The public defenders would not allow Ted to
cross-examine witnesses any more.
On the first day of the defense, July 20th, Ted rose to address Judge
Cowart. He was claiming that his attorneys were inadequate-the same
attorneys that he had praised highly to me in his pretrial phone call.
He blamed Mike Minerva for dropping out of the case without warning,
the man he now said had "the most experienced courtroom presence in
this case." He didn't mention that he himself had asked Minerva to leave.
"I did not have any choice in the selection of Bob Haggard to represent
me here in Miami. In toto, I have not been asked at any time my opinion
about who should be representing me within the public defender's
office."
In fact, Ted did not like his whole defense team.
"I think it's also important to note that there are certain problems
of communication between myself and my attorneys which have reduced
my defense, the defense which is not my defense or sanctioned by me,
nor one which I can say I agree with."
Ted complained that his lawyers ignored his input into the case, would
not let him make decisions, and were stubbornly refusing him the right
to cross-examine witnesses before the
jury.
Cowart was aghast.
"I don't know of any case I've seen or experienced where an individual
who is indigent has received the quality and quantity of counsel you
have. There have been five separate counsel here representing you. It's
unheard of. Who's mind372
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
373
n
ing the store for the public defender I can't tell you. And what's
happening to all those other indigents they represent I can't tell you.
Page 412
This court has watched with a great deal of carefulness that, before
witnesses are tendered, you are questioned, and this record will show
hundreds of 'just a moment, pleases' where they [Ted's attorneys] go
by and confer with you. I've never seen anything like it in the history
of any case I've ever tried. Or in twenty-seven years at the bar have
I ever seen anything exactly like what has happened in the defense of
this case."
But Ted was adamant; once again, he wanted to take over his own defense.
Cowart said he would agree, but warned Ted that a lawyer who represents
himself has a fool for a client. Ted responded, "I've always taken that
particular axiom like someone who works on his own car has a fool for
a mechanic. It all depends on how much you want to do by yourself."
It was an old, tired story. Cowart suggested that Ted's question was
one of "submission of counsel."
"Imposition," Ted countered.
"No, it's submission, and this court has addressed that. If they don't
do every little, single, solitary thing that you want 'em to, they're
incompetent. And, bless your heart, if they do ... I'm gonna fire 'em."
It is likely that Ted wanted to be sure the record showed that he had
not had his attorney of choice. Millard Farmer's name wasn't mentioned,
but the implication was clear.
Once again, Ted was at the helm, and his attorneys were only "advisors."
Still, for the moment, Ed Harvey would question the defense witnesses.
Harvey said-out of the hearing of the jury, a jury which did not seem
to realize that the defense team was in a shambles-that he wanted out
too.
The defense tactics were not to present any alibi for Ted Bundy, but
to try to negate the state's evidence. Dr. Duane DeVore, an oral surgery
professor from the University of Maryland, and an advisor in forensic
dentistry to the chief medical examinertof the state of Maryland,
testified that bite marks were not unique-though teeth themselves were.
". . . the material of skin is flexible, elastic, and, depending upon
the bleeding structures underneath and the amount of blood, [a tooth]
may not leave a unique mark."
DeVore produced four models of teeth from Maryland youngsters that he
said could have caused the bite marks on
Page 413
374
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
the victim, but he admitted to Larry
Simpson that Ted
Bundy's teeth also could have made the same marks.
The defense produced a tape taken while Nita Neary was in a hypnotic
trance where she said that the houseboy, Ronme Eng, had resembled the
intruder. Eng was brought into the courtroom and stood beside Ted. The
jury looked on, and, of course, said nothing.
Serologist Michael J. Grubb, of the Institute of Forensic Sciences in
Oakland, testified that the semen left on Cheryl Thomas's sheet could
not have been deposited by Bundyagain in a long, highly technical
discourse that seemed to confuse the jury.
Ed Harvey, trying one more time to save his client, asked for another
competency hearing. "The man's life is at stake. He shouldn't be forced
to take the services of public lawyers whom he has no confidence in.
His conduct has revealed the debilitating effects of his mental disorder
by reflecting a total lack of insight regarding the disorder and its
effects on him, by reflecting a wholly inadequate ability to consult
with lawyers about the case."
Danny McKeever opposed the competency motion. "The man is difficult
to work with. He's almost cunning the way he works against his attorneys
sometimes . . . but he's competent."
Ted smiled. Anything was better than being considered incompetent.
Cowart felt Ted was competent too, and a compromise was worked out as
the trial approached its ending. Harvey would stay, Lynn Thompson would
stay, and Peggy Good would make the final arguments. Bundy would comment
later, "I feel really, really, good . . ."
I had not seen Ted alone since I'd reached Miami, although I had left
messages at the jail with my phone number. I don't know if he got them,
or, if he had, if he was allowed to call out. Perhaps he no longer had
anything he wished to say to me. So I cannot judge whether he was
Page 414
competent or not. It is a moot question whether his deliberate rocking
of the defense team's already shaky platform was a move on his part
to gain even more attention or whether it was an indication that he
was, truly, no longer rational, a man in the grip of some kind of egomania
that obliterated the issue of survival itself. I could only observe
him in the courtroom, and he seemed hellbent for destruction.
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
375
Ted continued to denigrate his attorneys, still angry that they would
not allow him more control.
"I've tried to be nice. We're speaking more to a problem attorneys have
in giving up power. Maybe we're dealing with a problem of professional
psychology. Where attorneys are so jealous of the power they exercise
in the courtroom they're afraid to share it with the defendant. They
are so insecure in their own skill and experience that they are afraid
that anybody else might know as much as they do or can at least
participate in the planning process."
Cowart commented mildly that Ted's attorneys had passed their bar exams,
had graduated from law school. "I can't conceive of submitting myself,
or I'm sure you wouldn't submit yourself, to brain surgery by somebody
who had only a year and a half of medical school."
In actuality, of course, Ted's defense attorneys were not that
experienced. Cowart had helped them often in phrasing questions, and
much of their cross-examination was tedious, uninspired, and headed
nowhere. But then Simpson and McKeever-for the state-did not rival
Melvin Belli or F. Lee Bailey. The Bundy trial had been marked throughout
with mediocrity; only the judge himself was a thoroughbred. However,
if Ted could have worked with his attorneys instead of trying to tear
them apart, he might have had an adequate defense. They had succeeded
in barring the "fantasy tape," the Utah panty-hose mask, his former
record, his escape. Despite any faltering on their parts, they might
well have saved him ;'/ he had allowed it.
Page 415
Moving into final arguments, the press was still wagering even odds
on the outcome of the trial.
And yet, there seemed to be something happening, something that couldn't
be stopped. Ted had spoken of "this railroad train running," and it
struck a chord buried deep in the recesses of my memory. The outcome
of the trial would not necessarily be the wrong verdict; that verdict
was something that none of us had control over any longer. The truth
had been lost somewhere among the games, the rituals, the motions, the
petty arguments and the rational arguments, the quotes for the pless,
the notations for the record.
In all human endeavors that deal with what is unthinkable, too terrible
to be dealt with squarely, we turn to what is familiar and regimented:
funerals, wakes, and even wars. Now, in this trial, we had gone beyond
our empathy with the
376
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
pain of the victims, our niggling realization that the defendant was
a fragmented personality. He knew the rules, he even knew a great deal
about the law, but he did not seem to be cognizant of what was about
to happen to him. He seemed to consider himself irrefrangible. And what
was about to happen to him was vital for the good of society. I could
not refute that. It had to be, but it seemed hollow that none of us
understood that his ego, our egos, the rituals of the courtroom itself,
the jokes and the nervous laughter were veiling the gut reactions that
we should all be facing. We were all on "this railroad train running ..."
I looked at the jury, and I knew. Never mind the odds. My God, they
are going to kill Ted . ..
46
Page 416
Ted himself had one "last hurrah" before final arguments. He had studied
the blow-ups of his teeth carefully, listened stony-faced as Dr.
Souviron testified that there was no question in his mind that it was
Ted Bundy-and only Ted Bundy-who had sunk his teeth into Lisa Levy's
buttock. In the emptied courtroom, he had even mugged a bit for the
cameras, holding a model of his teeth against the picture of the dead
_girl's bruised flesh. And he had realized just how damning this forensic
dentistry evidence was to his case.
In the absence of the jury, Bundy called his investigator, Joe Aloi,
to the stand. Aloi is a hearty, husky man with Latin coloring, given
to wearing flamboyant tropical shirts when he is not in the courtroom,
a respected investigator who often joked with the press and the attorneys
in the lounge of the Holiday Inn. Now Ted was trying, through him, to
bring forth physical evidence that would dispute the accuracy of
Souviron's testimony. The chip in one of his front teeth had not been
there at the time of the Chi Omega murders, not according to Ted.
Aloi identified some photographs sent to him from Chuck Dowd, the
managing editor of the Tacoma News Tribune, Ted's hometown
paper-pictures that represented a chronological sequence since his
first arrest in Utah.
Ted asked: "What was the purpose of enlarging certain portions of the
photographs that you were attempting to obtain in chronological order?"
"I had received information from Mr. Gene Miller of the Miami Herald
conAprning a seminar Dr. Souviron had given. I was very concerned about
when this characteristic occurred." I
"And what characteristic is that?"
"This is concerning one of two front teeth-I don't know all the names-and
I was concerned about this chip on the
377
378
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
inside of the tooth, and whether it was or was not there and whatever
Page 417
specific times we could document some of the photographs in evidence
to depict that this particular tooth was in very good condition at
certain times. And, of course, at other times when Dr. Souviron had
taken his samples from you if the tooth was in a different condition."
Ted asked what the photo blow-ups had revealed. An objection was
sustained. Judge Cowart coached the defendantdefense attorney.
"You might ask him if he was able to accomplish [discovery of the teeth
in different conditions]. Try it that way and see if I object."
"The court is always right."
"No," Cowart demurred. "Not always."
"Did you accomplish what you set out to do?"
"No sir, I did not."
"And why not?"
Aloi responded, "The media, for legal reasons and perhaps for other
reasons, would not be very cooperative."
The investigator explained that various newspapers would not release
their negatives to him, negatives of pictures of Ted Bundy flashing
his familiar wide smile. Aloi had been unable to lay his hands on pictures
taken of Ted before his Pensacola arrest that would indicate positively
that there was no chip in his front tooth at that time.
Ted changed places again, and, again, became the witness-questioned
by Peggy Good. He testified that his tooth had been chipped in the middle
of March, 1978-two months after the murders in Tallahassee.
"I recall I was eating dinner in my cell in the Leon County Jail and
I bit down hard, just like you bite down on a rock or pebble, and I
pulled it out and it was just a white piece of tooth, and it just chipped
out of one of my central incisors."
Danny McKeever rose to cross-examine.
"You don't know what the Utah dental records look like, do you?"
"I've never seen the dental records themselves."
"Would you be surprised to know that those teeth appear to be chipped
from the Utah dental records?" (Which, indeed, they did.)
"Yes, I would."
Now, for the first time, Ted called his friend, Carole Ann Boone, to
the witness stand. Carole Ann answered Bundy's
Page 418
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
379
questions about her visits to him in the Garfield County Jail in late
1977.
"Did you visit me there? How many times?"
"I don't have my records with me, but I believe I visited with you on
six or seven consecutive days-both in the morning and the afternoon.
On a few afternoons, we visited in the law library in the courthouse
and then we would walk back together to the jail, about half a block."
Ms. Boone testified that to the best of her memory, Ted had had no chip
at all in his front tooth at that time.
Ted argued vehemently for a delay, for subpoenas that would force all
newspapers to turn over their negatives of him. "I think you'd understand
what I'm getting at. If that chip did not occur until March, 1978, a
month or two after the Chi Omega crimes, and if the state's odontologists
say that space between the two linear abrasions could only have been
made by a tooth with a chip or a gap between the two central incisors
then there's obviously something wrong with the observations made by
the state's odontologists. Our contention all along, Your Honor, is
that they have taken my teeth and twisted them every which way but loose
to fit."
It was a vain plea. Cowart ruled that there would be no dash for new
evidence on Ted's teeth, no subpoenas. As Ted moved to reopen, Cowart
intoned:
"Mr. Bundy, you may jump up and down, hang from the chandelier, do
anything you want to, but the court has ruled and the case is closed."
Ted muttered some derogatory statements under his breath.
"You impress me not, sir . . ." the judge replied.
"Well, I suppose the feeling is mutual, Your Honor."
"I'm sure it is, bless your heart."
Larry Simpson rose to give the closing arguments for the prosecution,
speaking in his usual subdued manner; he talked for forty minutes.
"First degree murder can be committed in the state of Florida in two
Page 419
different ways. It can be done by a person who premeditates %nd thinks
about what he's going to do and then goes out anA does it. That's exactly
what the evidence showed in this particular case, a premeditated, a
brutal murder of two young girls sleeping in their beds. The second
way is during the commission of a burglary. The state has proved a
burglary in this case.
"I asked Nita Neary the question-on the witness stand380
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
'Nita, do you recall the man you saw at the door of the Chi Omega sorority
house the morning of January 15, 1978?' Her exact words were, 'Yes,
sir. I do.' I asked her 'Nita, is that man in the courtroom today?'
She said, 'Yes sir. He is.' And she pointed him out. That in and of
itself is proof of this defendant's guilt, and it is sufficient to
support a conviction in this case.
"In Sherrod's, Mary Ann Piccano also saw the man. He scared her so bad
she can't even remember what he looked like. He came up to her and asked
her to dance. What were the words Mary Ann Piccano used to her friend
when she went to dance with the man? She said, 'I think I'm about to
dance with an ex-con . . .' Ladies and gentlemen, this man was next
door to the Chi Omega sorority house, the morning of the murders . . .
and there was something wrong with him!"
Simpson continued to tote up the circumstantial evidence, the testimony
of Rusty Gage and Henry Palumbo of the Oak that they had seen "Chris"
standing at the front door of the rooming house just after the attacks,
seen him looking back toward the campus. "They told you that the
defendant in this case said to them that he thought this was a
professional job-a professional job-done by somebody who had done it
before and was probably long gone.
"Ladies and gentlemen, this man recognized from the morning of these
murders that this was a professional job, that no clues had been left.
He thought he'd gotten away scot free."
Page 420
Simpson pointed out the links with the license tag stolen from Randy
Ragan's van, the theft of the Volkswagen bug, the escape to Pensacola,
the room left wiped clean of prints, empty of all possessions.
"He had loaded up and packed up everything he had and he was getting
out of Dodge. That's what it amounts to. The heat was on and he was
going."
Simpson spoke of Officer David Lee's arrest of Bundy in Pensacola.
"Theodore Robert Bundy said to him, 'I wish you had killed me. If I
run now, will you shoot me?' Why did he say those things to Officer
Lee? Here is a man that has created, committed, the most horrible and
brutal murders known to the Tallahassee area. That's why. He can't live
with himself anymore and he wants Officer Lee to kill him right there."
Simpson built to a big finish. He had dealt with the eye
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
381
witness, the circumstantial evidence, and now he brought in Patricia
Lasko's testimony linking the two, curly-brown hairs in the pantyhose
mask beside Cheryl Thomas's bed to their source: Ted Bundy's head. "That
pantyhose mask came directly from the man that committed these crimes.
The hairs from that pantyhose mask also came from that man."
Souviron's testimony was the clincher.
"What was his conclusion? With a reasonable degree of dental certainty,
Theodore Robert Bundy made that bite mark in the body of Lisa Levy.
Asked in cross-examination about the possibility of someone else in
the world having teeth that could have left those marks, what did he
say? He said it would be like finding a needle in a haystack. A needle
in a haystack.
"When Dr. Levine was asked about the possibility of someone else leaving
this bite mark, or someone else having teeth that could leave this bite
mark, he told you it was a practical impossibility. A practical
impossibility."
Simpson ended by decrying the defense's desperation.
Page 421
"On cross examination, Dr. DeVore, the defense expert, had to tell you,
and did, that the defendant, Theodore Robert Bundy, could have left
that bite mark. Ladies and gentlemen, the defense was in a real problem
situation. Anytime they've got to put a witness on [who will say] that
their man could have committed this crime, they've got real problems.
And it was a desperate move-a damned desperate move-that might have
succeeded-but did not."
Final arguments, ideally, are filled with the kind of rhetoric that
will keep listeners on the very edges of their seats. This is the stuff
of which movies and television dramas are made. But the Bundy Miami
trial had none of that fire, nothing to grip or compel, from the attorneys
not even at the close.
Only the defendant and the judge filled their roles as if they'd been
chosen by central casting.
Two jurors drowsed, incredibly, drowsed in their chairs as Ted Bundy's
life hung in the balance.
Peggy Good, me last barrier between Ted and the electric chair, stood
nowito speak for the defense. She had little to work with-no anbis,
no surprise witness to rise from the gallery and shout that there was,
indeed, an alibi. She could only attempt to tear down the prosecution's
case, to nibble away at the jury's consciences. Ms. Good had to overcome
the testimony of forty-nine prosecution witnesses, the one hundred
382
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
exhibits entered by the prosecution. She could only fall back on talk
of "reasonable doubt."
"The defense is not denying there was a great and horrible tragedy that
occurred in Tallahassee on January 15th. True, that
these four
unfortunate women were beaten while sleeping in their beds, injured . . .
killed. But I ask you not to compound that tragedy by convicting the
wrong man when the state's evidence is insufficient to prove beyond
Page 422
a reasonable doubt that Mr. Bundy. and no one else, is the person that
committed these crimes. How tragic it would be if a man's life could
be taken from him because twelve people thought he was probably guilty,
but they were not sure. You must assure yourself that you will not wake
up and doubt your decision and wonder if you convicted the wrong man
here two weeks after he is dead and gone."
Ms. Good cast aspersions on the police investigation. "There are
basically two ways for the police to investigate a crime. They can go
to the crime scene, they can look for the clues, and they can follow
the clues to their logical conclusions and find a suspect. Or they can
find the suspect, decide on the suspect, and decide to make the evidence
fit the suspect and work to make the evidence fit only him."
Good listed the areas she considered weak, condemning the introduction
of the masses of bloodied sheets, bloody photographs, the lack of
fingerprint matching, mishandling of evidence-even the eye-witness
identification.
She found Nita Neary's identification faulty. "She wants to help if
she can. And she can't let herself believe that the man who committed
these crimes is still out on the street."
Good tried feebly to make Ted's retreat from Tallahassee seem reasonable.
"There are lots of reasons a person might run from the cops. One reason
is that you might be afraid you'd be railroaded. You might be afraid
you'd be charged with something you didn't do. It's clear Mr. Bundy
left town because he was out of money. He was running out on the rent."
Peggy Good was like the little boy with his finger in the dike, but
there were too many new freshets erupting to hold back. In dealing with
the testimony by Drs. Souviron and Levine, she suggested that the
investigators had found Ted Bundy and matched his teeth to the bite,
rather than searching for the person who had made the bite. "If you
want to convict on the best shell in a confidence game, maybe you'll
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
383
Page 423
accept what Souviron and Levine have to say. It will be a sad day for
our system of justice if a man can be convicted in our courts on the
quality of the state's evidence, and you can put a man's life on the
line because they say he has crooked teeth, without any proof that such
are unique, without any scientific facts or data base to their
conclusions."
Simpson came back with rebuttal. It was almost over.
"Ladies and gentlemen, the man who committed this crime was smart. This
man premeditated this murder. He knew what he was going to do before
he did it, and planned it, and prepared himself for it. If there is
any question in your mind about that, just look at the pantyhose mask.
That is a weapon that was prepared by the perpetrator of this crime.
Now, ladies and gentlemen, somebody took the time to make this weapon
right here, this instrument that could be used for both-a mask that
could hide identity ... or also for strangulation.
"Anybody who took the time to do that is not going to leave fingerprints
at a crime scene. And there was not a single fingerprint in room 12
at the Oak; the room had been wiped clean!
"Ladies and gentlemen, this man is a professional, just as he told Rusty
Gage at the Oak back in January, 1978. He's the kind of a man smart
enough to stand in the courtroom and move to the end of the bannister
and cross-examine witnesses in this case because he thinks he is smart
enough to get away with any crime, just like he told Rusty Gage."
Ted himself had said nothing. He'd sat quietly at the defense table,
sometimes staring at his hands, hands that did not appear particularly
powerful, small hands with tapering fingers, knobbed at the joints as
if with early arthritis.
It was 2:57 P.M. on July 23rd when the jurors retired to debate his
guilt or innocence. Dave Watson, the old bailiff, guarded the door.
An hour later, Ted was returned to his cell in the Dade County Jail
to await the verdict.
All the life seeded to have gone out of the fourth-floor courtroom;
it was, jor the moment, an empty stage bereft of its players. I
The ninth floor, however, had become a bee-hive of activity, alive with
reporters, all the attorneys, anyone connected with the case-save the
victims and the witnesses. The odds were still even. Fifty-fifty.
Page 424
Acquittal or conviction, and bets were being placed. It would surely
be a long, long night384
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
perhaps days before a verdict could be reached. There might even be
a hung jury.
Louise Bundy was in Miami, waiting with Carole Ann Boone and her
son-waiting to see if Louise's son would live or die. Although the
penalty phase would be separate, no one doubted that, if Ted were
convicted, he would also receive the death penalty. Spenkelink had only
killed another ex-con; this case involved the deaths of innocent young
women.
Ted gave a telephone interview as he waited to hear.
"Is it just being in the wrong place at the wrong time?" the reporter
asked.
His voice came through, strong, almost surprised-sounding at finding
himself in this predicament. "It's just being Ted Bundy in anyplace,
I guess . . . anymore. It started out in Utah and it seemed like one
set of circumstances seemed to bootstrap another, to feed on one another,
and once you get people thinking in that vein . . . Police officers,
they want to solve crimes, and I sometimes don't think they really think
things through; they're willing to take the convenient alternative.
The convenient alternative is me."
It was 3:50 P.M. The jurors sent out for legal pads, pencils.
4:12 P.M. Watson announces, "I'm going to the head. Hold 'em down if
they knock."
5:12 P.M. Watson says the principals are spread out around Miami, that
it will take half an hour to return them when the jury reaches a verdict.
6:31 P.M. Judge Cowart returns to the courtroom. The jury has a question.
It will be their only inquiry. They want to know if the hairs were found
in the panty-hose mask. The answer is that they were shaken from the
mask.
Page 425
The jury has stopped its deliberation to eat the sandwiches which were
sent in. The feeling is that they will deliberate for a short time longer,
and then retire for the night. There is such a massive amount of testimony
and evidence to be got through.
And then, the word came. Electrifying. It is only 9:20 P.M. The jury
has reached a verdict. As they file in, only Foreman Rudolph Treml
glances at Ted. He silently hands seven slips of paper to Judge Cowart,
who passes thein to the court clerk.
Shirley Lewis reads them aloud. Guilty as charged . . .
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
385
guilty
guilty
guilty
guilty as charged . . . guilty . . . guilty . . . guilty . . . guilty ...
guilty.
Ted betrays no emotion. Only a slight raising of the eyebrows, his right
hand to his chin, rubbing gently. When it is all over, he sighs. Again,
it his mother who cries.
It has taken the jury less than seven hours of deliberation to decide
his fate. All those kindly middle-aged women, the devout church-goers,
the people who didn't read newspapers, this jury hand-picked by Ted
himself. It appeared that they had been eager to debate the question
of his guilt, almost as eager to find that he was, indeed, guilty.
Ted is lost to me. He has been lost since I looked at the pictures of
the dead girls and knew what I knew . . . knew what I had never wanted
to believe. There is no need to remain for the penalty phase. Whatever
is to come after is already foretold in my mind. They are going to kill
him . . . they are going to kill him ... and he knew it all along.
I
I
Page 426
47
I flew home, leaving Miami behind in the grip of a warm, pelting rain.
I had to change planes in St. Louis, and there too, that city was
criss-crossed wtih violent thunder storms. We sat on the ground for
one hour, two hours, waiting for a break hi the storm. At length, we
were the last plane allowed off the ground as lightning seemed to split
the air only feet from the wing-tips. The plane bucked and shook as
if the pilot had no control, and we dropped, dropped, and then flew
ahead. I was frightened; I had seen how very tenuous life can be.
When we finally left the storms of the Midwest behind us, I turned to
the man beside me, a Boeing engineer, and asked him if he had been afraid.
"No. I've already been there."
It was a strange answer. He explained that he had been clinically dead
as a youth, crushed beneath a car after he and several friends had hit
a utility pole.
"I watched from somewhere up above and saw the troopers lift the car
off someone. Then I saw that it was me lying there. I wasn't afraid,
and I didn't feel any pain-not until I woke up in the hospital three
days later. Since then, I've known that the soul doesn't die, only the
body, and I've never been afraid."
I had seen nothing but death hi Miami, heard nothing but death-and death
seemed to lie ahead for Ted. Hearing the stranger's words was somewhat
comforting. Ted had written in his last letter, "There's nothing wrong
with my life that reincarnation couldn't improve upon."
It seemed to be his only option left.
I believed that the verdict had been the right verdict, but I wondered
if it had been for the wrong reasons. It had been too swift, too
vindictive. Was justice still justice when it manifested itself as it
had in the less than six hours of jury
386
Page 427
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
387
deliberation? Was this the delayed justice that should have come before?
Perhaps there was no way that it could have been done cleanly, concisely,
in a textbook case. The people had spoken. And Ted was guilty.
I
I
48
In Colorado, Ted Bundy had been a kind of lovable rogue, with many of
the Aspenites delighting in his antics. Judge George Lohr had eliminated
consideration of the death penalty in Colorado in Ted's murder trial
there. Had he stayed in his Garfield County jail cell on that day before
New Year's Eve, 1977, Ted might have won freedom (except for his
still-uncompleted term in Utah) but he certainly would have had his
life. By the summer of 1979, he would have been sitting in one western
prison or another, but he would not have found himself in the long shadow
of the electric chair.
Florida-the "Buckle of the Death Belt"-was the worst possible state
to which he could have run. No one in Florida had taken kindly to Ted
Bundy's mocking superiority, his games. Not the police. Not the judges.
And certainly not the public. In Florida, "killers" were killed
themselves, and with as much dispatch as possible. An Oregon detective,
returning from a seminar in Louisville, Kentucky in 1978, told me that
he had talked with some of the Florida lawmen who had dealt with Ted.
"They told me they would have killed him," the detective recalled to
me. "They said he would have had an 'accident,' while he was still in
jail-but they didn't dare because he was too much in the public eye."
"Good ole boys"-policemen and laymen alike-didn't hold with
women-killers, with despoilers and rapists. These were the men that
Ted had scoffed at in his phone call from the Leon County Jail. These
were the people who now would control his every move.
Page 428
He had deliberately walked into the very jaws of death. Why?
Prosecutors Simpson and McKeever would ask for the death penalty,
although, ironically, they stressed that they would not go for
"overkill;" there was enough already with388
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
389
out inundating the jury with the full background on the man they had
convicted.
In the bifurcated trial, the second phase-the penalty phase-was slated
to begin at 10:00 A.M. on Saturday, July
28th, despite the defense team's plea for a week's delay. The jury was
taken back to their luxurious Sonesta Beach hotel to relax for the
intervening days.
Ted had some new motions. Again, he wanted Millard Farmer. Arguing that
Farmer had extensive experience with death penalty cases, he asked Judge
Cowart if-now that he'd been found guilty-he could have the Atlanta
attorney beside him.
"I've already ruled on that," Cowart said tersely. "I consider the making
of the motion a second time an effrontery to the court."
Ted wanted to bring a Florida prison inmate in to testify about the
woefully inadequate prison law library system in an attempt to point
out how much good Ted could do in upgrading the library if he could
work there as a law clerk.
Denied. But Cowart commented that Ted might have been a lawyer-if only
he had not taken the path he had.
A motion to delay.
"That falls on totally deaf ears."
A motion to plea bargain after fee fact, citing that jury trials are
unfair because a guilty verdict invariably results in the death penalty.
It was too late; Ted had been offered a plea bargain back in May, and
he'd refused it
Page 429
Judge Cowart was annoyed when Peggy Good said that the penalty phase
would rob Ted of "due process." As a Florida judge, he resented that
state's being constantly referred to by defense lawyers hi America as
"notorious." (In actuality, many
states now have bifurcated
trials-including Washington-and there are arguments just as cogent to
show that they can tend to save a defendant from the death penalty.)
When the second phase of the trial began on Saturday morning, the state
was remarkedly restrained. Carol DaRonch Swenson, a youdj^ matron now,
was called to the witness stand. The jurors|looked on with interest
as the tall woman in white satin slsrcks and blouse sat silently in
the witness chair. She was, quite possibly, the most striking of all
the women they had seen hi the courtroom during the monthlong trial
with her great pansy eyes, her mane of long dark hair. But Carol DaRonch
Swenson never spoke a word. A
390
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
quick huddle between the opposing attorneys, a whispered word to the
judge, and she stepped down. The defense would stipulate to Ted's
conviction in February 1976 for her kidnapping in Utah in November 1974.
Jerry Thompson, the Salt Lake County detective who had run Ted to earth
that first time, took the stand instead of Carol and told of that case,
offered a certified copy of Ted's Utah conviction.
Michael Fisher, the slender, intense Pitkin County investigator from
Aspen, Colorado, who had taken up the chase in his state, was just as
succinct, and more inscrutable. He told of taking Ted from
Point-of-the-Mountain prison to the Pitkin County Jail. He too read
a stipulated statement: "On January 15, 1978, that you (Bundy) were
under a sentence of imprisonment by the state of Utah and that you have
not been paroled or otherwise released from that sentence."
The escape was never mentioned; it was left to the jury to surmise that
a man never "paroled or released" from a sentence must have walked away
Page 430
from jail of his own accord.
There was so much that jury in Miami never heard. They knew nothing
about all the dead and missing girls in Washington, nothing about the
three dead girls in Utah, nothing about the five dead and missing girls
in Colorado, nothing of the Pensacola fantasy tapes; presumably they
did not know that the man before them was felt by many to be the most
prolific mass killer in America.
The prosecution had, indeed, avoided any cries of overkill.
And yet, the specter of the electric chair hovered in that courtroom,
as surely as if it had been brought hi and placed before the bench.
Ted expected it, his attorneys expected it, and the public demanded
it
Ted had a measure of forgiveness from one of the three women beaten
into unconsciousness on the night of January
14-15, 1978. Kathy Kleiner DeShields said, "I feel sorry for him-he
needs help-but what he did, there's no way to compensate for that."
Karen Chandler felt differently. "Two people dear to me are dead because
of him and I really think he should be too."
Tiny Eleanor Louise Cowell Bundy, trembling with anxiety, would take
the stand to plead for her son's life. This was her ideal child. This
was the baby she had borne in shame, the little boy she had fought to
keep with her, the young man in whom she had taken such overriding pride.
He was to
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
391
have been her vindication for everything; he was to have been perfect.
She made a pitiable figure on the stand, fighting as all mothers will
fight to save their young. Cowart was gentle with her, telling her,
"Settle down, Mother. We haven't lost a mother in a long time so just
don't be nervous."
Louise Bundy told the jury about Ted, the other four children. "We tried
to be very conscientious parents, ones who did things with our children,
Page 431
gave them the best we could on a middle class income. But, mostly we
wanted to give them lots of love."
Mrs. Bundy detailed Ted's schooling, his boyhood jobs, his Asian studies,
his political activities, his jobs with the Seattle Crime Commission
and the Governor Evans campaign. She might have been a proud mother
at a church social function, bragging about her boy-instead of sitting
in front of a jury begging for his life.
'Tve always had a very special relationship with all my children. We
tried to keep them all equal, but Ted, being the oldest, you might say
was my pride and joy; our relationship was always very special. We'd
talk a lot together, and his brothers and sisters thought of him as
just the top person in their lives, as we all do."
"Have you considered the possibility that Ted might be executed?" Peggy
Good asked quietly.
"Yes, I've considered that possibility. I had to-because of the
existence of such in this state. I consider the death penalty itself
to be the most primitive, barbaric thing that one human can impose on
another. And I've always felt that way. It has nothing to do with what's
happened here. My Christian upbringing tells me that to take another's
life under any circumstances is wrong, and I don't believe the state
of Florida is above the laws of God. Ted can be very useful, in many
ways-to many people-living. Gone from us would be like taking a part
of all of us and throwing it away."
"And if Ted w|re to be confined, to spend the rest of his life in prison?"
»
"Oh," his mothm: answered. "Of course... yes."
For the first time in the long trial, Ted Bundy cried.
There is little question that the jurors felt for Ted's mother; they
were not to be swayed, however, about their opinion of Ted himself.
Larry Simpson voiced the unspoken thoughts in
392
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
Page 432
the courtroom as he finished his arguments for the death penalty.
"The whole four to five weeks that we've been here in this courtroom
has been for one reason. And that is because Theodore Robert Bundy took
it upon himself to act as the judge, jury, and everybody else involved
in this case and took the lives of Lisa Levy and Margaret Bowman. That
is what this case has been all about. They can stand before you and
ask for mercy. How nice it would have been if Lisa Levy's and Margaret
Bowman's mothers could have been there that morning of January 15,1978
and asked for mercy for them."
Peggy Good argued that to kill Ted would be to admit that he could not
be healed. Her argument that it was not a heinous crime was transparently
specious. "One of the factors of the definition (of heinous crimes)
is whether or not the victim suffered, whether there was torture or
unnecessary cruelty to the victims. I believe you recall the testimony
of Dr. Wood where he stated explicitly that both of these women were
rendered unconscious by a blow to the head. They were sleeping; they
felt no pain. They didn't even know what was happening to them. It was
not heinous, atrocious, or cruel because of the fact that they were
not aware of impending death, they did not suffer, and there was no
element of torture involved whatsoever as to the victims who died."
No one, of course, would ever-could ever-know if Lisa or Margaret had
suffered or the degree of that suffering.
The jury debated for one hour and forty minutes, and then returned with
the expected verdict: the death penalty. Judge Cowart, who had already
sentenced three murderers to the electric chair, could override that
decision-should he choose to do so.
The jury would say later that they had been split at one point with
a six-six deadlock, a deadlock that had been broken after ten minutes
of "prayer and meditation."
It was Ted's own cold, nonemotional demeanor in court that had cost
him his life. When he 'had risen to cross-examhie Ray Crew, the police
officer, he had turned off many of the jurors. One commented that the
decision had seemed "a mockery of our system."
On July 31st, Ted had his day in court-unrestrictedspeaking to Judge
Cowart, making, not a plea for his life, but, instead, doing what he
had told me he loved to do ... "being a lawyer."
Page 433
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
393
"I'm not asking for mercy. For I find it somewhat absurd to ask for
mercy for something I did not do. In a way, this is my opening statement.
What we've seen here is just the first round, second round, early round
of a long battle, and I haven't given up by any means. I believe if
I'd been able to develop fully the evidence which supports my
innocencewhich indeed I think created a reasonable doubt-been able to
have quality representation, I'm confident that I would have been
acquitted, and, in the event I get a new trial, will be acquitted.
"It wasn't easy sitting through this trial for a number of reasons.
But the main reason it was not easy in the early part of the case was
the presentation of the state case on what took place in the Chi Omega
House, the blood, the pictures, the bloodstained sheets. And to note
the state was trying to find me responsible was not easy. And it was
not easy, nor did I ignore the families of these young women. I do not
know them. And I do not think it's hypocritical of me, God knows, to
say I sympathize with them, to the best I can. Nothing like this has
ever happened to anyone close to me.
"But I'm telling the court, and I'm telling those people close to the
victims in this case: I'm not the one responsible for the acts in the
Chi Omega House or Dunwoody Street. And I'll tell the court I'm really
not able to accept the verdict, because, although the verdict found
in part that those crimes had been committed, they erred in finding
who cornmitted them.
"And as a consequence I cannot accept the sentence even though one will
be imposed and even though I realize the lawful way the court will impose
it-because it is not a sentence of me; it is a sentence of someone else
who is not standing here today. So / will be tortured for and receive
the pain for that act ... but I will not share the burden or the guilt."
Ted continued with a diatribe against the press: "It is sad but true
that thetmedia thrives on sensation and they thrive on evil and they
Page 434
thrive on things taken out of context"
And Ted, as Always, could see the drama of his legal battles: "And now
the burden is on this court. And I don't envy you. The court is like
a hydra right now. It's been asked to dispense no mercy as the maniac
at the Chi Omega House dispensed no mercy. It's asked to consider this
case as a man and a judge. And you're asked also to render the wisdom
of a
394
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
god. It's like some incredible Greek tragedy. It must have been written
sometime and it must be one of those ancient Greek plays that portrays
the three faces of man."
And so, at long last, there was no one left but Ted Bundy and Judge
Edward Cowart. Antagonists, yes, but the two men had a kind of grudging
admiration for one another. Another time, another place, and it might
have all been so different. Never before had Cowart had such a literate,
educated, wryly humorous defendant come before him. He too could see
the waste, the roads not taken, and yet he had to do what he had to
do. "It is ordered that you be put to death by a current of electricity,
that that current be passed through your body until you are dead."
At that moment, it was clear that Cowart would have wished that things
might have been different. He looked at Ted and said softly, 'Take care
of yourself, young man."
"Thank you."
"I say that to you sincerely; take care of yourself. It's a tragedy
for this court to see such a total waste of humanity that I've experienced
in this courtroom. You're a bright young man. You'd have made a good
lawyer, and I'd have loved to have you practice in front of me-but you
went another way, partner. Take care of yourself. I don't have any
animosity to you. I want you to know that."
"Thank you."
"Take care of yourself."
Page 435
"Thank you."
I watched that scene-not from my seat in the press section-but in front
of my television set at home in Seattle, and I felt the chilling
incongruity of it as keenly as if I had been there. Judge Cowart had
just sentenced Ted to die in the electric chair; there was no way Ted
could "take care of himself."
49
Peggy Good had pleaded in vain for Ted Bundy's life as the Miami trial
neared its close, "The question and the choice is how to punish in this
case. It is necessary that you consider the protection of society, but
there are less drastic ways to consider the protection of society than
taking another life. To recommend death in this case would be to admit
failure with a human being. To recommend death is to confess the
inability to heal, or to consider that there could be no healing."
I have been asked a hundred-a thousand-times what I truly believed about
Ted Bundy's guilt or innocence, and until now I have always demurred.
Now, I would like to attempt to express my thoughts on what made Ted
run. It may be presumptuous on my part. I am neither a trained
psychiatrist nor a criminologist. Yet, after almost ten years of knowing
Ted through all the good times, the bad times, after researching the
crimes he has been suspected of and those he has been convicted of,
after agonizing reflection, I realize that I may know Ted as well as
anyone has ever known him. And I can only conclude, with the most profound
sense of regret, that he can never be healed.
I doubt that Ted will understand the depth of my feeling for him. The
knowledge that he is undoubtedly guilty of the grotesque crimes
attributed to him is as painful to me as if he were my son, the brother
I lost, a man as close to me in many ways as anyone I have ever known.
There will never be a time in my life when I will not think of him.
I have felt friendship, love, respect, anxiety, sorrow, horror, deep
anger, despair and, at the end, resigned acceptance of what has to be.
Like John ttenry Browne, and Peggy Good, like his mother and the women
Page 436
who loved him romantically, I have tried to save Ted's life . . . twice.
Once he knew it, and once he didn't. He received the letter I mailed
in 1976 when I begged him not to kill himself, but he never knew that
I had
395
396
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
tried to arrange a plea bargain in 1979 that might have meant confinement
in a mental hospital instead of the trials that led him inexorably toward
the electric chair. And, like all the others, I have been manipulated
to suit Ted's needs. I don't feel particularly embarrassed or resentful
about that; I was one of many, all of us intelligent, compassionate
people who had no real comprehension of what possessed him, what drove
him obsessively.
Ted came into my life, however peripherally, at a time when all the
beliefs I had held smugly for many years had been shattered. True love,
marriage, fidelity, selfless motherhood, blind trust-all those
marvelous truths were suddenly only wisps of smoke blowing away in a
totally unforeseen gust of wind.
But Ted seemed to embody what was young, idealistic, clean, sure, and
empathetic. He seemed to ask nothing but friendship. He was, in 1971,
a decisive factor in the verification that I was a person of worth,
a woman who still had a great deal to give and to reap. He was most
assuredly not a predatory male eager to "hit on" a newly divorced woman.
He was simply there, listening, reassuring, giving credibility to what
I was trying to become. Such a friend is not easy to turn one's back
on.
I have no idea what I was to him, what I seemed to remain to him. Perhaps
I only gave back to him what he had given to me. I saw him then as quite
perfect, and he must have needed that. Perhaps he could sense an
emotional strength in me, although I surely did not feel it myself at
the time. He may have known that he could count on me when the going
Page 437
grew perilous for him. In times of deepest stress, he would turn to
me, again and again. And I did attempt to help him, but I could never
really assuage his pain because Ted could never bring himself to expose
the soft underbelly of his anguish. He was a shadow man, fighting to
survive in a world that was never made for him.
It must have taken incredible effort.
The parameters of that shadow man were constructed with such care; one
misstep and they could all come apart.
The Ted Bundy the world was allowed to see was handsome, his body honed
and cultivated meticulously, a barrier of strength against eyes that
might catch a glimpse of the terror inside. He was brilliant, a student
of distinction, witty, glib, and persuasive. He loved to ski, sail,
and hike. He faTHE STRANGER BESIDE ME
397
vored French cuisine, good white wine, and gourmet cooking. He loved
Mozart and obscure foreign films. He knew exactly when to send flowers
and sentimental cards. His poems of love were tender and romantic.
And yet, in reality, Ted loved things more than he loved people. He
could find life in an abandoned bicycle or an old car, and feel a kind
of compassion for these inanimate objects-more compassion than he could
ever feel for another human being.
Ted could-and did-rub elbows with the governor, travel in circles that
most young men could never hope to enter, but he could never feel good
about himself. On the surface Ted Bundy was the very epitome of a
successful man. Inside, it was all ashes.
For Ted has gone through life terribly crippled, like a man who is deaf,
or blind, or paralyzed. Ted has no conscience.
"Conscience doth make cowards of us all," but conscience is what gives
us our humanity, the factor that separates us from animals. It allows
us to love, to feel another's pain, and to grow. Whatever the drawbacks
are to being blessed with a conscience, the rewards are essential to
Page 438
living hi a world with other human beings.
The individual with no conscience-with no superego at all-has long been
a focal point for study by psychiatrists and psychologists. The terms
used to describe such an individual have changed over the years, but
the concept has not Once it was called a "psychopathic personality,"
and then it became "sociopath." Today, the term in vogue is "antisocial
personality."
To live in our world, with thoughts and actions always counter to the
flow of your fellow men, must be an awesome handicap. There are no innate
guidelines to follow: the psychopath might well be a visitor from another
planet, struggling to munie die feelings of those he encounters. It
is almost impossible to pinpoint just when antisocial feelings begin,
although molt experts agree that emotional development has been
arrested hi early childhood-perhaps as early as three. Usually, the
inward-turning of emotions results from a need for love or acceptance
not filled, from deprivation and humiliation. Once begun, that little
child will grow tall-but he will never mature emotionally.
He may experience pleasure on only a physical level, an
398
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
excitable "high," and a sense of euphoria from the games he substitutes
for real feelings.
He knows what he wants, and, because he is not hampered by guilt feelings
or the needs of others, he can usually achieve instant gratification.
But he can never fill up the lonesome void inside. He is insatiable,
always hungry.
Hie antisocial personality is mentally ill, 'but not in the classic
sense or within our legal framework. He is invariably highly intelligent
and has long since learned the proper responses, the tricks and
techniques that will please those from whom he wants something. He is
subtle, calculating, clever, and dangerous. And he is lost.
Dr. Benjamin Spock, who worked hi a veterans' hospital dealing with
Page 439
emotional illnesses during World War H, cornmented at the time that
there was a pronounced cross-sex problem hi dealing with psychopathic
personalities. The male psychopaths had no difficulty in bewitching
female staff members, while the male staff picked up on them rapidly.
The female psychopaths could fool the male staff-but not the women.
Ted's retinue of friends and companions was always heavily weighted
with women. Some loved him as a man. Some women, like myself, were drawn
to his courtly manners, his little boy quality, his seemingly genuine
concern and thoughtfulness. Women were always Ted's comfort-and his
curse.
Because he could control women, balance us carefully in the tightly
structured world he had manufactured, we were important to him. We seemed
to hold the solution to that dead hollow place inside him. He dandled
us as puppets from a string, and when one of us did not react as he
wanted, he was both outraged and confused.
I believe men, on the other hand, were a threat. The one man whom he
felt he could emulate, the man whose genes and chromosomes dictated
who he was, had been left behind. When Ted told me for the first time
about his illegitimate birth, I sensed that he seemed to consider himself
a changeling child, the progeny of royalty dumped by mistake on the
doorstep of a blue-collar family. How he loved the thought of money
and status, and how inadequate he felt when he found himself with women
who were born to it.
Ted never really knew who he was supposed to be. He'd been taken away
from his real father, and then taken away from his grandfather Cowell
whom he loved and respected.
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
399
He could not, would not, use Johnnie Culpepper Bundy as a role model.
I think his feelings toward his mother were marked with a raging
ambivalence. She had lied to him. She had robbed him of his real father,
although rational consideration shows that she had no choice. But half
Page 440
of Ted was gone, and he would spend the rest of his life trying to make
up for mat loss.
Still, he clung to his mother, tried to live up to her dreams that he
must excel, that he was her special child who could do anything. Of
aU the women that Ted was involved with romantically, it was Meg Anders
who lasted the longest-and it was Meg who was the most like Louise Bundy.
Both of them are small, almost frail, women. And each was left alone
with a child to raise. Each of them traveled far from their family homes
to start a new life with that child. Meg Anders and Louise Bundy are
the two women who, I believe, suffered the most agony when Ted's facade
shattered.
The men that Ted was drawn to were all men of power, either through
their accomplishments, their intellect, or their easy mantle of
masculinity: his lawyer friend in Seattle; Ross Davis, head of the
Washington State Republican Party; John Henry Browne, the dynamic
public defender; John O'Connell, his Salt Lake City attorney; Buzzy
Ware, the brilliant Colorado attorney he lost; Mfflard Farmer, denied
to him by the Florida courts. Policemen had that same kind of
powerespecially Norm Chapman of Pensacola, who exuded strength,
masculinity, and, yes, the ability to love.
Like a little boy who yearns to be important, to be noticed, Ted played
perverse games with policemen. In many of his crimes, he would assume
their mantle, their badges, and he would, for that time, be one of them.
Although he often called policemen stupid, he needed to know that he
was important to them, if only in a negative sense. If he could not
please them, then he would displease them so much that he had to be
noticed. He had to be so notorious that all other criminals would pale
in comparison.
It is interesting tk consider that when Ted confessed his escape and
his intricate credit card thefts, when he discussed his terrible
fantasies, it was to policemen. His voice on the tapes made in Pensacola
is excited and full of pride. He is triumphant and hi his element on
those tapes, doing exactly what he wants to be doing as if he were laying
a gift before them, expecting praise for his cunning. Those detectives
were
Page 441
400
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
men who could appreciate his cleverness, and, as he said, "I'm in charge
of entertainment..."
I have no doubt that Ted would have given anything in the world to have
been able to change places with big, easy-going, Norm Chapman. Because
that man-whatever his limitations-knew who he was ... and Ted never
had.
Women were easier to deal with. But women held the power to hurt and
humiliate.
Stephanie Brooks was the first to hurt him badly. Although Ted had dated
only infrequently hi high school, he had longed for a relationship with
a woman who was beautiful and wealthy. Stephanie did not make Ted an
antisocial personality; she exacerbated what was already smouldering
there. When she walked away from him after their first year together,
he was ashamed and humiliated, and the rage he felt was out of all
proportion. He was the litfle boy again, a boy who had had a toy wrenched
away from him-and he wanted it back. True, he would smash it-and the
relationship-when he got it back, but he had to have the opportunity
to do that
It took him years, but Ted did accomplish the seemingly impossible task
of reworking the outer Ted until he was able to meet Stephanie's
standards for a potential husband. Then . . . then, he could humiliate
her just as she had humbled him-and he did. Once she had promised to
marry him, he changed suddenly and sent her away. He put her on the
airplane to California without so much as a kiss, saw her stunned face
and turned his back on her.
But it didn't seem to be enough. His revenge brought no lessening of
the void in his soul, and it must have been a terrible realization for
him; he had worked, planned, schemed so that he could reject Stephanie,
sure that he would feel whole and serene again, and yet he still felt
empty.
He still had Meg, and Meg loved him devotedly, would have married bun
Page 442
hi a minute. But Meg was too much like Louise; any love he felt for
either of them was tempered with scorn for dieu: weakness. Somehow,
he would have to punish Stephanie more.
It was, of course, only three days after Stephanie left Seattle in
January of 1974 that Joni Lenz was bludgeoned and raped symbolically
with the metal bed-rod as she lay sleeping in her basement room.
And so the answer to the question put to me so many
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
401
times is yes. Yes, I believe Ted Bundy attacked Joni Lenz, just as I
now am forced to believe that he is responsible for all the other crimes
attributed to him. I have never said it out loud-or in print-but I believe
it, as devoutly as I wish I did not.
The victims are all prototypes of Stephanie. The same long hair, parted
in the middle, the same perfectly even features. None of them were random
choices. I think some of them were chosen-watched for long periods before
the attacks occurred-while others were picked rapidly because they were
convenient targets during those times when Ted was in the grip of his
maniacal compulsion.
But they all resembled Stephanie, that first woman who had pierced Ted's
carefully constructed facade and revealed the yawning vulnerability
beneath. That damage to Ted's ego could never be forgiven. None of the
crimes filled the emptiness. He had to keep kïïïing Stephanie ovet and
ovss agaa, hoping that each time would be the time that would bring
surcease. But the more there were, the worse it became.
Ted had said that "my fantasies are taking over my life," and I don't
believe that he had any control over them. The compulsion that he
excoriated in his first letter to me after his arrest hi Pensacola
dominated Ted; Ted did not dominate the compulsion. He could manipulate
other people, but God help bun, he could not stop himself.
He also said that acting out his fantasies was a "downer," and the depths
of those downers can only be imagined by a rational mind. Since an
Page 443
antisocial personality has no empathy at all for others, it was not
his victims' pain that tormented him; it was that there was no relief
for him.
All of his victims were so lovely, so carefully chosen, that during
the time they were living players in his obsessive rituals, he thought
he cared for them. The rituals themselves left the chosen limp, bleeding,
and ugly. Why did it have to be that way? He detested them for dying,
for becoming ugly, for leaving him-agai%-alone. And, hi the midst of
the awful aftermath of the fantasies, he could not truly comprehend
that it was he who l|ad wrought the destruction.
Madness, yes, but madness is what I am trying to understand. Holding
the reins of power was no fun when there was no one left to terrorize
with that power.
I think the rest of the carefully regimented games came about
accidentally, an extension of the killing games. Driven
402
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
by rage, revenge, frustration, Ted killed. The sexual aspect of the
murders was not a matter of satiating his drives, but rather the need
to humiliate and demean his victims; he felt no true sexual release-only
the blackest of depressions.
It was only after the killings that Ted realized just how newsworthy
he was. He began to exalt in the thrill of the chase, and it became
a part of the ritual, a part even more satisfying than the murders
themselves. His power over the dead girls lasted such a short time,
but his power over the police investigators went on and on. That he
could do these things, take more and more chances, refine his disguises
so that he could come out in the light of day-and still remain
undetected-was the ultimate euphoria. He could do what no other man
could do, and do it with impunity.
How often he would talk to me of being in the limelight, being the Golden
Boy. It became life and breath to him.
Page 444
And the games became more intricate. When Ted was finally arrested in
Utah in 1975 by Sergeant Bob
Hayward, he was outraged. One must
understand that he actually felt this sense of indignation. As an
antisocial personality, he could feel no guilt. He had only taken what
he wanted, what he needed to feel whole. He was incapable of
understanding that one cannot fulfill his own desires at the expense
of others. He had not finished with the games, and the stupid police
had ended them before he was ready.
When Ted complained throughout the years about jails, prisons, the
courts, the judges, the district attorneys, the police, and the press,
he was not aware that there was another side to it all. His reasoning
was simplistic, but to him it made sense. What Ted wanted, Ted should
have, and there was the blind spot in his superior intelligence. When
he wept, he wept only for himself, but his tears were real tears. He
was desperate, and afraid, and angry, and he believed that he was
completely within his rights.
To convince him otherwise would be akin to explaining the theory of
relativity to a kindergarten child. The mechanisms needed to understand
the needs and rights of others are not integrated into his thinking
processes.
Even today, I cannot hate him for that; I can only feel profound pity.
Ted has often bragged to me that psychiatrists and psychologists could
find nothing abnormal about him. He had
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
403
masked his responses, another red-flag indicator of the antisocial
personality.
Dr. Hervé Cleckley, the Augusta, Georgia psychiatrist who interviewed
Ted prior to his Miami trial (the evaluation that Ted felt he was tricked
into), is an expert on the antisocial personality, and he acknowledges
that standard tests seldom reveal this aberration.
Page 445
"The observer is confronted with a convincing mask of sanity. We are
dealing not with a complete man at all, hut with something that suggests
a subtly constructed reflex machine which can mimic the human
personality perfectly."
The antisocial personality does not evince the thought disorder
patterns that are more easily discerned; there are few signs of anxiety,
phobias, or delusions. He is, in essence, an emotional robot, programmed
by himself to reflect the responses that he has found society demands.
And, because that programming is often so cunning, this personality
is extremely hard to diagnose. Nor can it be healed.
My first niggling doubt about Ted's personality came when he forgave
Meg so quickly for betraying him to the police. True, he had loved her
to the extent he was capable of loving, and Meg had never humiliated
him. He was the dominant partner in then- relationship, and he had
humiliated her again and again. But he never viewed her betrayal as
an act of revenge on her part I think she may have been the one woman
in his life who helped to fill even a small corner of his barren soul.
Although he could not be faithful to her, neither could he exist without
her.
And so, because he needed her so much, he seemed able to obliterate
any vestiges of resentment toward her. Because it was essential to have
her emotional support, he could forgive her for her weakness. But it
was such a flat response, so eerily unhuman for him to be able to simply
forget that it was Meg who had caused him to be caught I am quite convinced
that without Meg's interference the identity of 'Ted" would still be
a mystery tèday.
Ted's psyche sol dominated Meg's that I am amazed that she was ever
able to break free, and I don't know how free she is-even though she
is married to another man.
Sharon Auer was merely expedient; she was there in Utah when he needed
someone to run errands and bring supplies into prison, but he left her
behind when he left Point-of-theMountain. Carole Ann Boone soon filled
the gap; Ted has
Page 446
404
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
never been without a woman at bis beck and call since his legal troubles
began. Carole Boone has endured. She refers to him as "Bunnie," and
plainly adores him. I could not presume to evaluate what his feelings
are for her. I talked at length to his other women; Carole Ann said
only five words to me. As he told me, "She has thrown in her lot with
me," but it is certainly a blighted romance.
There is, within all imperfect mechanisms, a tendency to self-destruct,
as if the machine itself realizes that it is not functioning correctly.
When the mechanism is a human being, those destructive forces writhe
their way to the surface from time to time. Somewhere, hidden deeply
in the recesses of Ted's brain, there is a synapse of cells mat is trying
to destroy him.
Perhaps that first Ted, the small-child-Ted who could have become all
that was promised, knows that the Ted who has taken over must be done
away with. Or is that too farfetched? The fact remains that Ted has
constantly struck out at the very people who lave tried to defend him.
Over and over, he has fired his attorneys-sometimes within sight of
victory. He chose the most dangerous state in the union to flee to,
knowing that the death penalty was a real threat there. Given a chance
to plea bargain for his very life, he tore up the motion that would
have saved him and virtually dared the state prosecutors to convict
him-a challenge they were only too willing to accept I think he wants
to die. I don't know if he realizes that he does.
In my opinion, Ted is not a Jekyll-Hyde. I have no doubt at all that
he remembers the murders. There may be some overlapping, some
blurring-just as a man may not remember distinctly every woman he has
ever slept with. How many times has he told me that he is able to put
the bad things that have happened to him out of his mind? The memories
may lie hidden like festering boils-but he does remember. The memories
can no longer be left behind, because he has no place left to run, and
they must haunt his cell in Raiford Prison.
My own memory haunts me. The precognition of the dream-the nightmare-I
had in April of 1976 frightens me. Why did I dream that the baby I tried
Page 447
to save bit me? That dream where I saw the bite mark on my hand was
two years before the bite mark on one of Ted's Chi Omega victims became
the prime piece of physical evidence in the Miami trial.
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
405
If only Ted had talked to me during our last meeting in Seattle in January
of 1976, it might have been different When he said, "There are things
I want to tell you .. . but I can't," was there something I could have
said that would have allowed him to talk to me then? Could I have changed
any of the events that were to come? Although Ted insists he bears no
guilt for any of the killings, I am sure there are many others who,
like I, carry feelings of guilt because we should have known more, done
more-before it was too late.
Ted would have lived if he had confessed to me in the state of Washington.
We had no death penalty here in 1974. He would have lived in the state
of Colorado. The state of Florida will never let him go-not even to
stand trial for Caryn Campbell's murder in Colorado. Colorado let him
escape twice, and Florida authorities are scornful of their security.
Ted Bundy belongs to Florida.
Killing Ted will accomplish nothing at all; all it would assure is that
he could never kill again. But looking at the broken, confused man in
the courtroom, I knew that Ted was insane. I cannot justify executing
a man who is insane. Placing bun in a mental institution-with the
tightest security possible-could perhaps do more toward psychiatric
research into the causes and, hopefully, cures for the antisocial
personality than the evaluation of any other individual hi history.
It might save the potential victims of antisocial personalities still
being formed. Ted can never go free; he is dangerous and he will always
be dangerous, but there are answers to vital questions locked in his
mind.
I don't want him to die. If the day comes when he is led into the death
chamber at Raiford Prison, I will cry. I will cry for that long-lost
Page 448
Ted Bundy who might have been, for the bright, warm young man I thought
I knew so many years ago. It is still difficult for me to believe that
the facade of kindness and caring I saw was only that, a thin veneer.
There could have been-should have been-so much more.
But if Ted is toldie, I think he will muster the strength to do it with
style, basking for the last time in the glow of strobe lights and
television cameras. If he is relegated to the ranks of prisoners-the
General Population-that will be the worst punishment of all. If he is
not killed by his fellow prisoners, who have been vocal that "Bundy
should fry," the emptiness inside himself will destroy bun.
406
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
When I grieve for Ted, and I do, I grieve for all the others who bear
no guilt at all.
Katherine Merry Devine is dead...
Brenda Baker is dead ...
Joni Lenz is alive ...
Lynda Ann Healy is dead...
Donna Manson is gone...
Susan Rancourt is dead ...
Roberta Kathleen Parks is dead...
Brenda Ball is dead ...
Oeorgeann Hawkins is gone...
Janice Ott is dead ...
Denise Naslund is dead...
Melissa Smith is dead...
Laura Aime is dead ...
Carol DaRonch Swenson is alive...
Debby Kent is gone ...
Caryn Campbell is dead...
Julie Cunningham is gone...
Denise Oliverson is gone ...
Page 449
Shelley Robertson is dead...
Melanie Cooley is dead...
Lisa Levy is dead...
Margaret Bowman is dead...
Karen Chandler is alive...
Kathy Kleiner DeShields is alive...
Cheryl Thomas is alive...
Kimberly Leach is dead...
One day, the earth and the rivers may give up more remains, all that
is left of the young women whose names are still unknown-the women Ted
referred to when he said, "Add one more digit to that and you'll have
it..."
None of them could fill the hollow soul of Ted Bundy.
Epilogue
The trials and hearings of Ted Bundy had become akin to a Broadway play,
its long run ended, replaced by a road cornpany. Only the star remained
in the lead role, surrounded by a new cast. And the star was tired.
He had lost much of his enthusiasm. Ted's trial in the Kimberly Leach
case puzzled laymen. "How many times can you kill a man?" they asked
incredulously. Since Ted Bundy had already been sentenced to
death-twice-they could not see the need foi yet another trial. The State,
of course, was covering its bets. If there should be a reversal on appeal
in tbe Chi Omega killings, they wanted the back-up of a third death
sentence. Legally, it made sense.
The Leach trial was postponed again and again, finally settling in
Orlando, Florida on January 7, 1980. Orange County was a grudging host;
they didn't want Ted or the hoopla that seemed to accompany him, but
Judge Wallace Jopling, the sixty-two-year-old jurist who would preside
at the Leach trial, had determined he could not find an impartial jury
in the Lake City area.
The roster of attorneys had changed; only Lynn Thompson remained of
the original defense team. Thompson was joined by Julius Victor Africano,
Page 450
Jr. The man who might have defended Ted was Milo I. Thomas, Public
Defender for the Third Judicial Circuit-but Thomas excused himself;
he was a close friend of the Leach family.
Jerry Blair of the State Attorney's Office-Jerry Blah- who had vowed
to himself in June of 1979 that, if Ted wanted a trial, Ted would get
a trial-and Bob Dekle, a down-home, good-ole-boy lawjer with a perpetual
chaw of tobacco tucked in one cheek, a special prosecutor, would speak
for the state.
There was a pronounced malaise among the reporters who had covered the
Miami trial; nobody really wanted to go through a second trial. Tony
Polk of the Rocky Mountain
407
408
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
News wasn't going. A Seattle reporter had to go on assignment, but he
dreaded it. A Miami reporter called me and said, "Yeah . . . I'm going,
but not until I have to. I'm just going up for the kill." And then he
gasped and said, "God, that sounds awful, doesn't it? But it's the only
way to describe it."
I didn't go. I knew what the evidence was, I knew what the witnesses
were going to say, and I could not bear to see Ted again in the state
he had come to. Instead, I watched the Orlando trial on television and
saw a man who might well have been a complete stranger to me.
Ted was no longer as handsome as he'd been at the Miami trial. His weight
hovered near 190 pounds, his jowls bulged, and his eyes were sunken.
The lean, cleanly denned good looks were gone, along with his tenuous
grasp of reality. He flared with temper easily, and seemed about to
blow into fragmented pieces. He took offense when a court stenographer,
a woman who smiled naturally, appeared to him to be making light of
the proceedings.
"Would you please take this seriously!" he shouted at her.
But no one seemed to take it seriously; they had come to see the show.
Page 451
A local disc jockey had set the tone of the trial by opening his morning
broadcast with "Watch out, girls! Ted Bundy's in town."
A female impersonator from Pennsylvania made a dramatic entrance,
swirling his fake leopard jacket and tossing his platinum wig as he
sashayed to a seat. Ted never looked up. A young man removed his jacket
to reveal a tee shirt reading "Send Bundy to Iran." And, in the front
row, were the ever-present Ted groupies, anxious for a smile from the
fading star.
The television camera might as well have focused on the inmates of
Bedlam.
Neither Louise or Johnnie Bundy made the trip back to Florida. There
was only Carole Ann Boone, sitting beside the wife of an inmate from
Raiford. Carole Ann, still flashing Ted looks of love and encouragement.
The prospective jurors, available from a seemingly endless pool,
appeared willing to say almost anything so that they might be chosen.
Judge Jopling had ruled that even those potential jurors who believed
Ted guilty might be chosen if they indicated they could put aside their
opinions and remain objective. Several of those prospective veniremen
made the jury.
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
409
There was nowhere else in Florida where the trial could go. Prosecutor
Blair said a change in venue would be an exercise in futility. "This
man is a cause célèbre here and he would be a cause célèbre in Two Egg,
Pahokee, or Sopchoppy as well."
Twice, Ted stalked out of the courtroom, a demonstration against the
jury being seated. "I'm leaving. This is a game and I won't be a party
to it! I'm not staying in this kind of Waterloo, you understand?"
Returned and calmed down until he had a modicum of control, he blew
up again, slamming his hand on Judge Jopling's desk. "You want a circus?"
he cried to Blair. "I'll make a circus. I'll rain on your parade, Jack.
You'll see a thunderstorm."
Page 452
Ted headed for the door and a bailiff blocked his way. Ted set down
the beer carton he carried his flies in on a railing and removed his
jacket. The television camera caught, for the first time, a Ted Bundy
out of control. He was backed to the wall, a snarling fox caught in
a circle of hunters. It may have been the face contorted with
open-mouthed rage that his victims had seen, and it shocked me. He
appeared to be about to come out swinging at the five court officers
who surrounded him. He stood panting, trapped. A moment passed ... two ...
Ted and his tormentors were frozen.
"Sit down, Mr. Bundy!" Jopling ordered.
"You know how far you can push me!"
"Sit down, Mr. Bundy!"
Slowly, he came back to himself, slumped, all the fight gone out of
him. He walked back to the defense table and slid into his chair, eyes
downcast.
"It's no use," he stage-whispered to Africano. "We've lost the jury.
There's no point in playing the game."
He may well have been right.
Day after day, Ted sat in confusion and anger as sixty-five prosecution
witnesses took the stand. Africano and Thompson fought it all, digging
their heels in for some kind of foothold as they were forapd back and
back. This time, they would not allow Ted himsett to speak, although
he was allowed to participate in legal arguments away from the jurors'
ears.
Three weeks into the trial, Ted made a twenty-minute plea for acquittal
in Jopling's chambers. His voice quavering, he seemed on the edge of
tears as his monologue drifted, a far cry from his ordered, precise
arguments in Utah four years
410
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
earlier. He insisted that there was no evidence that a murder had even
been committed.
Page 453
The defense presented two witnesses who had allegedly seen Kimberly
Leach hitchhiking "near Jimmy's Buttermilk Chicken place" on the
morning she disappeared. But they faltered when asked to identify her
picture absolutely as that of the girl they'd seen two years before.
Even the testimony of Atlanta Medical Examiner, Dr. Joseph Burton,
backfired. He had apparently been retained to bolster the defense claim
that Kimberly Leach could have died of other causes, and he clearly
could not do that.
"While my study of findings could not rule out accidental, suicidal,
or natural causes, all three were way down on the list."
On February 6th, the most startling rumors in the courthouse concerned
Carole Ann Boone. Ms. Boone had applied for a marriage license! Whether
there was any way she could, indeed, marry the man she called Bunnie
was questionable. Major Jim Shoulz, County Director of Corrections,
was adamant that there would be no wedding in his jail. But Judge Jopling
authorized a blood test for Ted to fulfill an initial requirement for
the license.
Carole Ann admitted that she fully expected Ted to be convicted, but
she was determined to marry him anyway. The odds were not on the chance
of acquittal; spectators were betting on whether Ted and Carole Ann
could get married. Ted himself had bet Africano that the jury would
find him guilty in three hours. He lost. They took seven and a half
hours, a half-hour more than the Miami jury had.
This time there was no weeping mother begging for her perfect son; there
was only Carole Ann Boone. It was two years to the day since
twelve-year-old Kimberly Leach had vanished: February 9, 1980. Carole
Ann took the stand to plead for Ted's life.
But first, and seemingly foremost, she had a mission; she wanted to
become Mrs. Ted Bundy. She had meticulously researched how one got
married in Florida, given the peculiar circumstances. She knew that
public declaration, properly phrased, in an open courtroom in the
presence of court officers would make the "ceremony" legal. A notary
public, holding the marriage license in the names of Carole Ann Boone
and Theodore Robert Bundy, sat watching as Ted rose to question his
fiancée.
Page 454
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
411
The bride wore not white, but black-a skirt and sweater over an
open-necked blouse. The groom, who had always favored bow-ties, wore
one with blue polka dots and a blue sports jacket. The jury wore looks
of utter bemusement.
The couple smiled at each other, as if they were the only two people
in the courtroom, as he began to question her formally.
"Where do you reside?"
"I am a permanent resident of Seattle, Washington."
"Could you explain when you met me ... how long you have known me, our
relationship," he said, leading her.
Carole continued to smile happily as she recalled their meeting in
Olympia at the Department of Emergency Services office, of the closeness
they had achieved as Ted's legal problems increased. "Several years
ago, our relationship evolved into a more serious, romantic sort of
thing."
"Is it serious?" Ted asked.
"Serious enough that I want to marry him," she said to the jury.
"Can you tell the jury if you've ever observed any violent or destructive
tendencies in my character or personality?"
"I've never seen anything in Ted that indicates any destructiveness
towards any other people, and We been associated with Ted in virtually
every circumstance. He's been involved with my family. I've never seen
anything in Ted that indicates any kind of destructiveness . . . any
kind of hostility. He's a warm, kind, patient man."
Over the prosecution's objections, Carole Ann stated that she felt it
was not correct for either an individual or a representative of the
state to take the life of another human being.
She turned toward the jury and spoke with an intensity, "Ted is a large
part of my life. He is vital to me."
"Do you want to marry me?" Ted asked.
"Yes."
Page 455
"I do want to marry you," Ted said, as the state lawyers and Judge
Joplifig froze with surprise. It took Dekle and Blair a few beats Before
they were able to rise and object
Ted turned tofonfer with his attorneys. He'd almost blown it; he'd used
the wrong terminology. They told him marriage was a contract-not a
promise. He would have one more chance on re-direct to make his verbal
contract
State Attorney Blair questioned Carole Ann, suggesting that there might
be a less romantic reason than true love be1
412
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
hind her desire to marry Ted. He hinted that there might be financial
reasons, but Carole remained unmoved. He questioned the timing of the
proposal, coming as it did just as the jury was about to deliberate
on the death penalty. Carole Ann would not be shaken. As Blair
cross-examined her, Ted conferred frantically with his lawyers.
He rose to question her on re-direct. This time he knew what he was
supposed to say to be sure the marriage was valid.
"Will you marry me?" Ted asked Carole Ann.
"Yes!" she replied with a giggle and a broad smile.
"Then I do hereby marry you."
Ted grinned expansively. It was done before the prosecutors realized
it. Carole Ann and her Bunnie were now man and wife.
Most of the eyes in the courtroom were decidedly dry, and there would
be no honeymoon. The second anniversary of Kimberly Leach's death was
now Ted Bundy's wedding day. Carole Ann had prevailed; she had remained
loyal and omnipresent. Stephanie, Meg, and Sharon were now relegated
to Ted's dim past. One got the impression that Carole Ann's tenacity
was such that she might indeed wrest Ted from the very arms of the
electric chair if it came to that.
And it seemed that it would come to that. After listening to Jerry Blair's
Page 456
characterization of the wedding as "a little Valentine's Day charade,"
and to Ted's own forty-minute rambling plea for his life, the jury
retired for forty-five minutes to deliberate on the question of the
death penalty.
It was 3:20 P.M. on February 9th when they announced their decision
that Ted must die. He rose in his chair and shouted, "Tell the jury
they were wrong!"
On February 12th, Judge Jopling sentenced Ted to diefor the third time-in
the electric chair in Raiford Prison. As Ted stood to receive that
sentence, he carried a red envelope in his hand: a valentine for his
bride.
Within an hour, Ted was in a helicopter lifting off the courthouse roof,
headed back to Raiford Prison. In the language of Florida state law,
he had been convicted once again of a crime "extremely wicked, shockingly
evil, and vile."
There would be appeals ahead, predicted to take years, but for all
intents and purposes, the Ted Bundy story was over. Locked away from
the rays of the limelight, the rays that for Ted seem necessary to sustain
life, I know that he will continue to sink deeper and deeper into the compulsive madness that grips
him. He will never again be the Golden Boy beloved by the media.
Ted Bundy is a killer. A three-times convicted killer, a throwaway man
now.
I cannot forget his phone call in October, 1975, the call where he said
calmly, "I'm in a little trouble-but it's all going to work out. If
anything goes wrong, you'll read about it in the newspapers."
I
I
Page 457
Afterword
As I write this, it has been six years since Ted Bundy was sentenced-for
the third time-to die in Florida's electric chair. In my naivete in
1980,1 ended The Stranger Beside Me by suggesting that the Ted Bundy
story was at last over. It was not. I vastly underestimated Ted's ability
to regenerate in both spirit and body, to pit his will and mind
continually against the justice system. Nor was I able to extricate
Ted from my mind simply by putting him and my feelings about him on
paper. The relief that I felt when I wrote the last line was immense.
This book was a healing catharsis after a half-dozen years of horror.
But the next half-dozen years have forced me to accept that some
significant part of my consciousness will be inhabited by Ted Bundy
and his crimes-for as long as I live. I have written five books since
The Stranger Beside Me, and yet when my phone rings or a letter comes
from somewhere far away-several times a week still-the questions are
invariably about "the Ted book."
My correspondents fall generally into four categories. Laymen have
contacted me from as far away as Greece, South Africa, the Virgin
Islands-consumed with curiosity about Ted Bundy's eventual fate. Most
of them ask, "When was he executed?" Police investigators call wondering
where Ted Bundy might have been on a particular date (Ted's comments
to Pensacola detectives that February night he was captured in 1978
are well-remembered by homicide detectives all over America. Although
officially a murder suspect in only five states, Ted told Detective
Norm Chapman and Don Patchen that he had killed "in six states" and
that they should "add one digit" to the F.B.I's victim estimate of 36).
414
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
415
The calls that surprised me most were from Ted's burgeoning "fan
club"-unofficial but passionately vocal. So many young women who had
"fallen in love" with Ted Bundy and who wanted to know how they could
Page 458
contact him to let him know how much they loved him. When I explained
that he had married Carole Ann Boone, my words fell on deaf ears. I
finally asked them to read my book once more, asking, "Are you sure
that you can tell the difference between a teddy-bear and a fox?"
Almost as fervent were the religious readers who hoped to get word to
Ted so that they might prevail upon him to repent before it was too
late.
Finally, there were the callers that Seattle policemen refer to as
"220's"-people deranged to greater and lesser degrees -who imagined
that they had some bizarre connection to Ted.
The latter were the most difficult to deal with. An elderly woman came
to my door near midnight, regal and impeccably dressed-and yet
distressed because "Ted Bundy has been stealing my nylons and my
panty-hose. He's been coming into my house since 1948-and he takes my
personal files. He's very clever; he puts everything back so that you
can scarcely tell it's been moved . . ."
It did no good to point out that her "thefts" had begun when Ted was
still a toddler.
Her visit did, however, make me realize that I could no longer have
my home address printed in the phone book.
In ways that I could never have imagined, Ted Bundy changed my life.
I have flown two hundred thousand miles, lectured a thousand times to
groups ranging from ladies' book study clubs to defense attorneys
organizations to police training seminars to the F.B.I. Academy-always
about Ted. Some questions are easy enough for me to answer; some may
never be answered and s|>me provoke more and more questions in an endless
continuum.
If, indeed, Ted claimed to have murdered in six statesthen which state
was the sixth? Had there really been a sixth state-a hundred and thirty
six victims or, God help us, three hundred and sixty victims? Or had
it been, for Ted, a game
416
Page 459
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
to play with his interrogators in Pensacola? His cunning jousts with
police were always akin to Dungeons-and-Dragons, and he so delighted
in outwitting them, watching them scurry around to do what he considered
his bidding.
There may well have been myriad other victims, and yet it is an almost
impossible task to deduce precisely where Ted Bundy was on a particular
date in the late sixties and early seventies. I have tried to isolate
periods of that time almost
20 years ago now, and so has Bob Keppel, the one-time King County
detective who knows as much about Ted as any cop in America. But Ted
was always a traveler, and an impulsive wanderer at that; he would say
he was going one place, and head somewhere else. He hated to be made
accountable for his whereabouts-by anyone-and he reveled in popping
up to surprise those who knew him.
1969 found Ted visiting relatives in Arkansas, and attending classes
at Temple University in Philadelphia, his childhood home. In 1969, a
beautiful dark-haired young woman was stabbed to death far back in the
"stacks" of the library at Temple. That case, more than a decade unsolved,
came back to a Pennsylvania homicide detective when he traced Ted's
journeys in my book. In the end, he could only conjecture; no one could
place Ted in that library on that evening.
Even more haunting is the unsolved murder of Rita Curran in Burlington,
Vermont on July 19, 1971. Each born in Burlington, Rita Curran and Ted
Bundy were twenty-four years old that summer. Ted had, of course, been
raised on the opposite coast while Rita grew up in the tiny community
of Milton, Vermont, daughter of the town's zoning administrator.
Rita was a very lovely-but shy-young woman. Her dark hair fell midway
down her back. Sometimes, she parted it on the left side; sometimes
in the middle. A graduate of Burlington's Trinity College, she taught
second grade at the Milton Elementary School during the school year.
Like Lynda Ann Healy, Rita spent much of her time and energy working
with deprived and handicapped children. Although she was well into her
twenties, she hadn't really lived away from home until the summer of
1971. She had worked as a chambermaid at the Colonial Motor Inn in
Burlington for three previous summers, but this year was the first she'd
Page 460
taken an apartment
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
417
there rather than commuting from her parents' Milton home ten miles
north.
She was attending classes in teaching remedial reading and language
at the University of Vermont's graduate school, and shared the apartment
on Brookes Avenue with a female roommate. Rita Curran had no steady
boyfriend-and that was probably one of her reasons for spending the
summer in Burlington. She was hoping to meet a man who would be right
for her. She wanted to be married-to have children of her own-and she'd
laughed to friends, 'Tve gone to three weddings this year-all the
bachelors in Milton are taken!"
On Monday, July 19, 1971, Rita changed bedding and vacuumed rooms at
the Colonial Motor Inn from 8:15 a.m. to 2:40 p.m. That evening, she
rehearsed with her barbershop quartet until ten. Rita Curran's roommate
and a friend left her in the apartment on Brookes at 11:20 to go to
a restaurant. Both the front and back doors were unlocked when they
left. Burlington, Vermont was hardly a high-crime area.
People didn't lock doors.
When Rita's friends returned, the apartment was quiet and they assumed
she had gone to sleep; they talked for an hour, and then Rita's roommate
walked into the bedroom. Rita Curran lay nude .. . murdered. She had
been strangled manually, beaten savagely on the left side of the head,
and raped. Her Tom underpants were beneath her body. Her purse, contents
intact, was nearby.
Burlington detectives traced the escape route of the killer, and found
a small patch of blood near the back door leading off the kitchen. He
had, perhaps, dashed through the kitchen and out through the shed beyond
even as Rita's roommate came in the front door. A canvass of neighbors
was fruitless; no one had heard a scream or a struggle.
In 1971, there were approximately 10,000 homicides in America. What
Page 461
irtferigued John Bassett, a retired F.B.I. Special Agent-and also |
native of Burlington-when he read about Ted Bundy was the remarkable
resemblance between Rita Curran and Stephanie Brooks, the fact that
Rita had died of strangulation and bludgeoning to the head . . . and
the proximity of the Colonial Motor Inn where Rita worked to an
institution that had wrought so much emotional trauma in
418
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
Ted Bundy's life: the Elizabeth Lund Home for Unwed Mothers. The Lund
home was right next door to the motel.
I had always assumed that Ted's trip to Burlington had occurred hi the
summer of 1969 when he journeyed East, but John Bassett's call made
me wonder. It was in the Fall of
1971 when Ted spoke to me of "finding out who I really was."
If Ted was in Burlington in July of 1971, if he walked past the building
where he was born, if he-perhaps-even checked into the Colonial Motor
Inn, there are no records whatsoever to confirm or deny it.
There is only a blurred notation hi the Burlington "dogcatcher's"
records that note a person named "Bundy" had been bitten by a dog that
week. . . .
In talking with Bassett, with Rita Curran's parents, and with a detective
from the Burlington Police Department, I too was fascinated by so many
similarities-but there was little I could do to confirm their suspicions
about Ted Bundy. Meg Anders writes hi her book The Phantom Prince that
she saw Ted sometimes that summer, and sometimes he didn't show up for
dates. She had begun to notice a moodiness in him.
But was Ted gone long enough to make a trip to Vermont? And is it simply
too easy to imagine Ted Bundy's shadow wherever a beautiful dark-haired
woman died by strangulation and blows to the left side of the head?
There are many commonalities between Rita Curran's murder and those
that came later and -were attributed to Ted.
How many victims were there for Ted Bundy? Will we ever know?
Page 462
A dozen or more young women have called me since 1980, absolutely
convinced that they had escaped from Ted Bundy. In San Francisco. In
Georgia. In Idaho. In Aspen. In Aon Arbor. In Utah ... He could not
have been everywhere, but, for these women, there are terrified memories
of a handsome man hi a tan Volkswagen-a man who gave them a ride, and
who wanted more. They are sure that it was Ted who reached for them,
and declare that they never hitchhiked again. For other women, there
is a man with a brilliant smile who came to then- door, ingratiating,
and then angry when they would not let hun in. "It was him. I've seen
his picture, and I recognized him."
Mass hysteria? I think yes, for most. For some, I wonder.
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
419
There have been other calls that left no doubt in my mind. Lisa Wick,
nearing forty now, called me. Lisa was the stewardess who survived a
bludgeoning with a two-by-four as she slept in a basement apartment
on Queen Anne Hill in Seattle in the Summer of 1966. Her roommate, Lonnie
Trumbull, died. Like so many of the later victims who were struck again
and again on the head as they slept, Lisa Wick lost weeks of memory
forever.
Lisa did not call to tell me that she had read my book; she called to
say that she could not read my book. "I try to pick it up and read it,
but it is impossible. When my hand touches the cover, when I look at
his eyes, I get sick to my stomach."
Somewhere, buried in her deepest forbidden memory, Lisa Wick knows that
she has seen those eyes before. But long after her physical injuries
have healed, her mind remains bruised, and protects itself. "I know
that it was Ted Bundy who did that to us-but I can't tell you how I
know. . . ."
There have been no calls from Anne Marie Burr-who would be thirty-one
if she was alive. From the night she disappeared from her own home in
Tacoma in August of
Page 463
1962, there has been no sign of Anne Marie. And yet I have had more
calls-with information, and with questions-about Anne Marie than any
of the other victims.
A young woman, whose brother was Ted Bundy's best boyhood friend: "We
lived right across the street from the Bundys-and when that little girl
disappeared, the police were all over our street. They searched the
woods up at the end of the street many times-they questioned everybody
because we lived so close to the Burr's house."
An older woman, now living in a retirement home, who lived near the
Burrs in 1962: "He was the paper boy, Ted was -the morning paper boy.
That little girl, Anne Marie, used to follow him around like a puppy-she
really thought he was something. TheyJcnew each other all right. She
would have gone with him if Se asked her to crawl out the window."
It is so long agjk 24 years.
A young woman called from Florida one day, an assistant in the State
Attorney General's Office. "I'm a Chi Omega," she began, "and I read
your book."
"I was a Chi Omega too-" I said, and she interrupted,
420
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
"no. I mean I was a Chi O at Florida State-I was there in Tallahassee-that
night-in the house when ... he got in."
We talked about how it could have happened-with all those girls-39 of
them-and a housemother. How could anyone have done so much damage-so
quietly-in such a short time?
"He had already scouted it out-that afternoon-I think," she mused. "For
some reason, we were all gone Saturday afternoon, even the housemother.
The house was empty for a couple of hours. When we came home, the
housemother's cat was acting spooked, and its hair was standing on end.
It ran through our legs and out the door-and it didn't come back for
two weeks."
She said some of the girls had felt the presence of a kind of evil that
Page 464
night. The Chi O's had wondered only a little while about the cat's
behavior, but, later that night, at least two of the girls who were
upstairs in the sleeping area had experienced stark terror, a
free-floating dread with nothing to pin it to.
"Kim had a sore throat, and she went to bed early. She got up sometime
during the night to go down to the bathroom to get a drink of water
because she was coughing. She saw that the lights were out in the hallway.
They were almost always on, and it was pitch dark-but she just had a
little way to walk to touch the switch. But she said she suddenly felt
such unreasoning terror-as if something awful was waiting for her. She
had a terrible cough and she really needed a drink of water-but she
backed into her room and locked the door. She didn't come out until
the police banged on the door later. . . .
"And-it must have been a little bit after that-Tina started down the
back stairs-to the kitchen to get a snack. It was the same kind of thing.
She couldn't seem to make her feet go down those stairs. She started
to shake, and she ran back to her room too. She'd felt something-or
someone-waiting down below. . . ."
I had always believed that Margaret Bowman had been Ted's designated
victim that January night in 1978. Margaret looked very much like
Stephanie Brooks; she was a beautiful girl with the same long silken
dark hair. It would have been easy enough for Ted to have spotted her
on the Florida State Campus, or walking near The Oak and the Chi O
house-or
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
421
even at Sherrod's. But how could Ted have known which room Margaret
Bowman slept in?
I asked my Chi Omega caller that. "How did he know just where to go?"
"We had a room plan posted-"
"A room plan?"
"Like a blueprint of the house. Each room had a number, and the names
Page 465
of the girls who had that room were written in."
"Where was it?"
"In the foyer. Near the front door, on the wall there. We took it down
after."
Posted on the foyer wall, right there in the one area of the sorority
house where dates and delivery men . .. and strangers could read it
and pinpoint exactly which room each girl occupied. It would have been
propititious for a man stalking a particular girl.
The Chi Omegas, beseiged by the press, ousted from their rooms by
investigators dusting for prints, gathering evidence, and testing for
blood, were evacuated from the huge house on West Jefferson and farmed
out around Tallahassee with alumnae. They came back two weeks later,
just about the same time the housemother's cat deemed the house safe
again.
I have not been back to the Chi O house in Tallahassee, but I have returned
many times to the Theta house on the University of Washington campus
hi Seattle-with screen writers or magazine photographers-who want to
see where Georgeann Hawkins vanished. It looks the same-the alley behind
Greek Row with students constantly moving back and forth. Night or day,
fraternity boys are still shooting basketballs at hoops nailed to
telephone poles. The cars parked along there are newer models than those
in the police photos-but otherwise, nothing has changed-not even the
sorority itself that was Georgeann's destination.
But when one Considers an extrasensory awareness of danger or evil,
I know I felt it in the narrow space between the Theta House and the
fraternity just to the south of it. On the hottest, sunniest days, the
air is icy, the pine trees there are crippled and blunted, and I want
very much to be away from it, from the cement steps where Georgeann
was to have perched while she threw pebbles at her roommates' window.
422
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
Fear made some of Georgeann's sorority sisters drop out of school for
Page 466
a time. A dozen years later, Georgeann Hawkins is still missing. The
sorority girls inside the Theta House seem oblivious to what happened
to her. They were only five or six in 1974; for them, Georgeann Hawkins
might well have vanished in the 1950's.
Ted Bundy's rooming house on 12th. N.B. looks exactly the same as it
did the day he moved out and headed for Salt Lake City. The old rooming
house the next block overwhere the woman was raped by a man in a dark
watch cap -has been razed to make room for the University of Washington's
new law school buildings.
Farther north on 12th N.B., the green house where Lynda Ann Healy
disappeared in 1974 has been painted a dull brown. The main floor is
a pre-school now, and, in the front window, someone has pasted a decal
of-eerily-a huge smiling teddy bear.
Donna Manson has never been found. The campus at Evergreen State College
is even more heavily thicketed with fir trees today. In Utah and Colorado,
the missing are still gone: Debby Kent and Julie Cunningham and Denise
Oliverson.
No more evidence has been found. Not an earring. Not a bicycle. Not
even a faded piece of clothing. All things that were secret a dozen
years ago remain hidden.
When Ted was delivered by helicopter back to the bleak walls of the
Florida State Prison northwest of Starke, he joined over two hundred
inmates on Death Row, the building housing more condemned men than any
other state prison. Compared to Utah's "Point of the Mountain" and the
jails where he'd been incarcerated in Colorado, "Raiford" was a long
step down in the amenities of prison life.
Starke, Florida, is the closest town of any size, with a population
of about a thousand people. Approaching from the east, it appears to
be a shanty town, economically depressed. The houses move from shack
to middle-class closer to the hub of Starke-where the main intersection
is marked by a Western Auto Store.
About three miles west of town, the prison looms on the
Page 467
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
423
left, and there is a neat sign reading "Florida State Prison." Just
past the sign, a visitor turns into the main driveway and proceeds one
hundred yards to the parking lot and the brick administration building.
The prison is fifty yards beyond. It is not a modern concrete fortress;
it is an old prison, stucco and faintly greenish white-not unlike the
pallor of the inmates it holds.
The grounds are perfectly manicured, with bright flower beds; the
driveway and the parking lot paved with carefully troweled cement.
Richard Bugger is the Superintendant of the Florida State Prison. He
is, in a sense, a "lifer" too. Dugger was born on the prison grounds
when his father was the warden. He was raised here. He is Ted Bundy's
contemporary, a tremendously fit, tautly muscled athlete-the
antithesis of the standard movie portrayal of the pot-bellied,
semi-comedic southern warden. Dugger has been described as a rigid man
who goes by the book. He is certainly a no-nonsense prison
superintendant.
Dugger runs his prison meticulously. Trusties keep the flat grounds
of Florida State Prison a tentative oasis in the midst of inhospitable
sandy soil. There is a farm-as all prisons have farms-cows, pigs,
whatever will grow to add to the prison menu.
For Ted-born on Lake Champlain, nurtured on the Delaware River, raised
on Puget Sound-Ted who craved water and trees and the smell of salt
air coming off some sound or bay or ocean, this last stop on his downward
spiral had to be hell. Raiford sits smack dab in the middle of a triangle
of roads surrounding nothing. There are no waterways at all; the air
outside dries the membranes of the nose and throat, or smothers with
mugginess. Beyond the grounds, the vista is endless and barren; there
is a factory down the road, the vegetation is scrabbly palms, and
whatever will grow without water and with too much sun.
The Okefenokle Swamp is approximately fifty miles north of Raiford.
Gainesville (the city Ted once dismissed when his pin stuck there on
a map because it had no large waterways) is thirty-five miles south.
The Gulf of Mexico and the Atlantic Ocean are east and west, each an
easy hour and a half s drive for a free man.
Page 468
It probably didn't matter at all what it was like around
424
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
Raiford. Ted Bundy would not spend time outside the walls. 1 With his
history and expertise at escape, every precaution would be taken that
he would not demonstrate his talents at Raiford. This was something
of a disappointment to a number of burly guards who muttered that they'd
sure as hell like to see the bastard make a run for it-as they'd "enjoy
splattering Bundy all over a wall."
Ted was not destined to be a popular prisoner. Not so much because of
the crimes for which he'd been sentenced-but because of his attitude.
Ted Bundy was a STAR, and that rankled both guards and fellow convicts.
When he wrote to me from the Utah State Prison, Ted had confided that
he was welcome in the "general population"-a sought-after "prison
lawyer." He had not done very well for himself when he played lawyer
in Miami; his counsel was tainted now. Besides, in this southern prison,
he was isolated among all those men struggling not to die. He was alone
in a cell most of the time, a cell once occupied by John Spenkelink
-the convict who had been executed six days before Ted chose to tear
up his "admission of guilt" on May 31, 1979, throwing away what proved
to be his last good chance to elude the death penalty. He would have
been locked up forever-but he would have lived.
If it was a gamble, Ted had lost.
Less than a year later, Ted sat in the dead Spenkelink's cell, a short
walk from "Old Sparky"-the electric chair that would soon hold the record
for electrocuting more convicted killers than any other since the
Supreme Court lifted its ban on the death penalty in 1976.
But Ted was not alone in this ugly life he'd come to. When Carole Ann
Boone spoke her surreptitious vows of marriage in Kimberly Leach's
murder trial on February 9th, she had meant them. She would stick by
her "Bunnie."
Carole Ann did not, however, take Ted's name; she remained "Boone."
Page 469
After the two widely-publicized Florida trials, that was notorious
enough. She and her son, Jamey, who was in his early teens-a dark,
good-looking young man, who impressed newspeople at the Miami trial
as being an exceptionally nice kid-chose to live-not in Starke-but in
Gainesville.
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
425
Carole Boone is an intelligent woman, with advanced degrees and an
impressive job résumé. However, she had spent her financial as well
as her emotional reserves in her fight to save her new husband. Ted
at least, was housed, fed and clothed. Carole Ann and Jamey were on
their own.
No one has ever questioned that Carole Ann believed in Ted's innocence,
unquestioning. I have often wondered if she had truly expected that
Ted would be freed, that they would one day be able to settle down like
a normal family. Her obsession with him had landed her in Gainesville,
Florida on public assistance-at least temporarily. She became only one
of hundreds of prisoners' wives clogging the employment market.
But it did not seem to matter. Nothing mattered but the fact that she
was still close to Ted. She was Mrs. Theodore Robert Bundy, and each
week she could journey up through Starke, turn at the Western Auto Store,
and go three miles out the dusty two-laned road to see her husband.
From time to time, she would write to Louise Bundy to tell her how Ted
was doing. But in essence, Carole Ann had become everything to Ted,
as he had been for her for so many years now.
Whatever he asked for, she would try to give him.
The Stranger Beside Me was published in August of 1980. I had not written
to Ted; he had not contacted me-not since his ebullient phone call just
before his Miami trial. As I wrote this book, I had been startled to
find a great deal of anger surfacing from someplace inside me where
I had unknowingly repressed it for years. I thought that I had juggled
my ambivalence about Ted very well. But listing the murders, detailing
Page 470
the crimes, and being closeted for months in my office where the walls
were papered with the photographs of young wornen who had died
grotesquely changed me.
I thought that «wnetime I would write to Ted-but I wasn't ready when
I finished the book. And I wasn't ready when I went out on a me<ea tour
for "Stranger" in August of 1980.
In seven weeks, I flew to 35 cities, and, in each, talked to interviewers
from radio, television, and newspapers about Ted Bundy. Some of
them-back in 1980-had never heard of him. Some, in surprisingly distant
cities, had watched his trials on television.
426
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
The night shows were different. People listening to their radios out
there in the darkness somewhere are unable to sleep-most of them-for
one reason or another. The callers' voices were more emotional than
daytime listeners', opinions were expressed more freely. Many of them
were angry-but their rage was polarized.
In Denver, on a midnight to three A.M. talk show, the host left me on
the phone-and on the air-for fifteen minutes with a man who bragged
that he had murdered nine women "because they deserved
it"-disconnecting him only when the man threatened to "blow me away"
with his .45 because I was being "unfair" to Bundy. The host walked
me downstairs, pointing out the bullet-proof glass in the lobby-and
helped me into a cab with a perfect stranger-who, fortunately, turned
out to be most protective as he raced me to my hotel. (Later, the host
of that late-night talk show was shot down and killed-in front of his
own apartment house.)
In Los Angeles, I had a similar threat-because I was "too kind" to Ted
Bundy.
But, for the most part, readers understood what it was I was trying
to convey, and I was grateful for that.
My itinerary took me to Florida in September. The closest I came to
Page 471
the Florida State Prison was the day I was in the Tampa-St. Petersburg
area. lust as I went off the air in a radio station in Tampa, an urgent
call came in from a man. The host said that I could not talk, but gave
the caller the number of the next station where I would be interviewed.
But, when I arrived in St. Petersburg, there was only a message. A man
who would not give his name had said it was urgent that he speak with
me-that I would know why, but that he could not stay on the phone.
The next day, I was in Dallas. I never found out who the caller was.
Ted? Or possibly just a "220?"
The St. Petersburg Times' interviewer had told me that he'd come up
with a novel approach for reviewing my book. He had sent it to Râiford
and asked Ted to criticize it-on its literary merits only-promising
the usual thirty-five-dollar payment that book critics received.
Ted would have loved that, I thought-if Vic Africano let him do it.
Ted had not responded, but the book had not been returned.
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME 427
In late September, after weeks on the road, I came home to Seattle for
a few days to rest up for the second half of the tour. There was a letter
waiting for me, a letter postmarked "Starke, Florida" and dated the
day after I had been in Tempa. The handwriting was as familiar to me
as my own.
It was, of course, from Ted.
"Dear Ann,
Since you have seen fit to take advantage of our relationship, I think
it only fair that you share your great good fortune with my wife, Carole
Ann Boone. Please send her $2500 -or more-to: (he gave her address)
as soon as possible.
Best regards, ted."
Curiously, my immediate reaction was one of guilt. Emotion without
rationale: What have 1 done to this poor man? And then I remembered
that I had never once lied to Ted. I had my book contract months before
he was a suspect, I told him about it when he became a suspect, and
Page 472
I reiterated the details of my contract to him many times in letters.
He knew I was writing a book about the elusive "Ted," and still he had
chosen to keep in touch with me, to write me long letters and to call
often.
I believe that Ted felt that I could be manipulated into writing the
definitive "Ted Bundy is innocent" book. And I would have done that-if
I could have. But the Miami trial had exposed his guilt with such
merciless clarity. I had written what I had to write. Now, he was furious
with me, and demanding money for Carole Ann.
That he had lied to me-probably from the first moment I met him-had
not occurred to him.
When I reconsidered, I had to smile. If Ted thought that I was basking
hi riches, he was woefully mistaken. My advance payment for the Book
that one day became The Stranger Beside Me had bjbn ten thousand
dollars-spread over five years-with a third of going to pay my expenses
in Miami.
I glanced in my checkbook. I had twenty dollars in the bank. There would
be more coming, of course; my book was selling very well, but I was
learning as all authors do that
428
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
royalty payments come only twice a year. In 1975, I had offered Ted
a portion of book royalties-if he should choose to write a chapter or
two from his viewpoint, and he had declined.
I reduced his request to a simple equation. I had four children to support;
Carole Ann Boone had only one. Even if I had had the money Ted requested,
it did not seem fair, somehow, that I should help support Carole Ann.
I started to write to Ted to explain my feelings, and, thenfor the very
first time-I truly realized that he could not, would not, understand
or emphathize or even care what my situation was. I had been meant to
serve a purpose in his life; I had been the designated Bundy P.R.
person-and I had failed to produce.
Page 473
For six years, I didn't write to Ted again. Nor he to me.
Ted Bundy, who had been all over the news for five years, virtually
disappeared for months. The word was that he was in his cell, poring
over law books, preparing for appeals. There were three books published
about Ted in 1980-mine included-and the man who once yearned to be
governor of Washington became instead a nationally-known criminal, his
chilling eyes staring back from newstands and bookshelves all over
America.
There was yet another book in 1981. The woman I called "Meg Anders"-Meg
the woman who had been with Ted longer than any other-published her
story, entitled The Phantom Prince: My Life With Ted Bundy.
Meg's real first name is Liz. She used that and a fictitious surname
"Kendall" as her pen name. She did not realize, perhaps, that becoming
an author had made her a public figure. Seattle papers immediately
printed her true name, and her hope for anonymity for herself and her
daughter-fifteen in 1981-was destroyed.
Liz/Meg had received a call from Ted at Pensacola Police headquarters
on the same Thursday night in February, 1978 when I did. In her book,
she intimated that Ted confessed to her the kidnapings of Carol Da Ronch
and Debbie Kentand the murders of Brenda Ball, Janice Ott and Denise
Naslund. She quoted Ted as saying that the police were "years off" when
they speculated about when he had begun to kill
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
429
Liz wrote that she asked Ted if he ever wanted to kill her, and said
he admitted he had tried to kill her once. He had allegedly left her
asleep in her hide-a-bed after closing the damper on the fireplace and
putting towels against the door crack. She had awakened, she wrote,
with streaming eyes, choking in a smoke-filled room.
Liz Kendall's book, published by a Seattle firm, may well have caused
her more grief than comfort. Families of the victims bombarded radio
stations where she was interviewed, demanding to know why-if Ted had
Page 474
confessed to her-she had not told the police. Many callers reduced Liz
to tears, as she tried to explain that everything was being taken out
of context. No, Ted had never actually confessed to her.
At the end of June, 1980, Liz got a last letter from Ted, mailed-not
from the Florida State Prison-but forwarded by Carole Ann Boone (Bundy.)
Oddly, Ted berated lAz for going to the police and telling them "fairly
uncomplimentary" things about him. Why would he have been so angry at
that late date? I can remember so well having lunch with Ted in January,
1976 when he told me that he knew it had been Liz who turned him in
to the Salt Lake County Sheriff-"but I love her more than ever."
Whatever Ted's reason was for castigating Liz, he called her weeks later
and apologized. That, she wrote, in the ending of her book, was the
last time she heard from him.
Of all the lives that Ted Bundy damaged irrevocably-beyond those of
the women he murdered-Liz's may head the list. She was-is-a very nice
woman, fighting a hostile world. She loved Ted for a long time. She
may still.
There are no authorized conjugal visits in the Florida State
Penitentiary, no cozy trailers or rooms where inmates may share intimacy
with their spouses. The visitors' room ip-*" Row is well-lighted,
utilitarian, with tables and sto^ to the floor, recipient of wax,
cigarettes, disK ^/- sweat. k *•"'
But there are ways around the rules. O callers is a woman who visits
a relativ £ jï&j
Penitentiary's Death Row. Like w ~ f errv
cinated to catch a glimpse of the ii 4' ?..
she has learned a great deal about gVUligatoraccomplished in the Death Row vish g-irelessly for
430
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
"They bribe the guards," she explains. "Each prisoner who wants sex
with his wife or girlfriend puts up five dollars. After they get a kitty
Page 475
of about fifty or sixty dollars, they draw lots. The winner gets to
take his lady into the restroom or behind the water cooler and the guards
look the other way."
"Have you seen Ted?" I asked her. "What does he look like now?"
"You bet I have. He's real thin. Some of them say he's just gone crazy
in there . . . just purely crazy . . . that they have to keep him doped
up with Thorazine all the time. . . ."
My caller was afraid of Ted Bundy. "His eyes. He just kept staring at
me and staring at me and he never blinks."
But Ted had not gone crazy. He was planning and studying and working
things out in his head-just as he always had. There was the mythic "Ted"
who terrified female visitorsand there was the real Ted, who, if he'd
had a white shirt, a tie, and a suit, could still have sat easily at
the governor's right hand.
During the summer of 1982, Carole Ann Boone wore a jacket when she went
to the prison to visit her husband, despite the baking heat of northern
Florida's July and August. Tall and large-boned, it was easier for her
to hide a growing secret than it would be for a more petite woman.
She was putting on weight. That in itself wasn't unusual. Women whose
men are locked behind bars, who subsist on low incomes, frustration
and meager hope, often eat too much. But Carole Ann's weight was all
around the middle, and to their chagrin, prison authorities saw that
her silhouette was unmistakable.
Carole Ann Boone was pregnant, carrying Ted Bundy's child.
The two of them, together against the world, had managed lo marry by
subterfuge. Now, they had accomplished the conhotion of a child the
same way. whfc
her thi,er; 1932, was a landmark month for Ted Bundy. First and the
new attorney, Robert Augustus Harper Jr. of Tallalund. She ,3 tjje
Florida Supreme Court to overturn Ted's off" when >. the mur(jers of
Lisa J^evy and Margaret Bowkill
Court Case No. 57,772 (Circuit Court No.
Page 476
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
431
78-670) Harper cited the controversial bite-mark evidence and deemed
the hypnosis of a prosecution witness highly suspect. Further, Ted's
attorney claimed that his client had had inadequate legal help at the
time of the Miami trial. (This, when Ted had told me so gleefully just
before trial that that was one area in which he would never have an
appeal. He had been delighted with his attorneys then. . . .)
"Bite-mark evidence is here to stay . . . but at the same time, there
are certain standards that have to be set out," Harper argued. "Richard
Souviron was out to get famous on this case."
Harper also attacked Nita Neary's testimony because it came after
hypnosis. "You can see that a creation of memory occurred. That point
where her memory has been created by a pseudo-scientific process is
improper."
Assistant Attorney General David Gauldin argued for the State that
fairness of the trial was the bottom line, "I think he got a fair trial,
and I think the jury was untainted. . . . He hired and
fired lawyers
at will, all of them publicly provided."
The six Florida Supreme Court justices did not say when they might make
a judgment on whether Ted would get a new trial in the Chi Omega killings.
A new cycle had begun. Ted was attacking again, seeking a new trial-back
in the game. Carole Ann, ponderously-and proudly-pregnant, visited him
regularly that October. As the month neared its close, she entered a
private birthing center where she bore Ted his first child: a daughter.
That was all even the most assiduous reporter found out. No birthweight.
Certainly no name. Only "Baby Girl Boone."
Carole took the infant along when she visited Ted. He was very proud
of his progeny. Ted's genes had prevailed; the baby looked just like
him.
On May 11, 1984, James Adams, a black sharecropper's son, died in the
elftctric chair in Raiford Prison. He was,>^~ fourth man to die since
John Spenkelink.
A month later, pie Florida Supreme Court ap" findings on Ted Bundy's
Page 477
appeal in a thirtj^ > 2C^
ment \ j ? ferry
Ted had lost. Justices Alderman, Adkii \
 ff'dlligatorald, and
Ehrlich swept Harper's argumen " «orelessly for
been, in their opinion, denied the right 1 f
432
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
the public and press had attended pre-trial hearings. He had been granted
a change of venue from Leon County, and the jury had already been selected
and sequestered when the crucial pre-trial hearings were held. But then
again Ted had claimed he'd been deprived of a fair trial because he
had to ask for a change of venue-the press's fault-and lost his right
to be tried in the locality where the charged crimes were committed.
His two complaints were at counter-purposes. But they were both denied,
making it a draw.
On a more salient issue, the Court ruled that Nita Neary's description
of the man she'd seen in the Chi Omega house had not materially changed
after she was hypnotized. The hypnotist could not have suggested that
she describe Ted Bundy; Ted Bundy wasn't even a suspect when Nita Neary
was hypnotized. Nor did the Court feel that the newspaper pictures she
saw later of Ted Bundy had influenced her. The man she saw opening the
front door-with an oak club in one handhad been in profile. The news
photos were all full-face.
Ted had also argued-through Harper-that he had been unfairly tried when
the Dunwoody Street attack on Cheryl Thomas was being joined with the
Chi Omega crimes. The Court found the crimes were "connected by proximity
in time and location, by their nature, and by the manner in which they
were perpetrated."
Point by point, Ted Bundy lost in this appeal. No, the Grand Jury had
not been prejudiced against him when they handed down the original
indictment; he had had adequate opportunity to raise his objections
Page 478
in a timely manner. He had always, always had legal counsel. No, he
could not have a new trial because he'd been denied Millard Farmer.
Nor could he have a new trial because the jury had known that he was
an escapee when he arrived in Florida.
The Florida Justices disputed Ted's claim against the Forensic
Odontologist, Richard Souviron-that Souviron had erred in saying that
it had been Ted Bundy's teeth that left the imprints in Lisa Levy's
buttocks. ". . . We find that it was
horoper for the expert to offer his opinion on the issue of a
and Mnark match; this was not an improper legal conclusion.
lund. S«,ets of appellant's argument on the bite mark evidence
off" whei^t merit ,,
kill. .. . ntencing phase, the dry
legal terminology cannot
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
433
hide the horror: "Next Bundy claims that the trial court erred in finding
that the capital felonies were especially heinous, atrocious, and cruel.
There is no merit to this argument. The victims were murdered while
sleeping in their own beds . . . The trial court also recounted the
gruesome manner in which the victims were bludgeoned, sexually battered,
and strangled. These circumstances are more than sufficient to uphold
the trial court's finding that the capital felonies were especially
heinous, atrocious, and cruel... ."
Although it would seem a moot point-now that Ted knew that there would
be no new trial in the Chi Omega and Cheryl Thomas cases-he proceeded
with his appeal on the Kimberly Leach case: Case No. 59,128.
But his mind was obviously working on other levels-other possibilities
too*
Ted was thin, but he was probably in the best shape he'd been in in
years. He did wind sprints, one-hundred yard dashes, whenever he was
allowed out in the exercise yard, or into the long corridors.
Page 479
And he cultivated his neighbors, tuning in on the grapevine that blooms
so lushly with information throughout a cellblock.
Gerald Eugene Stano resided on the cell to one side of Ted; Ottis Elwood
Toole was on the other side. Stano, 32, had admitted to killing 39 young
women-mostly hitchhikers and prostitutes-between 1969 and 1980. It was
rumored that many of his victims wore blue-a color often favored by
Stano's brother-whom he hated. Convicted of ten murders, he had, like
Ted, been sentenced to death three times over. Toole, 36, most infamous
as Henry Lee Lucas* sometime lover/sometime murder partner, had
admitted to Jacksonville Detective Buddy Terry that it was he who had
kidnapped and murdered Adam Walsh.
Adam was sixtyears old when Toole spotted him near a Sears store in
Holfcrwood, Florida. Toole had, for some reason known only to hiA,
decided that he wanted to "adopt" a baby. He had searched all day and
found no little babies-so he'd taken Adam. When the little boy resisted,
Toole told Terry that he'd killed him and thrown his body into an
alligatorfilled canal. Adam's father, John Walsh, searched tirelessly
for
434
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
his child, and then relentlessly lobbied before Congress until they
passed the Missing Children's Act.
The movie "Adam" has been shown many times on television.
Ted's I.Q. alone nearly equaled Stano's and Toole's cornbined.
In the summer of 1984-following Ted's heavy losses to the Florida Supreme
Court-he came perilously close to repeating his Houdini-like Colorado
escapes. Prison officials arrived to do a surprise shakedown of his
cell just in time. They found hacksaw blades secreted there. Someone
from the outside had to have brought them in to Ted; that person was
never named.
But somehow, someone had gotten the metal blades through all the security
checks. The bars in Ted's cell looked secure, but careful perusal showed
Page 480
that one bar had been completely sawed through at both the top and bottom,
and then "glued" back with an adhesive whose main component was soap.
Could Ted have ever reached the outside? Even if he'd managed to cut
through another bar or two, and wriggled free of his cell, there were
so many obstacles. The entire prison is surrounded by two ten-foot-high
fences, with electric gates that are never opened at the same time.
Rolls of sharp barbed wire bales top the walls and occupy much of the
"pen" around the Death Row cellblocks. The guards are in the tower . . .
waiting.
And that is what Ted would have faced after (and if) he managed to get
past all the safeguards inside Death Row itself, a building separated
from the rest of Raiford Prison.
If he had somehow managed to shed his bright orange teeshirt that marked
him a resident of Death Row and obtained civilian clothing, how would
he have passed through the electric gates. When one gate opens, the
other has already clanged shut. How would he have gotten the hand-stamp?
Every visitor into these dangerous bowels of the Florida State Prison
is required to have his hand stamped-like teenagers leaving a dance.
But the colors change from day to day, without any discernible pattern.
When the visitor leaves, he must hold his hand under a machine that
reveals "the color of the day." Without the stamp-or with the wrong
color, the alarm bells sound. . . .
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME 435
The hacksaw blades were confiscated, Ted was moved to another cell and
it was "tossed" more frequently than before.
He had been "inside" for more than four years. His child was almost
two. There had been no execution date set. He waited, and studied, and
played the games that all prisoners play-but that Ted Bundy, in
particular, played. Anything to put something over on those in
authority.
On May 9, 1985, the Florida Supreme Court ruled once again on Ted's
request for a new trial-this time in the case of Kimberly Leach.
Page 481
Ted's points of law were essentially the same that they had been in
the Chi Omega case. Only the characters were different. An eyewitness
had been hypnotized, prospective jurors had been excluded because they
opposed the death penalty. Ted claimed the judge couldn't bave
determined if the child's murder was "heinous and atrocious" because
Kimberly's body had been too decomposed to tell, having lain so long
in an abandoned pig sty.
Supreme Court Justice James Alderman wrote the unanimous decision,
"After weighing the evidence in this case, we conclude that the sentence
of death imposed was justified and appropriate under our law."
In that May of 1985, I was on Hilton Head Island, South Carolina-scacely
a hundred miles away from Raiford-talking-still talking-about Ted Bundy,
showing the same one hundred and fifty slides that I have shown so many
times. To cops this time-a two-day seminar on "Serial Murder," sponsored
by the University of Louisville's School of Justice Administration.
The term "serial murder" was relatively new, and seemed to have been
coined for Ted Bundy, even though there had been a few dozen more men
who had racked up horrific tolls since Ted's incarceration. Ted Bundy
remained the celebrity seriei killer.
As I spoke to ttte three dozen detectives on the South Carolina island
in the Atlantic Ocean, I mused that Ted had truly become a coast-to-coast
antihero. Less than a month before, I had given the same presentation-on
the Pacific Ocean-to the American College of Forensic Psychistry.
Hilton Head marked a reunion of sorts. Dr. Ron Holmes of
438
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
about. And I knew, leadenly, that it must be. If Ted was not executed,
he would someday, somehow, find a way to escape.
Ted had fired his last lawyer-Harper-just as he eventually dismissed
all the others. He had been representing himself, and he had filed an
appeal for new trials with the U.S. Supreme Court-which was to have
been heard on March 7 -three days after he was now scheduled to die.
Page 482
On February
18, he represented himself again before the Supreme Court by delivering
a hand-written appeal for a stay of execution. Justice Lewis R. Powell
refused to block the execution, but he gave Ted a second chance. He
turned down Ted's somewhat amateurish request "without prejudice" and
instructed him to obtain proper legal counsel "to file an application
that cornplies with the rules of this court."
No one had ever gone to the Florida electric chair on the first death
warrant signed-but that was no guarantee that Ted Bundy would not set
a new record.
In Lake City-where Kimberly Leach had been kidnapped ••-thousands of
residents signed a petition supporting Ted's execution. A nurse whose
daughter had attended Lake City Junior High with Kimberly said, "Many
of those who signed said they would like to sign it twice and would
pull the switch if given the chance. .. ."
Richard Larsen, the Seattle Times reporter (and now Associate Editor)
who wrote one of the 1980 Bundy books, received one of many letters
sent to newspapers around America. It appeared to be an official
communique from the "Office of the Governor, Florida State Capitol,
Tallahassee, Florida,
32304."
It was two pages long, beginning, "Florida Gov. Bob Graham today signed
a cooperative agreement with the Tennessee Valley Authority for more
electricity to be used in the coming execution of convicted killer
Theodore Bundy . . . The power sales contract with TVA will provide
ten additional megawatts of energy to Florida Power & Light in order
to ensure Bundy is executed using the maximum voltage and amperage
allowed . . .
"In addition to the temporary contract for electricity, Graham urged
Florida residents to reduce their electrical usage for a five-minute
period beginning at 6:57 a. m. EST
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
Page 483
439
March 4, 1986. Bundy is scheduled to be executed at 7:00 a.m. on that
date.
"If citizens of the state can turn off all non-vital air conditioning,
televisions, electric dryers and washers during that brief period, we
could have as much as five additional megawatts to pump into the chair ...
"Reddy Communications of Akron, Ohio-owners of the popular Reddy
Kilowatt logo-will prepare a special gold medallion for the event with
the inscription, 'Die Quicker Electrically.' The medallions will be
on sale . . . Proceeds will help defray the tremendous costs associated
with Bundy's prosecution, incarceration, and ultimate execution . .."
It was, of course, a macabre prank, and had not come from Graham's office.
Yet, it reflected that the feeling in Florida about Ted had not changed
much since his Miami trial.
As the March 4th date drew nearer, it seemed that Ted was going to die
within the week.
And then, on February 25th, a Washington D.C. law firm announced that
it would represent Ted without payment. However, Jolly I. Nelson, an
attorney from the firm, said that they had not yet decided if they would
request a stay of execution.
"... We're investigating whether it's advisable . .." On February 27,
the U.S. Supreme Court granted a stay of execution-until April 11, 1986.
Assistant State Attorney Jack Pottinger-who was Chief of Detectives
in Leon County in January, 1978, when the
Chi Omega attack took
place-predicted that it would be a long time before Ted was actually
electrocuted. "Ted's used to manipulating the system all along. He'll
do nothing until the llth hour and come forth with a flurry of things."
Inside Raiford Prison, the word is that Ted Bundy will probably be
executed sometime in the Fall of 1986. One week before the date listed
on his final death warrant, the lights will dim in Raiford-as the chair
is tested. That is not a macabre prank; that realr&happens.
In the early morning of the date itself-whenever that date will be-Ted
wil be led down the long, long walk to "Old Sparky," and a black rubber
mask pulled down over his face. So that he will not see death coming?
Or, more likely, so that witnesses will not glimpse his face as the
Page 484
electricity jolts through his body.
440 THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
It seems ironic that Ted Bundy is in such superb physical condition.
He has become a vegetarian. Because Florida State Prison dieticians
do not cater to individual requests, it was necessary for him to change
his religious affiliation once again. Born and raised a Methodist,
converted to Mormonism just before his first arrest, he is now an avowed
Hindu. He admits that it is a pragmatic conversion; as a Hindu, he has
the legal right to be served a vegetarian and fish diet.
His muscles are defined, his lung capacity is excellent, and his
vegetarian diet prevents atheromic deposits from clogging his arteries.
When he dies, Ted Bundy will be in perfect health.
Ted touched so many, many lives-in one way or another. Since this book
was published, I have met a hundred people who once knew him-in one
segment of his compartmentalized world. All of them look a little stunned
still. Not one has confided that he seemed destined for a bad end. And
I have met a hundred people-more-who knew the victims. As I bend my
head to autograph a book, someone murmurs, "I knew her-Georgeano ...
or Lynda ... or Denise." Once someone said, "That was my sister," and
twice, "She was my daughter. .. ."
I did not know what to say to them.
Nor did I know what to say to Ted when T wrote to him for the first
time in six years. I wasn't even sure -why I wrote, except that it seemed
to me that we had unfinished business. I mailed my letter the day after
his death sentence was announced. I have had no answer. He may have
Tom it up.
People go on as best they can. Several of the parents of Ted's victims
have died early-succumbing to heart attacks. The remains of Denise
Naslund and Janice Ott were lost when the King County Medical Examiner's
Office moved; their bones were cremated mistakenly with those of the
unidentified dead. For Eleanor Rose, Denise's mother, it was only the
last in a series of blows. She had waited years so that she could give
Page 485
her daughter a proper burial. Denise's room and her car remain as they
were on July 14, 1974. Shrines.
One of my callers about Ted was the Mormon friend who persuaded Ted
to join the church in Utah in 1975. Even though Ted had not obeyed the
no-smoking/ no-drinking/
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
441
no-drags tenets of the Mormons, he had seemed earnest and sincere and
good. The Mormon missionary remembered how incensed they had both been
over the murders of Melissa Smith and Laura Aime.
"We sat there at my kitchen table, and the newspapers were spread out
between us, with all the headlines about the dead girls. And I remember
how angry Ted was. He kept telling me that he'd like to get his hands
on the man that would do something like that-he'd see he never had a
chance to do it again.. . ."
-Ann Rule March 2, 1986
I
I
442
THE STRANGER BESIDE ME
ANN R u L E, a former policewoman, has been a crime writer for eighteen
years. She is the author of POSSESSION, the "Andy Stack True Crime
Annals," and the forthcoming SMALL SACRIFICES, the true story of
Oregon's Elizabeth Diane Downs case. Her work has appeared in dozens
of publications, including the New York Daily News, Chicago Tribune,
USA Today, and the Seattle Times, as well as Cosmopolitan, Good
Housekeeping, Ladies Home Journal, and True Detective. She regularly
presents seminars on serial murder to law enforcement groups, has
Page 486
advised the FBI Academy, and testified twice before U.S. Senate
judiciary committees. From 1982 to 1985, she was one of five civilian
advisers to the VI-CAP (Violent Criminal Apprehension Program) Task
Force, which established a network among investigators to track and
trap serial killers. Currently at work on a new book, she lives in Seattle,
Washington.
Page 487
